comment body,comment author,comment id,subreddit
Good we have a wall there. Good luck trying to make it in. ,Nonsenseism,e9oirrs,conservative
I thought the caravan wasn't arriving for weeks or even months. Lamestream media is the worst. ,Iowa_Hawkeye,e9om84m,conservative
"The miscreants over at /r/news have a day old story up that has less than 100 upvotes saying that the US is “hardening” the wall in TJ in preparation for those ‘wayward migrants’. These people complain that “nobody” is talking about the “caravan” anymore, yet downvote and suppress ANY story about it on this overtly biased website. “We know trump is strengthening the border, we’ll still get through.”-the gist from a ‘wayward migrant.’ These people don’t care about our laws. They don’t care if they enter our country illegally. For that, i say I’ve them no chances. IF YOU ENTER THIS COUNTRY ILLEGALLY, YOUVE FORFEITED ALL YOUR CHANCES. You’ve decided to illegally enter a foreign country, in what fucking other first world country would they “give you another chance” to claim asylum? This person broke our laws to enter the country, what makes you think they won’t break the laws when inside our country? The logic is sound and so are immigration laws already on the books being enforced.",Phillipinsocal,e9osrxu,conservative
Good news that the arrival is in CA.  A leftist cesspool who just loves illegal aliens.  Let those there who are actually citizens and pay taxes support them.  And let the lower end blue collar workers see their wages lowered by less demand for US citizen workers actually expecting a higher wage.  Keep voting for leftists and fucking up your own situation. ,stancrouch,e9olqyr,conservative
"Why Tijuana? That is so much further to travel than straight up the east coast of Mexico. Every time we hear about the caravan, something does not make sense. Almost like it was a manufactured crisis. But who stands to gain?",mfinn999,e9opks8,conservative
"I think a NBA Draft participant said it best a couple of years back, in fact he wore it as a hastag on his jacket: RESPECT THE PROCESS. If you want a better life for you and your family, go through the legal channels. What have you to hide if coming in illegally?",ENEB1487,e9ork7t,conservative
"""Libertad Velarde, a Playas de Tijuana resident, watched the young men climb the fence. At least one shimmied down to the U.S. side of the beach and carved HONDURAS into the sand.""

Wall definitely stopped them...",patkavv,e9okc8e,conservative
They made it last time. ,chabanais,e9okkwb,conservative
"So they walked hundreds of miles for a month to a pick a spot where we already have a wall.....?????? 

",bmack083,e9omm3l,conservative
"Walls don't do any good if they aren't guarded, patrolled, and defended.  

If we have a wall but we open the gate, the wall is meaningless.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9opger,conservative
Dont blame CA for a few cities. SD is Republican and so are the farm areas of CA. ,Nonsenseism,e9omv1x,conservative
California would welcome them in and has much more benefits than Texas.,ngoni,e9oqbas,conservative
"California gets to benefit with more house seats by counting illegals as civilians, were gonna have another 3/5 compromise on our hands soon enough.",curlbaumann,e9ovwpn,conservative
I dont even know how that is possible. There is tons of agents there.,Nonsenseism,e9ol9xc,conservative
Weren't most of them let in?  I lived in SD near there for a long time. Very few people make it past the fence/wall. I dont even know how you could.,Nonsenseism,e9ol89v,conservative
"My guess is most of them are not planning on sneaking in but applying for asylum, like last year.",Nonsenseism,e9omr87,conservative
"Although rural areas are still republican, San Diego city limits have turned  DEM the last few cycles since it’s not as strong a military town  as it once was, sadly. I know. I’m here......",keepitreal51,e9ooaee,conservative
"https://i.redd.it/14qcpippa8j01.png

This is an image of the US-Mexican border stretched over Europe.  It's absolutely massive


And this one shows the true size of Mexico 

https://i.redd.it/wvhoa56ocrg11.jpg",Al_Gayda,e9ou8vd,conservative
If a bunch do it they can get in.,chabanais,e9ole26,conservative
"""Asylum.""",FelixFuckfurter,e9oo08s,conservative
:( I have not lived there in a while,Nonsenseism,e9opfco,conservative
Good thing the military is there and Trump is President. They want a fight they will get a fight.,Nonsenseism,e9olk1d,conservative
"They want a ""fight"" so they can use it against him.",chabanais,e9oloa2,conservative
So what is your take on this? What are you hoping for an outcome?,Nonsenseism,e9ona51,conservative
"Summary rejection of the asylum claims based on the fact they crossed through a third country to get here, followed by swift deportation.  
  
50% tax on remittances to Mexico and Central America to pay for the expense.",FelixFuckfurter,e9onsva,conservative
My take is that many will get in although none should.,chabanais,e9or9l1,conservative
I want one. How do I get Mexico to pay for it?,GatorZen,e9oj7gz,conservative
"Man, someone on Etsy could make a killing selling these. 

Edit: Oh fuck, I thought this was just art. You can actually buy these: 

https://keepandbear.com/products/build-the-wall?variant=13672394457178&gclid=EAIaIQobChMI48im6ffT3gIV0LrACh1DOAT9EAQYASABEgL6qvD_BwE",GetAGoddamnBeagle,e9odyz1,conservative
Angry orange man isn’t orange enough!!,bmack083,e9ofx4s,conservative
"Man, this and Trumpy Bear are hitting the 2018 holiday season pretty hard, lol. I'm tempted to buy both and send them to some of the rabid anti-Trump folks I know. ",Maswasnos,e9ogtcq,conservative
"One upvote and I repost this to the_donald

Edit: The populace has spoken",-Stolen_Stalin-,e9onang,conservative
😆,milkboy33,e9os2ct,conservative
"Dang, this and trumpy bear? I cant afford both!",sir_fenwick,e9oufa8,conservative
Excellent spice sir,Metric_Head,e9ouxx4,conservative
"Funny enough, I made this concept for a homework assignment 2 years ago. The prompt was to make a toy that would never be made. So much for that... ",HAL-9,e9ojqz0,conservative
"Haha oh man, bonus points for the stereotypical sombrero guy on the box if he comes with it. 

 I think this could be great for supporters and detractors actually, everyone could use a good laugh at this point.  The jokes with this hit on so many different levels.",Falkamper,e9ohmko,conservative
"Instructions unclear, mexican government paid for it",rigor-m,e9ololo,conservative
GOP = Traitors. Fuck every one of you scum bag hillbillies,SquidDogMonster5000,e9oqegr,conservative
"My girlfriend told me about this yesterday, then my little one saw it and immediately yelled, ""WALL UP!"" I guess it really is the perfect gift for Christmas ",ENEB1487,e9okpee,conservative
Lmao,Biochemhistory,e9opxnq,conservative
I would buy this.,blizzardice,e9op637,conservative
Now I know what I am getting for that liberal family member for Christmas! ,zatikat,e9ooxr6,conservative
Lol dont post this on r/lego. That sub is full of smug parrots.,HotWaffler,e9omo5q,conservative
Indirectly.,SpezTheSpaz,e9on56v,conservative
THAAAAAANNNNKKKK YOU for the link,FranchiseVC,e9oejll,conservative
It comes with extra orange paint!,Prince_P,e9oring,conservative
"lol why I'm anti trump and I want that damn bear for everyone I know with a copy of that commercial.

It was such a good commercial and it had everything.

A deep manly tough guy voice for a children bear with a tie and hair piece.

Powerful imagery helpfully written in fancy semi cursive.

Disrespecting the american flag under the guise of patriotism. 

Wooden infomercial actors.

real /r/wheredidthesodago kinda stuff. ",CartoonJustice,e9os6oj,conservative
Careful now.. that could give them PTSD,AntifaArePathetic,e9omf25,conservative
What class is that for? ,BuSpocky,e9osd9c,conservative
Looks like you’re retroactively getting an F,samurguy990,e9otozt,conservative
"The over-the-topness of it mostly. It's actually a really unique idea because both sides like it, apparently. I guess anti-Trump people like it because it kinda mocks him, and pro-Trump people like it for the extreme patriotism or something. Hilarious either way!",Maswasnos,e9osgi6,conservative
"3D Design, but not digital 3D. Everything had to be physically made. [The project.](https://imgur.com/a/qG24SXU)",HAL-9,e9ouo8q,conservative
"I think the pro trump people who would get it get the irony, but like the trolling potential ",samurguy990,e9otmzi,conservative
agreed,CartoonJustice,e9ouu7s,conservative
"Brian Kemp did a terrible job with this election.

He de-legitimized any sort of win for himself and tainted the process going forward to the point that I think a federal investigation of the entire state is warranted.  Somethings wrong with the states ballots and voting practices, I dont know enough to understand who is at fault but hes the man at top, and as such bears the lions share of culpability here.",Falkamper,e9ohxum,conservative
Brian Kemp trying his darnedest to compete with Brenda Snipes for Worst Election Overseer award,GorathThorgath,e9oh1zp,conservative
So clear voter fraud...this shouldn't stand....but it will,J0kerr,e9ogm53,conservative
"> Bowers, for example, noticed that a machine was marked ""Do Not Touch,"" when she went to vote in July. One poll worker told her votes had been cast on the machine prior to its failure on Election Day.
>
>After the polls closed, Bowser noticed the results tape from the machine showed it hadn't collected any votes.",Roidciraptor,e9oluq1,conservative
"
> Georgia is one of four states that uses voting machines statewide that produce no paper record for voters to verify, making them difficult to audit, experts say.

> Some issues, such as the freezing machines, could be chalked up to the age of the polling infrastructure

> But others, like the incorrect ballots, could have been caused by anything from a clerical error to a malicious manipulation of voter data

> It's possible that there's a connection between the security issues reported at Georgia's Center for Election Systems and the issues chronicled in the court statements, but an immediate switch to paper ballots is necessary regardless

Seriously, I don't understand why there would be no paper trail.  It just seems like common sense.",trendyweather,e9onqdq,conservative
Caravan didn't come on time.,ReaganTroll,e9oeh6c,conservative
Despicable,milkboy33,e9ose7t,conservative
"Non-American here. What's your view of electronic voting in relation with paper ballots?

Being from a country where we have voter id and paper ballots, I always struck me as odd that the US's elections have massive problems when compared to others.

If every thing was done well, you would not have half as many problems as your media claims",jihadu,e9osm2l,conservative
But I was told Russia was hacking the election? ,VeganMcVeganface,e9ollvz,conservative
"How do we stop this or take this back?
In all seriousness on election day there are a ton of volunteers. The same people I saw volunteering were going door to door campaigning for a member a democrat congress member. They were not official members of the campaign but still going around spreading the word. Another lady who is older is a rabid anti trumper on facebook. This is a small town election site in dark red upstate new york but the people working the polls are all raging liberals. The elections in the county still went red but would I trust them if it got close to be fair and impartial.....absolutely not ",billswinthesuperbowl,e9otczt,conservative
vOteR FraUD doESn'T exISt,ponmbr,e9oprfs,conservative
"Serious voters, forgot to register?",lax714,e9oocxw,conservative
"If we sit here and do nothing to counteract this clear and present voter fraud, then we deserve what is coming to us.",DocMilk,e9ommpx,conservative
"800 actually, I still have 30 more provisional ballots in my trunk …  /s",Edwardian,e9oor25,conservative
The main problem is our 18 year old voting machines. They wanted to get one more election out of them before implementing what I believe to be a new machine that is far superior next year (Does not come out till then). Stacy Abrams has played this perfectly as well as Kemp being about as bad as one can be. John Barrow will be our new Secretary of state most likely as a result of Kemp being so bad.,yllwjacket,e9oikdc,conservative
"From what I've researched and heard, under GA election law it's basically all up to the counties and then just referred to the SOS at the end. So all the allegations of Kemp voter suppression was really done at the counties and the majority of those counties with issues on the rolls were Democrat led. Ga also has exact match, so most of the people who were left off the rolls didnt have matching signatures or SS numbers. Same thing with the voting machines. They are old and need replacing and also in some counties many of the machines were taken for an investigation ( I believe a lawsuit from a third party) and they haven't been replaced.  ",rcfant,e9osj0c,conservative
"It really should have recused himself of all electoral responsibility. I guess his hubris is too big for him to do that though.

Damn shame because I believe he'll make a fine governor, but this will stain his time in office. ",amjourdan,e9oisf9,conservative
"Well GA is different than a lot of states in that most everything is done at the county level and then referred to the SOS.  The counties refer people to be taken off the rolls, the counties have their own machines, etc. A lot of the local stories have been more accurate than the sensational national headlines that really don't know about GA law.  I'm not an expert, but did some research in to it a while back to see what all the fuss was really about.",rcfant,e9osq87,conservative
"I don't get it... You still have people screaming about Russia because they made Facebook ads. While you have a clear cut case here and it doesn't matter.

I feel like I'm taking crazy pills. I keep trying to ignore politics to save my sanity but here I am again...",seraph85,e9omnw5,conservative
"If only Georgia's voting machines produced any sort of paper record, then maybe this could be audited and/or investigated. 

But for some reason, the previous administration in Georgia didn't want that, and now it's biting democracy in the ass.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9opg1k,conservative
"Truer words were never spoken.  Believe me, it puzzles a lot of us.

I'm in Oregon were we do mail-in paper ballots (first state in the nation to implement such a program, [started in 1998](https://medium.com/@BallotReady/oregon-spotlight-the-first-state-to-establish-universal-voting-by-mail-d16a479e93f1)).  There's no electronic voting in my state.",IamIrene,e9ov0g2,conservative
"But but but the russians did it, and daddy Mueller is investigating on it.... oh wait.",igor_otsky,e9ovv0g,conservative
243% turnout. It's not just the machines. It's the people in charge of them.,KnoWhatImSang,e9ov2pd,conservative
"> Georgia is one of four states that uses voting machines statewide that produce no paper record for voters to verify, making them difficult to audit, experts say.

These ballots are recorded electronically with no paper trail.  So, the issue can be voter fraud, glitch, or hacking.
",trendyweather,e9onihb,conservative
"This particular instance I agree with you, however the overarching problems of the election have been due to our outdated machines. These 400 votes are less than 1% of the votes necessary to push the election to a runoff. ",yllwjacket,e9ov6c0,conservative
Everyone is an idiot except me,xXdat_boi69Xx,e9olm5v,conservative
"Jesus, the NPC programming is real..",Webs1331,e9ongc8,conservative
Why doesn’t he cut off his own dick to protest rape culture ,Rabidraccoon76,e9onyxf,conservative
Look at the date. ,the_bigbossman,e9oo8og,conservative
"Yet another pretentious fuck with thick framed glasses (possibly fake) that thinks it makes him (look) smarter, sipping a ridiculously convoluted overpriced drink and acting like he is doing something important with his life on his Macbook Pro that he uses exclusively for Facebook, Twitter, and his little Wordpress site that he has to try to bring up in every conversation.",_pissedoff,e9opicy,conservative
I’ll bet he doesn’t even see the racism in his generalization of a race. ,Mawaukey,e9opkel,conservative
Mental illness.  He's not well and needs medical treatment. ,FourThrones,e9onrul,conservative
"When I'm in public, I look around and wonder how many people are red pilled. How many human robots there might be. I don't think about this crap this guy does. Those are wasted thoughts.",sasquatch_pants,e9omjm0,conservative
This isn't satire? Stupid sexy Poe's law.,sunder_and_flame,e9oop5d,conservative
If it weren’t for these signals I’d never know how incredibly virtuous this guy is. He’s someone us dirty white people can look to emulate. He’s just plain better than us.,FreedomFromIgnorance,e9ooxij,conservative
What a miserable life this guy lives everyday.  Pray for this man...,PerceivedShift,e9opmcs,conservative
Liberalism:  Make sure you get your daily recommended dose of self righteousness. ,grymlinq,e9ou3r5,conservative
Right after 2016 election.,Otto-Carpenter,e9oom95,conservative
"Every Starbucks has at least one racist.  This man has not found that one elusive racist.  


Where could he be?",markcocjin,e9oqayn,conservative
What would happen if you put this guy in a room with Zarna Joshi (of Hugh Mungus WHAT fame/infamy)?,GorathThorgath,e9opo0z,conservative
What a douchebag ,donjohn1986,e9otp0i,conservative
Stuff like this used to be funny until I started to not know if it's a joke or not. ,buckets84,e9ou1eq,conservative
LOOK AT ME! I'M ONE OF THE GOOD WHITE PEOPLE! LOOK AT ME!,Crusader_1096_2,e9ouxj2,conservative
So self centered. Me me me,rharravs,e9ov0jy,conservative
EVERYONE! Look at my furrowed brow and see the disdain I have for you because I alone am worthy.,SkyburnersXanax,e9ov748,conservative
"Maybe all of us evil white devils should have a special mark that we wear, like a gold star or something. 🤔",Puig_Destroyer,e9ovdoq,conservative
This can’t be real. Please let him be joking. ,HTBscribbles,e9ove8w,conservative
"""Who want's a culture of unapologetic rape where it's not even a taboo? I want a culture where rape is scandalous and taboo so that my proclivities feel wrong and I feel edgy""",Bikertron,e9oven8,conservative
"Yeah seriously, fuck all white people but me.",JaunJaun,e9ovh9l,conservative
I can't roll my eyes hard enough.,AM_Kylearan,e9ovi0m,conservative
"Assuming that every single person of a race is a rapist and hates women?



I dunno about you but that sounds a little racist ",gmrads,e9ovr1g,conservative
$5 bucks he's a secret sex offender.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9or0sv,conservative
"Who the fuck suppprts rape culture?

""Fuck yeah, rape is awesome! Later let's go punch some women for fun!""",LibertyTerp,e9otlr9,conservative
What a turd. It baffles me that these people are real and not just actors in the worst play ever. ,tapeonyournose,e9oqvb6,conservative
So brave. What a hero ,Kaptian_Krunch,e9orfwe,conservative
What a jackass,SuperMarioKartWinner,e9ospwl,conservative
Male feminists use the same mo as pedophiles . He's hoping some blue haired lady swoons when she sees that tweet.,willyruffian,e9otbcx,conservative
"> Everyone is an ~~idiot~~ unevolved backwoods savage except me.

FTFY",SnarkyUsernamed,e9orjzw,conservative
I couldn’t help but read that in Benders voice from Futurama. ,The5thRoom,e9orhjr,conservative
how do you know he hasnt already?,nuketesuji,e9ovac1,conservative
"Right around the election? So, essentially he is wondering how many Trump voters there were in that Starbucks. I wish I knew who this was so I could beat the piss out of him in a friendly way of course. Haha",myballsaresweaty,e9ov0wr,conservative
He probably hates capitalism too. LOL,myballsaresweaty,e9ouxp7,conservative
Problem glasses. ,Chootum,e9ovk2r,conservative
"His own race, no less. ",BarbiCannabis,e9osczl,conservative
"At a Whole Foods downtown, wondering who around me is a gun grabber, who supports socialism. Quite possibly every white person but me. IDGAF. ",gt4674b,e9osgwh,conservative
It reads like satire to me.,PurpleAngel23,e9oqgqx,conservative
Agreed. Satire that actually made me laugh!,tushmytralala,e9ou8t7,conservative
Plot Twist: He *is* the racist.,PurpleAngel23,e9oqiiv,conservative
Vikings ,donjohn1986,e9ottee,conservative
I bet the Left is already making signs and getting press releases ready,The_Fyrd,e9oil0q,conservative
And the democrats can’t do anything to block them.   Thanks Harry!,NCSUGrad2012,e9oksbh,conservative
Numerous in the liberal Ninth Circuit!,the_bigbossman,e9omoxj,conservative
CNN:. Trump nominates 13 rapists for Federal court system.,tehForce,e9oo03q,conservative
"I'm glad the President is finally pushing to fill vacancies in the Judiciary. This was a major concern for me at the start of the Trump Administration along with all the vacant seats in the various agencies of the Federal Government. If you fill those bureaucratic seats and the judge vacancies, Democrat policy will be extremely difficult to implement in the future.",weeaboo_swordsman,e9oug5p,conservative
"Slowly, steadily, it seems we are returning bits and pieces of our nation to sanity.",DocMilk,e9onhw6,conservative
"A lot has been made of RBG's health on the supreme court, at her age (85) something could happen at any time.  Justice Breyer is 80, but you never hear about him.  (both Democrats).  There's a very real chance Trump could replace one or both during his tenure (especially if he wins re-election.)",Edwardian,e9ophr6,conservative
Go Trump!,milkboy33,e9osgbu,conservative
Queue more morons dressed up like women from  The Handmaid's Tale. ,imaredditfeggit,e9ouldz,conservative
">I bet the Left is already making signs and getting ~~press releases~~ fake rape accusations ready


FTFY
",LumpyWumpus,e9okjkl,conservative
This is why I voted for Donald Trump,CertainSchool,e9oun72,conservative
"I dont know man, all the shit that happened with the elections has me really worried.",Isredditreal2009,e9or7uw,conservative
"> I dont know man, all the shit that happened with the elections has me really worried.

Next time the Ctrl-Left has all three braches, I expect them to *purge*, by any means necessary, as many republican judges as possible.  I expect they will take the stance of ""Illegitimate judicial picks because Orange Man bad"" and attempt to sweep any and all Conservatism under the rug.  ""Pack the courts!"" they keep chanting..... we would do well to believe them, take the threat seriously",Jizzlobber42,e9ovqbc,conservative
"It's a good wake-up call for us. We can't just assume Democrats are going to shoot themselves in the foot no matter how batshit insane their ideas are. 

For example: I support the President's immigration policies; but campaigning on Immigration instead of the Economy before the mid terms was a bad idea. Suburban Republicans do not care nearly as much about Immigration as Republicans in border states do, and guess where Republicans lost big last week? The Suburbs, specifically suburban Republicans who don't like the President's loud mouth.

Hopefully President Trump realizes that immigration is not going to be a winning issue for him in 2020 like it was in 2016, it won't even be a major issue.",weeaboo_swordsman,e9ousx0,conservative
"That’s why I say slowly and steadily, because we have failed to develop a working system like the Left has. They have all of these decentralized groups overlapping each other, aiding each other, while any grass roots groups we have are wholly autonomous. 

Conservatives are left in the wind, so we can’t organize like the Left can. That is why we cannot effect such rapid change like they can.",DocMilk,e9orcxz,conservative
At least for now all the dems can do is whine and waste time writing bills that wont make it passed the senate,zeldaisaprude,e9os60a,conservative
"And that's why getting Constitutionalists into the court system is so important. We've had almost a century of progressive judicial activism, this is now our best chance to draw a line in the sand that will actually mean something.

It doesn't matter how organized they are and how many connections they have or how much money they throw into the progressive agenda if the courts operate on the basis of the law as it stands, instead of how the left thinks it should be. ",_SkeletonJelly,e9oupm2,conservative
"While I can agree that having the courts back constitutionalist decisions is critical, the Left has been pushing to change our very culture and way of life. Politics is downstream of culture and if they can change the urban and suburban voters to embrace their Marxist views then they can effect political dominance in the legislative and executive branches. 

The war for our very survival must be fought on every front, in every school, in every courthouse, in every street. We cannot give them an inch anywhere, or else they’ll merely fester.",DocMilk,e9ouyc5,conservative
Sounds about right... feminists have truly become women's worst enemy.,Mewster1818,e9n9cgx,conservative
"It's almost like they know they're the worst, so they try and cover it up by pretending to be champions of whatever they hate most. 
Kinda like the most rabidly gay-bashing are secretly hooking up with male teenage hookers. ",Javatex,e9nbxfy,conservative
"Spread this far and wide and lets see this professional activist get fired and blacklisted from his industry.  We didn't bring destroying peoples' livelihoods into the ""acceptable weapons"" category, but since it's there we shouldn't shy away from using it.",anuser999,e9nco4x,conservative
">Granados is now being represented by America’s favorite attorney, Michael Avenatti.

lol holy crap, I had somehow not heard this part. ",atomicdiarrhea4000,e9nk3cp,conservative
A male feminist calling women whores and cunts? Imagine my surprise... /s,MrFizzardsWizard,e9ogoui,conservative
*Everyone* knows Republican women don't exist ^/s,Jizzlobber42,e9ngrcp,conservative
I watched the Colbert clip at the end of the article because I was curious. Holy crap that guy has gone off the deep end. He's like the comment section of /politics in real life which is terrifying since his show is on a network. ,WDKJokerr,e9nibzb,conservative
Avenatti is a scumbag. ,chugonthis,e9oc06x,conservative
"Seriously? Avenatti is representing the guy that said this?

“Here is a statement from my client regarding the incident with Tucker Carlson and Tucker’s fabricated version of events. As a father of two teenage daughters myself, I find it disgraceful that Tucker seeks to justify his behavior by falsely hiding behind his family. #Coward”

His daughter also backs what Carlson said. I thought we were suppose to believe all women? Avenatti is garbage.",AlterAlias1,e9nwsi6,conservative
Yeah that guy has beta cuck written all over him,DPistola,e9n92j2,conservative
"That's disgusting.

And I say this a bloke who has two sisters, I've been in a similar situation when someone called my younger sister a ""whore that should be used for sex"". 

I know how it feels like.",Azul19,e9njjvg,conservative
And yet there are no consequences. Grrrr.,SweatDaddy,e9opo77,conservative
Feminism is anti women so this doesn’t surprise me one bit. ,survivorfanbilf,e9oqq4h,conservative
Despicable!,milkboy33,e9otbtg,conservative
The left is so tolerant of its own disgusting ways ,shitstartingpatriot,e9ngknt,conservative
Not for long hopefully. ,Masklophobia,e9nd51y,conservative
"Democrats are like the Saudis.

Both fight to sit on women's rights groups but are in practice the worst people you want in those positions ",Stained-Glass-Window,e9njrwf,conservative
This is a very important issue right now. ,okapidaddy,e9ofyau,conservative
"[Every god damn time (video by 
1791)](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t_eibEi8DmA) (and the [Twitter Post](https://twitter.com/i/moments/851713200537993216), which was the inspiration of the video)

How long until some women come forward with rape allegations?",DutchmanDavid,e9og41c,conservative
C word? Conservative?,StruggleSnug69,e9njd0c,conservative
I'd imagine he will be swallowing his teeth soon...  A fellow Pede will step up and deliver the punishment.,KrampGround,e9oaefe,conservative
Hypocrite douchebag. I’m glad he exposed his true feelings. ,I_Love_New_York,e9nxa8r,conservative
"Guy sounds like a cunt.

How wonderfully ironic ",doggo_to_the_rescue,e9nxz3f,conservative
"It's ok cause he's gay,,,, and a liberal ",TommySawyer,e9o52ul,conservative
Delicious Irony,TerribleC0mment,e9ng8hb,conservative
Of cooooooourse. ,skarface6,e9ngumb,conservative
This Revelation is not surprising. ,dan4daniel,e9nqies,conservative
That's the problem with dehumanizing the opposition... You tend not to treat them with humanity.,waffleezz,e9nt4u7,conservative
I'd go protest but I have a job ,ParticipashunTrophy,e9nswyo,conservative
Male feminists are the worst ,HiGloss,e9nqid9,conservative
[removed],,e9nu6nx,conservative
...of course he does,TinyWightSpider,e9ni4g9,conservative
[removed],,e9o1rfn,conservative
You simply can't make this shit up.,OmahaVike,e9nu3jl,conservative
"ok I read the title as ""Man, who called Tucker Carlson's daughter a whore & 'C' word?"" so when other words followed I got confused.

this is really destroying our country. I always chuckle a bit when I overhear a feminist talking about how Trump is ruining the country.",fourdebt,e9njor2,conservative
Cunt,ketchup_pizza,e9np09w,conservative
"Hopefully not for long...

http://thewomensinitiative.org/contact/

>jajex@thewomensinitiative.org, vanderson@thewomensinitiative.org, abarlow@thewomensinitiative.org, jcurryel@thewomensinitiative.org, kday@thewomensinitiative.org, ahayat@thewomensinitiative.org, eirvin@thewomensinitiative.org, akorman@thewomensinitiative.org, alane@thewomensinitiative.org, amayfield@thewomensinitiative.org, smedley@thewomensinitiative.org, mohalloran@thewomensinitiative.org, iramos@thewomensinitiative.org, sstern@thewomensinitiative.org, astewart@thewomensinitiative.org, ezeanahshelton@thewomensinitiative.org, ecobb@thewomensinitiative.org, swood@thewomensinitiative.org",deathsythe,e9oixwu,conservative
"Could we just say cunt, it's a great word and we miss out on it's use in the US.  If we don't ever use certain words it gives them more power when they are used.  So lets chip their power down lower.  ",ToddtheRugerKid,e9nknz3,conservative
"I mean, we all saw the round house kicking “feminist”. Male feminists do not care about women.",frozenropes,e9nn7da,conservative
Sounds about right. ,Upasaka-paul,e9ni53v,conservative
What trash ,steelallz,e9nnzk4,conservative
"Conservative women are not women, we're just uneducated tools and subhuman to these people.",neemarita,e9nz2aj,conservative
And nothing will happen because intolerance of different points of view is accepted. ,wpiman,e9nmujc,conservative
"I would guess feminists hate each and every human equally or less radical than themselves.

That also includes themselves, because boy do they hate themselves. They mutilate themselves and everyone they're bonded or related to in every possible way. Their own kids, their parents, their ancestors, and God help him if they have a husband or boyfriend.

I don't know who or what they love. Cats and dogs, obviously, radical Islam even, but probably just because radical Islam is hating everyone else, too. ",phoenix335,e9nv6zn,conservative
Are we even surprised by this behavior anymore?,daviipup,e9norfs,conservative
"Nobody should be surprised. I do think a bit more needs to be done to help marginalized women and minorities. However, I find that a lot of liberals join these causes with an ulterior motive. Once we (I’m speaking as a minority) fail to know our place in their agenda, racism and sexism become acceptable. Some have pure intentions, but I still think their solutions fail. ",Kennyv777,e9nkhqh,conservative
[removed],,e9nrf8z,conservative
"I'll bet that ""women's group"" is a real puddle of cunts.",TheComedianGLP,e9npyvu,conservative
Shocked and appalled! But not really ¯\\\_(ツ)\_/¯,1800dope,e9nmbti,conservative
at least he was a qualified judge. ,phD_in_Random,e9o7jnb,conservative
"""Wow what a bunch of snowflakes crying over being called a name"", is something you're likely to hear if he Carlson was liberal",commentsandopinions,e9ohyqk,conservative
"Hey Americans, what is your problem with the word cunt?",Darim_Al_Sayf,e9o4icz,conservative
"Womens group? You mean  WHORE & CUNT Group?

What is the telephone number of this WHORE & CUNT Group?

Exactly which WHORE & CUNT Group does he demean and insult (serve)?

What is the mailing address of this WHORE & CUNT Group? 

Who is the biggest WHORE or the highest ranking WHORE of the WHORE & CUNT Group?

Who is the biggest CUNT or has the biggest CUNT in the WHORE & CUNT Group?

We should ALL ask these questions directly to the Big WHORE and Big CUNT of the WHORE & CUNT Group. Turn-About is FAIR PLAY.",StephenScherer1,e9nptxo,conservative
Allegedly.,beartrapperkeeper,e9oe0gu,conservative
"“I moved on her like a bitch, but I couldn’t get there. And she was married.”

“I did try and fuck her. She was married.”

“Just kiss. I don’t even wait. And when you’re a star, they let you do it. You can do anything.”

“Grab them by the pussy. You can do anything.”

-Donald trump 

Lol ",gorilla_bezoar,e9of5s1,conservative
They've stopped caring about women's rights a long time ago.,Azul19,e9njlj1,conservative
"Women have always enforced sexual standards for other women. For most of human history, that standard was to not be a whore, because they didn't want women having sex with their men. Now, I assume because elite men wanted access to more women, women are told that being slurry is empowering.",LibertyTerp,e9ngjdy,conservative
They always have been.  The vast majority of Women are happiest when raising a family.  Giving that up for a career has led to a lot of suffering.  The childless women over 35 that I meet are very bitter.,StraightNewt,e9na0ku,conservative
Jerry Brown in California was caught on tape calling his opponent Meg Whitman a whore. Feminists not only failed to denounce his comment they actually came out in the media and backed the statement.,ultimis,e9okrkt,conservative
Have you read the twitter thread that follows that post? Geez it’s pure cancer. ,MadTitan63,e9nnhju,conservative
"It's not just prohibition this time.. progressive fascists are ruining race, sex, gender, and due process.. substituting their reality as obfuscation ",BJUmholtz,e9nmb48,conservative
"It's what Democrats do. They hijack any special interest group they can get thier hands on and use them to push thier own agendas, disguising them as the groups agendas.",seraph85,e9nmd1r,conservative
"The 'C' word, just say Cunt or Conservative. ",gobsmack0,e9o6kpt,conservative
"It’s women like that why I believe men are socially the better sex, ironically, as women control society. (I mean socially, naturally, verbally, not just Feminist society but society in general). Men insult each other & get over while women hold a grudge and are passive aggressive (cowardly) too often.",HowRememberAll,e9nqomb,conservative
Or like how Asia Argento hooked up with an underaged boy,keepitreal51,e9nfmjl,conservative
https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DM7epzLU8AAyNg2.jpg,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9nzmp1,conservative
I'm starting to thinking this is the case with the rabid anti racist white liberals. I think they probably have a lot of contempt for minorities. ,WhiteeFisk,e9ob7m4,conservative
he's disappeared from their sites board of directors page and you now can only find him on the internet archive of the page.,aCreditGuru,e9nfxbg,conservative
"Your way of thinking is 100% right. This is a continuation of the Cold War, liberty vs. socialism. Use all tactics that will help us win, period. ",LibertyTerp,e9ngu68,conservative
"AGAIN, what's good for the Goose is good for the Gander.",StephenScherer1,e9npz98,conservative
Of course he is.,JAK4189,e9npp4a,conservative
"That dude's kids are going to have a dope Christmas this year. Also, college is probably covered, too.",mainfingertopwise,e9nwo66,conservative
"Avenatti sure happens to end up coincidentally representing people that attack right wingers.

What are the odds.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9nzq29,conservative
[people on here sure don't think so](http://archive.is/BzfaD#selection-1858.0-1871.10),PraiseTheSuun,e9nxqy0,conservative
I remember his first season when he used to be a comedian.,TheComedianGLP,e9npvdf,conservative
"Colbert is a satanist and has been for years. They all fall apart eventually, no matter how much of a psychopath they are. ",AidsinCali,e9oaycf,conservative
I mean isn't it all on video? ,stanleythemanley44,e9odxys,conservative
He’s a lawyer...  c’mon...  don’t be so surprised.  They’re all trash.,JarvisMusk,e9o25vj,conservative
So let me get this right... A scummy woman hating beta MALE  helps run a liberal women’s organization! Lol.,42random,e9nxx0w,conservative
Ain't that the truth.,Reven1911,e9nm5ds,conservative
"I’m a liberal and this guy disgusts me. I think a lot of other liberals I know would feel the same way. But I do agree that, sadly, both sides can be guilty of giving a pass to despicable people who are on their “team”.",KAlex11,e9ocwvo,conservative
Linda Sarsour is the archetype. ,d_grizzle,e9nm5iu,conservative
Yeah. Do you know that there are still people who take that literally? ,AidsinCali,e9oav1t,conservative
How is that relevant?,Skalforus,e9o1kqz,conservative
Can you believe people still take that literally? Meanwhile creepy Joe touches kids in public and none of the dems even talk about that. ,AidsinCali,e9oawbu,conservative
sounds a lot like whataboutism... how's my leftist impersonation?,aCreditGuru,e9nvu9b,conservative
"""Hey guys, the president engaged in filthy locker room talk to another guy years ago, so that makes it okay to target and harass young girls and their families! """,Dbrown15,e9ogc39,conservative
"Nice job on trying to compare two different situations, dumbass. 

Try again you fuck face. ",Chootum,e9ogd28,conservative
"They're like Peta, but for women.",MetaTater,e9nnp7r,conservative
"But Tucker Carlson's is a racist nazi bigot leading the fourth Reich. Surely none of his family can be afforded basic human rights. I'm going to trample all over their human rights so I can protect the rights of those that I definately know very close to me that are non-white, gay, and not here legally.

/s",mkov88,e9o10tm,conservative
Well. They have already gotten them the same rights... The fact they're still sound proves they're fighting for a different cause. ,barcelonatimes,e9nsx5v,conservative
"The message promoted by the left is always warped and the root of the problem can always be traced back to them.

It is a weird circular logic designed to trap people in a mental prison. The NPC meme was 100% on target.

&#x200B;",j1mmyj0nez,e9nj8el,conservative
">slurry 

Not sure if typo but it made me laugh. ",syntheticsylph,e9nkqcy,conservative
"Have you ever met a housedad? They’re happier as well! Male suicides are higher than women as well, and that’s because of the long running way we’ve lived. Imagine having the opportunity to be with your loved ones all day and work at your own pace. I’d be ecstatic, 

The thing is, both genders can be motivated, and want to bring home the bacon! As men, we naturally want to be the provider, but in reality, who fucking cares? Women are just as likely to pull in high paying jobs, so... why not switch up the roles every now and then?

Ultimately, these statistics are spurious because they’re built on a structure that we’ve had for many many years.",Loyalist_Pig,e9od86z,conservative
"This goes hand in hand with a good economy - not many can live off one income without children. And also a man needs to be a man and provide for his family. 

When those two are able to be set up properly (looking at the men, mostly) then I can see it working out that way. 

I’m thankful my husband works hard so I can stay home with our kids but not everyone gets that chance in today’s world. ",syntheticsylph,e9nl0d1,conservative
Bruh,Swhdju,e9njc3b,conservative
"Regardless of your flair lol, what is it that you hate about progression? 

Honest question, not trying to antagonize.",Loyalist_Pig,e9odhm6,conservative
or how Keith Ellison beat the shit out of his girlfriend.,thehamman277,e9no3kp,conservative
It's not tape when a woman does it /s.,Azul19,e9njol1,conservative
yes!! ,Javatex,e9nzzzj,conservative
Doesn't mean anything real happened. Political organizations do stuff like that all the time.,LibertyTerp,e9ngveg,conservative
"Wow, why would they do that when he's clearly done nothing wrong??? /s",spongish,e9nihs4,conservative
"Wow what a wonderful organization. If only they could apply their ""No men who call young woman cunt whores"" policy before they grant major positions to people. ",Hrendo,e9nt3pb,conservative
Hiding it till its blown over. ,chugonthis,e9oc14z,conservative
">Use all tactics that will help us win, period.

All? No, that would make you as bad as them.

Ones that they introduced and still unanimously promote? Fair game.",liquidsnakex,e9o64tt,conservative
"He was never a comedian, dude.  He was a leftist shill since the beginning.  99% of his jokes were about making fun of Republicans.  He could always thrown in the 1% of jokes at liberals because *his side was winning*.  He just never had to deal with panic from losing.  ",ravenswin,e9nrkpn,conservative
I’m sure he’s the coffee bitch,DPistola,e9oe6r7,conservative
"While your statement is statistically accurate, it's *also* statistically accurate to say it happens with far more frequently with Democrats",Liberty_Pr1me,e9oiobe,conservative
I'm stealing this analogy.,bulk2win,e9nua5m,conservative
What a great analogy,greeneyedunicorn2,e9nqmat,conservative
"LOL.

I agree with you fam :) ",Azul19,e9o6ifc,conservative
"Im reposting this comment, because I think it’s a good talking point:

Well the only problem is that feminism isn’t an organization, PETA is. I know plenty of amazing feminists on all sides. The shitty feminists just give them a bad name, and that really sucks, I was raised by many strong women, and to see some of the bullshit gender warfare that takes place, honestly, just confuses me. “Men and women are equally awesome” tends to be undercut by “MEN ARE THE PIGS.” And “WOMEN ARE SLUTS!” The fact is: Both genders are capable of those things.

I guess the point is: Let’s talk about the wage gap (which is mostly a myth, but worth the talk) and let’s talk about the overwhelming patriarchy (which is a real thing that also should be discussed) ",Loyalist_Pig,e9oe6rk,conservative
"They've got some real issues such as sexism, sexual assault, discrimination in the workforce, misogyny in our society etc...so I am going to give them props on that one.

But that's where it stops.

It's like men have no issues at all. 

We do Not face any kind of sexism/discrimination in our everyday lives /s.",Azul19,e9o6ncf,conservative
"Hahaha, guess I'll just leave it now. It's powerful imagery. Hope it becomes the new word for ""slutty"".",LibertyTerp,e9nlh18,conservative
">This goes hand in hand with a good economy - not many can live off one income without children.

Nah, economics have nothing to do with it.  You can raise children on very little money, parents have done it for ages.  Sure it isn't easy, but neither is a career.  Life is hard, but worth doing.

Having women work on careers instead of having families is like a farming selling his seed corn.  Sure it's nice to have a high standard of living that comes from spending it, but then there's nothing for next year.  Civilizations die horrible deaths when they stop having children as our has done.

>And also a man needs to be a man and provide for his family. 

Most men are natural providers.  Men who are not tend to criminals, thugs, and layabouts. ",StraightNewt,e9ny9cu,conservative
"Historically, women staying at home was actually vital to the economy. Throughout Ancient Greece, Rome and then into the Middle Ages, women were vital parts of the economy by producing goods such as wool and clothes. In Ancient Greece women were considered to have the ""home economy"" as their domain, leaving politics, war and external trade to men.

Something like 50-60% of the economy came from these home crafts. It was a point of pride for many Ancient men that their wives contributed to their household and for the majority of the ""middle income"" households this would have been the case.

If you are interested I can drag up some of my sources, but they are mostly from academic texts so may be difficult to link.",Atherum,e9npta5,conservative
"Here's a way women can make sure they have the option to be stay-at-homes moms:

Don't marry wothless retards.  And DEFINTELY don't sleep with them.

spez: This post is being downvoted by worthless retards who blame me for being incels.",TheComedianGLP,e9npreh,conservative
I wish more women were as practical and laterally thinking as you. Have an updoot :),jakman556,e9nnofz,conservative
What?,uniqueusername831,e9nr1tz,conservative
"There's a lot to hate about a group that has declared eugenical kinsmanship with the Nazi party, seized power from German immigrant alderman through Prohibition, put my most recent immigrant family in tenements and forced them to vote for progs, had the Ku Klux clan speak at their conventions, filibustered civil rights, has controlled major cities for decades and destroyed them, is in bed with the mob, convicted pedophiles with private islands, and nazi sympathizers, increased the veracity and depth of the drug war by lionizing users and didn't even try to stop the influx of cartel drugs and influence, and now continues to spread their same, fascist policies under different names using Newspeak and the myth of a party switch...  

...and has the fucking gall to call it ""Progress"".",BJUmholtz,e9ofro2,conservative
"Sounds like a sticky situation, but seems clear enough ",gills_of_war,e9nvys9,conservative
">~~tape~~ rape

FTFY",Slixem,e9nn3b7,conservative
"I actually thought about that when writing my post. Why should we let them define the terms of engagement? If we can introduce a new tactic that will help us win, we should use it. I'm not saying we should overthrow democratically elected governments to fight socialism, like the CIA did. But we shouldn't always be on defense, always catching up. We've been losing for the last 80 years because we don't push as hard. We just slow down how fast America is socialized.",LibertyTerp,e9omv6h,conservative
"I like watching him often. He is pretty straightforward pro-left, but it’s nice to be refreshed on how both sides fucking suck. Just wish he would get more folks that “oppose him” on the show. I know it’s a death trap for them (thanks editing) but he is a great entertainer, and is really good with communication and listening, he could make Bill Maher look like an even bigger chump.

EDIT: To be fair, at least Maher will actually *talk* to people he doesn’t agree with.",Loyalist_Pig,e9oescc,conservative
"Yeah, it was just my way of insulting  him.",TheComedianGLP,e9nsffh,conservative
Well where are these statistics you speak of?,swiftlopez,e9ojbvb,conservative
"I have not seen any statistics on that, but my view is that we really should be thinking about this on an individual occurrence basis. In other words, even if one side does it less, each side should be better about holding its own members accountable. I actually think that’s good politics in addition to being morally right.",KAlex11,e9onkv6,conservative
"Free to everyone!

Matter of fact, someone should share it to r/all ~~a certain page~~. Who knows, they may appreciate it.",MetaTater,e9nvhak,conservative
"Well the only problem is that feminism isn’t an organization, PETA is. I know plenty of amazing feminists on all sides. The shitty feminists just give them a bad name, and that really sucks, I was raised by many strong women, and to see some of the bullshit gender warfare that takes place, honestly, just confuses me. “Men and women are equally awesome” tends to be undercut by “MEN ARE THE PIGS.” And “WOMEN ARE SLUTS!” The fact is: Both genders are capable of those things.

I guess the point is: Let’s talk about the wage gap (which is mostly a myth, but worth the talk) and let’s talk about the overwhelming patriarchy (which is a real thing that also should be discussed) ",Loyalist_Pig,e9ocjw8,conservative
"Men have those issues too. 

Example: A drunk guy hits on a woman in a bar, it makes her uncomfortable, she tells her friends or the staff and they will generally make sure she is safe and take her concerns seriously.

Now reverse it, a drunk woman hits on a guy in a bar, it make him uncomfortable, if he tells his friends or the staff will he be taken as seriously? Probably not. So not only is he dealing with sexual harassment, but if he is unable to avoid the drunk woman adequately he also runs the risk of her getting upset and causing a scene that he will end up getting blamed for even if he's done absolutely nothing wrong.

Feminists say that this stuff matters to them too, but look at how they scorn Title IX cases brought against women by men. The movement used to be about equal rights and opportunity, but it's become a ""my problems are always more important than yours, do what I say and then *maybe* we can address you issues(Jk we will just move onto a new oppression against women).",Mewster1818,e9ofbyp,conservative
Slur shaming is wrong! ,d_grizzle,e9nm1ks,conservative
"Its legit a thing, Ive heard it being used growing up in Aus: https://www.google.com.au/amp/s/www.urbandictionary.com/define.php%3fterm=slurry&amp=true",CapArtemis,e9nywc8,conservative
"I would say the majority of men are layabouts or into drugs/drinking as well that causes them to be poor mates. They just don’t care about their spouse and that had a great impact on marital roles, as well as parental roles if/when they have kids. 

I agree about not living in excess. I think more people are starting to trim sway what they don’t need, thankfully. ",syntheticsylph,e9od6l0,conservative
"I would be interested in reading that. Don’t worry if it takes some time to get them. 

Your comment reminded me of the Proverb 31 wife. It’s what female Christ-followers are encouraged to be like as well when they run a home. 

Running a home is not encouraged today either. And when it is, the moms are discouraged or written off as “mommy bloggers”. ",syntheticsylph,e9nqr2w,conservative
"Well yes, I figured that was a given. Maybe not so much today. ",syntheticsylph,e9nqm1b,conservative
"I used to feel the same way, however I would argue that the ""overwhelming patriarchy"" is an even bigger myth than the wage gap... the wage gap actually exists, just as a difference in general choices(and the freedom to choose is definitely not a symptom of oppression.)

Of course it depends what you mean by ""the patriarchy"". ",Mewster1818,e9oetxi,conservative
">Let’s talk about the wage gap (which is mostly a myth, but worth the talk) and let’s talk about the overwhelming patriarchy (which is a real thing that also should be discussed)

How about not.",bulk2win,e9odsui,conservative
It's almost like men need a movement to advocate for their issues and secure their rights. Something like a men's rights movement.,awksomepenguin,e9oiblr,conservative
I like my women a little on the slurry side.,TheComedianGLP,e9npnd6,conservative
"Wow, maybe I knew that subconsciously. Or maybe it was autocorrect.",LibertyTerp,e9omjmy,conservative
"It is not like women are forced to marry those kind of guys, though.",8K12,e9oiozl,conservative
"There is an explanation of the ""worth"" of women by a 4th century Saint that is pretty good. He writes it out as if it is a discussion with a questioning woman.

Here is the quote from St. Basil:

""And God made the human being according to his image."" ""The [masc.] human being,"" says the woman, ""What does that have to do with me? The man came to be, for it does not say the [fem.] human being,"" she says, ""but by setting forth the [masc.] human being, it implies the masculine."" But that nobody may ignorantly ascribe the name of human only to the man, it adds, ""Male and female he created them"" [Gen 1.27]. The woman also possesses creation according to the image of God, as indeed does the man. The natures are alike of equal honor, the virtues are equal, the struggles equal, the judgement alike. Let her not say, ""I am weak."" The weakness is in the flesh, in the soul is the power. Since indeed that which is according to God's image is of equal honor, let the virtue be of equal honor, the showing forth of good works. There is no excuse for one who wishes to allege that the body is weak. And why is it simply delicate? But through compassion it is vigorous in patient endurance and earnest in vigils. When has the nature of man been able to match the nature of woman in patiently passing through her own life? When has man been able to imitate the vigor of women in fastings, the love of toil in prayers, the abundance in tears, the readiness for good works?

I have seen a woman secretly committing good thefts, doing good works apart from her husband for the sake of her husband, for the sake of the household's growth, for the sake of the children's long life. She gives and hides it from her husband's knowledge, distributing alms for his sake and concealing it from him. For since the Creator sees the things that are hidden, she does not make public her well-doing.

The good woman has that which is according to the image. Do not cling to the outer human being, it is molded [like clay]. The soul is placed within, under the coverings and the delicate body. Soul indeed is equal in honor to soul; in the coverings is the difference.

Therefore you have become like God through kindness, through endurance of evil, through communion, through love for one another and love for the brethren, being a hater of evil, dominating the passions of sin, that you may belong to the rule.

-from St. Basil's ""On the Origin of Humanity, Discourse 1""

",Atherum,e9nt46j,conservative
"The wage gap concept (as you probably know) is based on spurious statistics. So it’s still up in the air. That’s why I said “probably.”

However, I think there is quite a strange societal structure of men being in power over women, which in turn makes it a little harder for women to succeed in work and politics. I think to deny this would be quite silly, 

I think there should be more women in power, and we’re totally getting there internationally, but as a long time line cook, seeing women who are way qualified, get passed over for managerial jobs in the kitchen is just downright goofy and oxymoronic. Women used to “belong in the kitchen” but the second that it became a profitable industry, men took the reins. That was well over 60 years ago, even Jacques Pepin was trained by women, and he’s arguably one of the greatest Chefs that has ever lived.

I’m using this analogy because I’ve seen so many qualified cooks get passed over for promotion, simply because they are ladies. I myself got promoted over this chick who was a WAY better cook than me (and a bigger badass at that) we can’t do anything about this kind of thing by law, I just want people to remember that our sisters/daughters/mothers are very well capable of kicking our asses in various workplaces.

The mind is separate from the body, even though we used to beat women into submission, we don’t do that anymore, the concept of physicality is still present, regardless of it ever needing to be used. The world’s changing, I’d prefer we change with it, but fight for the traditionalist values we hold so dear. This topic, I believe, is not one of them.

Sorry for the rant, you seem like an educated and smart guy/girl. 

",Loyalist_Pig,e9ogeoq,conservative
"That’s it? You take an analogy, run with it, and don’t do your research?

What I love about conservatives is that we do our research! A lot of liberals just go by the feels (not that it can’t be the other way around) but shouldn’t you think a little bit about how that analogy totally flops? I’m not trying to antagonize, just want to talk, that’s the point of these threads.",Loyalist_Pig,e9oe1fx,conservative
They wear their clothes too tight and their hair is dyed. ,d_grizzle,e9nrix4,conservative
Thanks. That’s encouraging. :),syntheticsylph,e9ntecn,conservative
"This is what drives me nuts. Humans have understood for centuries that men and women are different, and that's not inherently a bad thing or unequal...

I think it's good that people have more freedom to choose how they want to live. But there's no evidence that people are happier overall with the result of feminism's attack on traditional families, in fact many studies show the opposite to be true.",Mewster1818,e9op47z,conservative
"That sounds like a small sample though, and are you certain that all those decisions were purely made on the basis of gender? How do you know? Being an amazing cook doesn't automatically make you the best person for a kitchen management position.

And in other industries, particularly STEM industries, women will be hired over men just for sake of ""diversity"". Women make up the majority of college students and still get preferential admission over men. 

Sure there are going to be sexist managers, but I don't think that should be the assumption unless you know all the facts. I know women who were passed over for promotions not because they weren't good at their jobs, but because they had negotiated an employment contract that allowed them better work-personal life balance and the company wanted a manager who was going to be more work driven and available. I myself have even turned down advancement opportunities because it would mean less time with my family.",Mewster1818,e9ojzdk,conservative
"What evidence do you have that these people are passed over because of their sex? Your opinion of their relative qualifications is not really relevant if you weren't the one making the decision. There could be any number of reasons that don't involve sexism for why someone else might disagree with you, so unless you have some kind of evidence to support your conclusion, it doesn't really prove anything. ",LegionBaby,e9onjkh,conservative
" Too much lipstick an' er too much rouge,  
 Gets me excited, leaves me feeling confused. ",TheComedianGLP,e9nt51y,conservative
"Exactly, for instance in my industry there aren't that many women in management positions. Is that because the company is sexist? Or is it because being a manager requires you to work almost all  holidays, weekends, and overtime? I don't even have kids yet and just missing time with my extended family on those days kills me a little inside each time... I already know that I would absolutely not continue this job once I have children either.",Mewster1818,e9opsq8,conservative
"I don’t think this is a fair comparison, he still participated in a wreath laying ceremony but at a cemetery in Chicago. Probably should have still been at Arlington, but let’s not pretend like he was lying on a beach somewhere instead ",billysavaiano,e9opu9o,conservative
"The story here isn't Obama is a disrespectful pig, honestly presidents are busy. It's that the media only cares when Orange man does something ""bad""",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e9omvve,conservative
"Actually, Trump attended Arlington Cemetery on Memorial Day this year on May 28, 2018. Memorial Day is usually the tradition. It’s the Democrats making a stink about him not going on Veteran’s Day.

https://www.al.com/news/index.ssf/2018/05/memorial_day_2018_trump.html

Flashback: Trump Saved NY Veterans Day Parade Marking 50th Anniversary of End of WWII

https://www.thegatewaypundit.com/2016/01/flashback-trump-saved-ny-veterans-day-parade/",Herschey,e9osppc,conservative
If*,wakinc,e9oie2k,conservative
Obama had an 8 yr hall pass.,beerandlolz,e9ok2hi,conservative
Thank God he’s out of office. He was a disgrace.,PurpleAngel23,e9okho7,conservative
Neither was Donald Trump.  Is it really more likely that he didnt feel like going or that there was a security concern?,wakinc,e9os1jc,conservative
[She looks like the village elder from The Temple of Doom.](https://vignette.wikia.nocookie.net/indianajones/images/d/d1/Shaman.jpg/revision/latest/scale-to-width-down/350?cb=20080704155656),keilwerth,e9oqv6j,conservative
This is another of example of why cnn and the rest of the lying media should simply use actors to push the agenda.  ,stancrouch,e9ost1u,conservative
"The mistake that Fredo made was doing this interview before fully scripting it with this clown snipes.  Cnn should have given her both the questions and the exact answers that they needed her to recite.  You can't push leftist lies with someone this stupid being interviewed.  Also....notice that the article has a ""Dr."" before her name.  What kind of fucking doctor is she?  Amazing dumb as a rock but probably has some kind of education doctorate.  Because you want a moron and a liar like this involved in the education of your kids.",stancrouch,e9onw57,conservative
It’s always nice when both sides can agree to criticize someone. ,MHE17,e9ovvth,conservative
"Doctorate in liberal arts! /s

Serious reply: PhD in Educational Leadership from Nova Southeast University",cons_NC,e9oqeei,conservative
I wondered how CNN and Sniped could botch a coverup. ,SickofInternetProgs,e9ophjw,conservative
">  PhD in Educational Leadership

So much for leadership...",PurpleAngel23,e9oqodj,conservative
"> I wondered how CNN and Sniped could botch a coverup.

Poor planning",stancrouch,e9os9f2,conservative
"Cheat on your wife, cheat on your country. Bill Clinton is trash.",Nonsenseism,e9oiza4,conservative
"Trump is on his 3rd wife. I know my religious views mean little now a days, but adultery is adultery. ",lol_speak,e9oojc1,conservative
[removed],,e9omyy3,conservative
His first 2 left him.,Nonsenseism,e9oprbm,conservative
Has he lied about it under oath?,rustyshakelford,e9on81z,conservative
I dont think he has cheated and he doesn't lie as much speaks in grandiose terms.,Nonsenseism,e9on7hh,conservative
"Just like we have the religion of peace, we also have the party of tolerance ",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9nz435,conservative
I wish they’d name or let us see the assailant. It feels like information has been left out. Is that normal?,Furtive_Smiles,e9nzqs7,conservative
"Yes I hope local news will come out with the assailant's name and political affiliation.

Just did a quick search over the internet - not reported or picked up by MSM or really any media apart from local.

They're only interested in tearing Trump down - at least when reporting offer coverage to both sides...Lugenpresse...not that it's any surprise at all.

Over here in the Nederlands (and Europe) its ALL anti-Trump",sydbuc,e9ocgl9,conservative
"> tried to murder the victim after breaking his ankle from behind

Um excuse me what the fuck?",glkerr,e9obut1,conservative
"What a psycho. 

Glad hes on the road to recovery",gab907,e9nz2ex,conservative
Now let's see someone try to post this on r/ politics.,The_Fyrd,e9oi45y,conservative
I am sad but not surprised. I hope he does not end up with lasting joint pain. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9ocbrx,conservative
The party of peace,grymlinq,e9ojguq,conservative
"He's going to remember this for the rest of his life, and his ankle will never be the same.   


If you wear a MAGA hat, you'd better maintain situation awareness and be ready to defend yourself.   


If some Communist puts hands on me, I'm going to make sure they regret that decision.",myerbot5000,e9oatd4,conservative
The attacker is probably lucky he’s not dead. You’re getting shot if you pull that shit with some people. ,Chootum,e9ofulu,conservative
Tolerance...,Dank_Communist_Doggo,e9oly5j,conservative
But but but it's the conservatives that need to end the hate and violence! Kathy Griffin was just kidding when she pretended to decapitate Trump! *Insert third blame-shifting excuse here* ,Sam012556,e9ohnkv,conservative
"You got to be tough and look like someone a soy boy leftist won't want to fuck with in order to wear your MAGA gear. I live in Chicago, liberal paradise, and I used to see some massive bodybuilders at the gym wearing ""BUILD THE WALL"" shirts and no one ever messed with them",ahrimanic_trance,e9omexg,conservative
Why is the attackers identity being protected  his face should be plastered everywhere saying beware of this violent person ,guildarts15,e9otnvs,conservative
Trash! Glad other citizens held him down and he got arrested.,milkboy33,e9otu9d,conservative
"That’s not violence, it’s free speech! /s",Dmfconrad,e9ofezo,conservative
That guy has a death wish if he is attacking Trump supporters in AZ. He is lucky he was shot by 8 different people. ,Nonsenseism,e9oe7rs,conservative
I hope they caught the premeditated murderer. ,plastiqmanb,e9ofx3z,conservative
Why don't they ever try that on me?  Please someone try that on me! ,FourThrones,e9on3s1,conservative
"It's sad that I believe the same thing would happen to someone wearing a MAGA hat in my hometown.  Which is probably why I really don't remember ever seeing someone wear a MAGA hat IRL.

I don't ever remember reading about Obama supporters being fearful of wearing Obama paraphernalia to show their support for their president.  Or the numerous cars with Obama stickers ever being vandalized.

Anything on your body or car showing support for our current president is at a clear risk today.",PerceivedShift,e9opin1,conservative
"I live in Tucson.  This city has become unhinged with all the protests and loonies from CA and Illinois moving here.  I moved here back in 03 due to the military, and the city has gone from centrist to way left.",angry_FE,e9or80n,conservative
He should sue the hell out of this lunatic.  Though he likely doesn't have a job so...,theinfamousjosh,e9op3e8,conservative
"Thank goodness someone stopped this animal from blowing up people with pipe bombs.  

Rest assured, he was talking shit and got his ass kicked. Good stuff.",AverageBubble,e9oq38q,conservative
1984 really wasn't wrong.,Liberty_Pr1me,e9oj49f,conservative
Not at all.  But the left protects it's own.,-rabid-,e9o8apa,conservative
It isn't reported because random assault is so common. My friend was beaten up bad for wearing a sports team shirt. Not a single news cared about it. ,Nonsenseism,e9oed4j,conservative
Love the Deutsch. ,StockSkys,e9oouyb,conservative
Just a normal day for an unhinged leftist,Straight_Ace,e9ogt4x,conservative
Just put “and that’s a good thing” at the end of the title and we’re good to go.,Storm-Of-Aeons,e9omsu3,conservative
I broke my ankle pretty badly and it’s one of those things you have to actively pay attention to or you’ll run into problems down the road. ,Chootum,e9ofru3,conservative
Which is why we need gun control. /s,DrEntschuldigung,e9omdb0,conservative
Esp. in AZ,motherfacker,e9olkwf,conservative
They did. Article states that bystanders pulled him off the victim and detained him until police arrived to arrest him on assault charges.,rattlesnake501,e9opf84,conservative
"And they’re probably of a different race, and that would go against the narrative that trump supporters are the racist ones.",totheleft2theleft,e9omt0s,conservative
I think he’s pointing to the fact that it’s a hot button issue. Like if the guy was wearing a black lives matter hat and got attacked it would be the cover story for cnn for the next 50 news cycles. Also the guys name and mugshot would be plastered everywhere along with people calling for a public hanging and shouting that this exemplifies the intolerance that is a building block of our nation. Instead we get a local news story that makes him seem like an asshole. ,fire_in_the_ol_anus,e9omkrq,conservative
"This reinforces the point that our voting systems need to have standards of performance and reliability set at a federal level.  I know it robs the local precincts of a level of autonomy, but this is getting ridiculous.  All summer I read articles about how easy it is to hack a voting machine, the past week all I have read is about a lack of voting machines, a restriction on voting hours, broken screens, missed votes, boxes of votes showing up, wrong tallies.  How is this even remotely acceptable?  This should be a bipartisan issue that we can get behind as a nation and agree that our votes are incredibly important and not subject almost every election to these antics.",Falkamper,e9oij99,conservative
OK when are the adults going intervene? I would be more comfortable letting France count our votes at this point.,Willie1Eye,e9oe55a,conservative
Florida is like a giant meme,Zac1245,e9ogf3n,conservative
FLOLrida,DogBeersHadOne,e9oi7r4,conservative
"But the overheated after all the Democrat votes were counted.   This is so blatantly obvious that it is attempts at voter fraud, what can be done?",RKfan,e9ohmw6,conservative
Another democratic county having problems. Shocking.,r777m,e9ogu21,conservative
The got the vote counters mixed up with the shredders. Don't jam multiple Republican ballots into the machine at once!,Rightquercusalba,e9omeqy,conservative
[Your election is important to us. Please stay on the line and the next counter available will get to you when free. We here at Florida value your election results.](https://youtu.be/gdJWZxPW45c),Enzo_SAWFT,e9of564,conservative
"And also, it's often only a minority of people who vote in the US too. In Australia we often have 90% or above turnout, as it's compulsory, but never long delays, frequently screwed up counts etc, and all voting is handled by completely non-political state or national electoral commissions. Oh, and virtually all ballots are filled out by hand and counted by hand too... And most counting is completed on election night.

It just baffles me every time the US has an election, to see it always be such an organisational mess.",isthisfunnytoyou,e9ord4j,conservative
Free Voter ID + secure block-chain voting tech should be a standard.,PerceivedShift,e9opqdl,conservative
I think in California all of the machines may be broken. 😝,milkboy33,e9otxzo,conservative
It’s almost to the point where you have to come to the conclusion that our whole system is fake and both sides are working to make it that way. ,Chootum,e9ovqc8,conservative
r/FloridaMan,ReaganTroll,e9ohm0h,conservative
Democrats are overtly bigoted racist and sexist.,BrighamYoung,e9opdak,conservative
"Poll: Majority of Republicans think Democrats are ""socialist."" 

Seriously, this shit is like asking Jews and Palestinians to critique each other, and then act surprised when the results are exactly what you expect.",moveoutadvicce,e9oo8q8,conservative
"That’s odd, because it’s the left who is supporting shit like affirmative action and diversity quotas which literally weighs race/gender over credentials and qualifications. Absolute insanity. ",political-alt,e9oo181,conservative
"I’m shocked that Democrats would say that, shocked I tell you. /s",seat_shop,e9opybi,conservative
"And yet if a democrat debated a republican and only FACTS were allowed, they would no longer hate us because their hatred is based on the lies spewed by their party and the lying media.",stancrouch,e9otmji,conservative
"Without exception, Democrats eventually believe their own propaganda.",SilverHerfer,e9orvlv,conservative
What I find most troubling about this is that over a fifth of both democrats and republicans think the other side is “evil.” Really? Evil? Like sure there are some bad apples on either side of the table but that’s such an extreme perspective. ,Boobs_not_bombs,e9ot1p4,conservative
I think the funniest thing is how significantly more liberals say they would be disturbed by someone marrying into their family with different political opinions. For the party that talks about how tolerant it is the data points quite a different direction.,etibbs,e9ourq1,conservative
"By the definition of racist commonly circulated, everyone is racist.  Literally every single person because that is how humans operate.  We see people, observe correlations, and act accordingly.  This goes for dress, behavior, and race.  
  
Racism used to mean prejudice.  As in you would assume behavior without experience causing people to ignore their actual experience.  Racism was an intellectual movement of racial determinism.  The new racism means having any race based beliefs.  As in you have to ignore your experience.  You aren't allowed to expect a Hispanic to act like the other Hispanics you've met.  Nor are police.  You are stuck fighting your own experience.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9ou87u,conservative
One side is guilty of generalizing and misjudging an entire population and your response is to generalize and misjudge that group? You're better than that. ,tucotemerarious,e9os876,conservative
One is a political platform the other is describing hateful people. I don't see how your example is equivalent. Especially since the Democrats have prominent stars like Bernie Sanders running around who would have won then 2016 primary had it not been rigged.,ultimis,e9oqjq4,conservative
"I think pattern recognition in and of itself isn't racist. What is racist is to hold the actions of a group against people on a person-by-person basis. Also, treating others differently based on their race. ",Crusader_1096_2,e9ovby3,conservative
"Except the Democratic Platform is by definition racist. They support race-based policies, and want to prop up minorities because of their race. ",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9oty9z,conservative
"You're thinking too hard into it...I was pointing out the clear bias in asking such a question, not trying to make a comparison between the verbiage. People who fundamentally disagree will see the other in a negative light.",moveoutadvicce,e9oqxj7,conservative
"And the left makes the same claims against the GOP. I'm sorry but I can't get on board with generalized divisive rhetoric. I'd would prefer to debate the issues on substantive grounds than demonize half of the country for the sake of rallying support to my ""team"". I may get downvoted for disagreeing with someone over the idea that the ""Left is bad"" at face value, but our democratic process breaks down when we can't talk to each other, and labeling millions of people racist to discredit them is not productive. ",tucotemerarious,e9ounfu,conservative
"I think we all agree sexist, racists, bigots are bad people. Democrats would not think socialists are bad people considering they wanted to nominate one for president.

I get your underlying point. Such as polling found that a large number of Republicans thought Obama was a secret Muslim. Not nearly as bad as the above poll, but showed a predisposition to believe things about the opposition. 

My argument was that they are not equivalent. Saying both sides do it is an over simplification of the issue and a false equivalency. The left's perception of the right is a lot more hateful than the reverse.",ultimis,e9osayb,conservative
"I gotta say that I disagree with you. I think it’s possible to disagree with someone but still think that they are a respectable, rational human being. 

I personally know people on both sides of the aisle who back their opinions up with facts and sound logic so I certainly don’t think these people are bigots or “evil” etc. But the two sides differ if their values so which facts are most relevant to determining policy, it’s tough. 

Then on the other hand we’ve got people on either side who have no facts and no reasoning and they are just talking out heir ass and getting a lot of attention for it. I do honestly believe that it’s possible to have civil, respectful debate. It’s just no happening in a public forum in this country. It’s splashy enough for the new networks and to grab enough attention to win debates. ",Boobs_not_bombs,e9osnns,conservative
"I'll agree with that, fair point. ",moveoutadvicce,e9osh4o,conservative
So CNN is claiming it’s a false flag ,i_floop_the_pig,e9oi1k1,conservative
"I'm sorry, is their entire argument that the white house knew Jim wouldn't give up the microphone? 

Because if he consistently acts like that to the point is predictable.... he doesn't deserve a press pass. ",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e9okcms,conservative
Every day I think we have reached peak stupid and every day I'm proven wrong. ,Vrael22,e9oko6n,conservative
So CNN admits it did happen then.,J0kerr,e9ogncf,conservative
"Don, there is video of the incident.  It doesn't looked staged but you look like a complete moron for saying things like this.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9ollbo,conservative
It's truly amazing how much bullshit CNN is capable of espousing,FallingPinkElephant,e9ols2x,conservative
This is gonna be fun!,soywars,e9om1f7,conservative
"Don, please keep doing whatever drugs you are on. You are proving why the majority of American think ""mainstream journalism"" is a joke.",Red_Falcon_75,e9oo6qf,conservative
"When life gives you Lemons, change the channel.",Otto-Carpenter,e9oq6td,conservative
Will say anything for viewers...,lax714,e9oqgpx,conservative
I don't get how a network that gives so much airtime to hardcore leftists like Lemon who has literally never not reported with a strong bias in his entire life can sit back and tell people they're not biased. And I also love how they think they have the right to keep a disruptive assclown like Acosta in the White House for the ratings he gets for trying to be the story instead of reporting the story.,fightonphilly,e9ou3ps,conservative
"Don is right about it being staged, except that it was CNN that staged it.",mlmack,e9oub2f,conservative
Just another CNN dipshit trying to gain noteriety and build a career by saying whatever ridiculous contreversial thing that pops into his pea sized brain. Moron,Rudeirishit,e9ovqtj,conservative
This whole thing is a joke. It's like who's whinier journalists or trump,PubliusDeLaMancha,e9oujlc,conservative
"> Every day I think we have reached peak stupid and every day I'm proven wrong.

This is exactly what my first thought was.  You can no longer even make up a total lie and not sell it to the useful idiots.  There are no boundaries left for the despicable slimes who have destroyed the news media in our country.",stancrouch,e9om1ua,conservative
I go back and forth deciding if it’s stupidity or Saul Alinsky.,DrEntschuldigung,e9omhs1,conservative
wat,Ilikeminewelldone,e9oq3dh,conservative
These people are evil.,HissingFauna22,e9orgxz,conservative
Transgender female would be a boy with long hair and girl clothes,Dranosh,e9osbn0,conservative
"He was transferred for refusing to look at a naked underage girl?! What the fuck 

Scary times to be a teacher especially since you can literally lose your job for using the wrong pronoun, pathetic. ",Harryfwd,e9ouwy4,conservative
">A Florida school district allowed a self-described transgender female student access to the boys' locker room, with no warning to parents. The first time she walked in, she caught 'boys (literally) with their pants down.'",keilwerth,e9or1rs,conservative
"Transgender female, that means “she” is a he",Dranosh,e9osp1d,conservative
"I was literally quoting the article.
  
Take your outrage up with the author, not me.",keilwerth,e9otyhc,conservative
 It that means they have their shit fucking backward. It was a dude,MegaBlastoise23,e9ovan9,conservative
cc: whoever has the authority to put Lindsay Graham 2.0 in Judiciary Chair ,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9op4bx,conservative
The picture of him in this headline is the face of a man who is done with people’s shit. ,Derp2638,e9ouhf1,conservative
"Real question is what our Deficit/GDP ratio is.

More info: https://www.thebalance.com/us-deficit-by-year-3306306",cons_NC,e9orapc,conservative
"We control all three branches of government.  I'm sorry, but from where I see it, the Representatives in office are only Conservative when the other party is in power.",trendyweather,e9ovhty,conservative
"The chart you linked shows 4%, which is good. 

I would prefer if it was as low as possible, but I’m satisfied with only 4% since 77% is the dead zone. ",c_ward5,e9otaml,conservative
"Nice, very solid take on the Amazon situation.

""New York, with the money that’s now going to Amazon, could have paid for three years of road maintenance or have reduced the corporate income tax rates by 5.42 percent, which would benefit ordinary companies without political favor. Virginia could have reduced the corporate income tax by 45.16 percent and maintained the roads for four years with that money.""",buamundus_gigas,e9ot5bs,conservative
Even a blind squirrel finds a nut once in while. ,chriztee,e9omhzk,conservative
Broken clock.,_Gardien,e9oozut,conservative
Bezos could personally pay the tax break back and still have about a hundred and ten billion dollars left over,SickofInternetProgs,e9osd96,conservative
"You can argue whether or not federal taxes are for ""revenue"" or are designed to reduce the amount of dollars in circulation so that government can continue its deficit spending.

But - for states and cities which don't have the unlimited printing press - taxes are indeed for revenue, and it's not ""socialist"" to argue that it's unfair and immoral to foist the tax burden onto the citizens and let corporate elites off nearly scot-free.  
   
  ",KezzardTheWizzard,e9ou5ei,conservative
"Update 2.1.3.45; Upload successful, installing........Installation successful.  Reboot now?  Rebooting........",Jizzlobber42,e9or5ho,conservative
Am I the only one who finds her physically unattractive?,PurpleAngel23,e9oqqc9,conservative
no,IvankasFutureHusband,e9ouah3,conservative
What the fuck does that matter?,TunaMustard,e9ovq9f,conservative
Grandpa Simpson has been creating disasters for years ago he has something to blame on global warming.  Like the fact that we can't get more water storage so drouts will be worse.,BrockLee76,e9nvgc3,conservative
">What many do not know, is that California Gov. Jerry Brown vetoed a bipartisan wildfire management bill in 2016, **despite unanimous passage by the Legislature, 75-0 in the Assembly and 39-0 in the Senate.** SB 1463  would have given local governments more say in fire-prevention efforts through the Public Utilities Commission proceeding making maps of fire hazard areas around utility lines. In a gross display of politics, this is especially pertinent given that Cal Fire and the state’s media are now blaming the largest utility in the state for the latest wildfires.

It is ridiculous that a governor was able to veto a bill that passed with unanimous support and then the legislature/assembly not have a means of overriding that veto. If the President vetoes a bill, it can still pass if 2/3rd's of the House and Senate support it or vote to override the veto.  


Edit: So, California does have vet override which requires 2/3rd's majority vote. The only caveat is that they have 60 days to vote on overriding the veto. Makes you wonder what happened that the bill did not go back on the docket (or perhaps no session was held) to override the governor's veto of a unanimous bill.",-Kerosun-,e9oi39r,conservative
"Liberals should coin the slogan “Learn the hard way, but work harder to forget what you learned.",bmack083,e9ogl2r,conservative
Jerry has a vested intrest in blaming wild fire on global warming. ,ozric101,e9nwz5m,conservative
Between Jerry and his relation Kate Brown our forests on the west coast are horrendously mismanaged. The last three years in southern Oregon we have had smoke choking out our valley with no attention from the governor to fix it and no national attention to fix it. The only one who has done it has been our Republican representative Greg Walden who has slowly turned into a much better representative,Vrael22,e9okkok,conservative
"Thanks.  Very informative. The law of unintended consequences at work, overtime.",GlenGanges,e9oa9du,conservative
Progressive is a code word for Communist. Both are pure evil.,pookiee68,e9okuwp,conservative
What was his reasoning?,Falkamper,e9oi7lh,conservative
"""Alright, let's make sure we have a unending stream of dead brush and trees in between all the houses and highways. Good job everyone!"". They refuse to clear this shit year in and year out then act shocked when everything's on fire.",JoeDuerte,e9oaxk4,conservative
Should have labelled it free fire control for illegals,lax714,e9orkdg,conservative
Wake up California.  Should be a new meme Jerry Brown leaving the State of California on fire.  What a genius he was.  And now Gavin Newsom (Jerry’s mini me) is Governor.  More of the same.  John Cox was your way out and you didn’t get it right.,Neanderthalbastard,e9ojids,conservative
"It's better than that. His father worked with Republicans in the 50's with a plan to store/provide water up to 100 million people. His first time as governor he gutted all the hydro infrastructure projects as a favor to rabid environmentalist groups.

He then was governor again when his chickens came home to roost. He then blamed climate change knowing the Democrats in the state were too stupid to understand the issue, and the deflection worked with the complicit media.

Meanwhile he and Democrats did *nothing* to address future water shortages. Yet Democrats were elected by the useful idiots who see a D and vote. ",ultimis,e9olesg,conservative
I just read you comment...  oops,ozric101,e9nx013,conservative
I had no idea California didn’t have the ability to override a veto.  What other states are like that?,NCSUGrad2012,e9okyho,conservative
"The California sheep flock to the Democrat shepherd but to their demise. This guy was an idiot before and still an idiot, the wild fires destruction and deaths are on his head.",cavemanben,e9ogl4w,conservative
"It's hard to have good reasoning when you veto a bill that was passed unanimously, with bipartisan support, in both the State's House and Senate. ",amjourdan,e9oj9jv,conservative
He is NOT called Governor Moonbeam for nothing.,pookiee68,e9okydz,conservative
He has been beholden to the rabid environmentalists. They see any human action in nature as blasphemy and evil. Which is why much of the fire prevention activities have been blocked.,ultimis,e9oln24,conservative
Stop flushing half the available water into the ocean every year would be a good start. ,ElbowWhisper,e9orjim,conservative
"Huh. That's odd. So, according to [ballotpedia](https://ballotpedia.org/Veto_overrides_in_state_legislatures#Veto_override_rules_in_state_legislatures), each state has the power to overturn a gubernatorial veto. In California, the state legislature has 60 days to overturn the veto and requires a 2/3rd's vote to overturn a veto.

Makes you wonder what else happened to where a unanimously approved bill that was vetoed by the governor didn't get back on the docket in time for the state legislator to overturn the veto.",-Kerosun-,e9olszo,conservative
"Sounds to me like he is damned if he does, and damned if he doesn’t.",PurpleAngel23,e9ojxps,conservative
Come on at least make your daughter show up. If I was prez I definitely would have better things to do but this would be a perfect opportunity for his wife to show some interest and get a little positive press. ,ProllyWasted,e9oihq4,conservative
"> Sounds to me like he is damned if he does, and damned if he doesn’t.

Of course it does.  You are dealing with irrational morons what else would you expect.",stancrouch,e9olud6,conservative
">get a little positive press.

LMAO, you sweet child.",ReaganTroll,e9onem9,conservative
They're not going because it would turn into an entire evening of Trump-bashing ala the Correspondent's Dinner.,ngoni,e9ol2b2,conservative
"No kidding. Either show up and piss people off, or don’t show up and piss people off. Gee, tough choice.",PurpleAngel23,e9oqe46,conservative
"Conservatives should be rioting right now, but no one cares. ",scrubking,e9oepaj,conservative
" I live in Florida. Imagine how easily fraud could occur if we stopped verifying signatures on mail ballots, stopped requiring identification and, heck, let’s just let illegals vote. This is what is being pushed by The Democrat’s lawyers in Florida.

Dem lawyers are asking a judge to throw that law out & force Florida to count ballots with signatures that don’t match the voter signature on file,” Senator Rubio explained.",Ted-the-Pirate,e9oespj,conservative
"When you can get the votes, just make them your selves ",Chapka69,e9ofw25,conservative
"The Democrats are desperate to get their voter fraud schemes in place, it’s too hard for those black hearted hate peddlers to win otherwise.",BrighamYoung,e9ojjqx,conservative
I'm convinced that voting day should be a national holiday. Votes can only be cast on that day by already registered voters in person on paper ballots. Final tally must be completed within 24 hours.,_Gardien,e9oq4bn,conservative
Of course they are.,phydeaux70,e9oi4yq,conservative
"I care, I'm just up in PA and have to work. No time in the schedule set aside for rioting. Its really fucking scary though, and I'm not just talking about the Senate race in Florida. There are 12 house races that were called for republicans on election night that ""flipped"" after the fact. This is a really bad thing. ",iwasthebeaver,e9og18q,conservative
"I'm a Floridian born and raised and am going to college in Brevard County. I've been outraged, but there's no conservative organizations on campus and I know exactly 0 other students who seem to care much at all about this. The only person I can fulminate with is my dad. 

Leftists riot and burn things down. That's not conservative nature. Sadly, it seems that means we aren't willing to stand up when it's needed and defend our freedom. ",Goat_Fluid,e9onqva,conservative
Final tally must be completed in 24 hours? Yeah that's never gonna work in Florida.,GorathThorgath,e9oqqql,conservative
Is that what happens to AZ?,PurpleAngel23,e9ok3ix,conservative
"I don't know about Arizona honestly, but McSally was winning on Election night and then more ballots came out of nowhere that went a crazy high percentage for Sinema and Sinema ended up taking the lead. ",iwasthebeaver,e9okd2i,conservative
"they didn't come out of nowhere. This is how AZ elections of late have worked. The vast majority of people fill out early mail in ballots, but drop them off at the polling centers on election day, which is fine and legal. So not only do they have to finish counting the mail in ballots in an unexpectedly high turnout year for a midterm, but also finish counting the dropped of ballots. 

If you go back and look at the 2016 election, even though everyone called it for Trump and HRC conceded the official results weren't announced for like a week or two after the election. They count them all regardless. Usually though one candidate is far enough ahead that the mail in ballots if they fall even within a pretty wide margin of the in person votes, then it will be safe to call the race early. 

The only legal challenges the GOP had here was how the guy in marciopa county might have not been following the rules and calling people who forgot to sign their ballots by calling them after the period in which you're allowed to follow up with them to confirm it was their ballot, but I don't think it was proved anything malicious was done. McSally ran a bad campaign, had a horrible debate, and wasn't that well liked in Maricopa since she's form the south of the state, meanwhile the democrats literally got the highest turnout I've ever seen in the state, that combined with just the natural forces of a midterm election meant sinema won. 

If she actually governs as an independent like she claims and says she will work with whoever is in the white house for the betterment of AZ (again, like she promised) then maybe she can be a long term senator. But if she votes and acts like the far leftist I suspect she is, then she will lose in a landslide come 6 years if someone like Schweikert, ducey, bernovich, or biggs runs against her. Big test will come if trump gets another Supreme court pick, she's lucky that she dodged that one being in the house, because that really did polarize the climate here, but sinema stayed away from that. IF turmp gets to appoint one more and someone like Barret is who he chooses and sinema votes against a sound constitutionalist judge, then she's done. I can also see the senate making a bunch of immigration proposals, since that probably can be done without having an impact on the budget it can come out of the senate. If she votes against something like a modernized skills based system that allows more people in to work with an end to chain migration and the diversity lottery program and gets a permnant solution for the dreamers that isn't citizenship, then she would likely be done. She voted against the tax cuts, but again is in the house and it's easier to go unnoticed on things like that, but the spotlight will be on her. ",ed_merckx,e9oom5r,conservative
"I get what you're saying which is why I said I don't know about Arizona. I just have 0 faith she is actually going to be an ""independent"" democratic senator and something just doesn't feel right about what has happened to a lot of the vote totals across the country in the last week since the election. ",iwasthebeaver,e9oq1vu,conservative
"> But if she votes and acts like the far leftist I suspect she is

I think she is beyond that. I think she is a total weirdo.",PurpleAngel23,e9oqb4c,conservative
"We can debate all day about what the rules should be (tax rates, regulations, etc), but in the end, every company should be subject to the same rules.   


&#x200B;",InnerSquare,e9ojkv3,conservative
"I’m of the impression that bezos should be able to shop around and pick what market will cater to him best. It’s entirely New York’s fault for giving him exactly what he wanted. 

To NY they must put a high value on the jobs and infrastructure it’ll bring, because we saw what happened with Seattle when they tried to screw amazon in every way possible. ",primitivo_,e9oo3av,conservative
"New York should have a more business-friendly environment across the board, but that'll never happen. Deals and incentives are inherently unfair to businesses that have had to suffer here for decades. The hysteria about destroying neighborhoods and the sky falling are hysterical though. ",ReaganChild,e9opjqi,conservative
Tucker Carlson and AOC agreeing on something? Now that's interesting.,GorathThorgath,e9oqw77,conservative
"But it's an 'incentive' not a break silly. Isn't NY already giving 10 years tax free for businesses moving to NY.

But yes in the end it should be across board. From what I've seen or heard about Amazon's demands their requirements were just as bad as the Olympics mandating all sorts of stuff from the host city.",postonrddt,e9omnj4,conservative
She has a handful of good points. She just draws the wrong conclusions from them. ,caffienatedjedi,e9orqas,conservative
"I do remember reading somewhere what they were looking for. I think that it's silly to give in to them because they're not bringing a ton of tax revenue with them. I had this conversation with a retired financial controller and he was explaining to me that the HQs they're setting up don't have a lot of things to tax compared to, say, a manufacturing center. Sure, there will be salaries, but not a whole lot more. So, it's not worth it on the merits alone to give them a huge break.

Now, there are arguments to be made about them bringing other businesses to the area, but I'm not exactly seeing the huge net gain. I am open to being convinced otherwise, though, especially as a I'm a big ebook consumer (and thus use Amazon a lot).",skarface6,e9or7kw,conservative
"I would love to see someone *on either side* advocate for having representatives telecommute from their own district rather than have to do all their business from the Capitol. Not only would it solve the problem of having to find housing, but lobbyists would have to work a lot harder to wine and dine everybody if they're literally all over the map. Plus it would have the added benefit of keeping reps in the districts they serve so that they remain accountable to those who vote for them.",GameShowWerewolf,e9na6xq,conservative
"I don’t think this (not being able to afford an apartment) is something we should mock her for. Apparently there’s a ton of congressman sleeping in their offices because D.C. housing prices are so high. Yes she could commute, but D.C. traffic is insane and we should be trying to eliminate as many monetary barriers to office as possible.",samurguy990,e9mq0ka,conservative
she could just live in maryland and drive to work like normal ppl.,spacexpanda,e9mm53t,conservative
r/wowthanksimcured,Tobyjv,e9mfvsr,conservative
economics major,Spudzzy7s,e9mwaik,conservative
This girl knew she was gonna be elected months and months ago but didnt plan for shit. Then gets elected and bitches about not planning anything. ,Zac1245,e9mkonc,conservative
"The new up and rising star of the Democratic Party, Ladies and Gentlemen, Ocasio-Cortez-Gump",Rudeirishit,e9mk775,conservative
"I asked some people why she doesn’t apply for a small loan from a bank, since her guaranteed salary and the fact that she’s nationally known means any bank would be stupid to turn her down.

I was downvoted because apparently money lending doesn’t exist in 2018 and she is asking for a handout.

She started a gofundme for rent, it would be interesting to see where those donations come from.

Edit:She’s backtracking on a lot of the rent comments now as the backlash was pretty widespread, her financial disclosures also show she should have enough money for an apartment.  I’m sure a working class woman of the people wouldn’t and shouldn’t mind living in the down and dirty parts of DC.",BroadStreetElite,e9ml9dk,conservative
She'll be fine once ~~other peoples money~~ her salary kicks in though,Jizzlobber42,e9mncsl,conservative
So she is elected as a socialist and now she has no money? The irony is beautiful.,Sketch_Crush,e9mqrdq,conservative
This woman should go back to bartending... ,TommySawyer,e9mikdn,conservative
"If this isn't r/facepalm, I don't know what is.",GreekLogic,e9mwq5b,conservative
"DC housing prices are high. I should know, I live here. But if you earn $174,000/year you can make it work. Find another incoming member as a roommate and pool a portion of your money for a small apartment. It's what adults do.",TrueBirch,e9n1k6a,conservative
This woman is a complete moron.  How she won is mind-boggling to me.,StephenNesbit,e9mwzr1,conservative
"See, when it comes to healthcare, it's important to understand that she meant the word ""you"" in the literal sense of ""not me"", as the concept of *her* paying for anything herself is clearly entirely foreign to her. Let's just see how long it takes her to figure out a way for not-her to pay for her apartment too.",misespises,e9mn2p5,conservative
Havent you heard? The taxpayers are supposed to provide her with housing. Everything is free!,Jagoff86,e9n5kvw,conservative
Didn't she get pissed at Amazon for choosing them for their new facility? Self-sufficient citizens must be quite the threat to socialism. ,cseymour24,e9n4kb7,conservative
She should run for Speaker. ,MDMCrab,e9nk5a5,conservative
This should have way more upvotes,sans_laRegret,e9myq6f,conservative
Jesus she’s soooooo DUMB!!!!,EnditAll4me,e9n100m,conservative
But wouldn't CNN be riding her dick all the way??,Bleachy98,e9mua7m,conservative
"Her strategy to pay for socialism is ""the same way everything else is paid for"".  That is, debt.  She just trusts the Fed and the Financial industry to just magically produce money.  She would take her brazen ignorance and mortgage our country to the people she claims to oppose.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9mqrdz,conservative
"That red lipstick.. this chick can say whatever she wants as far as I’m concerned. The more economically illiterate the hotter it is for me.

Edit: it has just occurred to me that this is the socialists plan all along. Damn you Bernie!",JackFucington,e9mmkf3,conservative
Is there anyone who actually likes this woman? ,TungstenKraken,e9msxfw,conservative
Remember when she was on Tapper’s show? He asked her how we were going to afford her $40 trillion program for all of these welfare services. Her answer was the usual “think of it as an investment” salesman BS.,MyCustomUsername,e9mr6ki,conservative
"If it's true she's set up a GoFundMe page, we shouldn't be surprised. Libs always expect someone else to pick up the tab. ",JFGFNY,e9mmulr,conservative
"God, if only my life were so simple.",Black_m0ngoose,e9nr0b3,conservative
"Oh, well look at that. Turns out the only problem with socialism isn't that you eventually run out of other people's money. Seems it's also a problem if expenses arise before you start collecting other people's money, too. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9nw3az,conservative
HA so tru,parog17,e9mzc6u,conservative
Intellegence does not run rampent with this one.,StephenScherer1,e9mvj1d,conservative
"She's either among the dumbest people ever elected, or an incredible liar with a gullible constituent base. Either way, she's a disaster",Oneshoeleroy,e9mvak0,conservative
"Or you could just repeal the 17th amendment.  Senators were never meant to be elected by the popular vote of the state, but by the state legislators for the very purpose you mentioned.  The state legislators live in the state the represent and they are more in touch with the people who vote them in.",flippy76,e9obytf,conservative
Progressive here.. I would have no problem providing some dorm like accommodations for late nights and what not.. but commuting into DC is not that big of a hardship.. I should know I do it every day.  I don't feel bad for her one bit.  Maybe they will do their jobs and fix the flaming disaster of a metro subway system if they have to actually rely on it. ,Dudehitscar,e9mtfz9,conservative
"How is a $175k salary barring people from office? She was able to fund and win a congressional campaign, but she can’t figure out how to lease an apartment?",Ihateunerds,e9n6shs,conservative
"> Yes she could commute, but D.C. traffic is insane

Yet hundreds of thousands of people do it.

Let's be real here... she just can't have the place she *wants*. Big difference between wants and needs.",TBoneTheOriginal,e9n4iqo,conservative
"I think the larger picture is that she clearly possesses very little knowledge about how to live as a responsible adult in a modern economy (on top of her lack of understanding about basic economic principles), and now she will be overseeing the spending and taxation and policy decisions of the federal government.
",nited_states,e9mvvry,conservative
"I disagree. Housing prices within realistic driving distances of the capital are well known. I don't want some one in office that's mystically able to fund a very large campaign, but unable to come up with a plan to sleep someplace dry for a couple months if elected.",Oneshoeleroy,e9muzq1,conservative
"$174,000",Moonthrower,e9n2e70,conservative
[deleted],,e9n7ibz,conservative
"I agree that we should encourage people who aren't rich to participate in politics, but at the same time she can get a roommate or two like the rest of us did when we moved to DC. I lived in a rented room in some guy's crummy house for $500/month for a while. It was a crappy situation but that's the money I had at the time.",TrueBirch,e9n141u,conservative
I found this about her financial situation: https://www.foxnews.com/politics/ocasio-cortez-claims-of-not-being-to-afford-dc-apartment-crumbles-under-scrutiny,thepinkviper,e9nywax,conservative
"Yeah, the ruling class should not have to commute like plebes like me who commute into DC. ",Zac1245,e9n53pt,conservative
"Or Virginia, where I live because I dont wanna live in DC and like guns (that I cant own in DC) and its cheaper.",Zac1245,e9mp4j7,conservative
"Or live in the congressional offices, which isn't unheard of.",Robo1p,e9msoft,conservative
"Exactly. There are millions of people living in the DC metro area. She just can't afford the kind of apartment she wants, so she whines about it.",LibertyTerp,e9mnomx,conservative
"Um excuse me, but THAT'S BAD FOR THE ENVIRONMENT AND YOU'RE A BAD PERSON

*Proceeds to climb into private jet*",Natanyul,e9mzr7f,conservative
Seriously I throw my Spotify on and drive my happy ass down the beltway every day from Columbia. She just wants to live like the wealthy. ,Evox119,e9n1lqq,conservative
"She’s not “normal people”, she’s a diva. Hilarious that her whole schtick is “just a working class girl from the Bronx” (from the wealthiest Bronx Zip Code, BTW) but she demands that everyone treat her like a princess. Naturally the White Knights of r/politics line up to sniff her sock.
",dontbedenied,e9n7c6f,conservative
Like a peasant!?,teddyrooseveltsfist,e9n9z6y,conservative
Honestly some of these are pretty cringeworthy and/or belong on r/comedycemetery,Ulamogs_Toilet_Paper,e9mm2u0,conservative
remind me to never go to the college she went to.,Delta_25,e9npan4,conservative
"What will happen to dumb, irresponsible people without socialism to hold their hand?

They'll learn from their mistakes and start being more responsible.",LibertyTerp,e9mnn11,conservative
That's why she's so perfect for Government!,chabanais,e9mq46f,conservative
"What's the over/under on # of months before we hear ""The government should just pay for (me) an apartment in DC "" out of her mouth?

Socialists really have no clue how the real world works

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",MyTaro,e9n1ojv,conservative
"So you’re suggesting someone who’s base thought is “someone else should pay for it” is upset bc she didn’t plan or save money for an apt in DC if she got elected, is some how surprising?

Better get that go fund me page ready. ",MadTitan63,e9mrfty,conservative
Sounds like a 14 year old I know.,justforthissubred,e9mvkty,conservative
She should run for president ,Zac1245,e9mpl5u,conservative
"She did not start a gofundme that I’m aware of, though a few unrelated people seem to have.  She has explicitly tweeted that anyone who wanted to contribute anything for her should instead redirect their fund to a charity that helps her constituents.

She also turned down an offer of housing from Jose Andres stating that she should be fine.

I imagine that you got downvoted because you made uninformed claims that were false",jasperhw,e9mmril,conservative
"> She started a gofundme for rent,

Is this really true?  ",stoffel_bristov,e9mm9z0,conservative
"Most banks don’t really give unsecured loans line gvat. Especially for something so small as just a few months rent. By the time they went through documentation and the loan process, they would lose money on the deal. ",foodVSfood,e9msl6o,conservative
"Lending money, for what, interest? Why that would be usury!

You were probably downvoted because of the strong value that most of reddit puts on strict adherence to biblical law. Why else would they have downvoted my post where I boiled a baby goat in it's mother's milk?",misespises,e9mmgj4,conservative
"> She started a gofundme for rent, it would be interesting to see where those donations come from.

Probably the same idiots who handed over $650K to Christine Blasey Ford.",FelixFuckfurter,e9mn1l2,conservative
"The DNC, Antifa, and Hamas. ",WooPig45,e9mm9r3,conservative
why so she can steal tips?,Delta_25,e9mjdfl,conservative
I'm sure she could get a 1 bedroom just fine at that salary.  I do it in NYC with less than that.,IvankasFutureHusband,e9n8h5d,conservative
muh free stuff in a district that loves muh free stuff.,IvankasFutureHusband,e9n8bnq,conservative
"Haha, I'm convinced thats why much of NYC voted for her. As a resident, I'm so sorry America. Please nuke us.",mrhammsack,e9mt8dx,conservative
It isn’t true,jasperhw,e9mmxfc,conservative
"Issue I have is congressmen make $174,000 a year. If she doesn't have the maturity level to be able to plan on that kind of income a way to get to work then I cannot take anything she says financially seriously. 

I know plenty of people in the NYC area paying higher prices then what I am seeing in the DC area on half that budget while paying student loans. ",madcorp,e9mzxfk,conservative
"I in the greater DC area recently on business. I live in the Bay Area and was dreading how bad traffic would be in DC based on what I’d heard. Turns out DC traffic ain’t all that bad compared to the bay. And the metro system was surprisingly efficient, but I understand that it’s a single track in some areas on the weekends.",pouklib,e9n3t4p,conservative
You commute from NYC everyday to DC?,bigchicago04,e9n5y9k,conservative
Funny how socialists want equality for everyone except the ruling class. ,workalotic,e9n7ooy,conservative
"> I think the larger picture is that she clearly possesses very little knowledge ~~about how to live as a responsible adult in a modern economy~~ (on top of her lack of understanding about basic economic principles), and now she will be overseeing the spending and taxation and policy decisions of the federal government.

FTFY",grckalck,e9nh8xc,conservative
"DC resident here. If she gets a roommate (not unheard of for freshmen members of Congress) she can find a decent place for her $174,000/year. [Here, I'll even help her find a place.](https://www.apartmentfinder.com/District-Of-Columbia/Washington-Apartments/q/?bd=2&xr=2500)",TrueBirch,e9n1c27,conservative
"She cant afford one until that $174,000 salary starts...",MisunderstoodDemon,e9ncgra,conservative
"DC's gun laws have changed a lot since I moved here 13 years ago. Apparently, we're even getting concealed carry.",TrueBirch,e9n1m9y,conservative
"Elements of a /u/chabanais meme post:

1. Title is directly taken from the meme ✔

2. Title ends in an ellipses ✔

3. Receives a brief blowing of air out of the nose or less as a response ✔

I love being a part of this sub, but a ton of these memes are just meh.",dragonbornrito,e9mtz8w,conservative
"Or die off, which is really what nature intended.",NakedAndBehindYou,e9moy9j,conservative
And a socialist party!,skarface6,e9mvrip,conservative
"Occasional Cortex 2020!

I'd donate to her just to make her go far in the primaries. ",MedayekMan,e9mrnne,conservative
She’s not old enough ATM. ,skarface6,e9mvskh,conservative
I would actually support this decision. 😈,etherealsmog,e9mr2jg,conservative
"There was a gofundme started *for* her, but not by her. That's a reasonable misunderstanding on the part of /u/BroadStreetElite, but the more relevant point is that he also didn't say he got downvoted for talking about her gofundme, but rather for asking why doesn't she just get a loan from a bank based on her guaranteed income.

I don't understand the point of her griping about all of this if she's now fine and can turn down Jose Andres's offer to stay with him. Broadstreet's question seems perfectly reasonable to me.",misespises,e9mnpj6,conservative
No,jasperhw,e9mmvan,conservative
Ummmm...goat.,JRockSr,e9mofuu,conservative
Professional rape victim ,buy_ge,e9mn815,conservative
"I’m an ex-bartender. I can understand why her old co-workers despised her. PSA: Stealing your co-workers tips says a lot about the kind of person you are.

EDIT: Looks like the White Knights of r/politics are downvoting you",dontbedenied,e9n6hpn,conservative
"Stealing tips,  stealing votes,. All in a day's work",TommySawyer,e9mnx8z,conservative
Someone will put the idea in her head or do it on her behalf...just wait.,JFGFNY,e9mn13l,conservative
I've lived in the DC area all my life and I've worked and commuted here for over 12 years. I don't make that kind of money and I am quite secure financially. I have no sympathy for her whatsoever.,workalotic,e9n48yr,conservative
"Are you telling me socialists don’t understand the value of money, or budgeting?

I am shocked! Shocked I say!",RanchRelaxo,e9optq8,conservative
">Funny how socialists want equality for everyone except **themselves**. 

ftfy",TheCelloLife,e9n9qzl,conservative
How came a person earning 174k per year can't afford 25k in rent?,-Hegemon-,e9n6ai3,conservative
"Its there but its a long tedious process, also tons of restrictions. More trouble than its worth or I would have gotten it lol.",Zac1245,e9n29db,conservative
"It's not easy being a Macedonian content farmer.  Plus, Comrade Putin does not provide clear guidance. 
",chabanais,e9mwnah,conservative
Hoping username doesn't check out.,cseymour24,e9n4et9,conservative
"Nature didn't intend anything. She, like everyone else, can learn and become more. When did Libertarians stop believing in the concept of Reason?",Zyrioun,e9mue56,conservative
"Yeah, but no one in the US is dying off unless they kill themselves literally or through drugs or alcohol. Zero sane American adults die each year. Zero. Even with zero welfare, a few more people would just live with their friends or relatives like people used to, and people in most of the world still do.",LibertyTerp,e9mueqy,conservative
That is a brilliant nickname.,rAlexanderAcosta,e9n528l,conservative
As if Democrats care about legalities. ,RightMillennial,e9mwxlq,conservative
"I don’t agree that’s a reasonable misunderstanding; it took me 30 seconds to confirm one way or the other.

I will agree that I was guessing as to the reason for downvotes, hence me starting it with “I imagine.”  Looking at their actual comment, I don’t see a false claim.  it’s at +2.  And for some reason they questioned if there was an ethics violation.

Regardless, the timeline is something like  -AOC mentions in a couple of interviews that there’s a gap between starting life as a legislator and getting paid as such.  Rando supporters try to start gofundmes on her behalf.  She tweets she does not want donations and anyone so inclined should donate to a charity in her district.  Jose Andres offers her a place to stay.  She says she’s fine but appreciates the offer.

I have not heard any gripes aside from the original interviews; have you?",jasperhw,e9mof7c,conservative
[deleted],,e9mrd6m,conservative
When has AOC stolen votes? I haven't even seen that alleged.,hisverbisdictis,e9mr9sl,conservative
I don't understand how this gets down voted... You guys can't even joke. ,TommySawyer,e9n4bs7,conservative
She’s already on record as asking for anyone who’s inclined to donate to her to instead donate to a charity that supports her constituency,jasperhw,e9mnuv3,conservative
"Im a student and with GI bill and working part time I am perfectly comfortable in the are. Yet shes bitching about her 174,000 dollar salary she will be getting.",Zac1245,e9n56ji,conservative
Yup.  I started on about $50k a year 8 years ago with a car and payment and I made it work.  It was renting a room but you can afford a great place on half of what they make.,velogeek,e9neey6,conservative
Almost like that’s the plan...,gt4674b,e9ohnb1,conservative
lol You kill it in the comments tho,dragonbornrito,e9mwqur,conservative
It was just a joke.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9n25q8,conservative
"She, like most socialists, probably doesn’t know how to manage money ",im-here-for-the-gold,e9ncvte,conservative
I often take heavy tarding tho.,chabanais,e9mwxz2,conservative
Which you put on display for the rest of us to chortle at...,Moonthrower,e9n2iby,conservative
[Biggest tarding I ever took.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/7t1pzm/trump_ordered_mueller_fired_but_backed_off_when/dt99kq8/?utm_content=permalink&utm_medium=front&utm_source=reddit&utm_name=Conservative),chabanais,e9n3d03,conservative
"ROFL holy shit! 

Talk about a brigade...",Moonthrower,e9nh4ef,conservative
Awesome.,chabanais,e9nheum,conservative
Womp Womp,Enzo_SAWFT,e9oo84g,conservative
"Admittedly this has been a big news week, but I watched the big 3 for mention of this on the nightly news on Monday and no mentions at all. ",triggernaut,e9ohgxm,conservative
I’ve only seen it here.,PurpleAngel23,e9okqlr,conservative
"Good news.  This hour of the Today show is now again a ""safe zone"" for the mindless idiots.  Kelly would occasionally introduce reality and it was painful to deal with.  ",optionhome,e9o8yn6,conservative
"This was the same women who could had a great career ahead of her on fox news, but she herself had put an axe to her own feet by going against trump, like katie tur & others. Because she wanted to be a FEMINIST. Alrighty then.",lonewolfsigma8917,e9o92cx,conservative
I don’t think that’s it. She was unpopular from the get go. It’s a Megyn problem not a people problem. ,azngirl7689,e9oi80b,conservative
"I still find it difficult to believe that she went from a quick-on-your-feet 9pm news gig to that dog and pony show on CNN. In spite of her dislike of Trump it really was a waste of good talent.  My dad was on her show a few times when she did town hall sessions during the election, and he said she was very nice in person and joked around with the sound and video staff on commercial breaks. I miss her show. ",SugarplumSarah,e9og00o,conservative
IMHO she did not so much go against Trump but rather attacked him - not with specifics but general innuendos.,GlenGanges,e9ob5om,conservative
She was extremely popular on Fox. She wasn’t popular on that medium because the audience was left leaning and hated her.,Colorsinthevoid45,e9omri0,conservative
I second that,lonewolfsigma8917,e9ob9p2,conservative
"Towards the end, she wasn't popular on Fox either. She shat on Trump too many times.",azngirl7689,e9onsiv,conservative
"I feel like she asked him a legitimate question at the debate.   She basically said you said this, the Democrats will attack you for it (which they did), how do you respond?   It seemed fair enough to me, but I’ve never seen her show so I don’t know what she said there. ",NCSUGrad2012,e9ol30t,conservative
It was totally fair. The president made comments that were actually misogynistic and she asked him how that would impact his ability to win over women. She was then accused of being a traitor for quoting things Trump said word for word. ,Colorsinthevoid45,e9omvl7,conservative
"This is not a left vs right topic. I live in an area that is dominate republican, I can assure you that the same thing happens here with Fox News. I don't really pay much attention to other right-wing news outlets so I can only speak to Fox News. ",Clevadio,e9muj73,conservative
[deleted],,e9mrwap,conservative
The subreddit turning into Meme-Central is pretty damn annoying. ,LordOfTheDerp,e9ms1e8,conservative
Net Neutrality repeal slowed down their uploading speed.,ReaganTroll,e9m84a8,conservative
"I always thought the incessant screaming and whining was a sign of a mental illness, but all this time it was a modem handshake.",soylent_absinthe,e9maqt4,conservative
Waiting for The NY Times wire to update. ,AcuteAppendagitis,e9ml37f,conservative
[removed],,e9mmphi,conservative
"Dinesh D’Souza put it really well, people think they’re well-informed because they see the same points on NPR, CNN, MSNBC, etc. while failing to realize that they’re watching the same bullet just bounce around.",DocMilk,e9mlp6e,conservative
Trump cause cancer,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9mcrvw,conservative
"""Vanilla ice cream is racist, and here are totally undeniable 100% true statistics to show why""",TrooperPilot,e9mntn0,conservative
Do NPC's dream of electric fascists?,sputnik_steve,e9mrwuf,conservative
"Well I think ""Orange man bad, make people pay for not having abject hatred if him and ensure anyone who works with him will experience generations of suffering"" is usually line 1 of text. But I could be wrong, it might be line 2.",Conservativeone,e9mxun3,conservative
“Tell me what to think”,Do_u_ev3n_lift,e9n58iu,conservative
"""reeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee""",AntifaArePathetic,e9mi1os,conservative
Those that put out the talking points use lies and distortions.  The mindless idiots can only repeat the spew of bullshit.  I would love just once to be able to ask one of the mindless pointed questions and provide them proof of reality and have them be able to defend the positions that they parrot.  I have yet be able to find that one person capable of doing it.,optionhome,e9mgkqf,conservative
Its something french wine world war 1 wet hair hitler. ,collectijism,e9mpb80,conservative
Ha I got called an npc for saying something that want anti-Trump ,Jabronies96,e9nvsng,conservative
"Fox news is garbage. Any mainstream media is garbage really. 

Critical thinking is the only way you can truly form your own opinions ",lets_get_lowwerr,e9n3ylo,conservative
"Absolutely.

It is a little more prominent for the left though just because most major media outlets lean left and Reddit leans heavily left.

But both do it for sure.",MenBearsPigs,e9my4sf,conservative
We're ready to believe you.,TheComedianGLP,e9nqfxj,conservative
"

Is that your caricature of where “conservatives” get their news? Fox? 

GTFO 





",Clatsop,e9ncj7s,conservative
Cool story bro. ,latotokyo123,e9ng60h,conservative
"""They're DEHUMANIZING people! This is arguably no different than GENOCIDE!"" -Some Vice News writer.",plow_ur_ass,e9mvhxt,conservative
"It is clearly succeeding in pissing people off, but is that really a good thing? Pissed off people vote.",disciple_of_pallando,e9mu883,conservative
Lol k.,Le4per,e9ms36l,conservative
" We’ve been running this subreddit the same way for over six years now... With a mixture of articles, memes and cartoons.  
 
If you don’t like a particular post or type of post, just don’t click it/them.  

",Clatsop,e9mtj19,conservative
God. Remember how none of us died and everything is fine? ,pharmermummles,e9negu9,conservative
":D

You're old.",TheComedianGLP,e9nqmdt,conservative
"MSNPC

https://i.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/001/423/413/bea.jpg",PhilosoGuido,e9nyehp,conservative
"How

Edit: Orange man bad",Doctor____President,e9mmv9x,conservative
"Do you remember awhile back when several news stations around the midwest all read the same statement about fake news and it made it to the front page? And liberals were freaking out cause all the fly over states had the same news.

Meanwhile liberal news is just copy and paste. ",VeganMcVeganface,e9mpd0p,conservative
"Think tanks come up with the daily angle and arguments, and then the media distributes them.

Republicans do it as well, it's just less overt because most major media outlets lean left.

I've always found it creepy how after something big happens, /r/politics has a very noticeable delay period.

They need to wait until the talking points have been established. But once they are, you'll have thousands of them spamming the exact same comments and submissions all over the place.

I remember a few times after something really big happened (especially if it was bad for the left) r/politics would go from radio silence for the first day, to 100k+ upvotes on multiple posts the next.",MenBearsPigs,e9mxy1z,conservative
"Reminds me of that montage about Trump's election when every MSM newscaster was saying ""this is the beginning of the end"" regarding Trump. ",WannabeBadGalRiri,e9n3xb1,conservative
*Drumpf ,DancingDinos,e9niy2g,conservative
Lmao this made me laugh,littlebit90_,e9mly8z,conservative
Its funny because this has been said about PBJ. ,Themusician67,e9mplan,conservative
"Eh I like OAN but they’re clearly biased. I like Fox News because they do bring some good counter points to Leftists. They have great discussion too, which I enjoy.",Hello_34,e9nefyt,conservative
Thank you. ,Clevadio,e9nhqs6,conservative
[deleted],,e9muqgl,conservative
[deleted],,e9mslia,conservative
"Huh, it's almost like a person is responsible for their actions.
",likesloudlight,e9ndivz,conservative
"I don’t mind the memes, but for quality of life for everyone who does would it be possible to have people flair their posts so others can filter out memes, news, satire etc ",phantomcut3,e9mw4n0,conservative
Imaginary murder is real too.,TheComedianGLP,e9nqhj4,conservative
[removed],,e9mnaa1,conservative
"""Gravitas""",TheComedianGLP,e9nqijw,conservative
"They forget that all of those flyover states they were freaking out about were showing the exact same things they were watching, from the same sources, on the same channels.",DocMilk,e9mpnr7,conservative
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hWLjYJ4BzvI,Iamabioticgod,e9mrpzv,conservative
"It strikes me as funny that they tried to pass off a statement about ""our democracy"" as being somehow ""right wing"".

Whenever that phrase is uttered someone is bound to start screeching about muh russia",richardguy,e9mqzpn,conservative
r/copypasta,MadTitan63,e9mrlsu,conservative
I’d like to see the internal data for how many people are actually subscribed to r/politics and if it’s really just that many angry leftists chugging away.,DocMilk,e9n55uy,conservative
https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/peanut-butter-jelly-racist/,mhurley187,e9ms5l8,conservative
"My biggest beef with OANN is most of their on air anchors. They’re all just college kids soullessly reading and stumbling through the teleprompter, it makes it hard to watch. Their opinion hour hosts though seem pretty good. I do respect the network for giving us another option though. ",Knollsit,e9nvxxh,conservative
I personally live in a left wing area and see people physically assaulted every day for their beliefs. There are people going around knocking doors to ask who they voted for? Does that happen in your right wing dystopia land?,latotokyo123,e9nijw0,conservative
">Lol are you seriously going to suggest that an internet meme is going affect voting patterns? 

Why is that any less likely than a campaign commercial effecting vote patterns? Clearly someone thinks those work, they're paying a lot for them.",DangerToDemocracy,e9mwubr,conservative
"I don't know, I can easily imagine some liberal redditor who would have been too lazy to vote otherwise being motivated to do so for a reason as stupid as memes. ",disciple_of_pallando,e9mwhyt,conservative
Shills were definitely part of what drove me to vote for Trump. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9nb3u1,conservative
Okay. Got me..,Le4per,e9mv58v,conservative
Except when said person is triggered by another person who is his/her/it self triggered by our patriarchical society.,TheComedianGLP,e9nqoy6,conservative
"Or...   

>If you don’t like a particular post or type of post, just don’t click it/them.

",Clatsop,e9nbyx3,conservative
"But how is one worse than the other? Their both terrible. I don't particularly subscribe to any news platform and instead base my own opinions based on the facts. Sure, I listen to Rush occasionally for entertainment purposes, but I never base my knowledge around that. I sure as hell don't get my news from Breitbart or FoxNews. 

The left news is much worse in my opinion. They all repeat the same slanderous news points day after day. I'm not saying Brietbart doesn't, but there are far more left leaning outlets and far more of them in the mainstream. 

And yeah, I edited the comment literally within the second I posted it. 
",Doctor____President,e9mo6fs,conservative
How are conservative leaning sources worse than liberal leaning sources?,PM_HATS,e9mnrue,conservative
"Sinclair broadcasting is a right wing organization that donated huge amounts of money to conservative and right wing candidates in the mid-term elections.  

[https://www.opensecrets.org/orgs/totals.php?id=D000029062&cycle=2016](https://www.opensecrets.org/orgs/totals.php?id=D000029062&cycle=2016)

To say that left-leaning people are npcs, you showed a right wing news and broadcasting umbrella forcing all of it's broadcasters to echo Trump's ""fake news"" claim.

[https://www.publicintegrity.org/2018/04/03/21653/sinclair-related-political-money-goes-mostly-republicans-democrats-get-cash-too](https://www.publicintegrity.org/2018/04/03/21653/sinclair-related-political-money-goes-mostly-republicans-democrats-get-cash-too)",Brdcktt,e9mwk20,conservative
Such spooky ,VeganMcVeganface,e9mvfbx,conservative
"You’re so dim it hurts. 

Sinclair is a conservative news outlet. They push conservative talking points. ",Pwnysaurus_Rex,e9oolyz,conservative
Is usually members of the left using the term democracy. The USA is a republic. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9mve4y,conservative
"Ah there it is. 


The most racist of all sandwiches. 

Im going to go make one now. Being oppressive works up an appetite. ",Themusician67,e9msu6r,conservative
Yea I agree. They’re a new network so I think they’re trying to establish themselves still. That’s why I think their anchors are so young.,Hello_34,e9nw17e,conservative
"I live in a left wing area and that doesn’t happen here, so you must be wrong.",Kuvira658,e9o5ebi,conservative
*...hmmm... were have I heard this before?*,likesloudlight,e9ndkaa,conservative
Where do you prefer to get your news from? I'm always looking for reliable sources of current events,yourname27times,e9mpcqq,conservative
They aren't. This person is just a leftist hack who comments in r/politics. ,Doctor____President,e9modm1,conservative
[removed],,e9mob2h,conservative
They almost understand,Ratmast_er,e9mxpmp,conservative
"Fun fact: A republic is a form of democracy, as explained in the Founders' writings. ",lxUn1c0,e9my8up,conservative
"Use a flashlight to get to the kitchen.

2 scoops of racism.",TheComedianGLP,e9nqqj3,conservative
"Did you look at the Snopes article?

It presents that the ""racist pb&j"" was a manufactured furor propagated by conservative outlets.",RedVillian,e9mu48l,conservative
Honestly I just watch the live feeds of important things and try to ignore any commentary people may be providing. ,Doctor____President,e9mpgmm,conservative
"No it really isn't. It's just a fucking meme and it isn't that deep. 
",Doctor____President,e9moiga,conservative
Wonderful. But we are not a democracy. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9mz3hm,conservative
"Mmmm. Racism. 

Now more filling with less fat. ",Themusician67,e9nqs68,conservative
"I like how snopes is reliable here. 

They tried to debunk ""if you like your doctor, you can keep your doctor""",Themusician67,e9mujcc,conservative
Live feeds? Like on Reddit? Cable news?,yourname27times,e9mpwmi,conservative
[removed],,e9momwc,conservative
"> A republic is ***a form of democracy***

There I made it a little easier for you to read.",onlypositivity,e9nckj6,conservative
"America is a republic.

A republic is a form of democracy.

Therefore, America is a democracy.",lxUn1c0,e9ncvy3,conservative
"You are 100% correct and I'm not sure why you are getting downvoted.  If you look at my post below I give clear examples of why we are not a democracy, but a republic.  I'm not saying a republic is not a form of democracy, but that does not mean that we are a democracy.",flippy76,e9odfgr,conservative
Racism: The other white meat.,TheComedianGLP,e9nsneu,conservative
Just YouTube videos of the actual event happening ,Doctor____President,e9mt4y6,conservative
"""kid"" lol okay tough guy ",mnslice,e9movcq,conservative
"Memes can be hypocritical. Rational people just don't give a shit because it's a dumb meme, pal.

Just go back to r/politics already.

",Doctor____President,e9mosmn,conservative
Read? I think I found your problem.,Zaicheek,e9nnwwf,conservative
"We have an electoral college. Therefore, we are a republic.

Where are you confused? ",VeganMcVeganface,e9oe9kj,conservative
Error. Transitive property plugin not found.,Zaicheek,e9nnykk,conservative
"That's  not entirely true.  If we were a democracy we wouldn't have the electoral college and the senate allowing each state, no matter the population, having equal representation wouldn't exist.  The founders feared a pure democracy because of ""mob rule"".   Federalist Paper Chapter 16 Document 15 specifically talked about mob rule. ",flippy76,e9ocnf1,conservative
Racism: Its what's for dinner!,Themusician67,e9nt3ur,conservative
"Often, sources like PBS, The Washington Post, Fox News, or NBC will have live feeds of current events. France 24 English is a good one too. Are these the live feeds you are referring too? Do you mind being more specific?",yourname27times,e9mzwhl,conservative
[removed],,e9mp20t,conservative
"Given the sub I really shouldn't be surprised lol

> I dont have a *dog*, I have a *golden retriever*!

Also lol at thinking it's the EC that makes us a republic ",onlypositivity,e9ofj60,conservative
[removed],,e9mp7we,conservative
We also have a senate. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9oi641,conservative
"I'm sorry. I thought this was r/conservative. I must've somehow clicked on the donald sub by accident. can you direct me to where I can go to for substantive discussion on conservative policy and not shitposting since this clearly isn't the place? 

",chickenavenger,e9mpjhr,conservative
"We dont have a *Senate*, we have a *golden retriever*.",onlypositivity,e9oj0n0,conservative
"The left: TRUMP THROWS NEEDY FAMILIES OFF FOOD STAMPS!

The right: Families no longer need food stamps due to economic success.",Cr8er,e9nihp7,conservative
But farmers are getting billions so it is kind of a wash.,Nonsenseism,e9npule,conservative
"[It's been on a downward trend for years](https://www.politifact.com/punditfact/statements/2018/feb/12/breitbart/food-stamps-dropped-nationally-after-temporary-spi/)...

> Annual SNAP data shows enrollment climbed from about 28.2 million in 2008 to 47.6 million in 2013 and has declined every year since that time. SNAP enrollment hit 42.2 million in 2017.
> 
> SNAP enrollment fluctuates based on the economy. National enrollment climbed between 2007 and 2013 amid the recession and sluggish initial recovery.
> 
> The rising numbers were as a result of expanded eligibility and outreach, which began under President George W. Bush including a commitment to expand funding. Also, the 2009 stimulus package signed by President Barack Obama expanded eligibility.
> 
> So far there have been no explicit changes implemented to SNAP since Trump took office in January 2017 to give him credit for the decline, said James Ziliak, director of the center for Poverty Research at the University of Kentucky.

> ""To the extent that the economy has continued to grow under President Trump, including rising wages, then to the extent that his policies have not interfered with this pre-existing trend he deserves some credit,"" he said.",CaptainCAAAVEMAAAAAN,e9oc6et,conservative
Welfare programs' success depends on how many people leave welfare. ,psstein,e9ogkw0,conservative
No one cares because Trump is a big meanie head to Jim Acosta and other millionaires.,link_ganon,e9nnrej,conservative
">38,845,997 on food stamps

Good christ.  I knew the number was high, but I didn't expect that.",tectalbunny,e9op9vg,conservative
"What about the guys that print food stamps?  They were better off under Obama.

(There I threw the Dems a bone)",ThruHiker,e9nlyd9,conservative
[removed],,e9njtxz,conservative
Trump Kicks 4M Americans Into Starvation,TheComedianGLP,e9nrf91,conservative
"the the question is which one is true? A good scenario would be if families incomes had Rosen to the point where they no longer need food stamps. That should be the goal. 

A bad situation would be if the Trump administration or someone else raise the requirements on food stamps high enough that many people who needed it just weren't eligible anymore

If a bank robber has five hostages the solution isn't to shoot three of them and then claim that you managed to reduce it to only 2 hostags",ExpensiveMention,e9nqob3,conservative
">The left: Millions starve to death in the streets after TRUMP THROWS NEEDY FAMILIES OFF FOOD STAMPS!

FTFY. Your headline was not sensational enough nor demonizes Trump enough.",super_ag,e9nzp5x,conservative
Abolish all subsidies of any kind to any company/persons. ,Hipster_Dragon,e9nwgbx,conservative
It kills me we had the Congress for two years and did nothing to bring back the requirements to pre recession levels.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e9ooqxe,conservative
Republicans are in a great position to frame the Democrats the party of the 1%. They just are too stupid to do it,ExpensiveMention,e9nqpul,conservative
Whats wrong with billonaires,Ledcookey,e9njyge,conservative
"So, I am involved with my church locally in regards to knowing, helping and assisting local members of the congregation who are in difficult situations. Before we reach out and do what we can, it is important for us to know how they are already being assisted. As in, it doesn't make sense for us to provide food support if they are already getting their EBT/Food Stamp benefits, but in some cases some people don't qualify. For example, we have an ex-con member who is actually a fairly repentant good person, but is denied benefits and has struggled at finding permanent work, so we have done what we can to help when the time arises.

Not all people on welfare are just lazy people. In some cases we will have say, a single mom of 4 kids who was a stay-at-home wife, raising them all, and dad takes off, leaves the church, leaves the wife and kids, and you know, child support arrangements can often take quite some time to secure, and often they just don't even pay and disappear. So, she starts getting gov't assistance while trying to find some kind of work to assist her children. Not an easy transition.

We also have an employment specialist that we coordinate with, who helps people in church find local work and so on.

There is absolutely a noticeable shift. If you go back 5 years ago, being an employment specialist was a pretty depressing job. People could barely find more than a minimum wage job anywhere. A significant number of people were on government benefits. People were significantly underemployed. I remember us occasionally making announcements and getting excited over inside information about $18 per hour janitor job (about 36k per year) at a local school, as we rarely would see decent openings like that even advertised because the better jobs were being handed over through inside-info, never being listed. And by better, that's just an example of how bad the economy was. A 36k per year job with benefits was considered golden for someone without a college degree. Maybe even so for some with.

Now, there's so much positivity. Now, there is zero excuse anyone has to not be working full-time. There are so many good options, so many openings, and changes in flexibility. We've seen a lot of people from the congregation find work, fall off food support and so on.

While my experience is anecdotal, just saying from the ground level, as a member of this church who is involved in trying to know who needs help, I've seen an absolute shift. This shift is most noticeable in the last 12 months. It didn't even happen when Trump was elected, maybe too early for companies. But, about a year ago it's like confidence re-entered the market and businesses weren't hesitant to expand anymore and up their wages.

One noticeable thing as well is it seems like people are getting more promotions again. One thing a lot didn't talk about was that it wasn't just crappy employment situations, it's also that many companies stopped growing, and when a company stops growing, the upward projection stops too because you have to wait for someone to quit, be fired, or retire, and considering the economy, no one was willing to give up their mid-level management jobs that paid a bit better. So many people were stagnating in their positions as a result. We have also seen a significant upward tick in not just low level job increases, but the number of members of the church increasing their tithing contributions, often due to promotions at work and increasing financial stability has been quite interesting to see as well.",GeneticsGuy,e9o8uwv,conservative
"Thanks, bud. I'm not so good at thinking like a lefty.",Cr8er,e9oehx7,conservative
Anyone who advocates for abolishing farming subsidies will never be president.  Right or left...it will never happen.  They would never survive the primaries.  20 billion dollars a year to pay farmers NOT to grow food and keep prices inflated.,DildoShwaagins,e9nym8w,conservative
Losers have billion envy.,TheComedianGLP,e9nrgjo,conservative
We need to prosecute the election fraud.  This is insane.,BrighamYoung,e9op2s3,conservative
In Florida if they need to fix the vote for a democrat to win they allow votes to be made and counted up to 5PM the Thursday after the election. ,stancrouch,e9ootsi,conservative
"“The woman’s initiative refused to provide comment”

I hate clickbait",churninbutter,e9no9iu,conservative
"It's odd, but I definitely think that this guy sitting on the board of a women's group makes it *more* believable that he called a young woman a whore just for being Tucker Carlson's daughter. What a very strange and occasionally quite off-putting world that we inhabit.

And before I remembered the details of the story, I definitely misread the title as saying that he called her ""a white"", which really threw me off for a second.",misespises,e9np0qk,conservative
btw at the time of this post Juan is no longer listed on the board of directors page but can clearly be seen on the [internet archive](https://web.archive.org/web/20180902231253/http://thewomensinitiative.org/board-of-directors/) of the page.,aCreditGuru,e9nf8gj,conservative
Why are we censoring ‘whore’?,PurpleAngel23,e9nfxnq,conservative
"From the party that backs hateful mobs, are we even surprised?",gab907,e9nghhk,conservative
Of course he's being represented by the creepy porn lawyer.,XYZ-Wing,e9nh8go,conservative
"Of course he did.  Because when the left makes a ""something"" group, no matter if it's a group for racial minorities, women, immigrants, or whatever else, they don't actually care about the people who make up the group.  These so-called ""groups"" only exist for one purpose, to stir up a particular group of people in an effort to make them vote for Democrats.  That's all.  Dare to ignore their prodding and they'll crucify you.  Because they don't actually care about you.  ",DevonWeeks,e9nxc55,conservative
These are the types of gutless despicable scum that sit on boards of leftist groups.  They direct the mindless idiots in hate of all that do not walk lock step with the leftist agenda.,optionhome,e9o8w3o,conservative
"I know being called ""white"" is a terrible insult these days, but starring it out is a bit too far, no?

/s",balloot,e9oo79p,conservative
Awesome! Thanks.,tracychavez,e9o3kk8,conservative
We aren't. It's The Daily Caller's title. They're the ones who censored it. ,GuitarWizard90,e9nmu69,conservative
just following rule 6 ;),aCreditGuru,e9nh0oh,conservative
Gotcha,PurpleAngel23,e9nou86,conservative
"No CNN, 24 hr reporting on Trump's stupid tweet du jour is not newsworthy.

Grandstanding for Jim Acosta does not beguile you in the eyes of your viewers.

Reporting on real news - near record low unemployment, strong economy, voting shenanigans (both for and against your base), these things will bring your ratings back up.",Sideswipe0009,e9ny5se,conservative
"CNN is receiving considerable criticism regarding the [lucrative nature](https://www.vanityfair.com/news/2018/11/inside-the-trump-gold-rush-at-cnn) of its [symbiotic relationship](https://thehill.com/opinion/white-house/414927-donald-trump-needs-the-media-as-much-as-the-media-thrives-on-him) with the president, as well as its [waning hard news content](https://thehill.com/homenews/media/415669-larry-king-hits-cnn-stopped-doing-news-to-focus-on-trump), and [its general dependency on the president](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0ZOgnHUQ_P8&). Attacks from the White House, meanwhile, continue to misdirect the public's focus away from this reality. In the wake of Acosta theatrics, Woodward responds:

> “In the news media there has been an emotional reaction to Trump,” Woodward said, later adding, “Too many people for Trump or against Trump have become emotionally unhinged about this.”

> “The remedy [isn’t a lawsuit],” he argued. “It’s more serious reporting about what he’s doing.”

Also see:

* **NYT:** [CNN Had a Problem. Donald Trump Solved It.](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/04/magazine/cnn-had-a-problem-donald-trump-solved-it.html)
* **WaPo:** [Jeff Zucker’s singular role in promoting Donald Trump’s rise](https://www.washingtonpost.com/lifestyle/style/jeff-zuckers-singular-role-in-promoting-donald-trumps-rise/2016/10/02/7c3d4366-865b-11e6-a3ef-f35afb41797f_story.html?utm_term=.014103b57fb9)
* **Vox:** [CNN treats politics like sports — and it’s making us all dumber](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4pS4x8hXQ5c)",system_exposure,e9nw31p,conservative
[Here's an archive link in case Spez the spaz decides to ban and delete these posts](http://archive.is/TryM1),OldSchoolVinny,e9nik38,conservative
"Glad someone actually got exposure enough to say this and make it to the front page. If anyone is surprised by the comments in r/politics, you must be new to reddit. That is one of the most hate filled subs I have ever visited. I used to poke the bear for fun, but I realized I was becoming part of the problem.

The Donald gets accused of the same ""hateful rhetoric"" all the time, but I dont see it. Sure they praise Trump like crazy, but I've never seen them calling for folks to be hung, beat, or raped. You disagree in the slightest, they will ban you. That is bad enough on it's own, but there's plenty of other subs to bash Trump so I'm torn on that.

""Civil discussion?"" I just dont see it in r/politics. Maybe they should stop referring to themselves as the ""tolerant ones."" ",I_dont_study,e9mtsll,conservative
"Paging r/againsthatesubreddits
",LettuceAndCabbage,e9nbine,conservative
"That poster is awesome. I don't expect politics to be unbiased, but it is a hate sewer of a different stripe.  I have reported one post a couple weeks ago that actually did get deleted (calling for open rebellion). 

",SickofInternetProgs,e9myir3,conservative
Look how man idiots try to defend it anyways lmao,HolsterOfNuts,e9mle92,conservative
"Beautiful. Next announcement post from the admins, I'm going to ask for them to ban politics. Might as well mimic the other side for shits and giggles",___-III----III-___,e9mnf7o,conservative
"oh my god those posts, I want to puke. How can people be so hateful? Jesus...",CorneliusSavarin,e9mosdg,conservative
Sticky this,WeimarRepublic,e9nmlni,conservative
Holy. Shit. Beautiful. ,CarbineGuy,e9ne4r8,conservative
Sup guys. You’d definitely never see this on r/murderedbywords. Hilarious that I never said anything that displayed my bias and people automatically assumed I was defending r/politics 🤣,MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9mutjg,conservative
"This is a T_D supporter claiming that all the threats will come from r/politics and not r/T_D. Just look at his [post history](https://www.reddit.com/user/motherrussiabeepboop). 

So while r/politics is rife with threats and calls for violence, this is not a lib getting owned. It's a tard from T_D getting his point proven.",super_ag,e9nzkrg,conservative
That was amazing.,Opienus,e9o9yym,conservative
"OUTSTANDING resource.

Good reminder too of why we should all conceal carry, everywhere, always.",TheComedianGLP,e9nrb85,conservative
"> The Donald gets accused of the same ""hateful rhetoric"" all the time, but I dont see it. Sure they praise Trump like crazy, but I've never seen them calling for folks to be hung, beat, or raped. 

I saw it once, so I looked at the post history of who was doing it, and they were a rabid anti-Trump  r/politics poster. Probably trying to get the place banned.",IndefinitePresent,e9my383,conservative
Its proper name is r/npcpolitics,TheComedianGLP,e9nqubz,conservative
"The bannings for people who are anti Trump don't bother me because they come right out and say the sub is for pro trump people, and given the general culture of reddit, if they didn't, it would be totally overrun with negativity. They also advertise a sister sub where you can discuss Trump in a more critical manor if you want to.",cornshelltortilla,e9njspu,conservative
"
>Maybe they should stop referring to themselves as the ""tolerant ones."" 

Real question here: have they labeled themselves that or have Republicans just attached that as a joke? I'd love it if they called themselves that. ",peeves91,e9n22n1,conservative
"The Donald is stupid, but it is exactly what it claims to be. It is a circle-jerk online 24/7 Trump rally. It's not a place for honest discussion and they never claimed to be. I have no problem with The Donald, I don't visit that sub because I find it boring, but if others want to circle-jerk then I don't see what the issue is.",StanleyKubricksPenis,e9n9nmq,conservative
"[This post was on a /r/politics thread about confronting Conservatives in restaurants](https://i.imgur.com/xB33tM8.jpg).  
  
They're sick folks over there.",mp-,e9o15bx,conservative
"Knowing them, they'll probably ""call out"" this topic here for... Well, I'm sure they'll come up with *some* way to see it as hateful.",MarioFanaticXV,e9nxtph,conservative
"""but those comments are mostly downvoted""


  Which is exactly the same as the shit they cherry pick from thedonald",truls-rohk,e9mwrsz,conservative
"Lots of well-greased wheels on the goalposts in those comments, that's for sure.",anuser999,e9muyar,conservative
"Post it as The Donald at first, garner 5 gilds and 10k upvotes, then edit it to this and watch the world burn. ",Baptism-Of-Fire,e9mokls,conservative
"Of all of them the one that was most upsetting was the comment suggesting the best way to get to the politicians they dislike is through bullying and harrassment of their children...

Especially with what Tucker Carlson's family has been put through lately, just proving that no matter how downvoted the comments are people are out their agreeing and beginning to act on these types of things. ",Mewster1818,e9mqfuf,conservative
"There's a reason I don't think it's necessarily a good idea to try to force us and them to stay under a single government.  They obviously hate us and want to be rid of us, maybe the best move (i.e. the one that ends in the least bloodshed) is to just go ahead and separate.",anuser999,e9mv25c,conservative
The ugly truth is that most of then have severe depression and are deflecting others to be as ugly inside as they are or are mentally ill in other ways. ,FiveHits,e9nkund,conservative
Why is that unusual considering the demographics and leanings of Reddit as a whole?,kroatone,e9mzmzh,conservative
Haha yeah I'm looking through your post history and everyone assumes you're an /r/politics dweller but it's literally the opposite. ,sunder_and_flame,e9n896s,conservative
Eh you challenged OP and the other guy sat you down. Pretty comprehensive defeat. ,Meltzor,e9mxl9w,conservative
"Not a single person here has accused you of defending /r/politics.  

but ok",Baptism-Of-Fire,e9mwy89,conservative
"yeah, as soon as i saw your username, i assumed you knew exactly what you were asking for",sylect,e9omwxd,conservative
"The time that stuff makes it to the top of AgainstHateSubs or whatever, the most egregious stuff it’s almost always a screenshot taken like a minute after posting ",i_floop_the_pig,e9nfumt,conservative
This has been a common tactic since well before the election. Brigaders turn up in the dead of night and post insane garbage in the hope that mods won't catch it and the sub will be banned. They usually don't even bother to use sockpuppet accounts. Being a mod there is a full-time job.,jd_porter,e9nb4ta,conservative
"They got that moniker for being ""pro gay"" everything before Republicans accepted gay marriage and the like. They also claim to be anti racism, yet bring up skin color for every argument that's considered progress. 

Just look at every minority that won their election this past week. All we heard was ""first LGBT, youngest, Muslim, Hispanic etc. Yet no mention of their positions or ideas to further their constituents' best interest. ",I_dont_study,e9n9wrw,conservative
"That huge investigative analysis of Russian bots posting in TD

I think the highest karma one had was like 100.

Rules for thee..",Baptism-Of-Fire,e9mwzvi,conservative
"also, they are not mostly downvoted. when i sift through the bile in /r/politics, the more vile the comment, the higher the karma generally. the left are almost unanimously hateful and vile individuals. they are everything they accuse us of, everything. racist, sexist, bigoted",sylect,e9omud5,conservative
Genius. ,___-III----III-___,e9mpdgp,conservative
Rofl,MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9nfn67,conservative
"Ooh risky.  If something ever happened to TD, I would have no friends, no place to call home.  ",Markellany,e9nffnu,conservative
"It won’t ever work like this.  They don’t want to be left alone.  They want to **force** you to agree with them.  They are at war with reality and the very fact that you don’t agree with them puts the lie to everything they believe.  It isn’t enough that you don’t care about them, you will be made to care.

Why do you think Europe wants so desperately to turn us into them?  Our existence shows the lie in everything they are.",GooseJaw,e9nhx87,conservative
"They can have the coasts, we take the middle, and call it even.",unibuckeye,e9nh59j,conservative
r/conservative is unforgiving apparently ;),MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9na7ln,conservative
"His point was ""show me both /r/the_donald and /r/politics posts threatening violence, oh wait it'll just be /r/politics"" yet everyone is assuming it was the opposite.",sunder_and_flame,e9n8d4f,conservative
"The only way he challenged OP was by saying politics and TD aren’t a fair comparison because one lets people talk about violence and one doesn’t. 

He knew the examples of violence would all come from politics, and hardly any would come from TD. 

OP said that politics was like TD in that they both allow violent rhetoric. 

Mother Russia beep boop was right all along. 

He likely agrees with the OP from that post in that politics should be renamed, but he disagrees with OP from that post in the sense that TD is as bad as politics. Because any neutral observer of both subs can *instantly* tell that the attitude/tone/behavior of people in the subs couldnt be further apart. 

Mother russia didn’t suffer a defeat. He was just so subtle with his wording that everyone assumed he was a leftist from politics. Everyone (including you) instantly assumed he was a leftist, expecting the violence to come from TD. But he isn’t. His point was proven: dozens and dozens of examples of violence from politics, and very very very few from TD. ",ModsAreThoughtCops,e9n8fpp,conservative
"I never challenged OP, I was agreeing with him. ",MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9n5jvk,conservative
Yet your comprehension sucks bro. ;),MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9nfxim,conservative
Not sure what you assumed then.,MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9nfozb,conservative
">before Republicans accepted gay marriage and the like

Even Hillary was against gay marriage only 5 years ago...",CBScott7,e9nhnm1,conservative
"We will all ascend to Mount Trump together, or not at all.",TheComedianGLP,e9nr6j0,conservative
Oh I know.  The reason I want a split is because if it comes to war I for one will be advocating for solving the problem once and for all.  On the upside depopulating the country by about half should solve our emissions issue.,anuser999,e9niuzv,conservative
(standing ovation),TheComedianGLP,e9nr38n,conservative
"I'm happy with this.

Segregation is, frankly, the only way the Left is going to come out alive from any conflict with normal Americans.

And as a parting gift, we can tell China and Iran that California and New York are now no longer under the protection of the US government.",TheComedianGLP,e9nr23o,conservative
"I like the beach though, can’t we at least fight a little take back Southern California? There’s plenty of conservatives here.",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9ooq2l,conservative
"People are clearly not conscious enough to see what you did. 

From the beginning, you clearly knew that politics sub had many examples of violence and TD did not. 

But because you didn’t immediately declare what team you are on, everyone had to assume the worst about you, and assumed you were defending politics. This is evident by the number of people saying “he got shut down by that response”. 

The response is exactly what you wanted: to point out that one of the subs condones violence but is allowed on the front page, and one doesn’t condone violence, but is blocked from the front page. 

I’m not gonna blame those people to much, because the general demographics of Reddit do point to you being a leftist, but the reality is you probably just redpilled a bunch of leftists by asking that question, while also convincing a bunch of people that you are a leftist by asking that question. 

Reddit is a weird ass place sometimes. ",ModsAreThoughtCops,e9n84pw,conservative
Stop trying to flirt with me ,Meltzor,e9njxyf,conservative
(cases of the vapors erupt spontaneously),TheComedianGLP,e9nr4hh,conservative
I definitely expected liberals to get whooshed. ,MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9naaxf,conservative
Aight just this once.,MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9nm3wm,conservative
"I mean, a lot of conservatives did too.

Thirsty at the thought of you being an “owned lib”. 

There are actual liberals out there than need to be btfo’d but people are wasting their time on you because they mistook you dropping subtle red pills for liberal stupidity. ",ModsAreThoughtCops,e9nan6d,conservative
"Haha tell me about it. But hey at their nastiest, the things they said didn’t compare to what would be said in r/politics. ",MotherRussiaBeepBoop,e9nc05b,conservative
You are not wrong about that,ModsAreThoughtCops,e9nfrxz,conservative
Bye Bye Mueller.,trendyweather,e9ovvyx,conservative
Some people just want to live in a permanent state of outrage ,political-alt,e9ntj24,conservative
"I kinda find it weird that people were mad because he didn't create an lgbt superhero..... 
It just sounds so entitled.",alxndrmkhl,e9o4fp1,conservative
"All the SJWs have no understanding of the material in front of them. They say Lee was a homophobe, bigot, racist, sexist, etc. 

They don't seem to understand that these were the very things he wrote about - X-Men, Hulk, Spiderman, etc. They were metaphors for people suffering based on immutable traits.",Sideswipe0009,e9ntho5,conservative
Lol the X-Men are literally a metaphor for the Civil Rights Movement.,WebSliceGallery123,e9oanub,conservative
How sad. Tainting the name of a man who will go down in history for entertainment art. ,-Glew-,e9oboq9,conservative
Go into the comment sections on cringeanarchy or Tumblrinaction on a post about Thor being a woman if you want to see the other side of the coin of overly sensitive man children taking comics way too seriously.,FatherFigure1992,e9ohkcj,conservative
"I feel bad a guy died, but not sure what comic books have to do with conservatism or anything else really",BuyChristianSlaves,e9o09vs,conservative
I think that this post is merely pointing out the fact that SJW's are going after even the most wholesome people among us claiming that we are things that we aren't. ,CroutonusFibrosis,e9ohoid,conservative
"There are a lot of social themes in comic books.  I think the post is to further demonstrate the absurd levels some people will go to to feel a false sense of outrage.  I wonder what drives people like this, what went wrong to make them so angry?",Falkamper,e9oivbb,conservative
Good for the teacher. That’s a no win situation.  Fuck public education it’s become a SJW nightmare.  Is there any focus on education anymore?,Willie1Eye,e9ot5w7,conservative
In what world did France lose World War I?,Belfry_Demon,e9oqrbw,conservative
"... is anyone going to question why, when we are spending 10x what Russia is- that we should be afraid of them?

Is it because we are wasting billions of dollars on... transgender studies? Training women for combat? Putting toilet seats in to carriers instead of urinals so we can be more inclusive? How much are we over-paying defence contractors?

Where is the wastage?

If a country with half the population and 1/10th of the military budget is a threat- is anyone going to wake the fuck up and question why that is, rather than just throwing more money on to the blazing heap?",scarmine34,e9oohjg,conservative
"> Putting toilet seats in to carriers instead of urinals so we can be more inclusive? 

Kind of hard to crap in a urinal.",PurpleAngel23,e9oqzn3,conservative
">  is anyone going to wake the fuck up and question why that is, rather than just throwing more money on to the blazing heap?

No.  

We need to slim down our military infrastructure with another BRAC, we need to refocus on strategic priorities instead of fighting in a half dozen or more brushfire wars (Afghanistan, Iraq, Syria, Libya, Somalia, Afghan/Paki border region, ec), we need to realign deployed forces to better serve our interests, and we need to reassess who our allies really are.  (E.g. is Turkey really an 'ally'?)  

We've spent nearly twenty years now fighting savages armed with pickup trucks and AKs, and much of our current doctrine and battlespace experience is accordingly now geared to fighting future wars against - you guessed it! - savages with pickup trucks et al.  We're not prepared to fight a near-peer adversary with sophisticated combined arms tactics, cyber warfare, space warfare, high-end IADs, counter-air capability, and the list goes on.  We're not.  Moreover, we've ground down much of our military capability - thousands of hours on airframes, tanks and other vehicles damaged or degraded, munitions depleted, etc - in the last 18 years.  Our enemies by contrast have spent that time building *up* their militaries, training, and planning specifically to fight **US**.  

It's not too late to repair the damage, but it requires political will and the embrace of harsh measures.  That's unlikely to happen.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9oszl4,conservative
"Raw dollars is a bad indicator of productivity. We spend way more than any other country on the planet on education per child. It's not even close. 

1 million dollars can hire an army of workers in China. 1 million dollars can hire a handful of fat contractors in the United States. Money goes a lot further in other countries which is why comparing raw dollar amounts like Libertarians constantly do is retarded. %GDP gives you the relative effort going into defense.  

At which point the US only real advantage is industry experience which erodes the longer an adversary pushes their military (especially when US secrets are constantly being leaked by Manning and other traitors).

Throw in companies like Google who refuse to work with the DOD due to ethical quandaries, yet are perfectly fine working with China... (DOD technology and innovation is no where close to being on par with Silicon Valley).

This was a long time coming. The US military has been underfunded throughout the Clinton and Obama years. We are building less ships and have been cutting advanced weapon and aircraft programs to ""save money"". You get what you pay for.

Government is also wasteful, so that also plays a factor. But imagine our adversaries also deal with that.",ultimis,e9org82,conservative
Nice to see Rick Scott there.,r777m,e9ouima,conservative
"Like we’ve all been saying, we’d have a lot less suspicion of these voting delays if it wasn’t purely benefitting the Democrats. ",YankeeBlues21,e9on6ri,conservative
You know at least throw a few the other direction so it does not stink as much.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9ooaz9,conservative
"It is a [big problem](https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2353352) and getting bigger. It's possible that there are legitimate explanations (e.g. for some reason Democratic voters are systemically more likely to submit ballots that are irregular enough to require further review but regular enough to be counted), but confidence in election results will drop if someone doesn't convincingly explain what is going on here.",PubliusVA,e9ot8um,conservative
They won’t. They have no shame.,PurpleAngel23,e9oqtm0,conservative
They never do.,XYZ-Wing,e9nnzio,conservative
"You have to figure out how to educate and train more health care workers cheaply, good luck.
",ozric101,e9nrt1f,conservative
"“You just pay for it!”
- Future Democratic Presidential Nominee 2040 Alexandria Ocasio Cortez",Everett_LoL,e9oh448,conservative
"How about we first figure out how to setup a proper infrastructure within the medical field before jumping to the single payer system? 

Set up the system to work properly and efficiently once they finally implement it. ",Sideswipe0009,e9nt3zs,conservative
"This is the usual democratic bullshit of ""feels good"" but no one can pay for it.  No different than pie in the sky preachers.  And the audience is the same.  Idiots that don't live in reality and see unicorns behind every tree.  ",optionhome,e9o8acw,conservative
"If you are going to socialize it you would take way any incentives for efficiency and innovation.

I am staring to think part of the problem is we are a Nation of over medicated. over serviced and over tested hypochondriacs, TBH.  But, I am not a Physician so it is just my personal view. ",ozric101,e9nz6pt,conservative
">If you are going to socialize it you would take way any incentives for efficiency and innovation.

Depends on how its fleshed out. If it stays similar to what we have now, where private businesses profit from the increased pool of payees, then they have all the incentive and profit in the world to continue innovating.

If the government takes control, then yes, there is little need to innovate.

Profit drives innovation just as necessity does.

>I am staring to think part of the problem is we are a Nation of over medicated. over serviced and over tested hypochondriacs, TBH. But, I am not a Physician so it is just my personal view. 

Over medicated in some areas (too many kids on ADHD medication,  for example), under in others (not enough people taking proper psych meds or self medicating with alcohol or drugs). Psychology and chiropractic is often under covered by insurance companies and can lead to real results without long term meds or unnecessary surgeries.

I wouldn't say we're over serviced, as many people often don't or can't get necessary tests or labs either because insurance won't cover it or won't allow it because reasons.",Sideswipe0009,e9o106j,conservative
"> too many kids on ADHD

this has become an industry in itself.  Ask yourself how kids managed to survive before these drugs were invented.  Same thing with the array of medications for adults.  Can anyone say that adults are happier today because of these drugs as opposed to when they were not available.  We could be giving out handfuls of placeboes and there would be zero change in behavior.",optionhome,e9o88sb,conservative
Leftists love their violence even though they themselves are racists.,BrighamYoung,e9opg99,conservative
"They wear hoods, they are violent, they cause destruction. Sounds like a hate group to me. Oh wait, they are extreme liberal so it’s okay I guess.",seat_shop,e9oqefm,conservative
"Next update on Nov 16, I think, then last one on the 20th.",ReaganTroll,e9ocwkp,conservative
"While I think all this last-minute vote flipping is odd, it's interesting to note how many were very anti-Trump before the election or ran against his immigration policy.",GuyWithNoName67,e9og4ch,conservative
">the fact that we elected someone who had no qualifications to be President, who was running against a woman with a laundry list of qualifications to be President and instead America...chose to give the Electoral College to the person with no experience, who happened to be a man, just like all the other Presidents.”
>According to Maxwell: “What Michelle Obama is highlighting is the fact that that in and of itself is misogynistic and sexist.”

That's not how sexism and misogyny works. 

*facepalm*

Just more buzzwords thrown around with zero meaning attached to them.",Sideswipe0009,e9nszuc,conservative
Those words just don't mean anything anymore. ,dan4daniel,e9nnubc,conservative
"That's about the least intelligent way to assess it.  But, oooookay.",BrighamYoung,e9noynk,conservative
"What ISN'T 'Misogynistic and Sexist' nowadays for people like that...?

Oh, right. Whatever they dictate isn't so.",Terra_green2,e9o0f1i,conservative
"If / when we go to a direct democracy, that's pretty much the end.  It's how Athens fell, it's why the Roman Republic collapsed.  In a nutshell, tribune fuckery, populares mobs vs optimates mobs, and the government being periodically/constantly controlled by highly popular and highly controversial individuals like Marius, Sulla, Julius Caesar, and finally Octavion.  The government changed hands fairly regularly, and the winning side would proscribe the losing side.  For those who don't know what that means, it essentially meant 'show up with their heads and get paid, try to help them and we collect *your* head.'  

Now flash back to Obama's ""Reward our friends and punish our enemies"" and tell me if you didn't just feel a chill.  Go back a bit further and watch as the government whipsaws between Democrats and Republicans since 2000, with partisanship levels steadily ratcheting higher each time.  Consider the rise of assassination chic on the Left, with myriad fantasies of painful deaths for Trump, and then remember how Cicero, Pompey, Caesar, and other Roman politicians died.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9nr7id,conservative
HippieDippyCommieGuy calls MSNBC’s Maxwell a “stupid cunt”,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9nqqvw,conservative
"That also has nothing to do with the EC...if you want to say the voters are sexist and racist, that’s one thing (it’s wrong and idiotic, but atleast *plausible*), but to say the EC is sexist and racist because it follows what the voters do, literally makes no sense.",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9o0l4d,conservative
*Et tu Pence?*,WebSliceGallery123,e9nsja6,conservative
"I do feel that there are certain pros and cons to a popularly elected president.  Certainly not a direct democracy though, the average citizen is far too ignorant to be able to vote on national issues with any appreciable view of the long term affects those choices might have.

We should be electing the person who gets the most votes to represent the people.  The president should represent the majority of Americans.  With that thought in place, how do we assure the rural voters that they will not be forgotten?  I do see the issue on both sides here, I'm trying to reconcile the disparity in vote totals with the interests of those living outside of the suburbs/urban centers, but I do feel strongly that the founding principle should be government by people elected by the majority of voters, and I feel bad that some people live in isolated rural communities but we can not allow ourselves to be beholden to a population minority.  

Our policies must accurately reflect what is best for the majority of the American populace or we will never accomplish amything.",Falkamper,e9ojp6e,conservative
"Do you literally mean direct democracy, or just a popularly elected president?

Because if it's the latter, Europe hasn't fallen apart yet.",mkgandkembafan,e9o4re7,conservative
Pence is more of a Lepidus than a Brutus in my estimation.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9nsr27,conservative
"> We should be electing the person who gets the most votes to represent the people. 

Which people?  The populations of New York and California would have a disproportionate effect on the outcome, and both those states are blue.  

> With that thought in place, how do we assure the rural voters that they will not be forgotten?

You don't.  Thus the purpose of the electoral college.  

Any time you open things up to direct democracy, you guarantee that a very small segment geographically of America will control the destiny of an entire continent.  Once upon a time, Americans fought a brutal war to ensure that they would not be governed by a small island thousands of miles away without any representation.  Effectively negating the votes of all rural areas equates to eliminating their representation, since they will have no control over the outcome.  

The Founders gave this a lot of thought, and were - rightly - terrified of the tyranny of the majority.  We should not be so quick as to cast aside our governmental structures.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9opbmx,conservative
"European countries are smaller than many states. And the president has to be president of *all* of America, not just the cities you urban majoritarian bigot.",higmage,e9od4df,conservative
"Everyone has a bias against trump, either for or against.  There really isn't a neutral party regarding the president, any president, ever.  ",TheBurrfoot,e9mr378,conservative
"I lean left and I agree with the principle here. Politics shouldn’t play a role in criminal investigations. 

Which is why the justice department needs to stay as apolitical as possible and why we have career public servants like Mueller in charge of the investigation, and not politicians. ",SomeRandomScientist,e9nbshp,conservative
If we are being honest we often think this way also. Remember it seemed corrupt to have Strok playing a key role in the Trump Russia collusion hoax because we knew he was extremely biased.,nickintexas90,e9n5jud,conservative
HAHAHA implying Liberals will uphold themselves to the same standards they want to hold us to. That's rich.,M6D_Magnum,e9mdr2m,conservative
"Political (Senate/Congressional) investigations vs. Apolitical FBI/DOJ investigations. Key difference. 

Strozk should have been removed from the Mueller investigation immediately after those texts came to light. Likewise, anyone like Pelosi, Waters, or Schumer should absolutely not be involved in any FBI/DOJ investigation. 

But that's clearly different from the congressional shitshow that the Dems have planned. ",pepsimaxonly,e9ncy79,conservative
[removed],,e9neyos,conservative
Yup we can play this game too. ,latotokyo123,e9ma6hj,conservative
"Remember how after the attempted sexual assault smears against Kavanaugh failed, the talking point became that he shouldn't be confirmed because he couldn't control his emotions and be unbiased against Democrats? How come liberals never called for RBG to recuse herself from weighing in on any cases involving the Trump administration after her critical comments of him during the 2016 election?",ahrimanic_trance,e9n6i04,conservative
"It’s hard to instill virtue into a group of people who don’t believe in virtue.

That being said, in a moral world, I think you’d be correct ",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mlflw,conservative
"I agree with you, but in liberal leftobia itll never happen. ",youtwoha,e9ndixz,conservative
Democrats don’t refuse themselves.  They cover for each other.,cchris_39,e9nsp4u,conservative
I hope Trump sues and gets the same judge who ruled he couldn't end daca because of his previous statements regarding it 🤔,chrispr83,e9n483i,conservative
"They really need to educate themselves on this. You don't ""recuse"" yourself because you have an opinion on a certain subject. Sessions did it because:    

""28 CFR 45.2 – states that DOJ employees may not “participate in a criminal investigation or prosecution if he has a personal or political relationship with any person or organization substantially involved in the conduct that is the subject of the investigation or prosecution, or who would be directly affected by the outcome.”

https://www.businessinsider.com/jeff-sessions-on-recusing-himself-trump-investigation-russia-2017-6/?international=true&r=US",Fluzing,e9od3og,conservative
"But hes a career democrat servant. He was obama fbi director.

He hired oretty much ONLY democrat donors to his team

And -despute finding many crimes by top democrats- he has ONLY pursued republicans connected to trump while igmoring dem crimes

Hes also moved from Investigating collusion between the trump campaign into Investigating random trump people for random crimes

Why is he indicting a reporter for imfowars of all places?

Why did he go after payments to a porn star? Is stormy daniels a russian?

Why after 2 years (and multiple partisan leaks) has nothing surfaced?

Mueller is about as unbiased when it comes to Trump as mccain. (Aka very biased and takes democrats side)

If we want an unbiased Investigation we have to use a different special council who doesnt have ties to the obama Administration

thing is Democrats don't want an unbiased investigation. They want to dig up whatever dirt they can to use against Trump. That's why they love him so much much

",ExpensiveMention,e9ndsyw,conservative
Ding ding ding!!!,plastiqmanb,e9ml8en,conservative
Force them to,ExpensiveMention,e9nfc48,conservative
"Nice pivot

Whatever happened to all those Kavanaugh accusers?

Havent heard much from them lately",ExpensiveMention,e9nqexv,conservative
If a former Republican FBI director was investigating a Democrat president they would be up in arms,ExpensiveMention,e9ndwcx,conservative
We can still demand it,ExpensiveMention,e9mzk17,conservative
"Wow, ok I'm going to try to address each of your points.

&#x200B;

>But hes a career democrat servant.

He's a lifelong republican, appointed to FBI director by a republican president. Appointed as special prosecutor by another lifelong republican who himself was appointed by a republican president.

&#x200B;

>He was obama fbi director.

FBI directors serve 10 year terms. This is by design such that it is not a partisan position and doesn't change with each new president. His term continued into Obama's presidency because he was appointed during Bush's presidency and had not yet served his 10 year term.

&#x200B;

>And -despute finding many crimes by top democrats- he has ONLY pursued republicans connected to trump while igmoring dem crimes

Thusfar, he has brought charges against very few Americans. However, he is investigating whether a republican campaign had illegal contact or coordination with a foreign entity - it's not a surprise that his investigation has largely involved republicans. However, if he finds evidence of crimes committed by democrats, of course he should pursue it or refer the investigation to another part of the DOJ.

&#x200B;

>Hes also moved from Investigating collusion between the trump campaign into Investigating random trump people for random crimes

He absolutely is not investigating random people for random crimes. When investigations of crime A uncover evidence of crime B, you can't simply ignore it. He has pursued it when appropriate and referred it to other parts of the DOJ when appropriate. This is how he is supposed to conduct his investigation...

&#x200B;

>Why did he go after payments to a porn star? Is stormy daniels a russian?

He didn't the Michael Cohen investigation was conducted by the Southern District of New York, not Mueller, because he deemed it to be outside the scope of his investigation. Again, this is exactly how he is supposed to be acting.

&#x200B;

>Why after 2 years (and multiple partisan leaks) has nothing surfaced?

There have been may things that have surfaced. 29 individuals have been indicted as a result of the investigation, which is still ongoing so presumably that number will increase. These investigations take time to be conducted properly and thoroughly. Would you rather he rushed the investigations? I doubt it. As for the claim that there have been many leaks, there has not been a single confirmed leak from the Mueller team. Any leaks have come from the targets or subjects of the investigation.

&#x200B;

>If we want an unbiased Investigation we have to use a different special council who doesnt have ties to the obama Administration

Again, his ""ties"" to the Obama administration are because he was finishing his term as FBI director, appointed under George Bush.

&#x200B;

>thing is Democrats don't want an unbiased investigation. They want to dig up whatever dirt they can to use against Trump. That's why they love him so much much

While some Democrats are partisan hacks just like some Republicans, any serious person should want a thorough and unbiased investigation by a non-partisan investigator with a strong track record and good reputation. You would be hard pressed to find anyone better or more appropriate than Mueller.

&#x200B;

The thing is, it's not surprising that people have been attacking Mueller and trying to cast him as biased and unfit. This is a classic political tactic and has a long history. Spiro Agnew, the Nixon VP, is a classic example of this, since it's exactly the tactic he used when he was under criminal investigation. [https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spiro\_Agnew#Criminal\_investigation\_and\_resignation](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spiro_Agnew#Criminal_investigation_and_resignation).

&#x200B;

You have to ask yourself, if Trump actually is guilty of serious crimes, how would he be acting? He would be doing everything he can to obstruct the investigation, install loyal people to the head of the DOJ to shut down the investigation, and do everything he could to undermine the credibility of the investigation and the prosecutors. Which is exactly what Nixon did and exactly what Trump is doing.

You've been fed a narrative that simply isn't true.

&#x200B;",SomeRandomScientist,e9nfcv7,conservative
"Why did you ignore his point about who Mueller has hired to his team? You did a point-by-point breakdown, but ignored that for some reason.",Random57473838,e9nlcce,conservative
"before I even get into debunking what you said what's I'm going to point out that what's extra interesting is that Democrats will swear up and down that Republicans are corrupt . 


But then claim that Mueller being a republican is evidence that he is not corrupt

Going by Democrat logic Mueller being a Republican would mean that he is completely not trustworthy

but who are we kidding? We can see socialist Democrats who were protesting for net neutrality one day turn into ayne rand and defend facebooks right to censor the next

Mueller is a lifelong Republican the way McCain was a lifelong Republican. AKA not at all

At McCain funeral he invited more Democrats than Republicans. McCain invited his opponent Barack Obama to speak at his funeral. The guy who slandered him relentlessly during the campaign. But McCain did not invite his own running mate Sarah Palin


Similarly Robert Mueller was Obama's FBI director and recommended by Obama to stay on as FBI director

His best friend and Mentor James Comey was also Obamas FBI director. Appointed by Barack Obama

James Comey is also not a republican. Other than his voter registration. Besides going on to write an anti Trump book making fun of Trump's height and the size of his hands James Comey also went on to start giving Democrats political advice.

I don't know about you but that doesn't sound too much like a Republican. If Michael avenetti started doing that with Republicans who would assume that he was not a Democrat

in addition to my first point where Democrats basically admit to being a republican makes you more trustworthy

if George Bush's FBI director had been appointed as a special counsel to investigate Obama's birth certificate the Democrats would be screaming

now on to some of your other claims. No he is not investigating whether a republican campaign had any contact with a foreign entity. In fact he hasn't been investigating that for about one-and-a-half years.

investigated that for about 6 months before he found no collusion. Since then he's been going on random witch-hunts against random people for random crimes that they committed unrelated to Russia collusion

Paul manafort work for the Ukraine under Democrat Tony podesta has nothing to do with the Trump campaign of Russia

Paul manafort tax evasion has nothing to do with Trump or Russia

Whether or not the Trump campaign paid off a pornstar that Trump may or may not have had sex with definitely has nothing to do with Russia

and whether Trump's lawyer violated campaign Finance laws in doing so also has nothing to do with Russia


Conindict an Infowars reporter will be a very hard case to make that it has anything to do with Russia

and that's just some of the ridiculous things that Robert Mueller has been looking into. Other things that he uncovered that he elected not to prosecute we're in the various Crimes by Hillary Clinton. More information on her emails. Possible obstruction of justice by Obama's attorney general. Possible collusion between the Clinton campaign Russia and Obama. Finance violations by Tony podesta. Possible possible treason by Tony podesta. Possible ethics violations by democrats. And handful of other things

none of those things have been prosecuted by Robert Mueller. In fact out of all of those things the only thing he bothered to prosecute more people that work for Trump. Again having nothing to do with Russia.


The next claim is just false. Literally not one indictment has been issued in relation to Russian collusion and literally not one person on the Trump Administration has been indicted for anything.

Yes 29 people have been indicted. Several of whom are on very shaky charges that can't be prosecuted. But none of those people were on the Trump  Administration and none of those people were indicted for anything related to Russia.

Robert Miller's time is FBI director expired while under the Obama Administration. Obama then personally elected to keep him on for several more years. Simply being under the Obama Administration at all is a conflict of interest. But when the President also extends the FBI directors time that's definitely a conflict of interest

If Jeff sessions had to recuse based on possible talking to anybody from Russia. And if they argue that Matthew Whitaker has to recuse based on a statement he may have made. Then Robert Mueller should rcise based on those facts


and flasks Lee that's also false. Any serious president person should not want a thorough and unbiased investigation. In fact if you were a serious person looking at the fact you should not want any investigation whatsoever. There's nothing to investigate.


there's not a single lick of evidence to suggest that any crime actually even occurred. Aside from Obama's unsubstantiated conspiracy theories that he made without evidence

We don't investigate people for no reason. And there's no reason to investigate Trump. There's not a single shred of evidence or even shred of possibility that he colluded with Russia. There's nothing to suggest that he did which means that there's no reason to even investigate it


that said. Even if you did want an unbiased investigation Robert Mueller would be the last person you would choose.

And the fact that the Democrat house which has repeatedly made anti Trump statements showing their bias is planning on launching investigations into Trump is more proof that Democrats don't care about unbiased investigations

fact is the Democrats want one thing and one thing only they want to overturn the votes of the American people.

They don't care how they do it. If it means using a phony investigation and phony evidence to do it then they're all for it.

pretty much every reasonable person has said that there's no reason to even be investigating Trump. The only people who suggest otherwise ARE the partisan hacks

 you even have left-wingers who say that there's no reason to be investigating Trump.

the people who say that zero evidence is required to investigate Trump or also the people who said that all the evidence against Hillary in her email Scandal wasn't a reason to be investigating her.

I think I went through all your points ther

Oh wait. One last point. You mentioned Nixon. Well Nixon was impeached for the crime of spying on his political opponents using government agencies. That is literally exactly what Obama did to Trump. Only on a much larger scale.

Trump is acting exactly the way I would assume an innocent person to be acting when faced with such a large Witch Hunt.

The only reason Obama acted differently weaves because Obama had already fired anybody who wasn't loyal to him by the time the Hillary investigation came around",ExpensiveMention,e9np3pa,conservative
"I honestly overlooked that point. It’s true that 13 of the 17 publicly known prosecutors are registered Democrats, but Mueller himself is, of course, a registered republican.  If we assume that the Mueller isn’t biased in the investigation towards the republicans, why should we assume these 13 are biased towards democrats? They’re career civil servants, like Mueller. ",SomeRandomScientist,e9nlyi7,conservative
"Registered means nothing. Obama personally extended his tenure at the FBI with a big round of applause. Obama personally recommended him to continue as the FBI director.

There's plenty of Democrats who are registered as Republicans. It really doesn't mean anything

We have so called Republicans who write for CNN and other news sites that argue that we need Universal Health Care. McCain was a so-called Republican and one of his policies that he had plan to it Act was a version of Obamacare.

McCain invited more Democrats than Republicans to his funeral. He invited his opponent who had slandered him over the campaign to speak at his funeral. He didn't invite his own running mate.

McCain was a registered Republican but that didn't mean he was actually Republican. Hillary Clinton could register as a republican it wouldn't make her a Republican

Robert Mueller is no Republican. He might be a bush loyalists. But that doesn't make him a Republican. He's a corrupt war-mongering neoliberal disguised as a Republican",ExpensiveMention,e9nq6q2,conservative
"It is absolutely outrageous for you to try and argue McCain wasn't a republican. He was the GOP presidential nominee ffs. Anyway, why do YOU get to define what a Republican is? Does it just mean fealty toward Trump now?",Askol,e9ny7zz,conservative
So a republican who hates his own party and helps the other party is a republican?,ExpensiveMention,e9ooly5,conservative
"He in no way hated his own party - what leads you to that conclusion?

He voted with Trump 83% of the time, and he voted for McConnell as leader - if he hated the GOP, why would he caucus with them.

He also supported McConnell's decision to not give Garland hearing.

Furthermore, when he was sick, he could have resigned prior to May, and then his seat would have been up for special election in 2018. However he knew that would be bad for the GOP, so he didn't resign, and as a result his seat isn't up until 2020. If he hated the GOP, why would he have done all he could to make sure his seat stayed red?

If you're saying the GOP is really just Donald Trump, then sure, he did seem to hate Trump. However he was was very much aligned with him (and the party) on policy. I really have no clue how you think he hated his own party and ""helps"" Democrats. Other than voting against Obamacare repeal (which was more on procedural than policy grounds), how did he do anything to help Dems?",Askol,e9otdjm,conservative
"> “Reagan’s dead, Bush is dead, John McCain’s dead”

...What on earth? 

You gotta laugh when they started chanting “Bush is dead” before one guy yelled “Bush is alive!”

Very low IQ protesters. 
",YankeeBlues21,e9nx093,conservative
"This is why you never compromise with the left. They're celebrating the death of John McCain, who conceded to the left numerous times. They're going to hate your guts no matter what, so stop compromising and caving.",GuitarWizard90,e9o15k5,conservative
"These people are almost literally dancing on the grave of a decent man who was a moderate by almost any standard.

We didn't always love his actions or policies so it would be hypocritical to pretend otherwise, but this is one of the lowest things I've seen in politics.",Trussed_Up,e9nstue,conservative
"John McCain was a closet democrat, this just goes to show the ignorance of the left.",texanSTH,e9olq92,conservative
This shouldn’t surprise anyone. These people are the dregs of society who go and chant about issues they know nothing about in order to give their pointless lives meaning. ,JAK4189,e9ny82s,conservative
"Men are women, women are men, does it surprise you that they can’t tell the difference between living and dead? 😂",jina100,e9nyq65,conservative
I was going to type up a devil's advocate response about how they might have meant HW Bush... Then I realized he's alive too!,Robo1p,e9o5qr1,conservative
"You do realize that T_D was celebrating his death too, right?",__Hello_my_name_is__,e9od3om,conservative
"> dregs of society who go and chant about issues they know nothing about in order to give their pointless lives meaning.

You perfectly described them.  Learn the slogans and chants.  Never understand the issues.  Can never answer questions about the issues because their only knowledge is the chants.  What miserable fucking lives they lead.  And you can bet not one of them has ever done any real volunteer work to help those who need and deserve help.  ",optionhome,e9o83ur,conservative
Whoosh,booblitchutz,e9oglj9,conservative
"""Woman Pregnant with baby""",McBonderson,e9nuq3t,conservative
After reading the headline I legit checked if this was a Babylon Bee post. ,mastaxn,e9nviqo,conservative
"Yes! Soon the woes of the transfinancial will be heard!


I am transfinancial. I am a rich man born in a poor mans body. I am faced daily, with oppression as I am forced to use my finances for goods and services. It is an imposition on my identity and I am taking a stand today. 

I am DEMANDING the government structure my bank account in a way that allows me to actualize my identity as afforded to me by the 14th amendment under the equal protection clause. 

ALL TRANSFINANCIALS NEED TO MAKE A STAND. ",Themusician67,e9nw6wx,conservative
"More accurate headline: 

> Deranged woman pregnant with baby she hopes to derange",XYZ-Wing,e9nhdwb,conservative
The kid is going to rebel by converting to Christianity and stating as business.,Daghi,e9nx0a4,conservative
"I mostly lean liberal and  I don’t care who anyone has sex with hell I don’t even care if a man wants to dress up like a woman or the other way around.

 I tried to be all on board with this transgender thing because “everyone should be accepted” but it never sat right with me and I don’t think it was until I was listening to Ben Shapiro that I realized I was trying to force myself to accept it because that’s what society or at least liberal society was telling me and not listening to what the freaking science was saying. 

In some ways I feel almost guilty because my thoughts go counter to what a great many people are saying and I wonder am I wrong? But the science just won’t let me accept it.",Boolean_Null,e9o6ecr,conservative
Everyone knows that is a pregnant woman...right?,J0kerr,e9obngo,conservative
"> When Scout Barbour-Evans gets asked if they are expecting a boy or a girl, they have the stock answer ready: **""I hope it's human"".**

Alright alright **ALRIGHT**!  NOW I'm ok with abortion ^/s

2018 folks.  The Earth is Flat.  Orange Man Bad.  Women who think they are Men are getting pregnant because they have organs that defy their made up logic that gender is just a social construct.  

.....my bad, I thought when I was a kid that ""The Future"" would feature enlightenment, not........*this*",Jizzlobber42,e9nfixg,conservative
What. The. Actual. Fuck. ,mods_blow_goats,e9ne8yz,conservative
We are reaching levels of retardation that shouldnt be possible.,ABlackKidOnTheNet,e9nu71j,conservative
"Sweet Meteor O' Death, please come soon.",DogBeersHadOne,e9nh0id,conservative
She's not a male we can take her chromosomes to prove it,KelciusAlairus,e9ni6gg,conservative
That poor poor child.,cons_NC,e9nrdp1,conservative
That poor kid has no chance.,earthblues,e9nshsr,conservative
So basically a mentally unstable chic got sperm donated and she’s going to raise a very confused child. ,MAGAcheeseball,e9nhwei,conservative
"Nope. If you can have a baby, you are a woman. Period. (Pun intended!) ",8K12,e9nkkda,conservative
That kid is fucked,slotrot,e9nupa6,conservative
"Notice how difficult it is to keep up with who the article is talking about when they use “they/them/their” in place of a singular pronoun. Makes you think it is referring to both of them when I think it it trying to refer to the mentally ill woman identifying as a man on temporary hiatus to birth a child. As Jordan Peterson has stressed, there are practical reasons not to give in to the linguistic demands of the radical left.",JackFucington,e9nw8zj,conservative
She has put zero effort into being a man. 🤣,johndeer89,e9nyxfk,conservative
That's not how this works....,dan4daniel,e9ni6ct,conservative
Schwarzenegger tried to warn us,lastbastion,e9nh5y6,conservative
"Not the momma, has taken on a whole new meaning. Yep not a dad, but whatever. ",Jonbonnet,e9nmoih,conservative
"Me, I identify as horseshoe crab and would like you to refer to my offspring as 'left and right ear', please.",paulbrook,e9np3uw,conservative
"I was expecting to get stung by the bee. 

It just didn't happen. This is real life. ",Themusician67,e9nvypw,conservative
"Wow, this explains all the anxiety I've been having.  I think I may be a transfinancial as well.  The world has just been oppressing me and my finances!",1amF0x,e9ol2d2,conservative
Ha,jakman556,e9o17hi,conservative
I was hoping for flying cars.,PurpleAngel23,e9nfpp4,conservative
I hope its a attack helicopter,Delta_25,e9nydpd,conservative
">Alright alright ALRIGHT! NOW I'm ok with abortion /s

You joke, but with the life of torture that kid's in for you'd be doing it a favor.",severeneckpain,e9o4hma,conservative
Upvote it lmao this shit needs to be seen,HorrorIngenuity,e9nec3p,conservative
"I was literally about to post this, verbatim",VoinaYMir,e9nnvvm,conservative
Beat me to it. Although I’d also take a zombie apocalypse or a massive EMP blast.,Rabidraccoon76,e9niuca,conservative
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3mbBbFH9fAg,VoinaYMir,e9nnx0j,conservative
"Scout calls themself ""mentally ill"" in her/he/xie own Twitter bio.",HorrorIngenuity,e9ni48o,conservative
Lmao ikr,HorrorIngenuity,e9nz0bf,conservative
That’s not how any of this works! ,syntheticsylph,e9nnx17,conservative
Not so much of a RINO after all!,skarface6,e9nm1xi,conservative
"You can't ""expect to get stung"". Getting stung is when you think it's the headline of a real article before noticing it's the Bee.",MarioFanaticXV,e9nx7sn,conservative
"YES! GET THE WORD OUT. 

Finance dysphoria is soon to be a recognized condition and the APA will be worked with to recommend the treatment of a finance reassignment program. This treatment in my estimation is the only way to help those suffering from financial dysphoria. ",Themusician67,e9oqj4u,conservative
We technically do have a car in space right now. ,soxfan90,e9ngnv9,conservative
"> I was hoping for flying cars.

Well we get pussy-hats and a fist full of imaginary genders instead.  The future has officially made me miss the 1980's.  Oh god....",Jizzlobber42,e9ngxh4,conservative
That is the exact argument the left makes for poor people who are pregnant,Nonsenseism,e9oekvf,conservative
"That’s part of the whole self diagnosis trend. Although its right, it has most likely never actually been told its mentally ill. What a weird trend. ",rpm3311,e9ocqui,conservative
"*herself, not themself. It’s one person. And it’s a fucking chic that dresses like a dude. Don’t use their words because they demand it. They are the mentally ill. Be smarter and stand on solid ground. Don’t budge. ",MAGAcheeseball,e9ni7p2,conservative
"Simple misuse. 

I apologize...",Themusician67,e9nxaz0,conservative
Good point. Now we have pregnant men.,PurpleAngel23,e9ngtwj,conservative
☹️,PurpleAngel23,e9niiwd,conservative
I was being sarc,HorrorIngenuity,e9nigzc,conservative
No need to apologize.,MarioFanaticXV,e9nxcji,conservative
Is that a new gender? /s,ConservativeBrit,e9odesx,conservative
Copy that. ,MAGAcheeseball,e9niiwn,conservative
Finding a good conservative sub on this site is always refreshing. ,ViolentMayfly,e9ok9cd,conservative
When you find a conservative here is like finding a long lost friend you never knew you had!,yestofreedom,e9o181u,conservative
"You wake up.  You discover that you are in a nut house.  But both the staff and patients are nuts.  You find one other guy who has just gone through the same experience.  And it is only because you met the other guy, you yourself don't go nuts.  ",stancrouch,e9omgsh,conservative
Welcome to /r/politics,cons_NC,e9on0rj,conservative
"You love that one of the largest and most influential social media sites in the world is constantly pumping out propaganda for the left and doing its best to stifle conservative voices? Great, glad you’re having fun with it.",hello_japan,e9oi3zr,conservative
"I don’t mind having political subs, but when the nonpolitical ones get political I get tired. If I want political I go to political. I dropped rfunny because I get tired of all the political post. ",yeroldpappy,e9ovj1a,conservative
Way too funny. Now you want your guns? California is in a state of hypocrisy.,seat_shop,e9oq5hs,conservative
"You misunderstand.  Some people are probably there to buy their first gun, sure - and they're in for a rude awakening when they discover that they can't have their guns anywhere outside of their house or at a gun range - but I'd wager that a lot more people are simply stocking up because they foresee further gun bans from California.  

The Dems picked up a supermajority in the 2018 election within California, so their powers are - once again - unlimited.  The 9th Circus will uphold anything that California passes, and if it happens to rule against a law you can be positively certain that the 9th will revisit the case en banc as they did with Peruta v County of San Diego, and will uphold the law.  

So there's a very limited window for Californians to purchase firerarms, ammo, components, etc before the California government tightens the screws even more than it already has.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9ouu8q,conservative
"I wonder if the person advocating for bringing back the 3/5 compromise was a clever troll. Everyone would qualify as a free person and the taxation status of indians is irrelevant (are there untaxed reservations?) after the Indian Citizenship Act of 1924. You could easily make it part of the constitution again without affecting anything, but it would definitely provoke a reaction.",ElbowWhisper,e9o58ob,conservative
"The Russian girl said around the halfway point said, “the founding fathers were intelligent, but apart of the elite who doesn’t understand what it’s like to be a minority”....

Oh...so the people who were a part of a set of colonies who literally fought a war against the biggest, strongest military in the world at the time because they were ruled tyrannically don’t understand what it’s like to be a minority? Ohkay.

That being said, I appreciate her discussion!",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9nz2n2,conservative
"Is this the most conservative sub on Reddit? More than r/TheDonald?

I'm looking for a sub that has only Far right Extremist viewpoints without moderate conservatives.",FriendlyFriend120,e9ny9tz,conservative
Conservatives of all stripes are welcome here so long as they obey the rules. Moderate conservatives are welcome here as well. ,GuitarWizard90,e9nyhmv,conservative
"I'd say this sub Reddit is more conservative than the Donald but not more ""far right"" than the Donald. I believe a large majority of the Donald is not far right just fans of the president, but the president isn't always the most conservative. ",BeatlesRays,e9nzu6a,conservative
Something about your rush to pejoratives like “far right” & “extremist” make me doubt that...,Rogdaddy,e9oafjo,conservative
"what if you're hard right socially, but more moderate fiscally?",edgelord2020,e9nzcln,conservative
"I think “far right” is a misnomer. I would say this sub is *more strongly* right wing. The Donald has some, as you say, who arent really conservative, just Trump fans, and it also has people from the alt-right (who are more far right than this sub)",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9o0h5z,conservative
"Like I said, as long as people obey the rules, they're welcome here. Our user-base here is mostly conservative, but to varying degrees. Some users are further to the right than others. Some are more moderate. We even allow people who lean left, so long as they're not parroting talking points or breaking rules. ",GuitarWizard90,e9nzohx,conservative
"I find it interesting that I don't find this news ANYWHERE on the front pages of the major politics and news subreddits, but that one (allegedly) Jewish woman yelling ""the fucking Jews"" in protest of the Jewish community in South Florida leaning heavily Democrat is in multiple posts all getting thousands of upvotes.",-Kerosun-,e9mabat,conservative
"When Israel fights back they’ll cover it and declare it asymmetrical warfare. Rinse, wash, repeat ",Pugasaurus_Tex,e9mbneh,conservative
[https://www.cbsnews.com/news/israel-hamas-gaza-escalation-palestinian-rockets-ashkelon-today-live-updates-2018-11-13/](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/israel-hamas-gaza-escalation-palestinian-rockets-ashkelon-today-live-updates-2018-11-13/),davethehawaiian,e9mnd65,conservative
"A ""journalist"" from the muslim brotherhood working for the liberal rag WP is murdered.  That is covered for weeks.  This....who cares.  Because the enemies of the USA are their friends and all negative news about them is censored.",optionhome,e9m27qo,conservative
"Sadly, missiles being fired into Israel is a bit too ""everyday occurance"" to qualify as ""news"".",weetchex,e9mypg5,conservative
"CBS, NBC re-affirm their position as propaganda media.",Lepew1,e9md87j,conservative
"The first I heard about this was yesterday. I sent a group text out to family members informing them. My uncle and grandfather both pointed out that it (supposedly) started last week. The first I heard of it was yesterday. The article I read (on this site) listed it as occurring yesterday. 

If it has been going on for a while, why are we just now hearing about it?

(Though my uncle said it’s been going on since the days of Abraham)",PurpleAngel23,e9mg15n,conservative
CBS was reporting in this about 30 minutes ago in my area.,dhc96,e9mtrcr,conservative
Just business as usual for MSM.,GreekLogic,e9mwkwg,conservative
"If it doesn't fit the narrative, it's not reported. And if it's not reported, in people's mind it never happened.",LibertyTerp,e9mcvd0,conservative
Jews are too white for these networks to really care.  Straight white people suffering doesn't support the agenda!,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9mjrge,conservative
Fox News doesn't even have a front page article...,GeneticsGuy,e9mwhlm,conservative
"I know this doesn't fit narrative, but, it seems like Israel is the aggressor here. All sources are saying the Hamas rockets are in response to an Israeli initiated undercover operation gone bad were 7 hamas soldiers and and an Israeli officer were killed.",mkov88,e9mk6as,conservative
Because the media and (most) democrats silently are anti-Israel. They only want to make the country look like the 3rd Reich.,Dank_Cartographer,e9mkgrv,conservative
Satan approves of CBS/NBC formats.,StephenScherer1,e9mlbqu,conservative
When do they report when Israel is sniping civilians or jailing little children on a daily basis?,ArmaniDiamonds,e9nrc4q,conservative
Sounds like business as usual to me.,Reven1911,e9mbxuu,conservative
I don't understand reddits anti-semitism when they ban places like MDE.,Spysix,e9muihz,conservative
"I'm sorry, was this not obvious enough for you?
https://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/9whvdu/some_300_gaza_rockets_launched_at_israel_idf/",blejusca,e9musss,conservative
"Don't forget the most important step: ""relief"" money flows into Hamas coffers.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9n29nh,conservative
Just like they've been doing for decades.,LumpyWumpus,e9me13k,conservative
It sucks what happened to the dude but given how fast our news cycles are it’s kind of crazy to me that we’re still hearing about it ,i_floop_the_pig,e9ma41a,conservative
"Oh bombs being dropped on Jerusalem...but Jim Acosta can’t get in the White House!!!!! 

edit: /s",MadTitan63,e9mrptv,conservative
[removed],,e9mky37,conservative
So Indiscriminately firing hundreds of rockets at a civilian population is a fair response to a surgical operation aimed at taking out high level terrorist operatives??,UltraconservativeBap,e9mwncx,conservative
>88,manbra,e9oa28p,conservative
So they attack civilians?  Find the narrative.,sedoneh,e9mmb2y,conservative
Because reddit is run by cocksucking Democrat progressives.,TheComedianGLP,e9nri7s,conservative
"I'm sorry. At the time I looked, the story was not on the front page. As of right now, going to the worldnews subreddit, it is 25 from the top when sorting by ""Hot"". At the time of my comment, the other story was over 10k upvotes and near the top of the politics subreddit.",-Kerosun-,e9mvs02,conservative
The egomaniacs in the mainstream media are desperate for a case where a journalist is assaulted so they can link it to Trump's rhetoric.  The best they can do is one Islamist being killed boy other Islamists in the third Islamist country.  ,FelixFuckfurter,e9mc48i,conservative
"Just checked, that's bullshit. It's nowhere on the cnn or wp front page, and NBC has a story about how Gaza militants are calling for peace with only one single sentence about the rocket attacks and three paragraphs (at least) trying to blame Israel for the violence.",dicaparly,e9mmjw9,conservative
But it's literally not.  Did you even check before you said this?,sedoneh,e9mm716,conservative
Nothing surgical about using artillery to cover your retreat from a clandestine assassination gone wrong. ,AutresBitch,e9my4v7,conservative
Imagine if some North Korean operative killed 7 US Soldiers on US Soil. Our response would be far greater than rocket barrages.,mkov88,e9nh9fc,conservative
"Very gracious of you to apologise. I am compelled to also say sorry for my snark. I assume it's not close to the top in  'Hot' because the thread was created 23 hours ago, but judging by the number of comments, it must've been pretty high up at some point.",blejusca,e9mw64s,conservative
"Bullshit. You didn't look or it didn't pop for you.
https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/middle_east/the-latest-un-egypt-working-to-end-gaza-fighting/2018/11/12/03feac84-e6e7-11e8-8449-1ff263609a31_story.html

https://www.cnn.com/2018/11/13/middleeast/israel-gaza-tesnions-escalate-intl/index.html

https://www.nbcnews.com/news/world/hamas-threatens-step-attacks-israel-gaza-border-ignites-n935531

https://www.cbsnews.com/news/deadly-israeli-operation-in-gaza-threatens-to-derail-truce-efforts/

And it was bannered on CNN. ",JHenry313,e9mnhlt,conservative
[removed],,e9mngs1,conservative
"Laser guided drone fire isn’t surgical? And again, 400 rockets fired indiscriminately into a civilian population is a proportionate response?",UltraconservativeBap,e9n0tdd,conservative
"So by your logic, ISIS would be justified in firing hundreds of rockets into New Jersey? 

Also I am 1000% certain the US would not fire a barrage of rockets into civilian areas of NK in your hypothetical scenario, and I suspect you’d agree if you were being intellectually honest. ",UltraconservativeBap,e9nhv26,conservative
I do think it's important to note that the story you linked has 2.3k upvotes while the one I am referring to in r_politics currently has over 16k upvotes (for comparison worldnews has 19M subscribers and politics has 4M).,-Kerosun-,e9mxfq1,conservative
"Why are you linking these individual stories? It's not on the homepage. Just look, idiot.",LibertyTerp,e9moabb,conservative
"This guy is such an asshole.

Just went to CNN.com. There is absolutely nothing about Hamas or rockets. Idiot.",LibertyTerp,e9mo91m,conservative
"You said ""front page"".  I went to all 3 front pages.  Nothing.  Searching is something else entirely.",sedoneh,e9mojo2,conservative
"I dont agree, and I hope we never have to find out.",mkov88,e9o0pwi,conservative
"That's true, but then compare the 'Hot in the past 24 hours' category from each subreddit. Notice how politics threads tend to get a lot more upvotes in general than worldnews despite the lower number of subscribers? Numer 10 in worldnews has 2.2k while in politics it's 14k. The scoring mechanisms might be different? Or there is simply lower participation in worldnews.",blejusca,e9mzss4,conservative
"CNN is that parent with a shitty kid who, instead of telling their shitty kid to behave in class, screams at the teacher for disciplining the shitty kid.",FelixFuckfurter,e9mdsgx,conservative
"CNN still has reporters at the White House and in the presidential press conferences

Acosta does not have a constitutional right to be physically present in the press room, anymore than the scores of media outlets that do not

Acosta can watch the press conference from outside the White House grounds as they are televised

The president cannot be compelled by any court to actually call on any particular reporter during a press conference

Acosta does not have a constitutional right to disrupt the press conference with his various antics anymore than any other reporter

A president is not constitutionally compelled to hold a presidential press conference",timrob3,e9motyt,conservative
Surely this isn't the first instance of someone having their press pass revoked.,mlmack,e9mq697,conservative
"Video compilation of CNN's Jim Acosta grandstanding and being rude 

https://v.redd.it/qr7bi6zq8cx11",lastbastion,e9mlxf4,conservative
"CNN was not kicked out of the Whitehouse, Jim Acosta was.  CNN is welcome to have a journalist apply for credentials.  That journalist will be required to follow the rules or face expulsion.

",tehForce,e9mhgys,conservative
"Having read the complaint, I’m dubious as to whether or not this will get traction in the courts - it may not even stand to preliminary hearings/exam.

The First Amendment violation seems to be an extreme stretch. Individuals are certainly entitled to a freedom of expression, but this does not mean they are entitled to access places where information is disseminated - including the White House. Example: you may be entitled by the first amendment to report on the events of my business’ board room meetings, but you are not entitled to access my boardroom. Acosta’s ability to express his ideas or convictions was not infringed upon by revoking the pass; what was diminished was his access to places where information is disseminated, and that is not an infringement on his first amendment right.

On the issue of his Fifth Amendment right to due process, there doesn’t seem to be any process for the revoking of a hard press pass. m
My understanding is that hard passes are distributed by the White House at their discretion following a successful background check performed by the secret service. Although there exists a White House Correspondents’ Association, that association has nothing to do with the process of distributing, or in this case revoking, hard press passes. There even exists a precedence of the White House unilaterally suspending clearances, as was the case when Trude Feldman was caught on CCTV rifling through the desk of a White House staffer. Although this is not the same as revoking the hard pass, it stands to reason that the White House has already exercised an implied right to revoke access to its interior spaces, the press room included. To me, this seems like a weak claim. 

The only claim that has sufficient strength would be the claim that there was a violation of the Administrative Procedure Act, 5 USC § 706, specifically section (2)(A), which effectively says that a government agency cannot engage in an action that is “arbitrary, capricious, an abuse of discretion, or otherwise not found in accordance with law”. The claim being made is that Trump’s commentary over the past year demonstrates a distaste not only reporters generally, but Acosta specifically; and that revoking Acosta’s pass based on a distaste for the man or his style of coverage is arbitrary and capricious. This could stand, but it seems weak to me as the claims are contradictory: first the complaint asserts that the revoking of the pass is a “final agency decision by the Secret Service”, but it then goes on to claim that the president’s commentary regarding Acosta demonstrates that the act was arbitrary and capricious. If the order came from Trump and is based on his distaste for Acosta, then the issue turns to whether or not 5 USC § 706 applies to the president; if the order came from the Secret Service, the question then becomes, can we properly infer the Secret Service’s intent from the president’s past commentary. Either way, these are serious problems with the complaint.",leonkennedy74,e9mncac,conservative
"It looks like they're throwing shit at the wall and seeing if anything sticks.

You're not entitled to be a grandstanding jackass.",Iowa_Hawkeye,e9mq7vk,conservative
"[You can read the actual text of the suit here.](https://www.washingtonpost.com/r/2010-2019/WashingtonPost/2018/11/13/National-Politics/Graphics/CNN_lawsuit.pdf?tid=a_inl_manual&tidloc=5)

&#x200B;

It reads like a comedy piece.

&#x200B;

Referring to Acosta...

>He is widely reputed as a diligent and thorough reporter for one of the nation’s most respected and widely watched networks.

&#x200B;

>Plaintiff CNN, a division of Turner Broadcasting System, Inc., is a trusted source for news and information

&#x200B;

>Plaintiffs hereby demand a jury trial.

&#x200B;

They even included the Secret Service officer that took Acosta's pass at the gate, which seems a little over the top.  As much as I would love to see CNN lose I bet they'll win this.  *Sherrill v. Knight* is a pretty similar court case which established that a press pass can't be revoked for arbitrary or content based reasons.  CNN will argue that Acosta was denied a pass because of his reporting unfavorably about the President.  The government will argue that it was because he was/is disruptive and the whole microphone thing.  

&#x200B;

If the White House wanted to be successful in this they probably should have issued the revocation in writing to Acosta and CNN and cited Acosta's continued disruption of press briefings.  

&#x200B;",el_jay_sea,e9mio6f,conservative
[deleted],,e9mtgzk,conservative
"And when Obama refuses to call on reporters who asked him questions he did not like, there were no lawsuits or outcry. Those reporters just dutifully complied. They sucked up to the President.",Lepew1,e9mfpme,conservative
"& once again, the story is about Acosta and CNN - not real news!",JFGFNY,e9mla1e,conservative
CNN has the right to sue.  Won't win but  they still have the right to try.,5_yr_lurker,e9mpqwy,conservative
CNN is free to waste its time and money. Jim is out. ,theeagle1,e9mqmui,conservative
The reason I don't see this as good news is because it indicates CNN still has the kind of money to frivolously spend in vain lawsuits.,Unbalanced_Life,e9md7sx,conservative
DRUMF IS FINISHED!,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9mcpwz,conservative
So CNN is grandstanding in order to make themselves the news.,FreeSpeechRocks,e9mrfmf,conservative
that'll get tossed out pretty quick i imagine,sylect,e9msyyd,conservative
I don't think Accosta or CNN has a leg to stand on. It's just grandstanding to make Orange Man look bad...again.,Sideswipe0009,e9npl3w,conservative
Ha! ,aluminum_lizzard,e9mb7rj,conservative
"I can see the case for banning Acosta: he's regularly disruptive, likes to grandstand, often serves as a distraction in the room. What I don't like is the bullshit excuse the WH is trying to use for revoking his press pass.  Acosta can be an ass but he clearly didn't ""lay hands"" on the staffer. Using that as an excuse to give him the boot is stupid and then tweeting a manipulated video trying to back that case is double stupid. 

Trump is the king of needlessly complicating shit and shooting himself in the foot just to get in a dig at an opponent. ",Grand_Theft_Motto,e9n3u0z,conservative
This. This sums it up nicely.,FuriousChef,e9mkh6d,conservative
"Great flair: ""Sowell Patrol"". I'm reading his book *Migrations and Cultures* right now. Pretty good so far (but a bit too heavy on statistics)",asphaltcement123,e9n1pfo,conservative
\^This x1000,AuroraNorthstar,e9nbuhg,conservative
Too true.,Qualiafreak,e9nccu7,conservative
Acosta is not entitled to be platformed by the White House. If he's not ok with it he should build his own White House. ,ElbowWhisper,e9mrs08,conservative
Then what is the basis for the lawsuit?,Reven1911,e9n11j3,conservative
Well said,NightFreak87,e9moxwv,conservative
"Exactly. CNN gets to keep sending reporters to the White House, so I don't see a First Amendment problem. ",TrueBirch,e9nflhl,conservative
Thank you. This needs to be seen far and wide. This tool bag has been pulling this crap for a while and finally got what was coming to him. ,MadTitan63,e9mrsll,conservative
Is there a way to make a link to this to where it doesn't bring you to this sub? ,Roosterdude23,e9mv7f7,conservative
They still have journalists there. ,JdPat04,e9nl8m0,conservative
">That journalist will be required to follow the rules 

#literally nazi germany",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9o7rdc,conservative
"So just a couple things to mention: 

> the claims are contradictory

This is not an obstacle.  Claims can be contradictory.  It is legitimate and even commonplace to pursue contradictory legal claims.

> If the order came from Trump and is based on his distaste for Acosta, then the issue turns to whether or not 5 USC § 706 applies to the president; if the order came from the Secret Service, the question then becomes, can we properly infer the Secret Service’s intent from the president’s past commentary.

The issue is that the ""hard pass"" comes from the Secret Service, and therefore its revocation can only come from the Secret Service.  The valid grounds for revocation, and this is according to Judge Napolitano, are ""danger to the physical security to the president or his family.""  Anything else, the suit suggests, is invalid and had to have originated somewhere else only to be executed by the Secret Service.",digitalmunsters,e9mrhm1,conservative
I'm surprised they haven't already gotten some district judge to issue an injunction based on the orange man bad doctrine as laid out in *NPC v Reality.*,ElbowWhisper,e9mrics,conservative
"Jiiiiiim come on, lets go,  jim we're leaving, we're done: [https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9vmbob/video\_compilation\_of\_cnns\_jim\_acosta/](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9vmbob/video_compilation_of_cnns_jim_acosta/)",soywars,e9mjrm8,conservative
">He is widely reputed as a diligent and thorough reporter for one of the nation’s most respected and widely watched networks.

You weren't kidding when you said this was a piece of comedy",AuroraNorthstar,e9ncsyp,conservative
"Tell me about it. I got into an argument with one of my friends over this and she’s blindly defending Acosta. She even had the audacity to say what Trump did is something a dictator would do. I told her if this was a dictatorship then Acosta would have been jailed, sent to a political re-education camp, or sent to a firing squad. It makes me laugh when people call Trump a dictator. He’s nowhere near anything similar to Hitler, Stalin, Mussolini, Castro, the Kim family, or Mao.",NightFreak87,e9mtpri,conservative
He's thrown out reporters on at least two occasions too.,chippedbeefontoast,e9mmaip,conservative
[deleted],,e9mtnoj,conservative
"Interested in seeing these, source? ",CarbineGuy,e9mp6oy,conservative
The double standards of the left are absurd.,NightFreak87,e9mgbsa,conservative
Why wouldn't they?,mlmack,e9mka83,conservative
I wouldn’t worry about it. I don’t think they’re going to win. It will be hilarious to see them piss all of that money away on court and legal fees.,NightFreak87,e9me6am,conservative
"If you still have cable, you're funding CNN.",_Gardien,e9mfmml,conservative
"cnn is a propaganda machine that is being funded by the left so they wont shut down through normal means (poor ratings, etc). this suit is an example of their propaganda mission. they know they have no case but sue anyway to try to make trump look bad.",scrubking,e9mkcw0,conservative
They’ll probably make more money in clicks than they spend sending the lawyers they already have on payroll to sue trump,churninbutter,e9mg0vp,conservative
Isn't cnn owned by at&t now?,eve314,e9mnnpz,conservative
Orangeman so bad!!!@@@!!,dudeman4win,e9minpr,conservative
"I disagree with you on the part when you said he didn’t put his hands on her. Granted he didn’t punch her or grab her. However, when you watch the video as the intern is trying to grab the mic he puts his forearm up against hers and puts up a resistance. Just touching someone with a a finger is legally construed as assault.",NightFreak87,e9n45zo,conservative
"You know, I could see the fruitcake actually do that.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9o7udx,conservative
"You can file a lawsuit for literally any reason, no basis necessary.",Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e9nd6ap,conservative
"https://reddit.com/r/news/comments/9wphek/_/e9mgu14/?context=1

This comment explains it pretty well. 

TLDR: They feel his first and fifth amendment rights were violated. ",BigginthePants,e9nmicy,conservative
Attention whoring.,nited_states,e9n583t,conservative
He hasn't received anywhere near what is due him.,TheComedianGLP,e9nrl8h,conservative
It's on YouTube under Mark Dice's channel. ,TheCtrlLeftisafterme,e9nad01,conservative
"Napolitano’s commentary confused me. If there’s no precedence for the revoking of a hard pass, on what grounds can he claim that the only valid cause of action for the revocation of a hard pass is a threat to the president or his family? Not to say I disagree with him, just that I don’t understand quite where he’s coming from. ",leonkennedy74,e9mt41f,conservative
U.S. Government’s Exhibit #1,el_jay_sea,e9mot9h,conservative
"I'm gonna count to three..

One... ",jamesensor,e9n2d3l,conservative
"Agreed. I linked some references to that in a response to another user in this thread. Obama was directly intrusive with the press, yet they still give him a free pass.",Lepew1,e9n205s,conservative
"[Fox shunned, getting to ask half the questions of other networks](http://editions.lib.umn.edu/smartpolitics/2013/01/16/fox-still-shunned-at-obama-pre/)

[War on Fox](https://www.baltimoresun.com/entertainment/tv/z-on-tv-blog/bs-ae-zontv-trumpvpress-20170304-story.html)

[Fawning questions the press did ask President Obama](https://dailycaller.com/2017/02/15/13-hard-hitting-questions-mainstream-reporters-asked-obama/)

[Obama's lack of transparency](https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2016/mar/30/barack-obama-press-freedom-strong-media-stop-donald-trump)

[Obama using espionage act on reporters](https://variety.com/2018/politics/news/trump-press-war-obama-administration-reporters-1202782264/)

[More Obama surveillance of reporters](https://nypost.com/2018/09/08/obama-who-once-surveilled-reporters-criticizes-trump-over-press-freedom/)

[Trump takes 3 times the questions of Obama in a press conference](https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/washington-secrets/mr-accessible-trump-takes-68-questions-from-35-reporters-three-times-obama)

[Obama suppression of the press and their sources](https://www.houstonchronicle.com/opinion/outlook/article/The-White-House-is-at-war-with-reporters-but-13199382.php)

You add all of this up, he was cowing the press into asking those fluff questions. He did not take as many questions, and shunned Fox. Somehow all of this got forgotten though.",Lepew1,e9mtoyi,conservative
"Well, otherwise they would have no standards.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9n2vhi,conservative
And then pay for Trump's fees ala Stormy Daniels and CPL.,chippedbeefontoast,e9mljgm,conservative
"To an extent. CNN receives a fair amount of money from their advertisers and with their viewership decreasing, they can only demand so much for those slots.",S_D_W_2,e9mfzur,conservative
Good thing I don't have cable then.,Unbalanced_Life,e9mfnok,conservative
CHEETO DICTATOR MEAN TO WOMAN!!!,Ulamogs_Toilet_Paper,e9mmaco,conservative
"In that case, she'd be assaulting him first by trying to grab the mic and bumping into him. 

Their forearms touching was clearly not assault. He even said, ""excuse me, m'am"" when they touched. Words have meaning and we don't want to go down the rabbit hole of trying to call what happened on that video assault. ",Grand_Theft_Motto,e9n4u8u,conservative
Thanks!,Roosterdude23,e9nfhsu,conservative
"My guess is that is the conclusion once the process plays out. 

Court rules that the revocation of the pass was legit because the president has discretion, 

or 

It rules that the president did not provide the appropriate reason under existing rules, and therefore has to amend the rules in place. Which he does, and then revokes it again. I can't see a ruling that stands that removes executive discretion here.  

Regardless Acosta isn't getting back in. Even if he wins, they will just put some extra requirement or reason to deny him and go round for round with CNN again through the courts. 

If it were me I would kick them all out and ban any network with a 24 hour coverage component, they are a cancerous part of the press. I honestly think the entire press pool should be rotated out routinely and local news papers/networks should be given access instead.  ",DrowningGods,e9n30em,conservative
"Wow, thanks! ",CarbineGuy,e9mxbp7,conservative
Good answer.,_Gardien,e9mob13,conservative
"No, she tried to grab the mic from him and he put his arm up against hers as resistance. That’s assault on his part, not hers.

Yes, touching someone with forearms or any per of your body is assault. You can google it.",NightFreak87,e9n4ypy,conservative
"Totally agree with your last comment it’s brilliant. Regarding Acosta, I don’t know why they didn’t just “freeze him out”  instead. That’s what I would have done. “Nobody talks to him” period. ",keepitreal51,e9n8kat,conservative
"That's absurd. For one thing, you're mixing up the term of ""assault"" with ""battery."" 

""Battery is a criminal offense involving the unlawful physical acting upon a threat, distinct from assault which is the act of creating apprehension of such contact.""

Also, the Acosta tape shows neither assault nor battery. Any contact between the two was accidental. You can't be charged with battery for bumping into someone on the train because neither of you were paying attention. There needs to be some degree of intent or at least negligence behind the contact. 

If there wasn't, then the staffer would have committed 'assault' when she brushed against his other arm the first time she reached for the mic. Obviously, that's not the case. And it shouldn't be. If it was, then we'd live in a world were passing too close to someone in the hall and brushing against them would be a crime.  ",Grand_Theft_Motto,e9n678h,conservative
"Assault and battery go hand in hand, there isn’t much of a difference.",NightFreak87,e9n7ik6,conservative
There is quite a divide: https://www.lomtl.com/articles/understanding-the-difference-between-assault-and-battery/,Grand_Theft_Motto,e9og8nm,conservative
"There is a big and very important difference between the two. It differs from jurisdiction to jurisdiction but assault is usually defined as intentionally causing someone to have the reasonable belief that physical harm is imminent. Battery is usually defined as a harmful or offensive physical contact towards another person without their consent.

Assault and battery are usually paired together because in most cases there's a threat of violence before the violent act occurs. But they don't inherently go hand in hand.",ict_brian,e9njaz5,conservative
"You're 100% correct. Saying there's not much of a difference between two separate but usually concurrent criminal acts doesn't make any sense. That's like saying there's no real difference between attempted murder and murder because they tend to go together. Obviously, you need to attempt to murder someone before you can succeed but they're not the same thing and don't carry the same penalties.  

Likewise, you can assault someone without it escalating to battery but usually if you commit battery against someone you've also assaulted them.",Grand_Theft_Motto,e9ogilc,conservative
Damn.  That’s a very poor move.  He’s not a fighter like Jim Jordan is,ravenswin,e9oncs6,conservative
Noooooo!,ChironInTheSky,e9ooaeh,conservative
Same ol shit different day.,_Gardien,e9op64o,conservative
Democrat here. Praying to god that HRC doesn’t run again and if she does the DNC superdelegates don’t decide that it’s “her turn” again. She’s a candidate with little to no trust from my generation and waaaaaaaayy too many skeleton in her closet. America can do better. ,ckeeyz09,e9orknl,conservative
They’d rather have fucking Oprah than Hillary! Hilarious. ,OstentatiousSock,e9osa14,conservative
Who would you like to see run?,OstentatiousSock,e9osbgd,conservative
Move on to an orange jumpsuit. ,PhilosoGuido,e9nyti8,conservative
How many days until she moves to D.C. for a seven-figure lobbying job?,soxfan90,e9ogmjo,conservative
It won’t matter who the run with. They will be trying to vote Trump out. ,oldschool54,e9nwcqg,conservative
"They lost their minds when she lost, who are you kidding. ",ozric101,e9nx6w9,conservative
And when she won the primary,soxfan90,e9ogny6,conservative
">U.S. District Judge Leigh Martin May wrote in a 17-page order that the county was found to be acting in violation of the Civil Rights Act with its rejection of absentee ballots solely on the basis of an omitted or incorrect birth year.


Different birth years means different person",Enzo_SAWFT,e9myrq2,conservative
"Oh come the hell on. If the form is not correct, it shouldn't count. Period. And if this info, this judge deems unimportant, why have it on the Form to begin with. What's next, missing or incorrect names should be counted?
",MaddSim,e9n2tbe,conservative
Are you fucking kidding me?,PurpleAngel23,e9n1z5o,conservative
"What's next?  Just show up to vote, scrawl an X on a piece of paper, and you are good to go?",mlmack,e9n875t,conservative
How are we not heading to a civil war?,J0kerr,e9obplb,conservative
"And Democrats claim they are the party of educated voters. They call Republicans dumb hicks and yet Dem voters can't even get their birth dates right or hand in ballots on time. Morons.  Maybe they need to be given pegs with names on them, round ones go in the Republican box and square ones go in the Democrat box. Watch as Democrats try to jam square pegs into round holes and then cry ""voter suppression!!!!"" ",Rightquercusalba,e9nbo9h,conservative
Appeal,ravenswin,e9nrnsb,conservative
If you write down your birthday wrong you shouldn’t vote anyway,MegaBlastoise23,e9n6wky,conservative
"Exactly, how can this judge be so naive? ",ozric101,e9n00pk,conservative
"It wasn't the judge who deemed the information unnecessary, that was acknowledged by Kemp's SoS office itself. For anyone interested in the actual legal reasoning:

> Defendant Crittenden's predecessor has previously conceded that some counties require a voter's year of birth for identification purposes but ""where the year of birth is not necessary to confirm the identify of a voter, it is not otherwise required by O.C.G.A. § 21-2-386(a)(1)(C).""

> ...

> Section 10101(a)(2)(B) of the Civil Rights Act forbids the practice of disqualifying voters ""because of an error or omission on any record or paper relating to any application, registration, or other act requisite to voting, if such error or omission is not material in determining whether such individual is qualified under State law to vote in such election."" 52 U.S.C. § 10101(a)(2)(B).

> This particular addition to federal law was ""intended to address the practice of requiring unnecessary information for voter registration requirements with the intent that such requirements would increase the number of errors or omissions on the application forms, thus providing an excuse to disqualify potential voters."" Schwier v. Cox, 340 F.3d 1284, 1294 (11th Cir. 2003); see also Fla. State Conf. of NAACP v. Browning, 522 F.3d 1153, 1173 (11th Cir. 2008).",Farwater,e9o0431,conservative
dont read the comment section they are even more deranged.,Delta_25,e9n3f4m,conservative
Depends on who you're voting for...,BeachCruisin22,e9nfsri,conservative
"Its funny that you just assume the ballots in question are all democratic votes.
The ballots in question with incorrect birthdates could be republican too.",Avionicskid,e9no26h,conservative
Intent ,elosoloco,e9nfvz5,conservative
This should be the top comment. ,Falkamper,e9okywg,conservative
Thanks for the heads up.,PurpleAngel23,e9ngn4f,conservative
"Ballots that are ""found"" and ""counted"" well after the election tend to not favor republicans.",diehardgiraffe,e9nodiz,conservative
Blonde hair on black women triggers ME!  It's blatant cultural appropriation.,Bubbacat7,e9n32hn,conservative
"That's not bias, that's full blown **racism**",Mr_0pportunity,e9mx8b4,conservative
"i heard this in context. when she was a child she was bullied by white girls with blonde hair. she realized that she had become like them by judging white women as an adult, wrongly associating them with the behavior of others, and that she had to stop and check herself. seems the opposite of racism to me. seems like learning not to be a racist despite being unfairly treated based on race.",ErasmusLongfellow,e9nfhuy,conservative
"shockingly racist, wow",BeachCruisin22,e9my5t4,conservative
"Of course this type of racism is fine.  She will be praised for her racism.  No one will be calling her out for her to be boycotted.  Hope all white women, especially those with blond hair, continue to vote for democrats.  And don't be surprised when even though you are a liberal, they come for you.  Morons.",optionhome,e9mw47f,conservative
I’m a redhead. Apparently I have no soul and hail directly from Ireland. ,genie73118,e9njwda,conservative
"At least she semi admits it, gotta give her that.",Havebaconwilltravel,e9neurn,conservative
"Attractive women of any color trigger her, especially the smart ones. ",Rightquercusalba,e9nbrxl,conservative
"> Blonde hair on white women just triggers me.

If that's all it takes, she needs to be in intensive therapy. ",LonelyMachines,e9najdn,conservative
wtf thats where blonde hair came from.  Lets hate people for how they were born.,atomtom65,e9nl5cx,conservative
I don't need to put up with this rich entitled cunts racism. ,johndeer89,e9nz6hy,conservative
"Sounding a lot like racism to me.  Change that statement to some physical characteristic, like skin and hair only on a black woman.  Sounds really bad doesn't it?   

At least she is aware of the bias.....but maybe we could suggest some sensitivity counseling....  Guessing no one here is liberal...so no one triggered or cares what Jada thinks, but it is a little ironic.",Ted-the-Pirate,e9nggv0,conservative
"As a natural blonde, I can confirm...",SpeedyPrius,e9n5v3w,conservative
"You 👏 can’t 👏 appropriate 👏 a 👏 culture 👏 if 👏 you’re 👏 oppressed 👏

/s",Biscuit_Bandit_Sr,e9npxn1,conservative
"But most adult white blondes you see are also appropriating the hair color, so....",MisterMouser,e9nien5,conservative
"From the article “Oh! That’s no different. That doesn’t give me the right to clump all blonde women in one.'”

Admitting to having biases and admitting they’re wrong and trying to correct it should be praiseworthy ",MegaBlastoise23,e9n7dyt,conservative
Blondes are a race?,mlmack,e9n9x4i,conservative
of course you would say that..... You read the article.  Stop doing that and just read the titles!!!,turboderek,e9nguib,conservative
Racist? Absolutely. Shockingly? Unfortunately not so much.,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9myex2,conservative
"From the article “Oh! That’s no different. That doesn’t give me the right to clump all blonde women in one.'”

Admitting to having biases and admitting they’re wrong and that you attempt to combat them is praiseworthy. 

But fuck reading an article ",MegaBlastoise23,e9n7ghd,conservative
"White women actually vote more for Republicans, including Trump. Look it up. The media constantly talk about this gap with women but never mentions that white women lean Republican.

It's amazing we win any elections with us being so demonized and mislead by the media.",LibertyTerp,e9nnlce,conservative
"Thats not true at all...

You keep the many souls of your victims in a chest under your bed like every other redhead. ",Ledcookey,e9nw659,conservative
"But its their race's hair color. Or do you have to stick to your ethnicity? Like women are all appropriating Scandinavian culture. Man, I guess you have to stay within your own ethnicity. I'm so glad we have the Left to help us learn that treating all people the same is racism.",LibertyTerp,e9nnhqq,conservative
The fact that shes even able to admit such a thing without insane backlash speaks to the huge double standard in society right now. ,imaliberal1980,e9ng39o,conservative
I wonder if you would look so fondly on a white actress if she said that she looks at Black women with black hair that way. I guarantee the media would tear her apart. The double standard so obvious,Mr_0pportunity,e9nj5em,conservative
"It's all in a context of political solidarity, they have to ""bridge the gap"" to beat Trump, essentially.  That's not praiseworthy at all.  It's pathetic.  It's like, fuck I hate white people so much, but we need white women to win!!",Reven1911,e9opkil,conservative
Are you really that dense?,Mr_0pportunity,e9niqwh,conservative
"Actually, I didn't read the article because I heard audio played by Michael Savage, who, even having heard the context, still didn't get it and was calling it racist. For a dude with considerable native intellect, he can come to some seriously bonehead conclusions. An example of emotion interfering with objective thought.",ErasmusLongfellow,e9nkfmh,conservative
No kidding.  I thought I was in r/politics.,mlmack,e9na11a,conservative
"I think there’d be backlash if someone said black women can’t have blonde hair because it’s a race betrayal or something. Who knows. 

Edit: read the article and she’s working on her own biases so that’s cool. ",syntheticsylph,e9no5b6,conservative
"It's not cool though. If a white actress said that she looks at Black women with black hair that way, even if she was ""working on her own biases"" she would be labeled racist and unable to find any work. There is a double standard when it comes to race and it's bullshit",Mr_0pportunity,e9npg3m,conservative
"Hm well she said she’s working on not being racist (or working on her bias as she said) so I think that’s good because racism exists. 

Of course she also wants all women to band together since they’re the victim against men, which I don’t agree with. ",syntheticsylph,e9nqkop,conservative
Is there is a constitutional right to it then everybody who wanted one could get one lol. ,Zac1245,e9nrar7,conservative
"There's a constitutional right to whatever 5 of 9 SCOTUS justices say there is.  Conversely if 5 of 9 say that there *isn't* a right, well, there you are.  

I don't *agree* with that that logic, but that's what our legal system has devolved to.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9ntwa4,conservative
"Acosta has the right to being a reporter and reporting the news. He does not have a first amendment right to being a reporter at the White House, especially when he acts like a clown while there. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9npgcc,conservative
"The Left: You have no right to own guns

Also the Left: You have a right to be in the WH briefing room. ",_TheConsumer_,e9nre5l,conservative
"Acosta has the right to say whatever he wants on CNN, but he doesn't have a right to be in the WH press room. That's a privilege. If it's a right, then I should be able to demand access.",GuitarWizard90,e9nvr3b,conservative
What the fuck am I going insane? How is this even remotely a First Amendment issue? So that means I can get a Press Pass right? ,latotokyo123,e9ntruv,conservative
"I love all the salty leftists who say trump is violating the 1st amendment.

When you ask them to cite the part that he violated they say ""congress shall make no law abridging[...] the establishment of free speech or of the press""

Then you ask them if that makes Trump congress and if he passed a law banning Acosta or CNN from their freedom of speech and they shut up real quick. ",Stained-Glass-Window,e9nqa87,conservative
"http://archive.fo/sLWEE

Archived link for people to read the article because WSJ loves to hide their articles behind paywalls.",PrestoPesto1,e9ntqkr,conservative
"I guess they're going to argue that diminishing their access is tantamount to infringement of their 1A rights. Seems like a stretch to me, but consider that judges have recently ruled that Trump can't block people on Twitter because it violates their 1A rights... I wouldn't put it past the judiciary to order the WH to reinstate that idiot's press pass.",mastaxn,e9nugd3,conservative
"There is a societal right to behaving normally, which Acosta clearly did not, good for Trump for banning him.",searanger62,e9nnsbq,conservative
"What is it the Left always said when people like Alex Jones and Milo got kicked off and banned from places they posted in?

They have the right to free speech, but they don't have a right to be on whatever platform they were booted from.

Acosta doesn't have a right to make trump give him a platform.

Why are the leftists doing a 180 on this stance now? ",Stained-Glass-Window,e9nqkg8,conservative
"I heard CNN has two other reporters in the room, so there isn't even a case of CNN being restricted.",ChunkyArsenio,e9nwl80,conservative
"CNN can report on whatever they want but they dont have the constitutional right to get into the WH lol, if they do then I do",talonrequiresskill,e9o7bfw,conservative
"What a lot of people don’t seem to understand is that journalism is an activity, not a class of people.

When the First Amendment refers to freedom of the press, it doesn’t mean that there’s a protected class of people called “the press” who have their own unique rights that are separate from others. It simply means that anyone has the right to practice journalism and Congress can’t prohibit them from doing so.

Whether it’s Jim Acosta or Jim, your next door neighbor, their rights are the same. They can practice journalism all they want and the government can’t stop them. But that doesn’t entitle them to be granted a press pass by the White House. No such right exists.",heyyoudvd,e9o4f34,conservative
This! Trump is just exacting some “common sense press control”. Reasonable people wouldn’t object to this. Enough is enough. It’s time for us to “do something” about these assault reporters.,justhere2havefun,e9ns44l,conservative
Anyone can get a day pass for the briefings.,m0thra_was_right,e9ojglv,conservative
"You could get a day pass, yes. That's how the Jacob Wohl-types get in.",m0thra_was_right,e9ojmov,conservative
">I love all the salty leftists who say trump is violating the 1st amendment.
     
The Clown Show...        ",ozric101,e9nqx3m,conservative
">Then you ask them if that makes Trump congress and if he passed a law

That's a pretty simplified reading of the 1st amendment, and I'm pretty sure the SCOTUS disagrees with that interpretation.

It doesn't need to be congress, any level of government (including the POTUS) can be found in violation of the 1st. And it doesn't need to be a law - a court ruling, executive order, injunction, etc. can also be found unconstitutional.

See: ""Sherrill v Knight"" for the most relevant ruling.",_fortune,e9o2if1,conservative
Acosta should build his own White House. ,ElbowWhisper,e9nxck7,conservative
But... muh 4th estate...,Reven1911,e9oq57a,conservative
I wish. Shame on them.,PurpleAngel23,e9n5z1v,conservative
Gonna be some people stung by the bee. ,skarface6,e9ngrax,conservative
Imagine filming that video and thinking that you were properly making the point that the life should be terminated,scottishwhiskey,e9nk6nq,conservative
potato,mysupersb,e9na4ef,conservative
"""He needs to recuse himself!"" - The Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9n0z5z,conservative
Hahahahaha.,SickofInternetProgs,e9mxxsh,conservative
This will go well. ,soxfan90,e9n0ruq,conservative
"""This is how democracy dies!""

Except when the Mueller investigation is staffed with nothing but leftists...",wynhdo,e9nkr32,conservative
"Ha ha, based, CNN will get owned!/s

But no, not really, that's no guarantee of the outcome. Kelly is going to decide the case according to the letter of the law and his best ability to interpret it, not his own beliefs. Conservative judges don't guarantee wins for the right, they just guarantee an even playing field. That's just better than liberal judges, who legislate from the bench regardless of what the law says. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9nwpot,conservative
😂😂😂😂 ,chrispr83,e9n4q2q,conservative
\#BURN,TheComedianGLP,e9nrw3q,conservative
That will be the talking point. Any and all judges appointed by Trump will be under attack for being “too partisan “. ,RanchRelaxo,e9n62xr,conservative
https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/9wpgca/cnn_sues_president_trump_and_top_white_house/e9n9gq8/,r777m,e9nd5fp,conservative
"This is important to remember. By laughing and making a joke of this we are damaging the integrity of the judge, we should be cautiously optimistic, but no verdict should be determined by who hired a judge, and I do not expect that to be the case here either.",Falkamper,e9ol69b,conservative
"Lol, called it!",mtgusa,e9ndk2k,conservative
"> Lol, called it!

I am Jacks complete lack of surprise.  Seriously predictable; we need to play by their rules.  Literally ALL of Mueller's team needs to recuse themselves as they donate to Democrats and/or are Hillary's personal lawyers.  How is any of that *not* a constant conflict of interest?",Jizzlobber42,e9nea2i,conservative
"And that's the ball game right there, use that as a counter arguement and they can't say shit.

But, we all know they'll try...",wynhdo,e9nkjpr,conservative
"No. They can complain all they want, but at the end of the day the law is what is followed.  Judges don't/aren't required to recuse themselves for being a nominee.

They can complain as loud as they want and it doesn't matter.",daringescape,e9nyw1t,conservative
"Uh, no, they'll just ban you.",TheComedianGLP,e9nrxtu,conservative
"Yeah, or brigade, nothing we aren't used to :)",wynhdo,e9nv9ef,conservative
He's an expert on the undead voter also. ,DozerM,e9nlf9d,conservative
He is also a pimp. ,soxfan90,e9ogu0o,conservative
"More gop pussies, learned nothing from trump. Taking their beating like bitches",BeachCruisin22,e9ml8j7,conservative
"The worst part about this has to be the coordination between the Sinema campaign and Recorder Fontes that opened these illicit voting centers. They didn't check ID at these polling places, and Sinema put out door hangers in the area specifically directing people to those centers and **highlighting that no ID would be required to vote**. I can't even find any verification that these centers had the required partisan observers from the Republic and Democrat parties.",kaioto,e9mmi3h,conservative
The GOP shouldn't accept the new outcome. I wish they would fight as hard to preserve the election as the left has been to steal it.,Lionstriker2,e9md2on,conservative
"Not like it matters anymore, the race has been called.",Zac1245,e9mc418,conservative
"Once again, Sinema won by 50k votes plus there was a far left green that got 50k votes.

Sinema was popular among about half of the state and is well know, succefully portraying herself as moderate.  McSally was basically a non entity during the campaign, her name is dumb and nobody knew who the hell she was. 

The Gop dropped the ball here, sinema will get her 6 years.  Oh boy!",Manchurainprez,e9mvkdr,conservative
Voting is over and done with. It’s time we leave it behind and carry on.,Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mmdol,conservative
And this is why McSally has the perfect last name. She already congratulated her opponent on the win. She's either taking bad advice from Arizona GOP leadership or she is just plain weak. Either reason exposes her weakness as a candidate. But the main culprit is the GOP leadership in the state. Imagine if Trump had taken the cookie cutter GOP approach as president. We would be getting out asses handed to us. ,Rightquercusalba,e9mjcv8,conservative
"At some point it has to sink in that Republicans will make a great audio clip of their outrage and then go back to business as usual. Trey Gowdy makes a hell of a sound bit but never, ever follows up. I just don’t get it. ",MadTitan63,e9mrwm2,conservative
"McSally herself too, conceded and wished Sinema good luck and ran away.",Zac1245,e9mlm5k,conservative
"AZ needs voter ID, they have complete Republican control of the state gov. I dont know why they have not passed it. ",Zac1245,e9mndom,conservative
The GOP doesn’t fight for shit. McSally rolled over and took it. ,Zac1245,e9mkb1k,conservative
">Not like it matters anymore, the race has been called.

Agreed.  We should all just accept the results once their in. 

Oh wait, the Muller witch hunt is still going on, so never mind. Fight them tooth and nail for every single illegal ballot they counted. ",CAGUnion404,e9mdwlp,conservative
"""Hur, it called who care if cheat? Moves on.""

Thanks fellow conservative. Your strength is a beacon.",Hinnaku,e9mk3bt,conservative
They were called in Florida as well.,mlmack,e9mjbcn,conservative
"Yes, let’s not contest any election we lose where there is cause for suspicion while the Democrats contest every election they lose where it is remotely close. Great plan. We’ll ride our principles right into the dirt and be buried with them.",hello_japan,e9no5fv,conservative
"And just like that, America dies with a whimper",KingOfTheP4s,e9mmskc,conservative
"Yes, the bank robbers got away.

Oh well, let's get to making more money to refill the bank, and never speak of this robbing again.",TheComedianGLP,e9nscrd,conservative
"> I just don’t get it.

Because, sadly, most of them are just controlled opposition at best.",IndefinitePresent,e9mxu33,conservative
"May she never return to politics, then.  Let's hope that the next person to run as a Republican is someone with some force of will.",anuser999,e9mmesa,conservative
Because Republicans and action don't always go hand in hand.  I also imagine they don't want to be thrust into the public spotlight as racists after Obama took on an all out media assault to slander them over SB 1070 and are a little gun shy at this point.  ,Blown89,e9n08bo,conservative
"The way of conservatives to just roll over...as they steal elections, as they send mobs to civilians houses, as they confiscate guns, as they form mobs in the streets, etc....the answer is always to not fight back. When will they fight back?",J0kerr,e9mecem,conservative
Im sure the AZ GOP Will get right on that (they wont).,Zac1245,e9me61m,conservative
"Eh, it takes time for the old guard to grasp the fact that the other side is not interested in following the rules of the game.  They still labor under the old idea that both sides are honorable and willing to stay within the bounds of the rules.  Give them time, they'll come around.",anuser999,e9mmjwa,conservative
"McSally has conceded and wished Sinema luck. The State GOP and National GOP has dropped the issues. What’s your plan to expose fraud here, “fellow conservative.”",Zac1245,e9mk7wm,conservative
"Different situation, there is no recount to be called here and McSalley has conceded. ",Zac1245,e9mjffo,conservative
"They want liberalism, just slower.",Beari_stotle,e9ng1xy,conservative
The speculation is she will take over Jon Kyles seat. ,Zac1245,e9mmg0g,conservative
I hope you're right.,Hinnaku,e9mmmdz,conservative
Too little too late,KingOfTheP4s,e9mmpcu,conservative
They'll come around as we're being lined up against the wall and the commies are slipping the blindfold over our eyes. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9mxhkn,conservative
"You didn't even read the article.

""By law, early voting is supposed to end on the Friday before Election Day, but the law also provides for the emergency voting centers that may be created after. Ambiguities over the ""emergency voting"" statute—including questions as to what constitutes an emergency and whether or not a voter should have to prove their emergency—are the points of conflict.""

You don't want this investigated. You don't wan it questioned. 

You want us to blind ourselves and look forward, to never second guess their shady tactics. 

You're not conservative, you're just a propagandist here to distract. 

Thanks again.",Hinnaku,e9mkdlv,conservative
Gillum conceded too. And then he unconceded.,hello_japan,e9nn9n8,conservative
"I really dislike that idea because then she will be running as an incumbent when the seat is up again and we will be stuck with her as a candidate. She has already shown that she sucks as a candidate despite her great background. She knows how to fight militarily but not politically. 

I would have been playing those Project Veritas clips in campaign ads non-stop. I really don’t understand how we lost this race, everything she needed was handed to her on a silver platter by James O’Keefe.",hello_japan,e9nnqwb,conservative
"Unfortunately you're more right than I'd like.  At this point the best we can probably hope for is that we split the country between the two populations before it gets to that point, especially since if the war *does* start it'll be to the utter destruction of one side or the other.",anuser999,e9n018i,conservative
"Whos gonna investigate it bro? lol You and I can call for an investigation but its not gonna happen. McSalley isn't pursuing it, the GOP isnt, neither AZ or National. ",Zac1245,e9mkk1g,conservative
"I think the phrase is ""renegged on the concession"".",TheComedianGLP,e9ns96t,conservative
"I've always thought that government should divide with growing populations.  It was a eureka moment for me and makes so much more sense.  Like you go from 1million people to 300 million, this is giving an ever more increasing responsibility to the government.  And businesses and governments alike, the bigger they get, the less efficient.  And government comes with the added cost of your vote counting less, each and every year.

So, the higher population you have, you divide into two governments, grow population again, divide into 4 governments, etc.

although, having more power in the counties and states would likely help to alleviate the problem as well.  ",StopTop,e9n8fje,conservative
Guess which side wins the Utterly Destroyed toss?,TheComedianGLP,e9ns3cj,conservative
"So again.

""Hur, it called. No investigate shady. Roll over die.""

Thanks man. Super strong.",Hinnaku,e9mknw1,conservative
I actually love this idea and I’m surprised I’ve never heard it before.,hello_japan,e9nnjfu,conservative
"That's why I *try* to help them by telling them to slow their roll with their rhetoric.  All I usually get for my efforts is a ban, so fuck 'em.  I tried.",anuser999,e9nsnv6,conservative
"This defeatism wimpness is all over the place.

Like concern trolls only more angsty.",TheComedianGLP,e9ns6jk,conservative
"No, please tell me who is gonna lead this investigation lol.",Zac1245,e9mkpzq,conservative
"Don't do favors for evil retards.

It wastes your time and irritates the evil retards.",TheComedianGLP,e9nsruj,conservative
"?? How much of the article do I have to read to you?

",Hinnaku,e9ml2a3,conservative
Ive read the article. Who is leading this investigation? This article is from yesterday before McSallley conceded. McSalley herself has no interest in it. ,Zac1245,e9mlfcy,conservative
Its pretty outrageous those democrats elected that old white man Schumer to control and oppress them.,Aszaszasz,e9orujp,conservative
"Leave it to the liberals to piss and moan about race and change during elections, but when it comes to leadership it's cave time

Edit: I'm referring to Sinema and every fresh Dem that had balls to say something against Schumer",ENEB1487,e9os2h8,conservative
">Sinema

Not even sworn in yet and she's already broken her first campaign promise.",PubliusVA,e9oswbh,conservative
"France is the only country in Eurovision that consistently neither sings nor reports results in English.  But there’s no nationalism there, nosiree.",BrighamYoung,e9op8hv,conservative
We hate nationalism! Let's build an army!,SickofInternetProgs,e9os06v,conservative
The lying inebriated hag is at it again.,BrighamYoung,e9opatx,conservative
Fair election?? Hillary is a freakin moron. ,seat_shop,e9opur6,conservative
Whenever republicans win or are winning its “cheating” and “foreign influence” the same democrats that want to flood the country with migrants to have foreign influence keep them in power.,PurpleHouseSlippers,e9orgb8,conservative
cough racism cough,Delta_25,e9mlkin,conservative
"You’re saying he speaks English well? *You don’t say*...it’s almost as if people don’t care of his skin color, but just want someone who seems competent. ",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mm235,conservative
Suspicious of 70% of her husband's voters much?,SickofInternetProgs,e9my2ls,conservative
"You know - because everyone in the black community has suspicions about black people that white people like...

It isn't even a controversy for her to say this on Good Morning America. She's just keepin it real.",Gnome_Sane,e9mkxv5,conservative
"She's actually not wrong, although she probably wasn't referring to this- a huge number of white liberals were head-over-heels for Obama because of his ""straight talk"" mannerisms and his general demeanor. ",Maswasnos,e9mo0k2,conservative
Please GO AWAY,BundyPolkHigh33,e9ml70v,conservative
"Talking ""straight"" as she puts it, should be encouraged. ",MaddSim,e9mmhqn,conservative
"Wow, that's kinda racist.",BaronFalcon,e9mys0t,conservative
She seems very miserable at times. Shes the type to meet someone then talk shit about them when they leave the room,KaiserGrant,e9nzipt,conservative
“He’s considered competent by white people so he must be a pawn in their racist schemes”. I don’t even understand what she’s talking about. Is she saying that straight talking is not something that black people do? I don’t get it. ,idabuti,e9mrcle,conservative
"Without white voters, Obama would never have been elected twice.  ",ThruHiker,e9no1hs,conservative
A disgusting human being.,BeauRyker,e9mxabp,conservative
Why am I hearing so much from/about her lately?,mlmack,e9n2rlm,conservative
Michelle should be signed as a RB for a NFL team with all his expert ball carrying experience.,GeckoFlameThrower,e9ndhj5,conservative
what an angry and ugly heathen pig.,pappazeuss,e9n9pkb,conservative
Is anyone going to remind “her” that Barack is only half black?,cur1ous1,e9nd7b5,conservative
"What a low-class black ""woman""(?).
 A really angry racist. I feel physically sick when I think that ""she"" spent eight years in the White House representing our country. What a POS!",Bubbacat7,e9n51gf,conservative
"She says this, but Michelle has plenty of white admirers as well.

Also, it's funny to see people who're racist towards their own race.",xoxoqt,e9mumwe,conservative
White people be like that.,NottingHillNapolean,e9mtffe,conservative
"This idea is touched on by the movie ""Get Out"" (even though I think most people overlooked it by over-simplifying the movie)",stanleythemanley44,e9nbi1r,conservative
The party of the KKK never shook their racism,___-III----III-___,e9mn3fv,conservative
"There’s a name they give people like this...they call them *Uncle Toms*. God forbid we try to work together as human beings, regardless of skin color. But nope, apparently if a black man works with a white man (or even white people support a black man) that makes that black person a house slave according to Michelle Obama.

What a disgusting human being. ",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mm72f,conservative
Define 'Black Community' because that is racists AF. ,ozric101,e9mm5pv,conservative
"wait, she's not talking about her husband? 

edit: oh I see what you meant",AdmirableStretch,e9mw0mt,conservative
"If you tell a redneck to speak properly, you're helping them. If you tell a black person to speak properly, you're a racist.

I bet this is one of the reasons progress for black people slowed down the past few decades. Well, black unemployment is at an all time low under Trump. Hopefully speaking English correctly, getting a job, not being a criminal, and raising your children will become popular again, as it was among black Americans for all of US history up until the 60s. Fucking cultural Marxism: using propaganda to make people think you're fighting for them while destroying their community, which naturally only makes them angrier.",LibertyTerp,e9njgmn,conservative
"Things have changed in the past few years, the mask can be allowed to slip more.",anuser999,e9nfzrb,conservative
You don't hear the dog whistle if you're not a dog.,putercom5,e9oi61v,conservative
"Probably because she is going to run for some office, if not President.

Why isn't this example of her racism a national story, and a teachable moment on race relations in America?",Gnome_Sane,e9n4muc,conservative
"I love how they say the parties ""switched"" in the 70s so they're not racist anymore. Oh, so Woodrow Wilson and FDR were small government capitalists? Not progressive heroes who instituted incredibly racist policies like putting all the Japanese in camps and REsegregating the military after Repiblicans desegregated it? Republicans then had to re-de-segregated the military, btw.",LibertyTerp,e9nirh0,conservative
"https://www.cbssports.com/nfl/news/rob-parker-calls-rg3-a-cornball-brother-says-hes-not-one-of-us/

>""My question, which is just a straight honest question: is he a brother, or is he a cornball brother?"" Parker asked to much confusion among the show's other participants. ""Well, [that] he’s black, he kind of does his thing, but he’s not really down with the cause, he’s not one of us.

>""He’s kind of black, but he’s not really the guy you’d really want to hang out with, because he’s off to do something else.""

>""I want to find about him,"" Parker said. ""I don’t know because I keep hearing these things. We all know he has a white fiancee. Then there was all this talk about he’s a Republican, which there’s no information at all. I’m just trying to dig deeper into why he has an issue. Because we did find out with Tiger Woods, Tiger Woods was like, 'I’ve got black skin, but don’t call me black.' So people wondered about Tiger Woods.""

https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/dc-sports-bog/wp/2013/01/07/rob-parker-talks-about-calling-rgiii-a-cornball-brother/?noredirect=on&utm_term=.a9ffad7b5b3c

>“It was just a conversation that’s had **in the black community** when athletes, or famous entertainers or whatever, push away from their people,” Parker said. “And that’s really what it’s about. You saw it with O.J. Simpson, and some other people, where they say, ‘Well, I’m not black. I’m O.J.’ So it’s more about that, not about RGIII and what’s going on. It’s more about this thing that we’ve battled for years and why people have pushed away from their people. It’s more about that.”

",Gnome_Sane,e9n4yys,conservative
"Fuck. I just realized she's a Hillary clone. Wait a minute, she's just as unlikeable as Hillary! And liberals are so stupid they'll actually nominate her!",LibertyTerp,e9njjvz,conservative
Are the people flying confederate flags Democrats anymore?,par_amor,e9np4h9,conservative
"There's southerners. Just like they always have been. Some of their Democrat and some Republican


Are the people supporting the New Deal Republicans?",ExpensiveMention,e9nrcnk,conservative
Was the new deal was controversial between party lines? Not being facetious I really don’t know.,par_amor,e9ntp8c,conservative
"The small amount liberal Republicans (RINO's) voted for it, but the conservative Republicans absolutely opposed it. For example, the National Industrial Recovery Act of 1933 was passed in the house 325-76. Of the 325 yea votes, 267 were Democrats. This time in history was when Democrats really became popular so the majority of Congress was Democrats or ""Republicans"" with Democrat platforms save for a few true conservative Republicans.",AManHasNoFear,e9nvs99,conservative
FDR was one of the most effective politicians in American history. He single-handedly transformed America into the welfare state it is today.,LibertyTerp,e9omrt3,conservative
Hey what happened to the Migrant caravan? Why is nobody talking about that particular threat to democracy,Dongus-,e9mytit,conservative
"David Brock is a piece of shit but his plan worked..

*edit for those who haven't seen it: https://mediaequalizer.com/jeff-reynolds/2017/08/silencing-all-opposition-voices-inside-the-media-matters-playbook

Direct link to doc: https://www.scribd.com/document/337535680/Full-David-Brock-Confidential-Memo-On-Fighting-Trump

This is old information that was never taken seriously, but it appears to be exactly what they did. ",AntifaArePathetic,e9mrjsp,conservative
And to the Republic which is our actual system of government.,ngoni,e9mrg8k,conservative
"And they got given one too many chambers of Congress. They’re going to damage this country for two years now. Trump will have to carry the team in 2020. 

Edit: How conservatives can disagree with this, Democrats having the House is BAD. ",Intimidator94,e9mr2m5,conservative
"Somebody get a case to the newly conservative Supreme Court so we can stop pretending Photo ID isn't already necessary for daily life. 

We need to make it and accurate databases part of voting requirements.  In Mexico, they make voters go to a specific voting location where they have a registration card and picture for each voter.   We should at least be as careful as Mexico.  Dead people don't vote in their elections.",ThruHiker,e9nmtp8,conservative
And the sky is blue.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9oa81j,conservative
That’s the media’s new strategy. Go radio silent to let outrage die out and keep people distracted. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9mz81x,conservative
"Democrats are also a threat to free press

Rioting at jounrlaists houses

Indicting journalists

Censoring news",ExpensiveMention,e9n2580,conservative
It's still going on.,chabanais,e9npoq7,conservative
I swear Tucker brought this up on his show a couple times last year.,IvankasFutureHusband,e9mslh2,conservative
"> How conservatives can disagree with this, Democrats having the House is BAD.

We have many ""fellow conservatives"" that downvote anything not ThinkProgress approved. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9mykmt,conservative
He will have to carry the team....again,J0kerr,e9mrf93,conservative
"> How conservatives can disagree with this

Easy answer. Orange Man Bad. There are still people here who hate Trump because he is mean or crude and trolls on Twitter. Conservative policy matters less to them than the appearance of decorum. 

But most of your downvotes are from brigadiers. Not conservatives. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9mz31t,conservative
"If you’re getting downvotes, it’s most likely a brigade from various leftist aspects of Reddit. They do it here all the time.",Masterjason13,e9myk7m,conservative
"We're being brigaded, again.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9n7d1z,conservative
kinda strange how our fellow conservative news networks also failed to keep up to date on this extremely pressing issue,Dongus-,e9n8s79,conservative
"> Rioting at jounrlaists houses

Not sure which journalist you’re referring to ",RPG_Vancouver,e9nh70i,conservative
yeah those antfia thugs absolutely destroyed Mr Carlsons doorbell. When will they learn that violence is not the answer,Dongus-,e9n8vap,conservative
Can you explain the last two claims?,tuckman496,e9n3f5d,conservative
"Of all people to do so, I imagine he would, but if your enemy gives you their play book and you don't do anything with it, then you can't point fingers. (if the GOP can be seen as monolithic and acting towards a singular goal at any given time)",AntifaArePathetic,e9msw5b,conservative
He carried the team when they let him. Otherwise we lost the House because they tried to stand against him. ,Intimidator94,e9mvrff,conservative
I read something yesterday from drudge stating they  were leaving Mexico City. It should play out over the next couple of weeks.,youtwoha,e9ndhdj,conservative
Democrats trying to steal the election is going on now but the caravan is still on its way.,chabanais,e9nprnw,conservative
"https://townhall.com/tipsheet/bethbaumann/2018/11/10/antifa-protestor-who-helped-storm-tucker-carlsons-house-provides-details-in-new-oped-n2535728

Domestic terrorist group surrounded his home saying they aren't afraid and will attack and know where he sleeps at night. The also cracked his front door too ",Stained-Glass-Window,e9njjt4,conservative
"They shouldn't have been there in the first place, I don't see conservative mobs breaking Maddow's door. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9ncya2,conservative
Never.,mlmack,e9n9pqa,conservative
"For fun times I took a look at your post history in the last month. 

> Just because people put it on a pi very of paper that doesn’t mean it’s an inalienable right

> Did you not hear the speech he gave when announcing his run for president? Right out the gate he gave the “they’re not bring their best” speech which called immigrants rapists, drug dealers, and murders

> The smoke isn’t people calling Trump a crook, it’s Trump and his circle continually lying about contacts with Russians. 

> A protest is a mob? What do you think democracy looks like? A rapist president that lost the popular vote? Yeah I thought so. 

> Intolerance of intolerance is absolutely acceptable. Some people get too caught up with the theory of accepting everyone’s “opinion” that they fail to see when it’s necessary to take a side.

> Antics [Guessing this is 'Antifa] exists exclusively to combat white nationalists and fascists - groups with the explicit goal of subjugating people and spreading hate. It’s not the same. 

> My point is that if a woman has decided she wants to abort, then the man should not try to convince her otherwise. Sure, communication is imperative for a healthy relationship. But if someone doesn’t want to be pregnant, they don’t have to be pregnant.

",Colonize_The_Moon,e9n98pv,conservative
I think a lot of the upper crust figured the lunacy of the left would be self-evident and that they could sit back and let the Democrats implode without exerting any effort on their own. Hopefully 2018 taught them otherwise. The left will burn the house down and lock us inside if given the chance; they have to be fought back as vigorously as they're fighting us.,GameShowWerewolf,e9n3ve6,conservative
"While they definitely shouldn’t have done that to Carlson, there’s one problem. He isn’t a journalist. He’s a partisan political commentator. 

Also lol ‘domestic terrorist group surrounding his home’. You really can make 20 people with spray paint sound REALLY scary. 

The truth is that it’s not the left currently waging a war on the press, it’s the right wing and the current republican administration. They’ve tried to equate  ‘negative coverage of Trump or other Republicans’ with ‘fake news’ and have repeatedly called the media enemies of the people. ",RPG_Vancouver,e9nm8y5,conservative
Thanks for the heads-up!,GuitarWizard90,e9nbn2h,conservative
"Antifa is a domestic terror group.

It's hard to dispute that.

If 10 dudes from isis showed up outside your house would you say ""lol it's only 10 dudes in headscarfs!""? ",Stained-Glass-Window,e9nplv3,conservative
"> Antifa is a domestic terror group.


There’s just... so much wrong with this whole comment. 

First of all, ‘antifa’ isn’t a single group or organization like ‘ISIS’ or ‘PETA’ or ‘The Libertarian Party’ (just some examples of organizations or groups). It’s a descriptor for an ideology. 

Under your logic, ‘alt right’ must be a domestic terrorist group as well, based on the tactics and actions of some of the people that follow that ideology. 

> If 10 dudes from isis showed up outside your house would you say ""lol it's only 10 dudes in headscarfs!""?


ISIS is known for murdering people they view as infidels and taking women as sex slaves. ‘Antifa’... shout at protests and spray paint graffiti and punch Richard Spencer? Holy false equivalence Batman! 


Also you seem to have completely ignored the fact that Carlson is in no way a journalist, thus rendering your initial comment you were defending completely wrong as well. ",RPG_Vancouver,e9nxyo1,conservative
"You mean to say climate science isn’t cut and dry, and is susceptible to political bias? *Color me shocked*

What does this say about those who denigrate “climate change deniers”? (Who are actually just skeptical of the narrative being pushed) 

*I’m looking at you, Bill Nye*",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9op8tm,conservative
"Washington has a lot of sleazebags, but this guy is the worst of them.",BrighamYoung,e9nitwk,conservative
Imagine my surprise; a Democrat is advocating ignoring the Law,Jizzlobber42,e9nhtyq,conservative
"Seditious pieces of garbage. Seriously, why do democrats think the law doesnt apply to them? What makes them so special? Oh yeah, because republicans are spineless amd let them get away with everything. ",iwasthebeaver,e9nguke,conservative
He is the absolute worst of them. ,ozric101,e9nix9h,conservative
I have a better solution.  Article V Convention of States.  We have 11 states already involved.  More people need to talk about this.,flippy76,e9oeujv,conservative
"It was the gentrifiers that got her the primary. She should welcome this,more gentrification, more baizuo.",willyruffian,e9mns8e,conservative
Who needs jobs anyway?,allboutryan,e9mikbz,conservative
"Oh no, your poor followers will get jobs, they have an opportunity to work and earn money for themselves, think for themselves, and maybe realize that the whole “muh free stuff” agenda she is pushing is complete bs",Lord_Grill,e9nbtef,conservative
">I don't want people to have jobs, I want them given free stuff",FallingPinkElephant,e9mmgzx,conservative
Amazon should teach her district a lesson in capitalism and move to Texas instead. ,texanSTH,e9mni04,conservative
The Crystal City location might also make it even harder for her to afford an apartment in the D.C. metro area. So this decision is 2 for 2 in pissing her off.,Crusader_1096_2,e9ms5la,conservative
"When Trump signed his tax cuts into law New York State wanted to sue.

Now New York State has promised massive tax cuts to Amazon as an incentive to move their plant there.

What am I missing here?",CarbineGuy,e9ne5t0,conservative
"Still not understanding how any voters voted for socialists.  I guess I can understand the siren song of free shit, but do they really not know that they will be the ones paying for it?

Oh, and no, they can't ""collectively bargain"".",mlmack,e9n39ca,conservative
">Damn Capitalism

Cortez",Enzo_SAWFT,e9mirps,conservative
"These people are crazy. The return on every dollar of tax breaks is 9 dollars.

It would be stupid not to do this. ",minuscatenary,e9njkw1,conservative
"Yes, because those that are employed and make a living are a danger to the leftist democrat. ",StillANNONin,e9mv33c,conservative
Jobs not mobs.,DK_Tech,e9mq0mc,conservative
Why would she want more jobs available for her constituents? ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e9nm4ya,conservative
"She is kinda hot, awful politics tho. ",hipsterdufus84,e9mohev,conservative
"Thanks for the reminder about the word [baizuo](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Baizuo).  

I love that the Chinese have coined their own term for leftist jackasses.",doireallywannadothis,e9nqn2a,conservative
"She wanted because she was a hispanic female. You don't get much more privileged than that. 

Maybe if she was black she would be",ExpensiveMention,e9nrfr9,conservative
"There's way more talent in NYC. Besides, it was New York's democrat dominated government that coaxed them into coming here in the first place.",DEFCON_TWO,e9n2hs7,conservative
"Nooooooo, you wanna turn Florida even more blue? lol it’s good they are going to already liberal places. ",Zac1245,e9mt1ph,conservative
"Capitalism suggests is that Amazon would pick the location for its headquarters were it would be most efficient for them to do so, not having the local government subsidize the jobs through tax incentives.",scottishwhiskey,e9njwtg,conservative
Never thought of that way!,soxfan90,e9n0wg2,conservative
Orange man not run Amazon,Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e9neieu,conservative
"Short term thinking.  This is the same thinking that gets these people into trouble with credit cards, new cars and phones they can't afford.  ",daringescape,e9nl4qt,conservative
"> but do they really not know that they will be the ones paying for it?

They think it will be paid by rich people.",Sideswipe0009,e9nrg0x,conservative
You say that when 50% of her pictures are of her giving a terrifying death stare ,Lord_Grill,e9nbuz1,conservative
Fuk oranj man. ,CarbineGuy,e9neiz2,conservative
And horse face,dicaparly,e9njh2n,conservative
Cheeto Hitler bad,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9nkb4o,conservative
Brick wall color dictator bad,Lord_Grill,e9ntriq,conservative
[removed],,e9mczv8,conservative
The writer doesn't include any concrete examples from the last 4 decades. ,BlueHarpBlue,e9md5fe,conservative
[removed],,e9mf5h0,conservative
[removed],,e9mdg75,conservative
"I'm pretty proud of how many non-inflammatory responses there are to this post just pointing out the major lack of evidence or any reasonable basis for this claim. 

",Thefuntrueking,e9mlhwx,conservative
"Ok, conservatives need to stand up here a bit. We can volunteer for election duty. This is how we stop these things from happening. Democrats volunteer in droves for this kind of job, we need to as well and accept the sacrifices that come with it. ",molon-labe7,e9m3hr9,conservative
[removed],,e9mjeap,conservative
[removed],,e9mkcnr,conservative
[removed],,e9mi0g4,conservative
"I am libertarian as much as possible and would love to see every government smaller, every single one (I am not in US, and I am not American). But I think one of the things that are responsibility of a non-partisan government are elections.

I know US gives a lot of independence to each State, I know most are different, but I think it's time to have a centralized entity that takes care of elections, at leas the major ones. Many countries, most of them smaller, have this, but Brazil is an example of a large country where elections work fairly and without much problems (I won't mention corruption after the election or on the judicial level that oversees them).

Elections are the cornerstone of a democracy, and they shouldn't be left to incompetent buffoons like these people we see in the news. People that shouldn't be responsible for a hot-dog cart on a calm corner of Tucson, AZ, much less on something that will shape the life of millions of people for years to come.",borga,e9matna,conservative
"When's the last time a box of gop votes appeared a week after an election? Honest question, ever? ",BeachCruisin22,e9mkws3,conservative
"I'm all for counting every vote, but I'm worried that these ballots aren't legit. Is anyone (GOP) verifying these are valid?",trendyweather,e9m4gtk,conservative
"Remember when GOP were called ""cheaters"" because of a ballot design that had been used in the past, approved by multiple parties, and published in the newspaper weeks prior? 

Can you imagine what the headlines would say if it was Republicans magically finding boxes of votes in airports and storage rooms? ",aboardthegravyboat,e9m7oww,conservative
"Wow, someone link this thread somewhere? I haven't seen brigading like this in some time.  Someone's triggered",BeachCruisin22,e9noghc,conservative
"Attorneys for Gillum and Nelson are arguing that non-citizen votes should count. 

Tell me again how Russia is the foreign influence in our elections or that Democrats oppose foreign influence in our elections?",CoyoteBanned,e9m6eja,conservative
"Hey, remember when they claimed that asking for photo IDs to vote was racist?  LMAO  WTF",StephenNesbit,e9maoyt,conservative
Seriously this shit happens by both Reb and Dem. Our elections are just as bad as any other country. We have no right to chastise other countries when we can't run a legit one ourselves. And don't gloss over what happened in Georgia.,ha7on,e9macx0,conservative
Wait are we losing now?,deepfeels96,e9nazv9,conservative
Establishment types will say take the high road and let it pass for the sake of the country.  Well that high road is being given to vile leftists intent on forever suppressing dissent.  I don't know the answer but being wimps isn't accomplishing anything.,GMU1993,e9m32ga,conservative
"yeah it's funny how recounts and late counting and ""suddenly we found a bunch of boxes of missing votes"" always seems to benefit the Democrats.

and all we heard leading up to the election was how Republicans are trying to steal votes and suppress votes and cheat.",Harnisfechten,e9maolg,conservative
"I still haven't figured out what happened in Arizona.  Florida is a shit show, but the same slimy shit went on out west ",Thuggled,e9malhi,conservative
"Apparently it's not enough because we keep letting it happen! We sit here and bitch, moan, and complain but do nothing. We got all the jokes and outrage but no motivation to go outside and protest. 

GET INVOLVED. BECOME ACTIVE. FIGHT BACK!
",ercwtsn,e9mchv8,conservative
"I'm in my 30s and I don't think I've ever seen an election where Republicans win go by without Democrats crying ""False"" and trying to recount and find new ballots to change the results.

&#x200B;",mytwodogs,e9mac6y,conservative
Stop the insanity...,ZXZ939,e9mjo3i,conservative
This is our world now....,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9mfg9s,conservative
"DC is moving to reduce voter age to 16. Most people I know who have reached maturity will point to their late 20s as the time when they thought they had political sense and deserved to vote. Prior to that time they thought they were voting in ignorance. How about this- if you are still on your parent's health care plan until 26, how about you do not get to vote until after you stand on your own feet? Democrats cynically put ignorant young voters into the mix just to gain power. They know younger people skew Democrat...they have not yet lived long enough to witness the failings of socialism personally, nor have they had to do any significant bill paying yet.

These corrupt election officials need to be prosecuted and jailed. Reporting standards need to be added in places where there are none, and ignoring those reporting standards should freeze the count to the point at which those standards were adhered. The person disenfranchising voters here is the election official who refuses to adhere to voting standards, and the public outrage over disenfranchisement should serve to motivate them to remove corrupt officials and insist on better adherence to voting standards.",Lepew1,e9md3d3,conservative
"> Things like motor voter and early voting are a plague on our electoral integrity that even the Russians couldn’t dream up. Early voting is an excuse for laziness that doesn’t allow a voter to change his mind. Early voters can move to another jurisdiction or even be dead on election day. Motor voter is problematic in states that hand licenses out to illegal aliens who then can drive to the polls and vote, disenfranchising American citizens. Provisional ballots make no sense. If you can’t properly register by election day, don’t bother to show up. It is not that hard. Put down your cell phone, register, and wait for the next election. Mail-in ballots are invitations to fraud, plagued with signatures that don’t match and ballots denied depending on the election judge’s finite wisdom or political prejudice.

Yep.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9mfttx,conservative
Then fight back.,Dogfacedgod88,e9m90py,conservative
">Election day voting with a voter ID eliminates mismatched signatures, misplaced, lost in the mail, or even manufactured ballots that show up only when needed to pull a Democrat to victory. State election boards must be allowed to purge voter rolls of dead people or voters that have moved, often winding up registered to vote in multiple jurisdictions. These actions disenfranchise no one except the lazy and the stupid.    

We need to reverse the early voting trend, and just have election DAY.



",Clatsop,e9m4lqk,conservative
"I also believe after the initial questions, his own administration that oversees this process came out and said there is no evidence of fraud, as did law enforcement. Which is why the judge didn't grant his injunction ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9mim77,conservative
[removed],,e9mkizb,conservative
"I do agree with you, however, there are clear laws in place that need to be followed. I have zero trust for the democrats, and breaking the laws in this way is very suspicious.",redeyes24321,e9mhoak,conservative
[deleted],,e9mdgtv,conservative
[removed],,e9mjnnf,conservative
">Take the little-noticed flip of a Republican congressional seat in New Mexico after a supposed election night victory was announced by local and national media for the GOP contender.

He could have included more but this one was right in the article.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9men53,conservative
Hard to get concrete evidence when the supervisors bar reporters from observing and immediately destroy any of the questionable ballots.  The coverup behavior alone is more than enough to be suspicious and not view the results as valid.,anuser999,e9mik7t,conservative
"Nothing suspicious about ""finding"" a number of ballots after your candidate lost, and then refusing to disclose any information about said ballots whatsoever.

This entire post is Exhibit A for why the left has run rampant in the West over  the past 75 years. One side understands that we are at war for our future, and it ain't us. ",Julius__Ebola,e9mg9ns,conservative
"Needs to be a lot more than ""a bit"" although at this point I think America is done.",groyperslefthand,e9mb0n3,conservative
[deleted],,e9mbny6,conservative
"Well, we all have jobs restricting our time, so...",HoodooSquad,e9meu9a,conservative
We have jobs. They don't. ,AidsinCali,e9mg1fy,conservative
"Lmao, wait wait wait... so we're suppose to ignore all the sketchy stuff going on under people like Snipes (and her impressive history), but instead focus on the people like Rick Scott trying to catch their bullshit? Okay... glad once again the Left is infallible regardless of what they do. ",Ledcookey,e9mkao2,conservative
"Theres a difference between pro-russia and laughing at the Lefts ""muh russia"" rhetoric these past 2 years. ",Ledcookey,e9mkdq5,conservative
"I dont see conservatives being pro-Russia as much as pro-""the democrats are being ridiculous about Russia."" ",BadAim,e9mkjnj,conservative
"Lefties are the commies, not us. ",AidsinCali,e9mjsx3,conservative
I completely agree or at least do something about Florida for gods sake. How many voters controversies do you need in the same state over and over and over to realize the people running that state's election are completely incomptent. ,ALMD1996,e9mi6pn,conservative
"Disclaimer: I do slant liberal. 

Considering that everyone on both sides is heavily lawyered up, I am sure that the GOP is watching every ballot with a hawks eye. I really wouldnt worry about any fraud for that reason. If something fishy happened, they will catch it, and frankly that goes both ways. ",ALMD1996,e9mhu3c,conservative
"Yes, Scott's own administration overseeing this process has said there is no evidence of fraud at this point. That's why the judge ruled against Scott. There is currently no evidence backing up any of the claims. But yes both sides are watching ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9mj18r,conservative
"GOO has sued for transparency, not to stop votes being counted. They have been fighting back tooth and nail. I don’t know why.",Zadiuz,e9m56df,conservative
They aren't letting anyone see them lol. Anyone who isn't a Democrat that is. ,AgrosLastRide,e9m72vw,conservative
 Yes. I think we can all imagine that.,Clatsop,e9ncvwa,conservative
"If it is fraud then thats descipable. 

If its not fraud then thats incredible incompetence. 

Regardless, everyone needs to be fired. ",ALMD1996,e9mhxiq,conservative
Democrats are the party of projection. They could power a large nation with the energy they expend projecting their corruption and flaws on others.,Rightquercusalba,e9m7uri,conservative
Must be some leftover money from the election cycle. Probably have enough leftover to pay the shills for a couple of weeks.,1756_squanch,e9ntuh4,conservative
Source for this? That’s ridiculous and has no legal standing. ,ichosethisasmyname,e9mawhs,conservative
"That isn't really what happened there (in the link you later provided). It is unfortunate that court documents can easily be misconstrued, but it happens more and more nowadays. Objections are lodged so you can have the opportunity to challenge them later at appeal. If you dont object, you just take opposing party's word for it. Here, they are likely preserving their ability to challenge the determination of non-citizen status. It would be a pretty poor and foolish tactic for them to outright say ""count the noncitizens"" if there was no other ground for including them.",BadAim,e9mkfmo,conservative
"Honestly, I slant liberal and I legitimately didnt understand that at all. It made no sense to me. Like if you fight to ensure that citizens who had provisional ballets are being counted, sure, but like non-citizens? Why the fuck would their vote count? It just made no sense to me. 

Maybe they were arguing that they weren't a non-citizen and were incorrectly classified. Thats like the only thing I could think of that would make sense. ",ALMD1996,e9mi1bw,conservative
[removed],,e9mki5v,conservative
"I like to think we did it right here in Arizona. It took a week after election day, but all votes were counted, we had no stories of voter fraud, and the outcome was legitimate. Our elections office was transparent and straightforward. Even though it looked like the Rep candidate was going to win, after all votes were counted and the Dem candidate won, I do not hear any conservatives screaming conspiracy or making a fuss- people are generally civil about it. 

&#x200B;

Our GOP did attempt to sue the state to stop counting votes when it found out different counties verify voter information differently, claiming it wasn't fair, but the judge said no, proceed with the count. ",outspokenentity,e9mkb5t,conservative
The hell it does.  Never once have I heard of this on the Repub side.  Never once has this nonsense gone on in a Repub district.  It's always Broward.  Always the blue districts...,Rogdaddy,e9mu64g,conservative
[removed],,e9mk30t,conservative
"Normally, those late mail-in votes don't really matter. It's rare to have a race so close that a few thousand might sway it and by the time every ballot is received one of the candidates has usually already conceded. 

Republicans have a couple things going against them with mail-in votes. A lot of them are college students going to school in a different city. College age students overwhelmingly vote Democrat. 

Higher population density areas tend to go blue. Because you have more people in counties with major metro cities, you're going to have more mail-in ballots from there. A lot of those ballots are going to be blue. It sounds like a lot of the mail in votes still being counted are in larger counties. 

Keep in mind, the reason we didn't have President Gore was because of re-counts, specifically in Broward Co in Florida. Both parties will do whatever it takes to win. Demanding a recount if it's close and they have nothing to lose is just part of the game. Claiming the other side is trying to steal the election is also part of the game.

I say do the recount as everyone's vote should matter. If there is actionable proof of fraud arrest the people responsible and give a harsh sentence to send a message. ",2muchtequila,e9mf3eb,conservative
"From what I understand Arizona was just called way too early, when like 60% of the votes were in. Arizona is traditionally pretty slow to count and they're on the west coast, so the time difference also delays things on election night. It was mostly random chance, but most of the counties who hadn't reported when it was called were urban, which are traditionally more democratic. 

In addition, arizona is slow with mail-in ballots and traditionally mail-in ballots lean democrat as well. 

Florida is a disaster, a complete shit-show. I mean just an utter disaster, and this feels like this happens all the time in Florida. How is the Florida state government just so incredibly incompetent and unable to do their jobs. ",ALMD1996,e9mih2z,conservative
[removed],,e9md9h3,conservative
"The problem is the media calling winners/projected winners before all of the ballots are actually counted. People take it as gospel, even the parties sometimes as we've seen, and it creates a shitshow like we are currently in",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9mjbyq,conservative
"every election that Democrats don't win is ""unfair"", or ""undemocratic"". the electoral college wasn't fair when Trump won, but it was ok when it elected Obama twice. the senate is undemocratic and gives too much power to small states when the GOP holds it to appoint 2 or more SC justices, but it's perfectly fine when Obama had the senate for a few years. Hillary winning the DNC nomination was perfectly legit and amazing, but Trump winning was Russian collusion and cheating",Harnisfechten,e9mayje,conservative
"> DC is moving to reduce voter age to 16.

DC can do whatever it wants. It's still not a state. ",psstein,e9mf18x,conservative
"How about if you’re a citizen and you pay taxes, you get to vote?",jooono77,e9mek8v,conservative
"https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/nation-now/2018/04/17/washington-d-c-may-allow-16-year-olds-vote-president-2020-election/523301002/

Wow.  That's going the wrong way.

""Teacher, can I be excused to go pee-pee?""

""Teacher, can I be excused again to go decide who should lead our city/state/nation?""

I don't know a single person over 30 that looks back and thinks they were well-adjusted and mature at 18.  Nobody would let their 18-year-old self borrow their car, lol.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9mfj9s,conservative
[removed],,e9ma99x,conservative
[I believe early voting is unconstitutional anyways.]( https://www.conservativereview.com/news/early-voting-dumb-unconstitutional/) ,Mawaukey,e9m5txi,conservative
"You COUNT LEGAL votes on LEGAL ballots...  

There is a window for a dam good reason...  Voting is not a month long process. ",ozric101,e9ml9bh,conservative
[removed],,e9me7g0,conservative
I thought the reason was bc Florida law specifically disqualified those ballots for various reasons,UltraconservativeBap,e9mgi82,conservative
Hahahahaha ya keep telling yourself that ,Dranosh,e9mofib,conservative
"Its not much of an example. The news media that announced the victory isnt the one counting the votes. Who's to say they didnt call it too early to get the scoope? 

What you need is a smoking gun. Man with fake ballots in hand or statistics proving an improbable victory. ",BlueHarpBlue,e9mfmba,conservative
How is false equivalence between projected winners on news media and actual winners by counting all the votes evidence of tampering? Let me be clear that Democrat Torres Small was also predicted Lean Dem anyway.,JishZ,e9mibul,conservative
[removed],,e9mkuqr,conservative
"Ok excuse my ignorance, what found ballots?",trckdsd,e9minus,conservative
"The funny thing is, I hear that same sentiment on the other side too. Everyone is pissed these days. ",2muchtequila,e9mcgv7,conservative
You may be overreacting ,Martensight,e9mcx04,conservative
Agreed. ,molon-labe7,e9mb1b8,conservative
[removed],,e9mdw8b,conservative
[removed],,e9mjr78,conservative
That sounds like a good reason to make election day a national holiday.,lewie,e9mg1p2,conservative
> and accept the sacrifices that come with it. ,molon-labe7,e9mewgn,conservative
> and accept the sacrifices that come with it. ,molon-labe7,e9mg2dg,conservative
"Well, it looks like about 40 will be starting new jobs soon.",AnySink,e9ml0s1,conservative
[removed],,e9ml83u,conservative
"I agree with you. I also think we need to get rid of the electronic voting. With all these issues and everyone yelling at each other, I think a scantron works just fine for voting purposes. At least until we figure out how to deal with this issues in a more effective way.",Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mkx3q,conservative
"Yeah, right!  Whoops!  Just honest mistakes...",Rogdaddy,e9msxex,conservative
Yes you do.,MillennialDan,e9mb8vv,conservative
[removed],,e9meevq,conservative
"Broke by https://dailycaller.com/2018/11/10/gillum-nelson-non-citizen-vote/


This Florida story is going to travel into strange territory if it is pursued to the end. Hopefully our side has the teeth for it. 

",CoyoteBanned,e9mbf57,conservative
[deleted],,e9mbiaf,conservative
"I'd read some of the other comments that shed light on the linked source. I hate Gillum and Nelson to their core, but it doesn't look like they were arguing to count non-citizens to vote. At least, that can't be concluded from the court document. 

Rather, they were likely lodging an objection regarding whether the vote in question was credibly a non-citizen, such that they have the option to challenge that later if it turns out the person in question was indeed a citizen. In any case, It's a little silly to read into the objection as some sort of stance in favor of non-citizen voting. ",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9mth41,conservative
That claim has never been backed up,KingOfTheP4s,e9mmja6,conservative
"> No one on the left supports voter suppression, ever. That's a GOP thing.

(citation needed)",GameShowWerewolf,e9mtvsx,conservative
"I'm thankful I'm not the only one thinking this. 

Screaming ""FRAUD!"" is just as ridiculous as the ""COLLUSION!"" nonsense. ",psstein,e9meyo8,conservative
"I just can't wrap my head around how voters voted overwhelmingly for Ducey but not McSally.  Know a lot of people from AZ, everyone I talked to voted straight ticket one way or the other.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9mg17a,conservative
"LOL, apparently questioning 2 races out of hundreds that have objectively been odd and seen the election night winner possibly losing after another week, makes everyone nothing but a conspiracy theorist!

Yeah bud, no extremism in your thinking...",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9mf9hs,conservative
[removed],,e9mjwq5,conservative
"Specifically what you mean by pay taxes? If you pay a sales tax on a beer and live on welfare, do you pay taxes?",Lepew1,e9mfl1p,conservative
"The fact that they’re people regulated by the laws of the country means they should have a say in those laws. By your logic a 50 year old should agree a 30 year old shouldn’t be able to vote because, “ask any 50 year old, I wasn’t wise enough to make a sound decision at 30.” Views change as your get older and your socio-economic status changes. They can be sent to war, processed through adult courts, and their parents have no legal obligation to care for them. Doesn’t matter if it’s a good choice or not, that’s the basis of democracy. You don’t get to silence people you don’t deem fit",jooono77,e9mjjhs,conservative
"Yeah, most worry about 16yr olds behind cars, doubting their good judgement. We do not trust them with booze until they are 21. But somehow they are old enough to vote? Very inconsistent. We need an age of adulthood, beyond which you are on your own, off your parents health care plan, can vote, drive, drink, get married, be tried as an adult. That age needs to be the same for everything, not adjusted as politicians see fit to achieve better safety statistics or larger numbers of registered Democrats.",Lepew1,e9mgnlr,conservative
"Make voting harder? What a lazy sentence lol. 

Make voting more accessible for citizens, not accessible for non-citizens, and protect the ballots like gold. ",KevHes1245,e9mb5sq,conservative
"The person who wrote that is either dishonest or ignorant. Early voting is a terrible idea in modern times because information can travel so quickly now, but it's not unconstitutional. Here's the text of the constitution to which the author is referring:

>The Congress may determine the Time of chusing the Electors, and the Day on which they shall give their Votes; which Day shall be the same throughout the United States.

That's Article 2, Section 1, Clause 4. All we need to do is look at Clause 2 to see that are Electors are not the same thing as voters. The Electors are the members of the Electoral College. 

>Each State shall appoint, in such Manner as the Legislature thereof may direct, a Number of Electors, equal to the whole Number of Senators and Representatives to which the State may be entitled in the Congress

Furthermore, this section of the Constitution only applies to the election of the President.

The Electors of the president must all cast their votes on the same day, but there is no constitutional requirement that all votes for every office must be cast that day. Considering the fact that our constitution was written in the 1780s, when travel and communication moved at the speed of horse, I sincerely doubt the founders expected every person in the country to vote on the same day. The idea was for the states to collect votes and appoint Electors in the days or weeks leading up to election day, then for the Electors to all cast their votes for President simultaneously in statehouses across the country.",Publix_Deli,e9m9v4j,conservative
"Not sure who you’re arguing with but yes, legal votes on legal ballots.  The window is more debatable.  If it takes a month to count all the ballots, why would you set a time limit for less than that?  You do realize many of these votes are from service men and women who are stationed overseas right?  Their votes shouldn’t be discounted because those running the election couldn’t get to their ballots in time.",wapttn,e9mljfz,conservative
It'd be easier just to suicide than to slowly watch the left replace you. ,Julius__Ebola,e9mfcem,conservative
You're the type of kid who would get beat up in high school instead of fighting back because you hold yourself to high standards. You're a pushover who will never get what you want in life because you are weak and pathetic. You are an example of why the conservative movement is dead/dying.,FashyBearJr,e9mfrkt,conservative
Maybe that's the sign that it's time to start designing a partition plan.  If neither side wants to be around each other then maybe that's the path we should pursue.,anuser999,e9minjc,conservative
"I'm not, by 2050 whites become a minority, the country never goes red again, and everything that made this country worth living in is crushed.",groyperslefthand,e9mejmq,conservative
US is one generation away from becoming a non white majority country. Do you think life will improve when that happens? ,AidsinCali,e9mg324,conservative
"> If you believe trump is anything other than a grossly under qualified and unprofessional jerk then you are skewed. 

I would just like to point out that the comment you responded to never mentioned Trump.

Exemplary example of TDS.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9meuhq,conservative
That would solve a lot of issues. ,AidsinCali,e9mjmw8,conservative
You are saying I should get fired so that I can volunteer? ,AidsinCali,e9mgi9o,conservative
I don't agree with your statement. In what way do you think conservatives are pro Russia? They are a trade partner. Nothing more. ,AidsinCali,e9mlikn,conservative
"Yea why do we need to know the results of the election on election night. Paper ballots are far more secure and if it takes longer to count, it takes longer to count. It wont change anything.",ALMD1996,e9mlgkh,conservative
We use scantrons in my county in Florida.  I don't know what they use down south.,robotoverlordz,e9n22iz,conservative
Source? ....,M4GHOST45,e9mfj38,conservative
Nope.  Somebody's going to call someone racist or sexist and then the republicans will just roll over and get fucked like they've been doing for years now.,audiophilistine,e9mdpky,conservative
"From the quote it just has them objecting to disqualifying the ballot for them being a non citizen. They don't argue that non citizens should vote, I suspect they are challenging the decision that the person is not a citizen. ",nopornat6pm,e9mbwrh,conservative
"McSally ran a campaign heavily weighed on smear, which turned a lot of people off. Others in AZ saw blind support of Trump and the stuff about the wall and said ""nope."" Sinema is an AZ native and has been working there for a long time; it isn't like she is an offbrand rando and hopped on the ticket. 

To my understanding, Ducey just had a better campaign, and better finances to boot. He just did better all around. That, and like you said, many in AZ vote straight red regardless. It is pretty surprising that Sinema won when AZ went conservative for something like *every other position on the ballot*",BadAim,e9mkt0q,conservative
">Maybe that's because Republicans keep suppressing voters 

how are they suppressing voters?

>gerrymandering the districts

both sides gerrymander when they can. that's politics.

>Also Obama won the electoral and popular votes, while the last two Republican presidents have lost the popular vote but still took the presidency. 

so what? that's how the system was designed from the get-go, it was never meant to be purely based on popular vote. I don't see how whining about it and calling unfair makes any sense.",Harnisfechten,e9ml6vl,conservative
"Are you trying to say that people on welfare shouldn't get to vote? Because it sounds like you're saying that, and that would be stupid.",Demesthones,e9mkmxd,conservative
"Yeah pay sales tax on beer, where you’d have to be 21 to purchase the beer. ",jooono77,e9mjok4,conservative
"And by your black or white logic a 12 year old that just said he fucked your mom on Xbox Live should also get to vote...

> “ask any 50 year old, I wasn’t wise enough to make a sound decision at 30.”

While people continue to gain wisdom with age, there's a point at which you achieve an acceptable level of reasoning ability.  Frankly, not many people would actually agree with your version (reddit teenagers updoots notwithstanding).

Not convincing in the least.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9o9343,conservative
More accessible by citizens by making it harder for people to vote? ,nopornat6pm,e9mby74,conservative
">. The window is more debatable. If it takes a month to count all the ballots, 

BULLSHIT ",ozric101,e9mls0f,conservative
"The left doesn’t need to replace us, especially if the people we put up to represent us are great candidates that actually care about the people they’re representing. I don’t think that’s asking too much. ",deafwishh,e9milb7,conservative
[removed],,e9mgj3p,conservative
"I’m not sure what “conservative movement” you’re talking about to be honest. No one had any reason to try to beat me up in high school, because I try my best to treat people the way I would like to be treated. I joined the Navy at 18 years old and did 6 years, got to travel the world, great job, free education, my life has been great, man, thanks for worrying about me though. ",deafwishh,e9mihai,conservative
[removed],,e9mll3v,conservative
That’s a bit of an extreame action don’tcha think?  I just think the main problem is that extreames from both sides are way too loud and makes it seem like we are all that angry. ,Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mkc7k,conservative
"We'll have some big tragic event that pulls us back together eventually. Right now there's a lot to be gained by pushing the two sides apart, but eventually, we'll realize we have more in common with our neighbors than we have differences. Most people on both sides love their country, but they have different views about how it should be run.

Besides, splitting the nation would be next to impossible. Political lines aren't drawn along the Mason Dixie anymore, they're drawn around urban centers. If you look at maps of voting by country we're a red country with blue dots sprinkled around. While most of the land is red, most of the people are blue.",2muchtequila,e9mjxlw,conservative
While minorities overwhelmingly are dems by 2050 many would be 3rd generation Americans. I think the GOP will have to change some but don't see it being a landslide. ,Martensight,e9mfgrj,conservative
"Honest question, why does that scare you? ",Fryman1983,e9mi2pj,conservative
I don't think life will improve until the world population is lower ,Martensight,e9mikst,conservative
"I think the implication is to schedule time off to volunteer, use a little PTO.  Obviously not everyone can do this and no one would expect someone working a job where you literally can't take off to not show up so they can volunteer.  But if you can, it's something to consider doing at least.",lizaoreo,e9mhsrw,conservative
Did I say you should get fired to volunteer? ,molon-labe7,e9mgk03,conservative
Scott's own administration. They have said there is no evidence of fraud. Which is why the judge ruled against Scott. ,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9mj38h,conservative
"And that's how misinformation spreads. 

A while ago I saw a facebook post about how Trump was deporting a poor army vet because he missed his window to file paperwork to become a citizen. It turns out, the guy had something like seven years to file paperwork but didn't, and he was being deported not because of a paperwork mix up, but because he was caught with two pounds of cocaine.

Always be on guard about misinformation, question sources and look for agendas especially when you agree with it. 

Citing false sources is a really quick way to discredit everything you say. If you're wrong about that thing, how does the person you're talking to know you're not wrong about other things? 

In this case it sounds like Katia is listed as a non-citizen in at least one database, but the two other attornies are objecting to her being listed as such. I wouldn't be at all surprised if the database isn't completely current because, well, it's a government database. Maybe she got married, or passed her citizenship test, or maybe the attornies are just trying to buy time to stretch this out while they investigate. 

In any case, if the attornies were actually trying to violate the constitution by having non-citizens vote most judges would immediately question what the fuck they thought they were doing and rip into them.",2muchtequila,e9mdxgw,conservative
"Correct me if I'm wrong, but ""objecting to disqualifying the ballot for them being a non citizen"" is a convoluted way of saying they want to count the votes of non citizens, right? Isn't that the same as arguing that non citizen votes should count?  Your mental gymnastics are twisting your prose.",audiophilistine,e9mdlaa,conservative
"So help me out here. Let's say I like free to me stuff. You know stuff I do not pay for but someone else does. And lets say that there are a lot of other people like me. We vote for whoever offers the most free stuff.

We succeed and get more free stuff passed. The rest of the world is taxed or the nation goes into debt. We don't care, because we want our free stuff.

Others see us, and join our coalition. Why should they work and be taxed, when they can just vote for more free stuff?

At some point we are now the majority. Everything we want is now given to us, until the economy breaks.

What is the check and balance on people bankrupting the nation by voting for free stuff?
",Lepew1,e9mxgcz,conservative
Why is it stupid to suggest that people should not be able to vote unless they pay into the system as much as they get out of it? We all get pissed off at the prospect of politicians voting for their own pay raises; how is this any different?,GameShowWerewolf,e9muy2k,conservative
"So what happens if people are net takers? IE the government gives them more in goods and services in benefits than they pay in? What if politicians learn they can get re-elected by pandering to people who are net takers by offering more free stuff? At what point does the system break? If you have no check on paying net tax into the system to stop the cycle of voting for free stuff, how do you avoid this problem?",Lepew1,e9mxnsc,conservative
"A 12 year old isn’t considered an adult. I’m not trying to change anything, I don’t need to convince you. I’m just explaining to you how things are here in America. Maybe you should check out China’s social credit system. You might enjoy that more than our pesky freedom we have here in America! Should we raise the age to register for the selective service? Should people be on their parents health insurance till their 30? Should college tuition be free? Might as well raise the driving age and the legal drinking age too. You can’t raise the voting age and keep everything the same. Id say most of America agrees with me because 1. The 26th amendment passed 94-0 in the senate and 401-19 in the house 2.it was ratified by 38 states within a year 3. There are currently 0 states that require you to be 21 and 4. Despite both party’s having control over the government in the past 4 decades, no legitimate effort has been put forth to raise the voting age. ",jooono77,e9oj1ch,conservative
"We all voted on Election Day for generations, no one died",BeachCruisin22,e9me7nl,conservative
[removed],,e9mlj1e,conservative
His name is “FashyBearJr.” I have a feeling he’s not much of a conservative.,TheXarath,e9mgzqv,conservative
[removed],,e9mh0i2,conservative
[https://media.giphy.com/media/WuGSL4LFUMQU/giphy.gif](https://media.giphy.com/media/WuGSL4LFUMQU/giphy.gif),Swingflip,e9miquc,conservative
"Yeah, better to be extinct than be branded something by my opponent.",FashyBearJr,e9mhqhh,conservative
Less extreme than a no-clear-lines civil war.  Have you forgotten Rwanda?  Now imagine that but with the level of armament present in the US.  That's what I'm trying to avoid by recommending a split instead.,anuser999,e9ml70e,conservative
"> but eventually, we'll realize we have more in common with our neighbors than we have differences

Do we?  It seems to me that the left and right have very few things in common anymore.  We don't have shared values anymore and shared values are the core of what makes a people.

> Most people on both sides love their country, but they have different views about how it should be run.

One side welcomes and accepts people who openly advocate for ""no USA at all"" and actively work to see such a thing done.  To be blunt I find your view here incredibly naive and based on a flawed assumption (that I addressed above).

> Besides, splitting the nation would be next to impossible. [...] If you look at maps of voting by country we're a red country with blue dots sprinkled around.

Yes, exactly why a partition is the better solution.  If we end up fighting instead of partitioning the fight won't look like the Civil War - it'll look like Rwanda.  Those urban centers will be charnel houses and we'll have death on a scale not seen since the 40s.  I'd rather avoid that even if it requires doing the ""impossible"".

",anuser999,e9mljgu,conservative
"I'm not so sure how easy it'll be to court their vote, and we'd be giving up a lot in the process. My guess is that these 3rd generation ""PoC"" Americans will be raised with identity politics in their blood. They'll have been taught for generations that the best way for minorities to get ahead is to shout ""white privilege"" and claim persecution, all the while collecting benefits from taxpayers and stealing college spots from actually hard-working students by way of affirmative action. 

I really hope this isn't the case, but things aren't necessarily looking up if the white population declines significantly.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9mspra,conservative
"""GOP will have to change some"" aka give up their stance on free speech, gun ownership, and borders, increase handouts and take up the fuck whitey narrative",groyperslefthand,e9mfza6,conservative
"Why is it ONLY white people that aren't allowed to have an ethnically homogenous homeland. Anyone else, fine, whites start advocating for themselves as a collective? ""Come on, why are you so scared?"" ""You aren't racist are you?""",groyperslefthand,e9ml78i,conservative
"Have you *seen* South America, or Africa, or Mexico, or the entire Middle East?  Even the ones that aren't violence-ridden shitholes (mostly just Asian countries) are far less free and far more authoritarian and, absent Western intervention, much less technologically developed.",anuser999,e9mkvxb,conservative
Because I've been in non white majority countries. They are always worse then the majority white ones. ,AidsinCali,e9mieem,conservative
I am asking specifically about white people. Will less white people make your life better? ,AidsinCali,e9mitwi,conservative
"Bingo, thank you for explaining it. I didn't think I had to, but this guy seemed to want to jump into the deep end of the pool. ",molon-labe7,e9mj37s,conservative
I asked you a question. If you don't want to answer that is fine. ,AidsinCali,e9mgvkx,conservative
"I *think* what the above poster was getting at  is that the objection could have been more ""Being named Katia _____ [phonetic] doesn't mean she's not a citizen"". And less ""non-citizen votes should count!"" But the 8 lines of the transcript provided it the article don't really contain enough information to to suss out the answer.",j-lar,e9mfnvw,conservative
"Voting by mail makes it easier for the military and older people with mobility issues and even just people who are busy, to vote. Could start by moving it to the weekend. Tuesday is an anachronism. There are probably better ways to authorize mail ins. I mean I can get a bank account online.",linklitter,e9mkqyt,conservative
"Yeah, I want to conserve more than just whatever was a liberal point of view 20 years ago. That probably doesn't make me a conservative like you guys.",FashyBearJr,e9mi0pk,conservative
Is that English?,pathartl,e9mijlq,conservative
The reasoning behind it is sound. Definitely would love to avoid a civil war. I don’t think we are at the point of splitting yet but if we ever do get to that point then yeah chances are we should figure out a way to peacefully split it up.,Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mld91,conservative
Do you think you're racist? ,aswaran2132,e9mj0z0,conservative
"But don't you think the greatest country in the world can overcome that? More brown people doesn't equal massive overpopulation or erosion of values. Like another poster said by then it could be 3rd generations of Americans. They will have grown up here and started having their own families, not wanting to suddenly start whatever version of a country you think they want. ",Fryman1983,e9miukj,conservative
"No, but more white people wouldn't make my life better either. ",Martensight,e9mjdyi,conservative
"That's fine. If you would like to make assumptions, that's your prerogative.

No I do not expect you to be fired, obviously, but think it's interesting that you assumed that. No, what I mean by sacrifices is signing up to help, you get paid, BTW, and taking a day off if it doesn't count as jury duty. When I did, the state considered it equivalent, so I didn't have to take a personal day off. Those are the kind of ""sacrifices"" I'm talking about.

So, now that I have answered your question, how about you answer mine, did I say in any of my comments that I expected conservatives to be fired to volunteer? ",molon-labe7,e9mhp7v,conservative
We've had absentee ballots forever ,BeachCruisin22,e9mktnr,conservative
Lol. Dude you just got owned. Damn that's funny. You literally got spun around and out worded. ,2layzee,e9mizy6,conservative
What is your definition of racist? ,AidsinCali,e9mj7rq,conservative
Most crime in the US is committed by none whites proportionately. That will only get worse. ,AidsinCali,e9mj2my,conservative
"> more white people wouldn't make my life better either.

What do you base this on? Have you had bad experiences with white people? ",AidsinCali,e9mjiit,conservative
"> If you would like to make assumptions, that's your prerogative.

I didn't make an assumption. I wanted to know what you think so I asked you a question. ",AidsinCali,e9mio70,conservative
^ “This guys a rapper? His real name is Clarence!”,JackFucington,e9mlfrb,conservative
The one found in the dictionary.,aswaran2132,e9mjb92,conservative
"Most crime in the US is also committed by the lower class. What are we going to do kill poor people? Mate, you are making the right sound horrible. This is exactly what the extreame left think we are. Don’t play into their games man.",Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mk75w,conservative
They also might be secret tranny's.....,Fryman1983,e9mjf0b,conservative
"Ok, and you received an answer. I asked you because you jumped (assumption) to ""fired"" when I had never said that. So, why did you think that? Did you even think to do research on what it takes to ""volunteer"" or did you decide to go to the extreme for a reason? What in my first comment made you thing (assumption) that I meant fired? ",molon-labe7,e9miz3z,conservative
Could you quote it for me please? To make sure we have the same definition. ,AidsinCali,e9mjd4o,conservative
"> What are we going to do kill poor people?

You could start by not acting like a drama queen over a serious topic. Most crime in the US is done by non whites proportionally. Unless people like you start to talk about this honestly it will only get worse. ",AidsinCali,e9mkbho,conservative
They aren't secret. ,AidsinCali,e9mjfwz,conservative
Do you have a job? ,AidsinCali,e9mj4d3,conservative
"the belief that all members of each race possess characteristics or abilities specific to that race, especially so as to distinguish it as inferior or superior to another race or races.",aswaran2132,e9mjq6k,conservative
"I am taking this seriously. What I was saying I guess to be more straightfoward is that non whites in the US cause more of these crimes BECAUSE they are in a lower economical class not because of their race.  Rather than this being a problem about race, it’s an issue that’s affected by other factors. Basically, I disagree that race is the problem. If a greater proportion of white people where in a similar state of poverty then the crime rates of whites would rise proportionally.",Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mklz7,conservative
"Not that it's any of you business, but I do, yes.

Would you like to answer my previous questions? I will not answer any more of your comments if you don't. ",molon-labe7,e9mj8mk,conservative
So you are saying that it's racist if a jewish guy thinks he's better than other races? ,AidsinCali,e9mjxhq,conservative
Ok. I can't talk about this with you. ,AidsinCali,e9mkupc,conservative
I don't think we started off on the right foot and this conversation is going nowhere.,AidsinCali,e9mjbdr,conservative
You're looking really bad here while you desperately try for the 'gotcha' question. But keep digging that hole. ,OneLastRodeo,e9mkz0u,conservative
Why? Because we have different opinions? That’s the point of the discussion that you wanted me to take seriously... I can’t force you though so that’s all right. Be safe my dude.,Dr_Prof_Boop,e9ml0bh,conservative
"We did not. Have a nice day and God bless, please don't make assumption in the future.

I would also like to point out you still have not answered any of my questions. ",molon-labe7,e9mjeea,conservative
"Hey man, if you would actually like to talk about this, I would be happy to. We did get off on the wrong foot, but I think it's important that we stay unified as an ideology. 

I have volunteered for these elections in the past and I am well aware that taking days off (if needed) can be challenging for some people. But if we want these organizations and processes to be ""fair"" we need to step up as apart of our civic duty. I don't like doing it, it's boring as fuck, but it is a hell of a lot better than election fraud. Same with teaching, design, news, tech, etc. If we want to change what's going on, we have to encourage that change. I also think we need to expand our timeline. Thinking year by year cant and doesn't work, but if we look at it decade by decade or by century even, we might actually be able to make long lasting change. We have to start individually and start making sacrifices as individuals to help the future.

Edit: and I apologize for whatever part I played in this starting off on the wrong foot. ",molon-labe7,e9mk3uv,conservative
I look fantastic. I don't need your lies. Thanks. ,AidsinCali,e9ml8qs,conservative
"No, because you choose to not be honest about it. It's pointless this way. ",AidsinCali,e9mlahq,conservative
"Yeah, you didn't mean bad. I took it the wrong way. Sorry. ",AidsinCali,e9mk655,conservative
You are choosing to think I’m not being honest for some reason. That’s the weirdest part. There is no reason to believe that what I’m saying is a lie. Just because I disagree with you doesn’t mean I am a liar. You’ll have trouble convincing people who may be on the fence like this. ,Dr_Prof_Boop,e9mlkb5,conservative
"Same. Sorry man, you didn't either and I respect your concerns. They just come out in droves protesting and volunteering. It is much harder to do that for conservatives. Even a littler can help though, ya know? ",molon-labe7,e9mkckb,conservative
"As long as there are people like Soros who pay millions to influence our elections, and none of our politicians act on this, nothing will change. You probably saw how many people are at the Trump rallies. We out vote the left every time. They commit fraud and get away with it. It's frustrating. ",AidsinCali,e9mkj4h,conservative
"It is, my solution to it is us showing up to work the elections. Think about it, if even one conservative was in a polling room, we could at least notify if fraud was occurring.

Also, and this is positive, see how much money they spent. They spent an absolute shitload. They by the polls and by the dollar should have blown us out of both the senate and the house. They only got the house, which based on precious elections, is completely within the realm of normal outcomes.  That is huge. Even with all their protesting and fraud, they didn't take as much as they should have. ",molon-labe7,e9ml423,conservative
"Man, we could take this country back in one day. If we only tried. ",AidsinCali,e9mld7j,conservative
"Zuckerberg did get bullied by the Dems for ""not doing enough to stop Russian bots"" after the 2016 election, however. 

I didn't think I'd ever be defending him, but that was ridiculous and the Dems are still pretending Russia interfered. 

Otherwise another good Bee article. ",Javatex,e9nt5s2,conservative
"This doesn't seem like fiction. I bet if you looked into the code of existing Facebook and Twitter algorithms, you'd find something quite like this, but probably enforcing more of a ""guilt by association"" model. Some human agent flags a post as ""inappropriate"" and then that person gets shadow-banned. As you get more and more shadow-banned friends, followers or start following people with that attribute flag, you get shadow-banned.",wiredcrusader,e9ockw6,conservative
"I'm re-reading *The Road to Serfdom.*  I sometimes have to remind myself it was written in 1944, not 2018.",FelixFuckfurter,e9musvg,conservative
You can have equal opportunity or you can have equal outcome but you cannot have both.,BrighamYoung,e9mwo9s,conservative
Social justice means collective justice. Does that phrase scare the shit out of you? It should. Justice is punishment for wrongdoing. Social justice is mass punishment of a group of people who are considered guilty of collective wrongdoing and therefore deserving of punishment.,LibertyTerp,e9nnr55,conservative
Part of me feels like leaving the United States in 2018 is like Leaving Germany in 1938. Getting out just in the nick of time. ,iwasthebeaver,e9mynsn,conservative
"I'm reading it for the first time. I'm only on chapter 4, but there have already been a number of instances where I've thought to myself, ""Wow, this sounds just like today.""


It's very good. My only complaints thus far are that I think Hayek mischaracterizes conservatives (fair enough; he was writing for an English audience, and their conservatism differed from ours); he basically equates laissez faire capitalism with anarcho-capitalism, and I don't think that's fair; and, I think he gives the socialists too much of the benefit of the doubt— I don't believe many have intentions so pure as he believes. ",RPwhitefrost,e9nlky0,conservative
"Nozick 'Liberty Upsets Patterns' can not be defeated. 
   
Live Free or Die, did not mean you live on the Government's redistribution of wealth.  Sadly it looks like that is what it has turned into.     
   
RIP Liberty...         ",ozric101,e9n1b1s,conservative
"But where do you have to go?  If you were leaving Germany to escape collectivism and find liberty, you could go to the UK or US.  Where would you and I go?",FelixFuckfurter,e9myxnl,conservative
that's the hardest part. There really isn't anywhere. So we are going to end up having to stand our ground and fight.,iwasthebeaver,e9mz7qu,conservative
"There is nowhere left to go, the line has to hold here. ",ozric101,e9n0s0b,conservative
"Following /r/personalfinance rules, she's basically broke",GorathThorgath,e9n413p,conservative
That's not a lot tbh,yop666,e9nm306,conservative
"So someone did offer her a place to stay until she gets her first paycheck and she turned it down, saying she would be alright. What's the fuss?",MisterMouser,e9nbeso,conservative
"Unpopular opinion here but I think the Gov should provide housing for Congress. The reason is you would attract more common people. Right now it is mostly elitists. We want regular people running for office. But they cant afford their home in their home state and a place in DC. 

The fed gov provides housing for the military and President. Why not congress?

Edit. Sowell wants to pay them way more. I agree. I think the housing costs should come out of pay.

Thomas Sowell argument https://townhall.com/columnists/thomassowell/2014/09/10/cheap-politicians-n1888848",Nonsenseism,e9n47qg,conservative
"Having moved a couple of times in my life I understand that it takes money to move, but how does one afford rent in New York City, but not Washington D.C.? I lived right outside of D.C. once and though rent is expensive, I'd imagine living in NYC would be just as much if not more. ",Trainwhistleblues07,e9njfue,conservative
Limousine liberal on a craft beer budget.,beerandlolz,e9n2adc,conservative
"But, but, but that’s HER money. She wants to spend OUR money. I mean come on, it was essentially her entire platform.",HolsterOfNuts,e9n2ap1,conservative
She's waiting for someone to come forward and present her with a Love Gift in the form of an apartment. ,oldfrostedone,e9n3txw,conservative
But by r/leanfire rules she can live for 20 years on that.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9n5nau,conservative
Flair checks out,HolsterOfNuts,e9n4jb2,conservative
She's playing poor refugee politician. That's the fuss,slotrot,e9njnsc,conservative
"I’d be fine with this, as long as they reduced salaries.",HolsterOfNuts,e9n4krj,conservative
"Sure, if they weren't being paid ~$174k per year....",Mewster1818,e9n57ma,conservative
I work for the Park Service and still have to pay $600/month for rent in park housing. Give us free housing before members of congress,MethuselahHoneysucle,e9nbxdz,conservative
"> Unpopular opinion here but I think the Gov should provide housing for Congress.   

They get paid 6 figures, they can pay their own way.",superdude411,e9n5nca,conservative
"The president and military are actually useful, can't say the same for Congress. ",Bhangus,e9n4jg3,conservative
Plenty of private companies offer moving assistance and signing bonuses.  I see no reason the government shouldn't do the same for our representatives.,TunaMustard,e9n5t8m,conservative
Gotta have that second apartment that’s just as nice as the other representatives’.,skarface6,e9nlqhx,conservative
She’s literally the worst. I am both looking forward to and dreading listening to her the next two years (and likely more). I wish I could be so dishonest about my intentions that I could take advantage of thousands of people for my own personal gain. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9n31iz,conservative
By r/latestagecapitalism rules she's dah wun pacent,ExpensiveMention,e9nrieh,conservative
Every day I go home and rub one out to my growing 401k and IRA accounts,GorathThorgath,e9n59nh,conservative
She turned down non-monetary assistance that would have resolved the problem. The jig is up.,MisterMouser,e9nk24a,conservative
I agree,Nonsenseism,e9n9zzt,conservative
I think they get a housing stipend too,skitch3000,e9ndxfw,conservative
Pretty pretty sure the cost of housing isn't what's keeping poor people from winning Congress,ExpensiveMention,e9nrktr,conservative
Maybe a dormitory type situation. ,Dmfconrad,e9ofx3e,conservative
The quickest way to move up in the world and to get rich quick is to become a politician,ExpensiveMention,e9nrmo4,conservative
It is based on a Thomas Sowell argument. Have you read any of his writings?,Nonsenseism,e9n9o8q,conservative
I HATE taking anything from people. I can’t stand politicians. Especially liberal ones. Simply because they’re the most hypocritical.,HolsterOfNuts,e9n3fpl,conservative
"I should really start a 401K but I worry about future tax rates, especially if liberals get in power. So I’m just stacking my Roth IRA. Pay taxes now :)",HolsterOfNuts,e9n6sbf,conservative
Just like the criminals in the caravan turned down assistance from Mexico,slotrot,e9nk61l,conservative
Not really and it is insanely hard to get elected to Congress if you are not well connected and wealthy. Congress should get paid more to attract better people running. ,Nonsenseism,e9ofnaf,conservative
I’d bet that the amount of insider trading that goes on is ridiculous. ,matata_hakuna,e9ojhcg,conservative
Check my flair ;),Bhangus,e9nbliu,conservative
"I agree entirely. The past two years has made me become a libertarian. When the two parties of our government are struggling over who’s in charge because of the power it gives, it’s a sign that we need to reduce the size of government. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9n44v8,conservative
"Really you should be contributing to both. A full $18,500 to your 401k and $5,500 to your IRA (for 2018). Especially if your employer matches. If your work offers a Roth 401k you can split your contribution between the regular and Roth, if you're worried about future tax rates.",GorathThorgath,e9n6zhn,conservative
But you disagree with him about congress?,Nonsenseism,e9npq6p,conservative
"Uh oh be careful. The snowflakes are brigading the comment section. Anyways, I 1000% agree. I’m against big government. Completely. The less the government controls, the less shit will be ruined. Not only that but like you said, it’s never about being helpful. It’s about power. I myself honestly consider myself more Libertarian but unfortunately this country is essentially ruled by the two party system. So, until a Libertarian candidate picks up some real steam, I’ll continue throwing my lot in with every republican on the ballot. Lesser of two evils by about a million miles.",HolsterOfNuts,e9n4i9n,conservative
"Holding up a sign on any type of roller coaster ride is pretty dangerous to others riding behind you. If that flies out of his hand the person behind him takes the damage to the face. It’s a massive liability for the park. They warned him once before, allowed him back in and he did it again. 

And regardless of where you fall on the political spectrum, people spend a LOT of money to take their family to Disney as an escape. No one wants political stuff in their souvenir photo or on their vacation.",Son_Of_A_Plumber,e9o58zx,conservative
"I don't think this guy is worth defending. Private property, they make whatever rules they want to make.",InnerSquare,e9ojq02,conservative
people do all sorts of stupid shit on that ride all the damn time i wonder if they were treated the same?,Delta_25,e9nw5gx,conservative
"I know their justification is safety, but what bugs me is that this seems like one of those sorts of stories that is only being punished one way. I definitely feel like a guy with an “Obama: Hope and Change” poster circa 2008-09 isn’t getting banned from Disney for the same thing. ",YankeeBlues21,e9nu98u,conservative
Ask yourself if the guy was holding up an obama sign if it would have made news anywhere.  Would Disney reprimand him let alone bar him from the park.  We live in a world where those who hate American culture have become the heroes.  ,optionhome,e9o7yr3,conservative
"I think they would. Disney does not fuck around, they fired James Gunn ASAP. ",Negrodamuswuzhere,e9ohxsc,conservative
"Yep, he's going the full term. ",soxfan90,e9ofzw3,conservative
"He may go full term (ends 2021), but unlikely he'll run. He resigned for a reason.",ReaganTroll,e9ohp1j,conservative
"Have you seen the pictures of the field? It is literally in terrible shape.

Not every player is kneeling. Stop generalizing the players. We’re better than that. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9ovqa0,conservative
"Not to get into a history debate, but after like 1941, there was no way Germany was going to win that war. The Allies landing at D-Day just helped to end things quicker. ",StanleyKubricksPenis,e9n9wgu,conservative
Let me show you my WWII era French rifle.  It's in great shape.  Never fired and only dropped once.,tehForce,e9mn5lw,conservative
When did Donald Trump become Groundskeeper Willie?,giobbistar21,e9nbv7p,conservative
[removed],,e9mtkkg,conservative
"Im ok with them defending themselves. Let them try, they'll find out in short order that they'll have to give up a lot of socialist programs, or seriously rev up industry to pay for it. In fact, let's just pull everything out tomorrow and see how well they swim.",Oneshoeleroy,e9mx46k,conservative
Let me take you on a tour of all the French cemeteries of soldiers killed liberating the United States. ,antiantifafa,e9mchtt,conservative
Boom. Roasted.,CouLesKy,e9mca1y,conservative
I love trump for indulging in French surrender jokers,Lord_Grill,e9nvz9a,conservative
"If it wasn't for D day the Russians would have beat Germany, but then the French may have to learn some Russian. Who know's, wish there was a looking glass that showed different outcomes of major events in history. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9nf3fb,conservative
"I'm not so sure. They started bringing out their jets towards the end of the war. Had we gave them more time, they would have had superior air power.",cajungator3,e9nws9u,conservative
"Meaning they would have just learned Russian instead... Same shit, different autocratic regime.",Luke15g,e9ocxta,conservative
You haven’t seen their tanks with 9 speed reverse.,igor_otsky,e9n2edv,conservative
"Nah, I don't buy that. The Vichys shot at us with those things. ",spartanburger91,e9nigjm,conservative
"Truth hurts. And frankly, I don't think it's unwarranted considering Macron's ridiculous comment that Europe needs an army to 'protect' itself from the US when we were the ones who've repeatedly bailed them from their own messes. Putting America on the same threat level as Russia or China is insulting when you consider how the US military is the only military force in the West large enough to challenge them. ",bittnerator,e9mx51o,conservative
"Trump didn't shit all over Macron. Macron used his pulpit to make a dumb and insulting jibe against the American President.

He hits back.

",SickofInternetProgs,e9mzd9j,conservative
"I agree, let's send the military that is currently in Europe to our boarder and have them defend it. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9nezy0,conservative
"Erm . . .

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/France_in_the_American_Revolutionary_War",FelixFuckfurter,e9md7sz,conservative
"A French gift of money paid for Washington's continental troops and supplies, then a fleet of 24 warships prevented an English fleet from resupplying Cornwallis troops at Yorktown, finally a French army fought with Washington's troops to force his surrender. There, the french lost 60 killed and 194 wounded and the Americans lost 28 killed and 107 wounded.

We do owe France something for the money and supplies, 24 warships, and 5,000 troops that gave us our independence.  That's why we put up with all their shit. 

",ThruHiker,e9nq7n1,conservative
"From this side of the Atlantic, the British history of the period reckons  the only reason the French and Spanish aided the colonial rebels was to stick it to the Brits.",Manach_Irish,e9mef1y,conservative
K... how many?,SuperCharged2000,e9muzco,conservative
Oof... damn ,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9mcoyp,conservative
So we repaid the favor...done with France now.,J0kerr,e9mk224,conservative
And one gear forward in case the get attacked from the rear.,jedichric,e9n7ek5,conservative
"Uhh....

https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quasi-War",War-Damn-America,e9ms3m9,conservative
"*b-b-b-but 240 years ago!!!*

There are plenty of people alive *today* who lost immediate family members defending France.  NOT the same.

It makes no sense to appeal a squabble between long-gone monarchies that happened more than two centuries ago, you might as well talk about the rift between Krog and Mumar 2 million years ago.",BrighamYoung,e9miijb,conservative
So you have a list of cemeteries to pay my respects?,antiantifafa,e9meref,conservative
Zero. ,antiantifafa,e9mv99w,conservative
Not to mention France being a great ally during the American Revolution is something that is mentioned in our schools all the time. ,latotokyo123,e9mnzdt,conservative
[Start here.](https://www.tripadvisor.com/ShowUserReviews-g187147-d484917-r3995071-Pictus_Cemetery_Cimetiere_de_Picpus-Paris_Ile_de_France.html),FelixFuckfurter,e9mewww,conservative
It's more than zero. The French were our largest ally in the US Revolutionary War. I don't think there's entire cemeteries though.,Oneshoeleroy,e9mwwzo,conservative
The French Empire was an ally of us. The 1st French Republic and us were not allies and even fought the Quasi War a decade after the Revolution give or take.,War-Damn-America,e9mrtw2,conservative
I am thankful for brave Frenchmen that came over and helped us. My beef is with the current government of France. We sent millions of Americans to fight and liberate France. No one has ever sent people to liberate our nation from anyone. The French helped us as a way to help themselves during our revolution.  The idea that France would ever need to defend itself from us is infuriating. We have Done a lot. More than once. To protect our ally.  And due to globalism that is all being forgotten. ,antiantifafa,e9mibyc,conservative
So it’s zero. I was being a dick when I wrote my initial comment. There are no entirely French cemeteries for their soldiers in the us that were killed liberating us. Since we’ve never been occupied and liberated by anyone. They helped us with our separatist revolution. ,antiantifafa,e9mx67n,conservative
"I think it's safe to say that the current French people are thankful for the brave Americans that came over and helped them, but their beef is with the current government of America.",BackInTowny,e9mxhxu,conservative
"I think Lafayette is buried in DC. There's probably a few others. Frenchmen did fight, but youre right there aren't entire cemeteries devoted to them(I initially thought you wanted just one Frenchman). The current french are not these Frenchmen though.",Oneshoeleroy,e9mxmdb,conservative
Don’t be globalists. Don’t sell out your own citizens to hoards of immigrants.  Don’t be butthurt that you’re irrelevant in the world.  And maybe we wouldn’t have to put them in their place if they just shut up and sat down. ,antiantifafa,e9mxxa3,conservative
"They will try, but if we can lock down the SCOTUS, then that will stop a lot of anti-gun legislation, and maybe even reverse some of the anti-gun laws already on the books in several states.",GuitarWizard90,e9o1e6c,conservative
"Don't start worrying unless they actually pass something in the House.  Democrats had the house and Senate (Senate by 60 votes) back in 2009 and did not pass any gun control despite having both ample party support and a few high profile shootings to work with.  

Dems know gun control is a party killer.  They want it.  They want it badly.  But enough of them know it is political suicide that it won't go anywhere.   At least they knew that as little as 9 years ago.",Hillary_For_Prison,e9oa7w8,conservative
"Dems are definitely trying. They ignore the ""inalienable"" part of our Constitution for the sake of false virtue signaling. You cant fully control a people who are armed, and they know this.",cons_NC,e9oo8e7,conservative
No.,chabanais,e9oexye,conservative
"I bet this more urban Dem majority will be much more anti-gun than the last more rural one that held seats in more gun-friendly areas like both Dakotas, several rural southern districts, Idaho, and northern Minnesota, Wisconsin, and Michigan as well as Senate seats in Nebraska, West Virginia, both Dakotas, and Alaska. Now they don't hold those seats because they either retired or got BTFO during the Obama years. The current Democratic caucus has no incentive to care about people in those areas. ",soxfan90,e9ogjzd,conservative
Literally the definition of elitism.,Natanyul,e9otmer,conservative
"I saw this on Fox News with Tucker Carlson. Too bad it won’t be seen anywhere else! Wonder why? /s

Edit: Serious question, why is this even happening?",wennie59,e9oqvan,conservative
It's around 28:30 for anyone interested.,misespises,e9nvljv,conservative
"Interesting footage. Seems to document the complicity of the Mexican police in delivering these people to our border, and also seems to prove the value of a border fence",searanger62,e9nnm52,conservative
Wonderful. I was wondering when they were going to show up.,PurpleAngel23,e9nlx26,conservative
I saw a story somewhere that 1/4 of the people in South America want to leave their country. ,ozric101,e9nolc5,conservative
"reports are they didnt cross into the usa , this is just to get the border patrol to send people to watch them in case they ump meanwhile in a different sector they ump the fence were there is little border patrol presence because they are watching the fence sitters. its a standard ttp they use.",Delta_25,e9o2i63,conservative
"Don't worry, there are millions more awaiting their turn.",SinisterPaige,e9nn8h5,conservative
"Send a platoon down with paintball guns and machineguns.   Load the paintball guns with pepper balls and use them to discourage.   If that doesn't get the point across use the machineguns to stop.

We need to take a hard line on these invaders. ",Hillary_For_Prison,e9oaigw,conservative
"Oh, I wonder where they want to go. 

This is why we can't have open borders. I bet there are at least a billion people who would come here if they could. ",soxfan90,e9ogsfn,conservative
"As a European, to state that the US is something that Europe should have an army to guard against is next level foolishness on Macron's part.",Manach_Irish,e9m9p10,conservative
"Misleading title. Trump opposes Macron saying Europe needs defense from the USA. He does not oppose the European army. He opposes this false notion that Europe needs defense against the USA, and he is supported by the history of this nation defending France. 
",Lepew1,e9megcw,conservative
"He wants to create an EU army to defend against China, russia, and US? Ya know what, do it. Fucking do it. Create and fund your own army so we don't have to do it anymore. And then all the happy little globalists can exist in their little globalist continent and all the European countries can become one. Maybe then they will stop leaching off of us. 

Also, he really thinks we are such a threat that he needs to make a massive military in order to defend against us? That's a massive statement. They don't trust us, they don't like us, and now they are openly stating that they consider the United States of America to be an enemy. ",LumpyWumpus,e9mefxh,conservative
"Could you imagine the shit show if trump said something like this about our allies?

Considering the sacrifices we've made as a country on behalf of Europe (lives and dollars) this is repugnant from little mac",BeachCruisin22,e9mkjmu,conservative
I thought Trump wanted NATO countries to spend more on their own defense.  Isn't this good?,TheThurmanMerman,e9mg0ky,conservative
The EU should have it's own army that is paid for by them. They want to be a political and economic union they should have an Army ready to defend it. ,Nonsenseism,e9mr5t1,conservative
"[A good commentary on the idea of a EU army](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=it1xTbblhvw).

All in all, the EU should increase it's NATO spending requirements, individually. But as Styx says, a EU army will be used to suppress dissent via using non-native troops.",Menhadien,e9mzjaq,conservative
"Disgusting two-faced person.  He was just in Washington shaking hands with the President, and now he sees us as a potential enemy?  What kind of wacko shit is this?",Reven1911,e9mcknn,conservative
My liberal buddies called me nuts when I told them in 2014 that an EU Army was on the way and it would threaten the sovereignty of all member nations. ,DAmbro8,e9m9do2,conservative
"An EU military wouldn't be used to defend against China, Russia, or the USA, it would be used to force EU nations into compliance with the demands that come from on high. If the Hungarians or the Poles decide that they don't want to flood their countries with Muslims and Africans then the EU would send in French/German troops to force them into taking in ""refugees."" It's no wonder that Macron and the other EU elites are constantly attacking nationalism, European nationalists are the only ones standing up and refusing to watch their homelands and their people fade quietly into the night. ",Trevor_awesome,e9n0glw,conservative
"The last time there was anything ""true European"" was the forties. And we all know how that went.",InsanerobotWargaming,e9m7kze,conservative
"My ass.  Macron is full of shit.  He doesn't want to defend against the US, Russia, or China, he wants to defend against Poland and Hungary.  That is, he wants to hold the empire together by force.  The political and financial tethers that hold subject nations in line can be torn off.  Macron wants to station troops to keep them in line.  Where do you think Macron would want to build bases?  ""Poland because Russia is the threat.""  Then once Poland leaves the EU Macron would refuse to relinquish the bases in hopes of them becoming a Fort Sumter.  
  
If Macron was genuinely concerned with the safety of his people, he would just focus on the French army or kick out the invaders already occupying his capital.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9m7v3u,conservative
I think Europe should have its own army.,killuin123,e9mv0ye,conservative
They don't have enough to pay their total share of NATO but do to create a whole other army? ,chrispr83,e9n4hyp,conservative
Trump is right.  Europe has nothing to fear from the US and should live up to its NATO commitments.  Otherwise be done with it and they can be on their own.,GMU1993,e9m3iod,conservative
"People will cry that Trump is alienating our allies, but the older I get the more I actually despise Europe and every other place on that side of the globe. They hate America, hate our culture, cry about our military. Well fine, defend yourselves, deal with your own shit. Don't cry when we don't condemn the shithole dictators who gas their citizens, it's not our problem.

The US should be focused on dominance in the Western Hemisphere, and let the fools in the East deal with their own shit. Tired of them, really.",NoOneAndNotSomeone,e9mhfa6,conservative
The old alliances are falling apart. Europe will no longer be western in another generation ,cornshelltortilla,e9nk1sf,conservative
"Weres the dem media attacking macrons ""dangerous and unhinged"" rhetoric

Or his ""warmongering"" like they did if trump said it?",ExpensiveMention,e9mbbmo,conservative
"Honestly, pretty unbelievable he said it.

I wonder what his angle is using that level of divisive language.

 Europe seems on their way to disaster. You have Germany taking over again, just more subtly this time. Aggressive immigration that's hurting their economy and dissolving their culture.

I feel like shit is still going to get drastically worse for them. ",MenBearsPigs,e9mykx9,conservative
"Ok, this makes way more sense.",johndeer89,e9nea5v,conservative
How would they even fund it? Could they really just increase taxes even more and their people be okay with it?,S_D_W_2,e9mfu6b,conservative
"Currently they can’t even support an incursion into North Africa. They’d be better at defending on their home turf, but they really couldn’t stop us if we were interested. Which we’re definitely not, seeing as we’re usually fairly isolationist. ",skarface6,e9mg3un,conservative
That Macron can make that statement while so many Americans were shipped off to Europe in more than one of their wars and died to defend them pisses me off.,lexi2706,e9nkb7l,conservative
"> They don't trust us, they don't like us, and now they are openly stating that they consider the United States of America to be an enemy.

That's a whole lot of assumptions.",DEFCON_TWO,e9n2cxq,conservative
It’s the idea they need protection from us which perturbed him. We are allies and you shouldn’t say you need defense from an ally. Euro Army would be more on their defense which is good though,RepubliKin,e9mh9xn,conservative
"He thinks it's all a game, doesn't he?",InsanerobotWargaming,e9n40uo,conservative
Wed be able to stop funding them tho,ExpensiveMention,e9mbcp3,conservative
That army will have a lot of muslims too that are hostile to european's way of life.,Reven1911,e9mc30x,conservative
"If there is European identity, there are European nationals and there is a demand for a European army.  Eurocrats have been eroding member-state national identities by every means they can find.  This is a big part of why they generated a ""refugee crisis"".  By jamming in new people, they can force the member nations to redefine themselves to include the newcomers.  This new, cosmopolitan definition has none of the weight of the old nation-state definition.  
  
They are trying to recreate the US right down to the African minority, the masses of brown people coming across the southern border, and the massive administrative state.  They have crammed 2 centuries of American mistakes into 30 years.   ",PlasmaBurnz,e9mcyfp,conservative
"Europe doesn't appreciate individual liberty. It's just a bunch of collectivists fighting over dominance. Collectivism always leads to war and conflict. It's no coincidence that socialism and national socialism swept Europe in the early 20th century, leading to the two worst wars in human history. ",LibertyTerp,e9mnvbc,conservative
All the more reason for a US pivot toward Poland. ,smokejaguar,e9mewjj,conservative
"Yep. I'd rather focus on countries that actually *like* the US, and Western Europe isn't part of that anymore. ",TheWhiteFalcon,e9mig1w,conservative
Doesn't fit **The Narrative**(tm).,LibertyTerp,e9mnr22,conservative
"> How would they even fund it?

They would probably borrow from the US, lol

edit; Autocorrect; Don't Reddit and phone kids",Jizzlobber42,e9n06mk,conservative
"They are stating that they want to build an army to protect themselves from us. I don't think I'm making any assumptions at all. Why would you build up an army to protect yourself from an ally? Hint, you wouldnt. ",LumpyWumpus,e9n68oi,conservative
[removed],,e9mmppi,conservative
Let them do it. We need to get this ball rolling already. Tired of waiting.,Justice4Jamal,e9mdzu1,conservative
"Both Christianity and Islam are middle eastern. For that matter all abrahamic religions are middle eastern. Unless you all convert to native European religions, you whining about Islam while celebrating a very similar chiristianity is hilarious to me as a native Hindu Indian ",vandheri_kurangu,e9mi4uf,conservative
"I'm not sure how feasible it is, but I could certainly get behind Trump sending some money to Poland to upgrade the port facilities at Gdansk as well as rail to connect it.  Reduced shipping costs means more trade.  Foreign aid that will have economic returns would be pretty nice.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9mkx2u,conservative
">> How would they even fund it?
>
>They would probably barrow from the US, lol

Would they *wheel* it over when they barrow it?",rf-engineer,e9n2xme,conservative
"Macron is saying that they can't depend on us completely, which isn't surprising considering Trump's rhetoric.",DEFCON_TWO,e9n738e,conservative
"I think you should stick to /r/politics, folk.",masternarf,e9mpruf,conservative
Islam is the most violent and hateful modern ideology and it's not even close.,MenBearsPigs,e9myny8,conservative
There's no moral congruence between christians in western nations and middle eastern muslims.  Islam is about 500 years behind us in cultural evolution.  They're simply culturally incompatible with our way of life.  We do not believe homosexuals or non-believers should be executed.  We do not treat our women like they are animals and force them to marry their own cousins.  We don't stop what we're doing 5 times a day to pray and interrupt our daily lives.,Reven1911,e9mk3s5,conservative
"Christianity and Islam are not ""very similar"" at all. Tell that to Asia Bibi and the people of Pakistan and see what they'll say/do to you.  ",WannabeBadGalRiri,e9n4d39,conservative
> glares at phone; auto-correct is auto-wrong,Jizzlobber42,e9ncev4,conservative
"No, he isn't saying he wants an army because he can't depend on us. He is saying he wants an army to protect himself from us. There is a huge difference ",LumpyWumpus,e9n8635,conservative
"Naw, actual conservative is an actual conservative. Just because I switch parties doesn't make me less conservative than you.",minuscatenary,e9mtfw7,conservative
"> We don't stop what we're doing 5 times a day to pray and interrupt our daily lives.

Nothing wrong with this. Forcing it on every adherent of Islam, having a loudspeaker blare it through the city streets, and deliberately inconveniencing others however *is*.",hopagopa,e9mku2q,conservative
[removed],,e9mki71,conservative
"You're right, nevermind. However, I really think Trump could have prevented this if he worded himself better. Unfortunately that's not his style.",DEFCON_TWO,e9n8jby,conservative
"color me skeptical, and it seems the mods are skeptical too.",masternarf,e9mthuv,conservative
It's excessive and inefficient.  Praying once a day is more than sufficient for christians and it does not interrupt our daily lives.  This is just one example of how islam is far more extreme than Christianity.,Reven1911,e9ml0do,conservative
Neutral observer my ass,KingOfTheP4s,e9mn07h,conservative
"It doesn't matter, culturally they are 500 years behind the modern era in western nations, ergo they are culturally incompatible.  Ireland is literally the only western nation that has a ban on abortion.  That is hardly comparable to muslims that desire the execution of homosexuals and non-believers.  Your examples are exaggerated and insufficient.",Reven1911,e9mkp8s,conservative
"When you spend 15 years voting a straight ticket R, then we can be on equal footing.",minuscatenary,e9mu3jh,conservative
"If it was commanded in the Bible to stop all your business dealings and go pray, multiple times per day, would you do it?  Or would you only pray once because multiple times is inefficient and interrupts your daily life? Also, if you truly believe it is the word of God, wouldnt you prioritize that over everything? Disobeying a command of God because it inconveniences your daily life, the daily life that is only possible because of God, is crazy to me. Regardless of religion, if you believe God to be the source of Truth, then you would prioritize his commands over everything else.

Of all the things to pick on Islam for this has to be the weirdest one.",1248163264128,e9mtdj5,conservative
"You are missing the obvious point. Only reason West is doing okay for the last few decades is due to their population getting education and moving away from christian regressiveness. 
And just like many educated christians, educated Muslims are also equally civilized. 
Only those who take Christianity or Islam seriously are dangerous (my emphasis on both being regressive equally, though Christianity has taken more victims, native European culture being a prime example) ",vandheri_kurangu,e9mlad5,conservative
"I'm not religious so no.  But even if I was I wouldn't.  That's absolutely ridiculous.  Christians have learned to ignore a lot of what in the bible.  Islam must do the same, but they won't, not in our lifetimes anyway.  If I owned a business and my employees wanted to break 3-5 times a day to pray I'd be fairly annoyed.",Reven1911,e9mub0l,conservative
"Muslims in Europe are not moving away from regressiveness, which is the obvious point you are missing.  The next generation born in Europe is often more regressive, not less, despite all the advantages of being born in a civilized country.  That's why many of the most extreme youths left Europe to go fight for ISIS.  Polling shows this population is just as extremist in their beliefs as their middle eastern brethren.",Reven1911,e9mlq99,conservative
This. Christianity was forced to go through a renaissance that Islam hasn’t gone through. ,Meltzor,e9my3t9,conservative
"Don't you see you are making very easy generalization?

By taking illogical stance of christianity, you are letting West be just another battle ground for two regressive middle eastern religions.",vandheri_kurangu,e9mnbzs,conservative
"As a religious person that just seems like prioritizing your self and desires over God, out of nothing aside from laziness/convenience. Same logic could be applied to the Sabbath, that you will work on Saturdays just because it is inconvenient.",1248163264128,e9n7h93,conservative
"Very little about how most Christians practice their religion is regressive.  I am not making very easy generalizations.  Half the Pakistani population in the United Kingdom is literally married to their own cousin in incest.  This is a backward and regressive culture that is resistant to change, mates within their own families, and is openly hostile to Western ideals and freedoms, like freedom of speech.  No Christian would murder someone because they insulted Christ, but many Muslims would murder anyone who insulted Muhammad.  And more sympathize with their actions.",Reven1911,e9mnnpl,conservative
"You are confusing agnostics and secularized people with christians. 
I've read horrors about how women were burnt in the name of witchcraft by the church. Blasphemy is a common theme of all abrahamic religions. I guess you are ignoring your own flaws due to your Christian background
Considering the history of Christianity I'm pretty confident Islam will civilize sooner.",vandheri_kurangu,e9mo4xt,conservative
"You're speaking of the distant past, that has no relevance today.  It was Christians who created the first bill of rights and constitution separating church and state.  I am not a religious person by the way, so I am not ignoring my own flaws.  There is no evidence Islam is civilizing itself anytime soon.  As the person making the positive claim the burden of proof is upon you to prove Islam is in the process of civilizing.  Western civilization has already created everything to expedite their modernization, so it should be easy for them to civilize, but I see no evidence this is happening.  The reverse is actually happening, Iran is a perfect example of such a regressive process.  2nd generation Muslims born in Europe are another example.",Reven1911,e9mrm2z,conservative
"It was not Christians who did that first. Iranian Cyrus or Indian Asoka who were before even Jesus was the first.

You seem to conviently ignore the deaths caused by abortions laws. How would that make you civilized ?

Again I don't wanna generalize you folks but your willful ignorance is unsettling. Iranians are very progressive they have more woman in sciences than my country and even US, only their quasi dictatorial govt is full on islamists. We should blame the foreign power that brought them to power. 

Think about it, because of violent christians in Europe who harassed and did genocide Jews just 60 years ago, the Jews had to flee Europe and force themselves into middle east. 

If not for violence of christians there wouldn't have been Israel paelstine issue. I'm shocked by ignorance of your own ills. I would never bury or ignore my india's caste problems.",vandheri_kurangu,e9mwffy,conservative
"If there’s one this liberals and conservatives can agree on, it’s that Linda Sarsour is an anti semetic psychopath ",Giantcheesewheel,e9ldm1v,conservative
I’m actually very impressed with Debra Messing and Alyssa Milano that they had the maturity to publicly announce that they’ve distances themselves from the march. ,survivorfanbilf,e9l5agw,conservative
"Not that I think this forgives all the left's sins, but I have to say it's nice to see some on the other side acknowledge an error and act in good faith to right a wrong.",LFOD42,e9kxh0r,conservative
"It's alright, I'm sure these ""human rights award"" people can just be dismissed by getting called alt-right ",Astraeus9195,e9kvd2s,conservative
The left's projection of anti-semitism is ridiculous.  The same people calling us Nazi's will defend Muslim extremists who literally would like to kill all Jew's.,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9kqfmp,conservative
Linda Sarsour is repulsive how a woman like her got so much influence after saying the things she did about Ayaan hirsi ali is beyond me.,ImperialRoyalist15,e9lxv9b,conservative
"All you need to know is one of its leaders is pro sharia law, any woman who supports sharia law is a complete idiot. 

Anyone really but a woman that supports it is especially stupid. ",chugonthis,e9lqo5e,conservative
Good. It was hijacked by Sarsour,OhioBritty,e9lxjer,conservative
Muslim talks shit about Jews. News at 11,annabellebooth,e9m2h1x,conservative
Good,starlight777,e9m6mei,conservative
And it only took a mass shooting for the left to finally call them out on it,eeeinator,e9l3wbm,conservative
Excellent. Couldn't have happened to a better bunch of nutjobs! Sarsour is absolutely insane,Starky_McStarkface,e9m9qpt,conservative
"This is the thing that redpilled me so hard. The radical left really has some strange bedfellows in their search for power. They preach socialism, equality for LGBQT and women, environmentalism and then they get into bed with Islamists, who literally have the most radical views opposing these views. Only one conclusion, they are full of shit and will say and do anything for power.",junglejimmy,e9l7nl5,conservative
Do you think any of those pussy hatters knew they were marching for antisemitism?,mlmack,e9l0fa2,conservative
Said it once and I'll say it again. Thank you guys! As a relegious Jew who is also pretty conservative ( when it comes to most things) it is obvious as a daylight which party is pro-israel/Jews and which one is not,elyasafmunk,e9le4zk,conservative
It about frigging time! She's been a an asshole for a long time.,YoMommaSez,e9lq0tt,conservative
Cue the regular apologists saying being anti-Israel isn't anti-semitism. Ignoring that the left overwhelmingly does both. It's disgusting how much the left vilifies the only bastion of human rights in the middle East and their primary religion.,OKResident93,e9lc67w,conservative
"Well, they have a muslim woman as a leader which by the way is just extremely ironic, she'd rather take away rights from women than help any woman fight for her rights. I mean, wasn't one her relatives tied to a terrorist organization? Karma's a bitch.",PapaGeorgio23,e9lxqpw,conservative
"Don't worry Obama, they aren't coming after your peace prize.",slotrot,e9l373k,conservative
a little late. Women's March should've never gotten off the ground,JohnChrissy,e9l6alp,conservative
"As a leftist and an ex-Muslim, fuck Linda Sarsour",flumsi,e9m0kdd,conservative
">The members noted the anti-Semitic actions by the organization such as the Boycott, Divestment, and Sanctions movement against Israel

Really, advocating for a boycott of Israel is antisemitic? Interesting precedent to set in conservative groups - giving legitimacy to so many accusations from the left about conservatives being racist for their criticisms of other states. 

Or we can just say that criticisms against a state has nothing to do with the people living in it.",civilmarsupial,e9lyhck,conservative
Finally. They get to be the ones called bigots ,duckfallasbdn,e9l99rz,conservative
are there any other sites reporting this? ,TexasDutch,e9l92xh,conservative
as long as that cockroach represents them then they should be stripped of all their accolades,smartguy360,e9l7zac,conservative
Is “women’s march” her name?,poopmaroop,e9lvpw8,conservative
So we can call any proud march supporters nazis now? I imagine the winner is whoever says nazi the most,BuzFeedIsTD,e9l9skg,conservative
Can someone point me to an instance of antisemitism that happened? Seems like everything getting called antisemetic nowadays ends up being a reach. ,negroic,e9l3hpm,conservative
"By allah if you call this journalism, i will shoot my self ",realXstrawarot,e9m0r43,conservative
I'm out of the loop when it comes to Linda Sarsour. What exactly has she done that has people calling her anti-semite?,ColbyTheLateOne,e9m470j,conservative
[removed],,e9leeqq,conservative
She’s a man baby!,Shedeviled,e9li1bf,conservative
Totally Islamophobic! They offered not one but two Jewish Womens Lunches; one roasted lemon pepper the other BBQ. ,StephenScherer1,e9l755u,conservative
"""anti semitism""

Man have you guys got a lot to learn.",Wardamntoucan,e9lgb6v,conservative
[removed],,e9lmtb0,conservative
"They should agree on it, but people still defend Sarsour. Sadly, the Democrats elected Ilhan Omar, a woman who said in 2012 ""Israel has hypnotized the world, may Allah awaken the people and help them see the evil doings of Israel,"" and instead of apologizing just said anyone who criticized her was a bigot. She also replaced Kieth Ellison, someone who the Democrats conveniently ignore the women who accuse him.

Oh yeah, she also claimed she was married to her brother so they could both get cheaper college tuition. She was married to her husband at the time. (Edit: She defrauded the government and admitted it publicly to walk back on the fact that she had been legally married to her brother in the US. Nothing was done about this.)",Deerscicle,e9lid99,conservative
Liberals don't agree on that. Or at least they didn't before she helped them win the house in the midterms.,Hereforpowerwashing,e9mbol5,conservative
"Its good that this happened, yet the left will still, and has been giving her a platform.  They've known this all along, they've called us racist for being critical of her.  Only NOW after the shooting are there small hints of them turning on her after they called the right anti-semitic.  Projection on the left is practically their party platform by now.",PerceivedShift,e9m5qwf,conservative
"\>anti semetic psychopath

&#x200B;

Don't give her the benefit of a mental disorder. This is not a mental disorder. This is Islam.",JazzTheGoose123,e9lyv8m,conservative
"Its litterally on her last name. ""Sarsour"" means cockroach in arabic.",SkeletonGamer1,e9m4hlz,conservative
"There’s a lot more we should agree on. Many more racist’s should be denounced and corrupt criminals such as the Clintons, Soro’s, Rothschilds, etc. but this is a good start.",Idiocrazy,e9mktry,conservative
Be more impressed if that hadn’t thrown out the woman who tried to tell her this a few months ago at a Q&A session ,JobieWanKenobi,e9m3bbv,conservative
It's interesting that the Women's March has become so toxic that even Alyssa Milano refuses to associate with it.  ,FelixFuckfurter,e9l0ddx,conservative
It only took them a long time. ,Crusader_1096_2,e9lg2l1,conservative
[removed],,e9lfyvw,conservative
Fuck both sides,Oblongmind420,e9l9tq3,conservative
Or Nazis. ,plastiqmanb,e9l8t69,conservative
Which is why it is so important for people on the left and right not yo immediately associate everyone on the other side as being in league with their worst actors.,Mister-Bear,e9l92c1,conservative
"And install Shariah Law, forcing all women to wear ridiculous coverings. Freedom!",Rabidraccoon76,e9kqtse,conservative
"I never have, and never will understand this. I'm told that I'm the problem with America because I'm a straight white male, something something patriarchy, but I can literally go on the internet and sadly, find plenty of videos of people in the middle east throwing dudes off buildings simply because they're 'allegedly' gay, or women being stoned for god fucking knows what, and that’s *never* condemned by the left. 

Blows my mind.",CarbineGuy,e9l4r6e,conservative
"What timeline are we in?

A fascist group calls itself antifascist. 

A woman march that hates Jewish women. 

A reporter assaults a female. Not assault. 

1/1024 South American Indian is an American Indian. 

Trump visits WW1 site on Nov 10 and Nov 11 -- he hates Veterans. 

The left make no sense.",VirginWizard69,e9l4mf0,conservative
https://youtu.be/Ikct54XayBQ,CreativeRoutine,e9kzc1d,conservative
Jews really can’t win. People on both sides find reasons to hate us.,Avatar_Yung-Thug,e9m90cs,conservative
[removed],,e9lm8go,conservative
"Almost every position they hold is hypocritical. I mean, the cons have some hypo s on thier side, but they got nothing on the Dems. ",joshuab01,e9l65x2,conservative
“Nazi” can be used as an insult to refer to both fascism and anti-semitism. ,Lucas_Steinwalker,e9l9ofx,conservative
[removed],,e9lhkp5,conservative
"I’m not seeing any liberal women here defending this behavior. Although this article uses extremely biased rhetoric, I completely agree that the award should be revoked if there is anti-Semitism amongst its leaders.    ",notagangsta,e9m6qhi,conservative
"Feminist here, I had no idea about this. It's so weird, I don't understand why anyone would be against Jews. Like I don't even understand their motivation for being anti Semite. It's something I doubt I'll ever support. ",KylieZDM,e9m164f,conservative
[removed],,e9ldjj8,conservative
"Unfortunately, I dont believe that when really pressed on any given political topic; these individuals dont really have much of a clue as to what they believe. Much less what they know they dont know.",for_the_meme_watch,e9l12r8,conservative
"a family friend of mine who's a well known jewish community leader certainly didn't.... then again she's convinced Orange Man Bad, Proud Boys are far right and most conservatives are nazis... So far, i've skated by with ""I'm a libertarian"".

It's sad, shes a genuinely good person who doesn't have time to investigate all the bullshit claims shes fed by CNN and MSNBC... so she just trusts them as the quality news sources they pretend to be.",ClippinWings451,e9l56dy,conservative
"Religious Muslim + conservative GOP member here. I may not particularly like Israel and personally think it shouldn’t have been made, but I would never advocate for its abolishment and fling shit at Jews (our closest brothers religiously) just because of it. The left does a real bad job at separating Israel and Jews, and it’s definitely possible to not be a fan of the state yet still respect its existence and the religion it follows. I’m sorry you guys have to deal with this crap after all you’ve been through. ",hexcodeblue,e9leod9,conservative
"It's like people who say that being anti-Iran isn't islamophobic and racist against Persians. Obviously, according to your argument, anyone who is against Iran is like that because they are racists against the only Persian state.

Right? Funny how quickly the right becomes SJWs when Israel is involved.",civilmarsupial,e9lyu2r,conservative
[removed],,e9ldpmi,conservative
#If you like your peace prize you can keep your peace prize. ,sremark,e9ltsnx,conservative
"Not really, it’s the Friedrich Ebert Foundation, a German socialist think-tank.  They didn’t actually give the award to the March.  They were going to, then decided not to.",Narezza,e9ler6b,conservative
"Linda Sarsour said in September that Israeli Jews don't deserve to be treated like humans. Another leader, Tamika Mallory, said in February that Jews are satanic and didn't deserve to be a part of this world. Do those statements qualify as anti-Jew enough?",wtcode,e9l6zzn,conservative
"Calling Linda Sarsour Antisemitic is an accurate description of her ideals and objectives.... there's absolutely no ""reach"" there.",ClippinWings451,e9l5jsk,conservative
"No one is saying that amtisemitism took place, just that the women's march leaders are antisemitic, and friends with Farrakhan, who is antisemitic.",mlmack,e9l46h4,conservative
[https://www.heyalma.com/everything-need-know-anti-semitism-womens-march-movement/](https://www.heyalma.com/everything-need-know-anti-semitism-womens-march-movement/),ClippinWings451,e9l5db9,conservative
">""According to the IHRA, antisemitism accuses Jews of conspiring to harm humanity and is used to blame Jews for 'why things go wrong'.  Antisemitism can be expressed in language, writing, images, as well as actions and employs stereotypes and negative traits. Antisemitism can also take the form of so-called new, Israel-related antisemitism. This includes hostility against the State of Israel, which is then described as a Jewish collective."" 

Quoted from the open [letter](https://jfda.de/wp-content/uploads/2018/11/OpenLetter_FES_WM.pdf) (PDF) against the presentation of the Friedrich-Ebert-Stiftung Human Rights Award to Women's March USA-- it was a link in the original article.  The whole letter gives examples of Linda Sarsour's (and other board members and chair women's) hatred toward Jews.  

&#x200B;",danger_derp,e9law5g,conservative
"Louis Farrakhan is an anti Semitic hate preacher, that’s a perfectly apt description.

“I’m not an anti-Semite. I’m anti-termite.”

Was that statement made in the 1930s? Nope. It was made about a month ago by Louis Farrakhan.

",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9ljxvo,conservative
What do you mean?,LightShieldRBLX,e9lhlvm,conservative
It’s anti Semitic ,Faulty-Logician,e9lscgn,conservative
"That's not antisemitic. Replace Israel with Saudi Arabia and see if you think it's still racist.

You can say she's wrong, and she may have said other racist things, but criticising Israel is not inherently racist.",Albion_mystic,e9lw730,conservative
"> Sadly, the Democrats elected Ilhan Omar, a woman who said in 2012 ""Israel has hypnotized the world, may Allah awaken the people and help them see the evil doings of Israel,""

How’s that antisemitic? ",Muslamicraygun1,e9lyu2l,conservative
You speak for everyone ,FreshStink,e9m3l1e,conservative
"Yeah anti semitism is unacceptable, islamaphobia is where it's at!

ORRRRRRR!!

how about both are stupid and wrong and we should be better than those we dislike.",Albion_mystic,e9lzj91,conservative
"Hi, do you have a source on that?",multiverse72,e9m4186,conservative
Good on Alyssa Milano,CBScott7,e9l21ib,conservative
And Debra Messing. Must be horribly obvious hate for those two to call it out.,42random,e9l85dx,conservative
"the women's march is literally everything bad about the left.

the vancouver one had a transgender prostitute called 'Hailey Heartless' as their figurehead. This is literally an enormous dude who does BDSM to men for money. Anyone who complained that chicks with dicks didn't belong in a women's march got blocked.

the portland women's march was taken over (with their consent) by a transgender ex-con, who (surprise, surprise), stole all the portland's women's march's money",Leandover,e9mdyzy,conservative
Really shitty b8,Kahlypso,e9lli01,conservative
Wat,Jrsplays,e9lhezk,conservative
"I lol’d.

Low effort.",bruux,e9lge38,conservative
*yawn* heard all this before. It isn’t happening. Go away.,8K12,e9liriw,conservative
"Well, they *are* German socialists according to the article...",Jacob_The_White_Guy,e9lx5n7,conservative
And throw gay people from roof tops,Jizzlobber42,e9ku2al,conservative
"No, you see, Margaret Atwood's The Handmaid's Tale has already prophesied that Christian conservatives are going to put us all back in chains! Did you skip feminist Sunday School, you apostate?!

Hello, Ministry of Virtue? I'd like report an unacceptable individual who has insulted the prophet Atwood's holy Emmy Award-winning scripture stories.",Anti-Decimalization,e9l643f,conservative
I have seen Feminists support that. Go fucking figure.,PurpleAngel23,e9l4rie,conservative
[removed],,e9lvxyv,conservative
"Totally agree.  The lefts obsession with protecting Islam is baffling.  The major countries that follow it kill gays, abuse women, practice modern day slavery, etc.  

If there was an issue you'd think the left and right would come together with itd be rejecting Islamic extremism.",NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9l8fjy,conservative
Votes.  It's for votes.,FactualDiscord,e9m1isv,conservative
The problem is that people generalize. Generalization is what has caused America to politically divide and polarize. I'm sorry if you had to deal with any of these kinds of situations.,goldrotmgonly,e9mkjb6,conservative
What are you rambling about you insane psycho the left condemns violence from those extremist countries. Get your head out of your ass.,orojinn,e9m6p3f,conservative
[removed],,e9lfrji,conservative
"Women can be men
Men can be women
Gender doesn’t exist
Racism against whites or Asians isn’t racist 
Illegal votes are ok (sometimes)
Violence is bad except when leftists do it
Borders are bad
Nationalism is treason (!!) 
I got tired typing their stupidity 😜
",42random,e9l822s,conservative
[removed],,e9ljlbo,conservative
[removed],,e9lupac,conservative
[removed],,e9lfora,conservative
"San Diego is conservative, homie. Check the voting.",sickofsteve,e9lo330,conservative
"Sorry do you have an example
Of a Muslim extremest that doesn’t want to kill all Jews? Or all Israelis? Or all Americans? Or all gays? ",carson_arson,e9lk8oo,conservative
"Agreed. But why is it that I've never seen your same point made when similar is said about the right, on /r/politics. Like not even once. That place has significantly more traffic, yet not a single poster on the left even attempts to correct obvious bad faith arguments.",elc0,e9lokx1,conservative
"I think the last one is the only valid criticism of the status quo among the heads of the GOP, but how are we in bed with Russia and North Korea?",KingJonStarkgeryan1,e9lri3y,conservative
Touche.,csajhr,e9lir29,conservative
"How dumb do you have to be to wear a pussy hat in protest of Trump, and then support Hillary Clinton, who didn't even have the decency to believe the women that her philandering husband raped and/or otherwise took advantage of?",mlmack,e9l34kq,conservative
"Have you asked her why she supports the party that pro-palestian and Hamas? Republicans support Israel and protect them, why any Jew would vote democrat seems to be a mystery ",JobieWanKenobi,e9m3g6d,conservative
Appreciate that man. I really think each side has to come together for a legit solution. Shit like what's going on today isn't gonna solve anything. I think the issue with the left is that they have just gone on the way to extreme,elyasafmunk,e9let93,conservative
"If someone only criticized Iran while all of its neighbors were universally worse in the regards to why you are criticizing Iran and you never have any criticisms for them, I would actually assume you are racist against the only Persian state. 

All of Israel's neighbors are worse than it by a fucking mile (including their treatment of Palestinians), yet you don't hear any complaints. Only reasonable conclusion is that they coincidentally hate the only Jewish state for some reason other than being comprised mainly of Jews or they think so low of Muslim countries that they have zero expectations for them, either way probably racist. ",ineedadvice12345678,e9m4n4w,conservative
"Considering Obama and Trudeau, two modern N. American left wing politicians were and still very supportive of the KSA I think your comment is complete nonsense. The geopolitics of the KSA trancened left and right unfortunately.",OKResident93,e9lj371,conservative
Awww. You're trying so hard. It's so cute. ,d_grizzle,e9lk182,conservative
yea... That is not what stripped means. I'm sick of these click bait headlines. ,TexasDutch,e9lhsh3,conservative
Based and redpilled ,negroic,e9l70z1,conservative
As conservatives we should focus more on Sarsour’s rejection of Western ways of life. Antisemitism is not worth worrying about right now. ,negroic,e9l5n1f,conservative
The title literally says “blatant antisemitism”. ,negroic,e9l48sy,conservative
literally all of that bitches articles are calling something anti semitism. We must throw aside these identity politic tactics that the jews use on the left. we must not partake. ,negroic,e9l5htw,conservative
"The IHRA definition of anti-semitism is one of the most egregious affronts to free speech in the world today. It's so wide-reaching and broad and includes tons of things that shouldn't be considered anti-semitism. By the IHRA definition, criticism of Israel, comparison of Israeli policy to Nazi policy, holding Israel to a different standard to other countries (being critical of Israel being founded in Palestinian land is seen as a double standard, even though no other countries have a similar scenario), questioning any aspect of the official story on the Holocaust, noticing that people of Jewish descent have disproportionate representation in many U.S./European institutions, these are all included as anti-semitism under this bullshit power-grab definition. This absurd definition has already been accepted by 31 countries and they are pushing for more, and to make it legally binding. ",FB-22,e9lmr72,conservative
"I never said Ilhan's was antisemitic, I said it was stupid. Ilhan called people who criticized her statement about Israel bigoted. I used her as an example that the Democrats don't actually give a shit about the people they say they represent.

Linda Sarsour is a bigoted Islamist who is vehemently antisemitic, and it shocks me that the main stream media never mentioned her antisemitism, which has been *very* open if you've ever opened her twitter account, in their dozens of stories championing her as a leader of the Women's March.",Deerscicle,e9lwe9y,conservative
It is not antisemitic,goldrotmgonly,e9mjvvd,conservative
"I never said it was. I pointed out the hypocrisy of Democrat candidates, and your response was ""How's that antisemitic"" instead of talking about things like the blatant fraud.",Deerscicle,e9lz92f,conservative
One is a modern religion. The other is incompatible with western society. Unless of course you're ok with throwing gays off of rooftops and child marriages and worshiping a pedophile war Lord. ,LumpyWumpus,e9m30yi,conservative
"https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=g7TAAw3oQvg

It’s not islamaphobia. ",skarface6,e9mgu0z,conservative
"Both are not the same. One is a Religion, the other is a race. We are already better than those we dislike. That's why we dislike them.",JazzTheGoose123,e9m0mai,conservative
"Milano even defended Sarsour and said that none of that was true....

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lqIGFvG2Fkg


https://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-6302929/Alyssa-Milano-hounded-friendship-controversial-Muslim-womens-rights-activist.html",JobieWanKenobi,e9m5mp1,conservative
"My favorite Halliwell sister..

",wizardglick412,e9lkj2r,conservative
"Hadn't heard about Messing. Good for her.  Although it's worrisome that Left wing activists only draw the line at Farrakhan. 

",FelixFuckfurter,e9l8ofk,conservative
Undeniable hate or they'd still be in.,Lunatic_Fringe_Phd,e9lt4qd,conservative
"""Every great cause begins as a movement, becomes a business, and eventually degenerates into a racket."" - Eric Hoffer  
  
A great moral failure of our time is the inability of so many people to spot grifters within their own ranks.",FelixFuckfurter,e9meuct,conservative
"Are you joking or did you mean ""nationalsocialist""?",Lucky_Man13,e9manfq,conservative
"""Kobe!""

-Chelsea Clinton, probably",GGtheBoss17,e9l1iu0,conservative
"And this woman praised her mentor Imam Raj Wahhaj, the father of the guy training kids to shoot up schools in the desert in New Mexico....",TexasKru,e9l820t,conservative
One of the reasons I stopped watching the show.  Couldn't take the blatant attack on Christian's.,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9m64ty,conservative
Linda Sarsour,drunk-deriver,e9lxf71,conservative
See article above,JobieWanKenobi,e9m2yrv,conservative
"> The lefts obsession with protecting Islam is baffling. 

Not really...

When you consider the irrational hatred the left has for us, and the lengths they have gone to demonize us, it becomes their default position to defend all aspects of Islam, simply because we have been critical of it. ",SideTraKd,e9ly6fr,conservative
[removed],,e9ldwn1,conservative
"I mean, not really in person, and even if I did I wouldn’t really take it seriously, as that is *obviously* a huge generalization and that person has no interest in actual discussion. 

You more so see it perpetuated online though, and thus people (mostly younger individuals) think this way. And it’s sad. I mean it’s even on TV. Don Lemon said “the biggest threat to the United States is white men.”  Really? What does that kind of comment solve? That comment, about any gender or race, does nothing. ",CarbineGuy,e9mkp6j,conservative
You seem level headed. ,CarbineGuy,e9m6q7x,conservative
"it's empathize, you tool",fireball3k,e9lm8kn,conservative
"Let me check. 

...no. ",CarbineGuy,e9lfta0,conservative
Enjoy your ban,VirginWizard69,e9ljm62,conservative
Oh look -- another tolerant progressive.,VirginWizard69,e9m3w04,conservative
prove it,Zac1245,e9li3py,conservative
"Did you respond to the wrong comment, or are you huffing super glue?",BigAl265,e9liieo,conservative
Horseshit,VirginWizard69,e9lgb4d,conservative
"Seriously. Pew research has done polls on this, and the results are frightening. ",CarbineGuy,e9mcn2c,conservative
"Of course she knew and believed. She took steps to actively silence them, if she didn't believe, there would have been no reason to do that.",csajhr,e9lhvg2,conservative
"Assimilated Jews support the Democrats. Jews that identify as Jews first do not care for the Democrats.
Nor do the Israelis.",Primitivsky,e9mlg7b,conservative
"For sure, and not just a solution about Jews and Israel too, but for a solution about Saudi Arabia and the terrible things it does among many other Islamic nations, that somehow people to try to justify??? Conservatism != radicalism, and state != representation of the whole religion; both sides need to get better at seeing that. I’d love to have a world where Jews and Muslims find strength in numbers to make a place for ourselves and live peacefully together. 

Yes, perfect! The left is growing extreme to the point where I want to gouge my eyeballs out of my skull. And in response to that, the right is growing extreme as well. Extremism never works out well for anyone and it’s heart-shattering to think what awful places we could end up because of it. We don’t need a Saudi Arabia 2. ",hexcodeblue,e9lfcqa,conservative
How is that relevant? Are you saying that if one atrocity is happening in one part of the world and another one that is bigger is happening in another part of the world that you are wrong for calling out the first one without talking about the other? Just because A is doing better than B it doesn't mean A is above criticism or criticism of A is attributable to some sort of nefarious opinion or view.,civilmarsupial,e9mgw75,conservative
As if both being wrong somehow absolves the right of anything they are currently doing.,CHolland8776,e9ljlrg,conservative
"Just so you don't think I'm making things up.
https://www.google.com/amp/s/nypost.com/2018/11/04/dont-join-this-years-womens-march-unless-youre-good-with-anti-semitism/amp/",wtcode,e9l9kth,conservative
"Antisemitism is a rejection of western values though.

&#x200B;

Hitler, and Stalin both attacked the Jews, a group that does not tend to work well in highly controlled dictatorships (except maybe China)

&#x200B;

The crazier theocratic elements of islam hate both the jews and israel.

&#x200B;

The old testament in the bible is basically the Torah and a lot of western christianity is based around it, at least the bits where Jesus is the messiah and the Old Testament is basically considered prophetic foreshadowing.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",atomic1fire,e9lcsz6,conservative
Anything that helps de-legitimize her as a positive icon for women's rights is a worth talking about,BillionCub,e9l7jjz,conservative
"Yes and no. In the US, jews are as safe as they've been anywhere in the history of the world according to Shapiro, but anti-sematism is a problem for a number of reasons, but the main one is that it's an attack on the foundation of those same western values you're talking about. Anti-sematism is unlike the other forms of bigotry that we talk about, because it's this idea that all of the worlds problems stem from the Jews and their ideology. So not only is an evil attack on a small minority, but its also an attack on the values we deem most important too. Even any policy that threatens Israel's safety in almost all instances that I can think of should be opposed, as its a bastion of western ideas and society in the part of the world that argueably needs those things the most. 

So while anti-sematism is not a priority in the sense that it's a vital policy issue (since the Trump administration seems to be doing very well on that front), but it's something that anyone who believes in the values that built western society needs to do their best to strongly disavow. ",mcbosco25,e9l7wm0,conservative
"Do some digging on Linda Sarsour, you'll see what they're reffering to. ",mcbosco25,e9l6w8m,conservative
"> We must throw aside these identity politic tactics that the jews use on the left. we must not partake.

How shocking, the guy trivializing anti-semitism reveals himself to be an anti-semite. ",gprime,e9mg6ra,conservative
This is a brazen lie. That's not in IhRA. Found an antisemite.,Primitivsky,e9mmary,conservative
"I mean liberals are pretty much pro Palestine. Also Illhan is not wrong. Israel controls the US and the rest of the world. Israeli lobby is responsable for pretty much every war in the middle east. 

&#x200B;",JazzTheGoose123,e9lywoq,conservative
[removed],,e9lwt1w,conservative
"Oh ok, I thought you were inferring that she was an antisemite like Linda Sarsour given the chronology of your post and quoting her Israel remarks.

Previous Poster:

>If there’s one this liberals and conservatives can agree on, it’s that Linda Sarsour is a **anti semetic** psychopath

Your post:

>They should agree on it, but people still defend Sarsour. **Sadly, the Democrats elected** Ilhan Omar, a woman who said in 2012 ""Israel has hypnotized the world, may Allah awaken the people and help them see the evil doings of Israel,"" and **instead of apologizing** just said anyone who criticized her was a bigot.

And then you later on went to post this:

>**Linda Sarsour is a disgusting antisemite**, and then I brought up **Omar who is incredibly similar to Sarsour** who was elected by the Democrats in Minnesota

One can only infer, by logic, that you are calling Ilhan an anti-semite too.",Muslamicraygun1,e9m12y0,conservative
"You implied it. We went through this. You're being disingenuous.

The poster above you wrote 'this woman 1 is a psychopathic anti-Semite.'

You replied 'yeah and people defend her. Sadly Democrats just elected a woman 2 who said this'

That implies you think woman 2's quote is anti semitic because that's how language works.",Albion_mystic,e9lzhgm,conservative
"Judaism is older than Islam? Ain't nothing modern about it?

I don't know if you know this, but that parts in Islam which speak about homosexuals, are exactly the same in the Torah.

and I don't want to upset you, but its written that [Mary was 12-14](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mary,_mother_of_Jesus#Later_Christian_writings_and_traditions) when she married Joseph, who some people said was as old as 90.",Albion_mystic,e9m3kcf,conservative
muslims are our natural allies against the degenerate left. every time you create animosity between muslims and westerners you are setting back our movement and impeding success. show these people some love. in the long run they are on our side,Sea_Safe,e9ne3bl,conservative
"Ok except Christians are mutilating female genetalia, which he says they don't so thats a lie. That is a regional thing which many East African Christians do, and not something an Indonesian would do.

Ok so he gets to define radical. Any one can do that, but even using his definitions...is he being honest.

Secondly he provides no links to his sources so I checked them.

He actually underestimates the number of indonesians who want sharia law. Its actually [72%](http://www.pewresearch.org/fact-tank/2017/08/09/muslims-and-islam-key-findings-in-the-u-s-and-around-the-world/). A slight red flag, so lets check his further assertions.

However he says that 70% blame Israel, the United states or someone else for 9/11. I'm not even sure what he means by that, because someone else did do 9/11, namely Al Qaida. But again I can't find his source that he doesn't provide. I did find a [survey](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Opinion_polls_about_9/11_conspiracy_theories#Asia), which at its most harsh analysis puts blame on America at 17% and Israel at 3%, with Al Qaida at 26%. Other Countries gets 12%, but that could mean anything from England or Jamaica, to Afganistan, Saudi Arabia or Pakistan, which...I mean the last three are hardly radical opinions. 43% said they did not know. Hardly suprising as not many people could name an Indonesian terrorist group or even attack off the top of their head. So his claim of 70% is true if you count as someone else, every country on earth, including those implicated, and all those who replied I don't know. hmmm. 

Is that so Radical? One poll of americans had [49%](https://web.archive.org/web/20070830012411/http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/19375611/site/newsweek/) (or 160 million people as he would say) saying Saddam Hussein funded 9/11. which he didn't. So thats more incorrect that Indonesia managed. Hardly evidence for a radicalised American population.

So 70% showing positive or mixed feelings in egypt for Bin Laden. Pew removed the survey I think he's refering to for being outside the margin of error. but they did provide [this one](http://www.pewglobal.org/2011/05/02/osama-bin-laden-largely-discredited-among-muslim-publics-in-recent-years/) Showing actually its only 22% and 21% of  egyptions who have confidence in Bin Laden, and favorbility of Al Qaida respectivly. Not 70% again.

Next one is weird, not sure why he says you don't think of bangladesh as a Muslim Country when it was founded on religious grounds. Thats like saying you don't think of India as a Hindu Country. Just  a bit strange that one. He says that 22% of people think suicide bombings and targeting of civilians is sometimes justified. Again doesn't explain where he got this data, and they're two different questions. Lots of people in America would say civilian bombings is justified against ISIS. Would you call them radicals? It doesn't ask who the bombings are against, and he's not fussed about clarrifying. This study found [60%] (https://news.stanford.edu/2017/08/08/americans-weigh-nuclear-war/) percent of Americans would approve of killing 2 million Iranian civilians to prevent an invasion of Iran that might kill 20,000 U.S. soldiers. Which is higher than the bangledeshi population and answers the same question.

He then says 30% believe honor killings may be justified. Ok pretty extreme. but [24%] (https://news.gallup.com/poll/210704/record-few-americans-believe-bible-literal-word-god.aspx) of Americans believe the bible is the word of god, which would imply they think Women should be stoned to death for adultary. Is America full of extremists? Should we be afraid?!

God we're not even close to the end.

Ok I give up at this point as this isn't my job. But your badly sourced video That gets to define its own versions of extremism, makes up statistics and extrapolates studies to include all the children in that nation to try and justify its own definition hasn't exactly changed my mind on being scared about muslims. Sorry. Central America's crime problem doesn't make me scared of Catholics.",Albion_mystic,e9mkxeg,conservative
"Um...Both are religions? There is no 'race' of jews. They're are Jewish people of many races; arabic, slavic, western european, ethiopian etc.",Albion_mystic,e9m0sxp,conservative
"Sadly no apology for that, but at least she realized her error instead of doubling down once she dove into it deeper.",-Shank-,e9m8mer,conservative
"Oh, the think tank that was thinking of awarding the Women’s March, but rescinded the opportunity, was described briefly as a “German socialist think tank.” ",Jacob_The_White_Guy,e9mzkww,conservative
I loled at this.,swed14,e9l7qxd,conservative
"But haven't you heard? Christians are never mocked, criticized, or discriminated against! /s",Mewster1818,e9mv8xl,conservative
"Yeah, “the right” are the ones selling arms to SA.  Your ignorance of global politics is astounding.",BigAl265,e9lj6a9,conservative
You're right. The media does seem to perpetuate and cause your dilemma. I just think our country needs more logic-grounded empathy. It seems like people just want to blame and blame and nothing truly gets fixed. The social-fabric of our country has really been torn apart in the past decade or so.,goldrotmgonly,e9mkvis,conservative
You seem offended snowflake.,orojinn,e9mcdcj,conservative
"What I meant to say was, I don’t see why you guys don’t suck. Sort of a double-negative.",Sir-throw-a-way,e9o35gq,conservative
/r/technicallythetruth,JAWSU,e9m6l1s,conservative
"Totally agree with everything you said cousin ;). I'm happy that although we may share our differences, we can put them aside and use logical reasoning. ",elyasafmunk,e9lffx2,conservative
[deleted],,e9lkij7,conservative
How,Aron_Johansson,e9m3kgn,conservative
"Liberals aren’t pro-Palestine. We are anti-suppression of all people. Israel is right to fear their neighbors. But their tactics are often much, much too violent and inhumane. See there’s this thing called nuance. ",BellEpoch,e9m5hw2,conservative
"> Please don't be disingenuous. You replied to a comment saying

> 'Linda Sarsour is a antisemitic psychopath'

 No, I didn't. I said she's a bigoted Islamist who is vehemently antisemitic. You can't even read what someone wrote before quoting me wrong. 

""Sarsour said American Muslims shouldn’t “humanize” Israelis."" Nope. No racism against Jews there. Or maybe you haven't read the article or paid a half second of attention to Linda Sarsour. 

And yes, I downvoted you because you're wrong and are ignoring the very public statements that she's said.",Deerscicle,e9lwycd,conservative
"Linda Sarsour is a disgusting antisemite, and then I brought up Omar who is incredibly similar to Sarsour who was elected by the Democrats in Minnesota. She's literally said ""death to Israel"".  You may not think that isn't hate speech against Jews, and if you don't there's no way I can convince you against this. 

I was mainly talking about Omar who defrauded the taxpayers of Minnesota before gaining citizenship because she claimed her brother was her husband so that they both could get cheaper college education. The same woman who, once again, said ""Death to Israel.""",Deerscicle,e9lzqv9,conservative
">Judaism is older than Islam? Ain't nothing modern about it?


It's older, and yet still more compatible with modern society. It's almost like it isn't a garbage religion like Islam is. 
>
>I don't know if you know this, but that parts in Islam which speak about homosexuals, are exactly the same in the Torah.

Yes. But do the Jews act on it? Do you see Jews regularly murdering gays? No. Nor do you see them killing people who left the faith or women who dare to take off their head coverings in public. 
>
>and I don't want to upset you, but its written that [Mary was 12-14](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mary,_mother_of_Jesus#Later_Christian_writings_and_traditions) when she married Joseph, who some people said was as old as 90.

The Bible never says how old they were. But I like how you have to make stuff up to try and make other religions seem as bad as Islam. 

>Some apocryphal accounts state that at the time of her betrothal to Joseph, Mary was 12–14 years old, and he was ninety years old, but such accounts are unreliable.

^ from your own source. 

And Mohammed married an 8 year old and raped her for many years. Somehow, Islam still comes up the worst. 
",LumpyWumpus,e9m3u9h,conservative
I'd rather not side with evil in order to beat another evil. ,LumpyWumpus,e9nfyp6,conservative
"Why am I not surprised a conservative who is pro Israel has no idea about Jews.. there *is* a Jewish race. Judaism is a religion, but there is a distinct Jewish race as well. Israel has a goddamn race based immigration system and race based marriage system. There is such a thing as Jewish DNA. No Jew will deny this, quite the opposite. Are you trolling?",JazzTheGoose123,e9m0zlw,conservative
Not really. You’d have to say something even remotely offensive first. ,CarbineGuy,e9mck78,conservative
"Amen (or whatever the Jewish version is) to that! We conservatives really have to stick together in this world. Wish you the best in all your endeavors, my man :)",hexcodeblue,e9lfkrf,conservative
"They control the mainstream media. You don’t see anti-Islamic messages from Israel because it’s tightly controlled. My Jewish friend who went there was pretty damn surprised how bigoted Jews are against Palestinians and non-Jews yet feign this “We can’t be bigots, we are Jews”

Her grandma who lived through the Holocaust compared what is happening in the West Bank to what she went through with the Nazis in how their daily lives are controlled by the occupational forces. Not to the same magnitude but her grandma became upset when they saw Palestinians getting pushed around and asked for papers and all the other restrictions on their lives in the name of “security”. 

Her grandma later said she knows why the Palestinians are angry and understand why they are resisting. It was an interesting conversation to say the least.",broneilbro,e9m405w,conservative
I mean in their view (generally) Palestine is being oppressed and is just defending itself. So.. yeah. ,JazzTheGoose123,e9m5oeg,conservative
[removed],,e9lxf3z,conservative
"Yeah except can you provide evidence she said death to Israel, I've been Googling and can't find any. Also if she said that why didn't you quote that the first time?!

Also could you please provide evidence she married her brother?",Albion_mystic,e9m07do,conservative
"I'm not a muslim, I don't like relgion at all. 

Right now in Africa and Jamaica Christians are killing Homosexuals. And Mary's age may not be in the Bible, but its part of christian tradition. Just how hell is not mentioned in the bible, but its part of christianity. I'm not making stuff up, I provided a source for you.

Right now in Israel They're are men who flat our refuse to sit next to women, doesn't sound very modern, and orthodox jews have murdered the Israli priminister and continue to support his murderer.

I don't like how islamic countries are run, but to ascribe all the worst acts of muslims to islam and to not do it the other way round is strange. All Relgions harm the world, why do you single out Islam?",Albion_mystic,e9m4ebh,conservative
"your claims are ignorant, rude and out of context. ",Sea_Safe,e9ne6gp,conservative
"Oh I'm sorry thats my mistake, which Jewish race is it?
Ashkenazi? Shepardi? Itakim? Romaniote? Mizrahi? Cochin? Bene Israel? Beta Israel? 

No jew will deny this, Trust a person who makes sweeping judgements about me to make sweeping judgements about what they consider an entire race of people. I mean I think you will have to go a long way to find a Jewish person who will argue that [all](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abayudaya) [these] (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nissim_Ezekiel) [people](https://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Scarlett_Johansson_in_Kuwait_01b-tweaked.jpg#/media/File:Scarlett_Johansson_in_Kuwait_01b-tweaked.jpg) are the same race.",Albion_mystic,e9m1rjf,conservative
Thank you kind sir. To you as well!,elyasafmunk,e9lfm0m,conservative
Would you consider yesterday's launch of 370 rockets on civilian areas by Hamas to be self defense?,goaheaddoyourworst,e9m9ms0,conservative
">Only Jews in my notifications every night are ones that condone violence against Arabs and are cool with mosques being attacked

>Nothing is creepier than Zionism.Challenge racism, #NormalizeJustice. Check out this video by @remroum http://bit.ly/Rr6pPK

>Regardless of what side your on, no justification to support any air strike attacks on #Syria from #Israel. Absolutely none. Disgusting

>Underwear bomber was the #CIA all along. Why did I already know that?! Shame on us - scaring the American people.

>How many times do we have to tell White women that we do not need to be saved by them? Is there code language I need to use to get thru?

>White folks forgot when pilgrims came here fleeing political persecution. Freedom to worship cool for them, not others. #HateUnchecked

>>There's no such thing as reverse racism. Racism is bigotry + power. The group that doesn't have power can't be racist.


All of these are straight quotes from Sarsour's twitter.


[She supports women until she wants to take their vaginas away!](https://twitter.com/SKYRIDER4538/status/855560775808598016)

>Can't learn or teach about the history of Islam in America without talking about the Nation of Islam (NOI)

She supports the Nation of Islam which is antisemitic. 

She appeared onstage with Rasmea Odeh, a PLO member who killed two Jewish Israelis and wounded nine others.",Deerscicle,e9lxtv4,conservative
And what do you think she means by opressor there genius? Obviously referring to Israeli jews.,MotorRoutine,e9ly4zu,conservative
">Also could you please provide evidence she married her brother?

It's a strange claim given incest is a criminal offence even between 2 consenting adults and is punishable by [up to ten years](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Laws_regarding_incest_in_the_United_States) in Minnesota",Muslamicraygun1,e9m1cg7,conservative
I don't like religion either. It inspires hate and divides our human race. We should not single out Islam simply because it happens to be covered in the media more.,goldrotmgonly,e9mjypt,conservative
And yet you provide no rebuttal. Typical. ,LumpyWumpus,e9nfxjf,conservative
"Not Jewish in religion but race. Ugandan Jews are obviously not Jewish. Hence why they are forced on birthcontrol in Israel. Knew that one? Black Jews aren't very popular among the Jews. 

EDIT: Forced on birthcontrol. Not castrated. Not there, yet..",JazzTheGoose123,e9m1zpp,conservative
I am not the one that holds that position. Both are cancer. Hamas are terrorists. ,JazzTheGoose123,e9mbad7,conservative
"Yeah she sounds like a knob, thanks for sharing.",Albion_mystic,e9m3xuj,conservative
[removed],,e9ly6hl,conservative
"All their claims are strange, and they havn't provided evidence for a single one of them. I'm beggining to think they're not true...",Albion_mystic,e9m2kph,conservative
"Ohhh, yes I'm so glad I spoke to a well reasoned expert. So there is one race of Jewish people but it doesn't include all Jewish people!

Or to put it another way, there is not one race of Jewish people, there are Jewish people of many races?

And they didn't castrate anyone, that's only the removal of the male genitalia. They forced citizens of a minority race (see how they're not one race) to take long lasting birth control. No less discusting but I notice you're not good at definitions of words.",Albion_mystic,e9m27x7,conservative
"> castrated 

I feel like this wasn't the word you were going for there...",sde1500,e9m30zi,conservative
"And the terrorists hide among civilians. Sadly, it is the reality Israel must face when the enemy resort to terrorist tactics and not conventional warfare.

EDIT: I should add, since I'm kind of curious... did this sort of occupation happen prior to the incursion of Hamas?",Knuckle14,e9mifj5,conservative
"Ok, at least we're in agreement on the latter part. I'm generally pro-Israel, with the recognition that they shouldn't be above criticism. I just don't think there's much of a comparison between them and a state that gives out payments to families of terrorists with near universal support from its populace. Not saying that you're equating the two, but it seems to be a somewhat common perspective on the left.",goaheaddoyourworst,e9mj55c,conservative
"Pfft, convenient that you believe the only narrow and unlikely interpretation which could let you continue to support an antisemite huh?

You don't ""humanise"" a government, you humanise a people.

Sarsour is blatantly targetting Isralei jews and any self respecting, non anti-semitic person would distance themselves from her. This isn't about politics, it's about basic human decency.",MotorRoutine,e9lyf42,conservative
">Ohhh, yes I'm so glad I spoke to a well reasoned expert. So there is one race of Jewish people but it doesn't include all Jewish people!

>

>Or to put it another way, there is not one race of Jewish people, there are Jewish people of many races?

Do you struggle with reading comprehension?

>And they didn't castrate anyone, that's only the removal of the male genitalia. They forced citizens of a minority race (see how they're not one race) to take long lasting birth control. No less discusting but I notice you're not good at definitions of words.


Yes I was gonna edit that comment. It wasn't castration. Birth Control. 

I'm gonna try and explain this for you again.

There's the religion Judaism and then there's the different jewish ethnicities. Black jews are not ethnically jewish. They're only jewish in faith.",JazzTheGoose123,e9m2ok9,conservative
Not it wasn't. I corrected it further down. I'll edit.,JazzTheGoose123,e9m3cig,conservative
"I don't support her. I don't know who she is. 

I'm just saying she didn't say 'dont humanize Israeli Jew's' she said don't humanize the oppressor. To say it's clear cut what she means implies you see Israeli jews as the oppressors of Palestine. I don't think she's referring to Jews, as much as the Israeli state or government. I mean being against government oppression should be our bread and butter.

I think there is more nuance in that statement than you are letting on. However I don't agree with it as a statement.

And of course you can humanize non human things...That's kind of what the word means?",Albion_mystic,e9lymza,conservative
"Why do you get to decide who is and isn't ethnically jewish? You have no idea what you're talking about and provide no evidence for your strange claims.

Are indian jews ethnically jewish? Are Arabic Jews? are Italian Jews? 

Which ethnicity is the right ethnicity for jewish people according to you? I assume it would have to include Ashkenazi, the ones the Nazis mainly targeted, but that excludes Arabic jews, or the ones who never left israel...which is obviously nonsense.

But you're proving my point. If those black people are oppressed for practicing judaism, that is anti-semitism. So Anti-semitism is not about race!",Albion_mystic,e9m2xjh,conservative
"Oh, so you don't support her, you have no clue who she is, but you have a deep and intricate knowledge of her psyche enough to weave some narrative from her words that mean's she's not actually anti-semitic

That's convenient huh? So if she is an anti-semite, you have nothing to do with her. But if she isn't an anti-semite you're her staunchest protector.

Jesus Christ man, I don't know what's worse of the two scenarios you created. That you either can't own up to being a supporter because you know how toxic and horrible she is, or that you just randomly float around reddit defending every anti-semite you have no knowledge of.",MotorRoutine,e9lyr3s,conservative
">Why do you get to decide who is and isn't ethnically jewish?

I don't. Science does. Do a 23&me test. Check out jewish people doing it. There's jewish genes.

>If those black people are oppressed for practicing judaism,

You really do struggle with reading comprehension. I've never said that.",JazzTheGoose123,e9m3g5g,conservative
"Um...the guy above quoted her. I used Google (it's really easy, you don't have to be a hardcore fan of someone to Google them) and realised he had actually edited the quote from 'dont humanize the oppressor' to 'dont humanize Israeli's' which you edit to 'dont humanise Israeli Jews'

And you have the cheek to tell me I'm weaving a narrative from her words.",Albion_mystic,e9lyygy,conservative
"I know what you said. I'm presenting new ideas, not just accusing you of stuff. And you criticise my reading?

I'm saying if those black people are oppressed for their faith, that is anti semitism. You would agree yes?

And you think they are a different race to what you consider jews (for some reason)?

Thus, anti-semitism is not linked to race, but to religion...just like islamaphobia!!!! which was my original point.

They're is no such thing as Jewish genes. I study genetics and I can't event imagine what thats meant to mean. Different jewish ethnicities have a propensity for different genetic disases, but its not like that have a protein in the shape of a menorah. What do you mean by Jewish genes?",Albion_mystic,e9m3r7q,conservative
"I don't care what he did, I'm not talking to him. Nothing he said impacts this conversation, you're the one who claimed she wasn't anti-semitic, you said that.

So which is it? Do you defend every anti-semite you see or just a fan of this anti-semite?",MotorRoutine,e9lz1ib,conservative
">I'm saying if those black people are oppressed for their faith, that is anti semitism. You would agree yes?

They are oppressed for being black in Israel. It's their race. I'm pretty sure I wrote this already..

>They're is no such thing as Jewish genes. I study genetics and I can't event imagine what thats meant to mean. Different jewish ethnicities have a propensity for different genetic disases, but its not like that have a protein in the shape of a menorah. What do you mean by Jewish genes?

How is it we can find anglo genes? How is it we can know where somebody is from based on their genes? ",JazzTheGoose123,e9m41er,conservative
"So you jump into a chat between to people and say what we were talking about was irrelevant? And were rude to me from the start.

I have never said she is not antisemitic. I have repeatedly asked for evidence that she is.

The one quote provided was an edited quote with a questionable meaning.

She could well be a raging anti semitic. Please please provide evidence. This is the third time I asked. I only say because he said her twitter was full of antisemitism and I couldn't find any! 

Could you please provide examples as you seem knowledgeable in the area. I would like to learn more about her.",Albion_mystic,e9lz514,conservative
"Right...But if someone in Uganda, a Ugandan Christian oppresses them, that is anti-semitism...thus its not a race thing? its a religion thing?

Yeah you can be identified as that, but there are different ethnic groups, you could be identified as Ashkenazi, or Mizrahi, not as 'Jewish' as that is not an ethnicity, like I said. Just how you don't get identified as Muslim, but Arabic, or Indonesian.",Albion_mystic,e9m4msk,conservative
"> She could well be a raging anti semitic.

So why defend her? 

And yes I'm being rude, when I see someone defending anti-semitism it doesn't exactly endear them to me, think about how much ruder it is to be hostile to others just because of their skin colour or religion?",MotorRoutine,e9lzbpf,conservative
">Antisemitism (also spelled anti-Semitism or anti-semitism) is hostility to, prejudice, or discrimination against Jews.[1][2][3] A person who holds such positions is called an antisemite. Antisemitism is generally considered to be a form of racism.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antisemitism",JazzTheGoose123,e9m55qz,conservative
"Sorry. I didn't realise you weren't keeping up. I'll go slowly for you.

They said her twitter is full of antisemitism.

I read through for a good while, couldn't find any. I think it's important to know if someone organising marches through major cities is a racist. I couldn't find any anti semitism. I ask for evidence.

I am presented with an edited quote. I provide the real quote and I explain that the 'oppressor' does not have to be a race. I even gave an example of how the American government being oppressive (a very conservative viewpoint) does not mean American Christians are oppressive. In the same way that not everyone who voted for Obama would be an oppressor. I ask for links to her twitter as that's what they originally said was full of racism. I get no reply.

At this point someone rattled the dickhead cage and woke you up.

You explain rudely how OBVIOUSLY the quote must be interpreted by adding your interpretation and changing the words and that any other interpretation is weaving a narrative (but what you were doing is totally not) and accessed me of defending an antisemite.

I ask for more evidence of antisemitism from you this time.

I get insulted again. You provide no evidence.

So here we are. You insulting me and me asking you to teach me.

So I'll ask one more time, with a please. For the fourth time, could you please provide evidence of her anti semitism?",Albion_mystic,e9lzu36,conservative
"Are you ill? Why are you defining that word now?

>The European Commission against Racism and Intolerance (ECRI) defines Islamophobia as ""the fear of or prejudiced viewpoint towards Islam, Muslims and matters pertaining to them"", adding that whether ""it takes the shape of daily forms of racism and discrimination or more violent forms, Islamophobia is a violation of human rights and a threat to social cohesion"".

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Islamophobia#Racism",Albion_mystic,e9m5npx,conservative
"To anyone reading this, this is what antisemites do, it's their M.O. to a tee, they deny and deny and troll and troll. Here's a perfect quote  from Sartre

“Never believe that anti-Semites are completely unaware of the absurdity of their replies. They know that their remarks are frivolous, open to challenge. But they are amusing themselves, for it is their adversary who is obliged to use words responsibly, since he believes in words. The anti-Semites have the right to play. They even like to play with discourse for, by giving ridiculous reasons, they discredit the seriousness of their interlocutors. They delight in acting in bad faith, since they seek not to persuade by sound argument but to intimidate and disconcert. If you press them too closely, they will abruptly fall silent, loftily indicating by some phrase that the time for argument is past.”",MotorRoutine,e9lzvfa,conservative
"Because we were talking about anti-semitism. I genuinely don't understand what you're doing here.

I don't care what the ECRI a political organization defines islamophobia as. It is what the word means. Not what they want it to mean. And we were talking about anti-semitism.",JazzTheGoose123,e9m5wpl,conservative
"GOOD LORD. No one else is reading this. I'm asking you a pretty direct question. You're trying to educate strangers and I'm right here asking for your help!

Can you please provide the evidence she is an anti-Semite?

I'll do this a different way.

I think you're father is racist against Mongolians. I don't have to provide evidence, as the accusation exists. If you ask for my evidence, it proves you hate Mongolians as well, and I'll quote Satre at you.

He might hate Mongolians with the best of them and spend his time building massive walls you can see from space, but if I refuse to explain why I'm so sure, and just insult you loads do you think I'm helping?",Albion_mystic,e9m0efq,conservative
Both parties are the party of the rich because money is too involved in politics.,Skylin3,e9massk,conservative
"Total spin.

Hillary won the under 50k income demographic, Trump won every demographic above that.",BrighamYoung,e9m5vmo,conservative
tbh It's hard to brand the GOP as the party of the working class when its president is a billionaire.,superdude411,e9m2h6w,conservative
*Both parties* are the party of the rich. ,DAmbro8,e9m97ow,conservative
"Raising taxes, putting ""workers"" on corporate boards, so-called Medicare for All, regulating industry, regulating finance, regulating political speech, regulating labor markets, regulating which cabs you're allowed to ride...those aren't policies of the party of the rich. Those are the actions of the party of an angry and ignorant proletariat. The DNC isn't Bill Clinton's party anymore--it's Elizabeth Warren's and AOC's

The GOP is built to continue the tradition of the Whigs and Federalists before it--to represent commercial interests and promote capitalistic policy, trade, economic growth...a stable order but with minimal interference from gov't. If you ignore Trump's tweeting, that's basically what it still is.",oilman81,e9nbg48,conservative
"They're the party of the connected elite and parasites, all of whom steal from taxpayers to benefit themselves. ",LibertyTerp,e9mczzi,conservative
"If they are, they soon won't be, after the socialists get done ~~stealing~~, err, I mean ""redistributing"" their money.",mlmack,e9mnhis,conservative
"The way super rich liberals make their money is questionable at best, in particular those heavily involved in reselling intangible IP licenses (eg. Hollywood, Software vendors, websites etc.). It's through IP that the world's richest made their money, and the vast majority of them are liberal. ",tenshon,e9mh3m2,conservative
How do you upvote a comment twice? ,ADAMD2000,e9mie82,conservative
"100% right. One of the only things the Left has a point on is campaign finance. I wouldn't ban any private political spending like the Left, but I would absolutely publicly fund campaigns and limit campaign donations. Our current election system runs on bribes. It's ridiculous. In the future, people will look at this as a time when the US was more of an oligarchy than a democracy.",LibertyTerp,e9mo5o9,conservative
"The brand of successful wealthy person who wishes to serve his country has long conservative roots. For instance Disraeli was as flamboyant as Trump ever was, and become one of the most successful Prime Ministers during Victoria's reign. ",Manach_Irish,e9m50ef,conservative
"tbh they said he was a bankrupt hack, who wants to be president to cut deals for himself",ReaganTroll,e9m3bjs,conservative
Or when many are their own party members have worked to weaken the working classes unions.  ,Raymond-Finkle,e9n4v7k,conservative
It's the party of working. Sometimes that's the working class sometimes it's people who simply worked hard and are now incredibly wealthy. The Democrats are the party of handouts and Berne Sanders who was a bum.,MikeyPh,e9mizt6,conservative
"No theyre not

Democrats have WAY more funding from wall st then republicans

Way more funding from billionaires

Way more funding from superpacs

The attendance at a hollywood award show has more net worth thsn ALL of the republocan 

",ExpensiveMention,e9mb7qz,conservative
"I'm not sure what you're saying here, so intellectual property is not ethical to sell vs tangible goods?",Forever_Goofing,e9mruha,conservative
"Up vote, down vote, up vote. ",joeysuf,e9mw9ma,conservative
*representative Republic ,GlenGanges,e9myufh,conservative
You know why it runs on bribes? Because the government offers subsidies. Let’s not look for leftist solutions to solve the problem here. ,latotokyo123,e9nfkva,conservative
"Yeah, let's not forget the farming subsidies that R's have been sending to soy, pork and corn farmers ever since China put tariffs on those products.

Welfare is welfare, and market interventionism is market interventionism.",minuscatenary,e9mmvi3,conservative
"Ask any working class person, white, black, female, male, whatever, and ask them their honest opinion on conservative ""healthcare"". It will ne obvious what they think almost immediatly and it is the reason the GOP doesn't win the working class.

Stereotyping people who simply wish to stay alive as asking for a ""handout"" is why they lost the house.",UnconstrainedRage,e9mowsi,conservative
"It's not a question of ethics, just of legitimacy. For those who master useful IP, it's a virtual goldmine - easy money. When money is that easy, the value of working to earn it is diminished, and from that you get people concluding that making money is easy so everyone should just share in wealth rather than have motivation to earn it themselves.  Hence the rich-through-IP crowd tend to be big proponents of socialism. ",tenshon,e9msbno,conservative
Good point.,LibertyTerp,e9n5cjr,conservative
"You're totally right, but we have to attack the problem from both sides. Even if you get rid of subsidies (good luck), the government will always spend massive amounts of money on various things, from buying jets to building roads. There will always be opportunity for bribery. Elections should be set up to reduce bribery as low as possible, while also cutting government spending to reduce opportunities for bribery, and having as much transparency as possible.",LibertyTerp,e9nh7z3,conservative
"I'm not a fan of those either, farming though is a difficult industry to accept losing to some other country. Having the capacity to be self sufficient with food is important in the event of a major war. I don't think subsidies are the answer. But I imagine this is a drop in the bucket compared to social welfare.",MikeyPh,e9mrp11,conservative
I am a working class citizen and disagree,8K12,e9nkaqh,conservative
"You mistake who I am criticizing. It's not the people taking the handouts, everyone will take free stuff. I don't begrudge a fellow coservative for taking unemployment or having been on welfare, I don't begrudge anyone that has. It's the people giving it out without actually thinking and caring what happens that hurt them, particularly with government, which isn't nearly as effective as individual charities and people in knowing what a person needs and how to help them.

If I give you a handout, I have a face, a name, a life and a family, and I likely have some kind of connection to you. Maybe we go to the same church, maybe our kids go to the same school, maybe. Given all that, I will be far more likely to be humble and gracious and use that charity from you as I should and push to make my life better than if some faceless government office hands me a check with little to no accountability.

Lastly, I know working class people who think handouts are bad news and create an environment where many people who can work don't work, which gives everyone who actually needs the help less money to help them out of their slump.",MikeyPh,e9mr9oy,conservative
"Pat Robertson has a personal net worth in excess of $100 million, a fortune he accumulated largely by selling ""IP."" Mostly books, DVDs, CDs and through his Christian broadcasting... Just a thought based on your comment and your tag.",jkruisb2,e9n4o82,conservative
"A bribery requires an exchange between two parties though. If an oil company  donates to a politician and a politician votes for policies that favor the oil industry, that is not a bribe.  If a union donates to politicians wanting better policies for workers in general, that's not a bribe. Same for any other advocacy group.  I agree that getting rid of subsidies is unrealistic, but getting rid of ""bribery"" is even more unrealistic. We've actually strengthened restrictions on election donations compared to the last few decades, and it's only gotten worse. There are technically limits right now to donations, and a million ways to get through them. I don't buy any of the BS solutions from the left, who want to let the largest influencers of elections ""the media"" go completely unscathed while they punish some people who are simply making a donation. ",latotokyo123,e9nhwiu,conservative
"Didn't we learn, from WWII, that great mobilizations happen in times of war? Subsidies are totally not the right way to go. A permanently distorted market is definitely worse than a temporarily distorted market.

&#x200B;

You're probably right on the social welfare stuff",minuscatenary,e9mucyd,conservative
"I said ""tend to"" because it's not a rule. It's not like I'm saying that IP is evil, it's not. But it certainly does make it easier to make money, and when money is easily made it *tends* to make one believe that money has less intrinsic value, which can lead to socialistic beliefs.",tenshon,e9n57no,conservative
"> If an oil company donates to a politician and a politician votes for policies that favor the oil industry, that is not a bribe.

It's awfully convenient for the oil company though. It's a quid pro quo. Politicians represent their donors interests to continue receiving their support in elected office and afterward. Donors generously reward politicians that vote in their interests with more donations and cushy, well-paid jobs and speaking gigs after politics.",LibertyTerp,e9nm6da,conservative
"Mobilizations happen sure, but we had vast amounts of undeveloped land during that time, so victory gardens in homes supplemented for the demand on American farmers. If some foreign entity owns all our farms or if farmers fail to compete against foreign competitors and we lose our domestic farms, who would we rely on for food? We have millions and millions of people living in areas where they can't grow their own crops, and the poor are the least likely to have any land to farm with.

Some day there will be another big war, probably bigger than WWII and I hope to never see that day and I hope my kids and their kids never see that day, but one will come and we will need food grown domestically. What happens when farmers fail? Bigger land owners tend to buy up that land, but what if the biggest ones fail?

Like I said, I don't think subsidies are the answer, and maybe I'm making more out of it than needs to be but I think people must admit that those subsidies to the farmers are a little different than straight welfare, and there are more things to consider when talking about farm subsidies. They are different things, farm subsidies could be entirely bad and make us weaker, I don't know, but it is a different situation.",MikeyPh,e9mz33o,conservative
"The return has to be something of value to that company. Are you in favor of banning donations from advocacy groups? The only leftist solution to solve the problem you're describing is ban donations altogether, although like I said the media has a gigantic platform. ",latotokyo123,e9nt1t6,conservative
Accusations of “dog whistle” are inherently straw man arguments.,BrighamYoung,e9opkpf,conservative
"It seems every single story is ""Breaking news"" since Trump was elected.",beerandlolz,e9oblnc,conservative
"So little info in this article, you can't tell if the ""berating"" was deserved or not, or even if their was a ""berating"".",ChunkyArsenio,e9ny9w7,conservative
You have to wonder just how weak of a leader she is if she can be so shaken up by a phone call. ,tenshon,e9nx9tm,conservative
"The WaPo source article was also just another hit piece short on specifics. They seemed to spend most of their focus on making sure you knew what Trump's tone and temperament was like for the entire trip. Here's an archive of the WaPo source if you're interested:


https://archive.is/TQED3
",MooMooCudChew,e9og73o,conservative
"I can understand where she/they are coming from. I’m pretty protective of my husband, too.",PurpleAngel23,e9nfn8h,conservative
Hillary Clinton fired White House staff.. nothing to see here. ,ozric101,e9nc76m,conservative
cut spending. politicians aren’t brave enough to do so.,InAingeWeTrust,e9njcmg,conservative
"Seriously, this is why the ""Kansas Experiment"" failed. It wasn't the decreased taxes, it was Kansas continuing to spend more money than they had. ",uniquecannon,e9njorb,conservative
The Republicans had better get what spending/budget bills passed that they can during the lame duck session.,PubliusVA,e9nn4mz,conservative
"Classic socialist. Greedy, bad with money, prone to lying. We’re supposed to entrust our countries money to her? ",Sen5atus,e9n65rh,conservative
"I do not like her but hell, not everyone has mad cash.  Actually to have in savings at her age is pretty good.  ",GlenGanges,e9nvc3t,conservative
Russia only had one troll today?,EVOL_IAM,e9nu694,conservative
"Confusing title, or maybe I’m just slow tonight. Reads like he’s being replaced on the Supreme Court.",Radni,e9nomye,conservative
">Neomi Rao (C), the administrator of the White House Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, reacts after U.S. President Donald Trump announced that he is nominating her to replace Supreme Court Justice Brett Kavanaugh on the U.S. D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals

She is filling Kavanaugh's now vacant seat in the Circuit Court, not his seat on the Supreme Court.",Sideswipe0009,e9nt8jq,conservative
"NICE pick!  The NPC's are going to have a collection of syntax-errors over this one.

  * A biological woman, not a man pretending to be a lady

  * Republican

  * Anti-regulatory 

  * Mother and Father LEGAL immigrants

  * Minority

I can almost *see* the NPC's fuming and short-circuiting  

> She also served as a clerk for conservative Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas.

lol, oh yeah, heads *will* explode",Jizzlobber42,e9niq7j,conservative
Damn good choice.  Holy crap.,BrighamYoung,e9neqoy,conservative
Like the Dems would like anyone President Trump picks. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9nfiif,conservative
"I thought that too, at first. Kavanaugh was appointed to the SC, so he left a vacancy at his prior position on the US Circuit Court of Appeals. The effort to fill that vacant position is what the article is about.",cowboyfan08,e9o50mt,conservative
The most diverse white supremacist group  ,Wittyusernameman,e9o50qo,conservative
"Thats why the NPCs already have signs printed that say, ""We oppose Trump's pick of _______ to the court of appeals!""",Xenu2177,e9ohhn0,conservative
"I don't buy that for a second. She literally ran on the conservative platform here in AZ and showed up at rallies with Trump and very prominent conservatives in our state.

Sounds to me like Mark Levin is just sour that she didn't go on his show.  Odd how he waited until now to air dirty laundry.
",mbarnar,e9m6wjm,conservative
The Arizona GOP needs a house cleaning. Terrible candidates like McSally and Ward should never have been allowed to run.,TheWhiteFalcon,e9m95fd,conservative
"McSally didn't want to be tied to conservatives?  Well, you got what you wanted. Good Bye!",trendyweather,e9m4k2h,conservative
We were pretty much screwed either way that race went.,BeauRyker,e9mw6rq,conservative
"I do not remember when we elected Mark Levin for the position as final arbiter of who is who. 

It was a close race, and I am a little worried that people are taking all the wrong lessons from this. 

The GOP was routed in Suburban districts nationwide. Being on Levins show if it has any effect at all would probably not have helped. 

The GOP failed with suburban whites with a college degree who bolted the party. Why do you think that is?",memberCP,e9mcp6i,conservative
Just wait for the voter fraud to be fully exposed.  McSally won that race.,WhereWeGo1,e9m8la0,conservative
Either he is telling the truth and she lied during her campaign. Or he is lying and is spreading fake news. Maybe Conservative journalists are turning just as bad.,Nonsenseism,e9m7ktq,conservative
"I have a feeling she didn't want to be tied to Levin, which I wouldn't blame her. Refusing to be on his show shouldn't be considered a litmus test for conservatives.",dmclone,e9m8nnc,conservative
"This is the newest generation of rinos.  Just like the old school rinos they stand on no principles.  They simply want (through polling) to be for what they think will get them elected.  The new version is those who will not embrace Trump's agenda.  So good for her that she lost.  In general this election has been a warning for those who are not on board with the majority of the republican base.  And if republicans were smart in the next round of primaries it would be a litmus test ""to be all in"" with Trump policies when selecting a candidate.",optionhome,e9m24bm,conservative
"Yes she was a boring candidate and a never Trumper that won the Primary becasue asshole Joe Arpio split the Vote with kelli Ward. 

Sinema didnt win this eclection, the GOP lost it with a boring candidate and half-assed effort. ",Manchurainprez,e9mvaan,conservative
"Irrelevant. The popup votes are the problem, not the candidate. Its not yet time to look at ourselves to blame; its time to fight the steal. ",Lionstriker2,e9mcsh8,conservative
I've seen similar situations at the local level where politician want to be will run any party that will back them and when in office the policies are opposite of the party of record. It could be a strategic pr thing but I think's she's simply a professional politician want to be which her resume reflects.,postonrddt,e9mbymv,conservative
This is more common than you think. Often candidates will try to avoid people they think are controversial. Levin has no reason to lie about this. The same thing happened to Bill whittle. ,WhoIsHarlequin,e9m7cea,conservative
If she didn't show up at Rallies with Trump she would have been destroyed in the election. The fact that she rolled over so soon in this race  puts into question her political integrity not Levin's.,Rightquercusalba,e9m91ac,conservative
"McSally was not a terrible candidate, losing a close race does not mean you suck. It was always going to be a close race. ",memberCP,e9mct53,conservative
"McSally was actually a pretty good candidate. She lost because Trump isn’t popular in suburbia, and this state has a ton of people living in the suburbs. Trump got the gop smacked this election in the same way that blowback against Obama hurt the Dems in 2010/2014.",Colorsinthevoid45,e9mhebu,conservative
"McSally might not have run the perfect campaign, but she was a decent candidate. How the hell was the GOP going to turn down the first female jet fighter pilot?

The bigger problem is Arizona is a purple state.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9mjpb9,conservative
"I 100% don't believe Levin on this one. I live in AZ McSally tied herself to just about every red person she could, our more prominent conservatives, even Trump.  ",mbarnar,e9m9lf5,conservative
"Learn the truth. Don't listen to levine. He is a snake oil salesman.  She embrased trump, he endorsed her in the primary.   Its a bummer she lost, but attacking her is wrong. ",hipsterdufus84,e9m6ehn,conservative
"Because suburban white voters, the former bedrock of the GOP coalition, don’t like Trump. It’s that simple. You can’t say the polls are fake anymore after last Tuesday.",Colorsinthevoid45,e9mhi2n,conservative
"> suburban whites with a college degree who bolted the party

Those indoctrinated by our Marxist schools and females so much wanting to do stuff ""that feels"" good and solves nothing.",optionhome,e9mgbi4,conservative
Not gonna happen with Levin. Not his biggest fan but conservatives are starting to realize just how weak the GOP leadership is and the fact that McSally is in Arizona and was chosen by that weak leadership is a major red flag. ,Rightquercusalba,e9m8ukx,conservative
I agree.  I enjoy listening to Levin every once in a while but his show would be a no for me if I was campaigning. ,Anklebender91,e9ma2k3,conservative
lol embrace trumps agenda. As if they guy who wants to keep large parts of the aca in place and has flip flopped on every issue isn’t a rino ,MegaBlastoise23,e9m9e4d,conservative
"That's what it seems like to me. This doesn't seem so much as a blue wave, but some deeply flawed rupublican candidates ",molon-labe7,e9m3kt4,conservative
McSally got 54% of the primary vote.   Ward+Arpaio's vote didn't come close. ,LordOfTheDerp,e9mwy7k,conservative
"Oh I don't doubt the ""she didn't wanna go on his show"" part.. it's the ""didn't want to be tied to conservatives"" part I doubt.  She often campaigned with some of the more prominent conservatives in the state.

",mbarnar,e9m9fbm,conservative
What happened to Bill Whittle?,evesea,e9mpltc,conservative
"What's controversial about Levin that's not also true of Trump? I don't listen to Levin that often, and he's a little too ""angry"" for my taste, but he's vanilla compared to Trump. Why meet with Trump but not get free press by coming on Levin show?",TangoFoxtr0t,e9mjl8v,conservative
Rolled over so soon? She didn't concede till 5 days after the election and the GOP is currently suing the state lol,mbarnar,e9m9hcs,conservative
she was a terrible candidate and her name is stupid ,Manchurainprez,e9mvblk,conservative
"Losing to a woman who called her home state a political ""meth lab"" and demonstrated sympathies to the Taliban is a pretty strong indictment on your level of competence as a candidate.",GameShowWerewolf,e9n0t3f,conservative
"Mark Levin doesn't pull punches, he is one of the most honorable men in the media and a genius! Unless you are were there dont believe the bs, she was a #neverTrumper all the way!",CulpeppperInaMinute,e9mcuw0,conservative
I didn't realize.  Thanks.  Do you have a source on this?,trendyweather,e9m8i7c,conservative
[removed],,e9m93fp,conservative
That demographic went strongly for Romney six years ago so I don’t buy this.,Colorsinthevoid45,e9mhjav,conservative
"Well you need their vote for power.

You can either submit to that reality and adress their wants and needs or submit to Pelosi as speaker and a possible democratic trifecta in DC come 2020. 

What are you going to do when the votes just aren't there. ",memberCP,e9mye8p,conservative
"> weak the GOP leadership is and the fact that McSally is in Arizona and was chosen by that weak leadership is a major red flag.


You're ridiculous.   Voters picked McSally overwhelmingly in the primary.  McSally crushed Ward 54.6% to 27.6%.   Even if you gave Ward 100% of Arpaio's votes she still would have only gotten 45% of the vote. ",LordOfTheDerp,e9mwkle,conservative
He's snobby and elitist as shit.  ,LordOfTheDerp,e9mwq0o,conservative
"> they guy who wants to keep large parts of the aca 

He wants a free market solution that will actually lower costs and get government out of it.  But you wouldn't know that spending most of your day in the leftist echo chambers.",optionhome,e9m9j7r,conservative
"She was down in some polls by 8 points prior to the election., She was not a flawed candidate but could not overcome certain national headwinds against her. ",memberCP,e9mcx35,conservative
We lost 40 seats in the house.  The amount of denial in this place is frustrating. ,hipsterdufus84,e9m61kv,conservative
He was ostracized and denounced  from a campaign for expressing conservative views. ,WhoIsHarlequin,e9msf05,conservative
A lot of Republicans distanced themselves from trump but you can only distance yourself so far from the president. ,WhoIsHarlequin,e9mo0vt,conservative
"Yup. She already congratulated her opponent on the win. Such virtue! Guess what, she doesn't benefit one single bit from taking the high road when Democrats nationwide are currently trying to downplay or are completely ignoring the scandal in Florida. That takes the spotlight off of Florida and election fraud whether she understands it or not. 

Guess what, Republican voters nationwide are starting to pay attention and we need GOP candidates leadership to take a stand. That means standing firm until these issues are addressed rather than being ignored. Now Democrats get to take their victory lap in Arizona and can now focus their energy on defending the Florida corruption.

 Every candidate that lost after new votes were found in Democrat heavy districts should have raised hell because this is a trend and whether actual vote tampering or illegal votes occurred or not can never be determined unless we force them to answer for these disturbing trends.",Rightquercusalba,e9me8s0,conservative
Link to the lawsuit info?,Zac1245,e9msebs,conservative
She had a D next to her name. A large portion of voters wanted someone to be a bulwark against Trump. That is what is matters in a hyperpartisan age. ,memberCP,e9n2sqr,conservative
Im actually mistaken. He didnt endorse during the primary.  She ran ads linking herself to trump.  Trump endorsed her after she won.  ,hipsterdufus84,e9m8r3y,conservative
"No, he doesn't. ",Rightquercusalba,e9m9401,conservative
https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.realclearpolitics.com/articles/2018/08/23/arizona_senate_candidates_pine_for_trump_endorsement_137874.amp.html,hipsterdufus84,e9m92vp,conservative
Yea that doesn't fly anymore. Trump has been way more conservative than people thought and at this point he has a track record to back it up. ,Natetendo83,e9meke7,conservative
Sure but these days that's a good indicator you have a conservative candidate. ,latotokyo123,e9ma1f8,conservative
Well trump isnt a conservate either so..  ,hipsterdufus84,e9m94nd,conservative
"The suburbs went more for Trump than for Romney lmao. 

https://www.forbes.com/sites/joelkotkin/2016/11/22/donald-trump-clinton-rural-suburbs/amp/",latotokyo123,e9ngh3e,conservative
"Funny how voters are always given choices between losers, McSally is a literal loser, Flake and McCain won their elections and yet I wouldn't call them winners for GOP voters. ",Rightquercusalba,e9mx7ji,conservative
"Called the repeal mean


https://www.cnn.com/2017/06/25/politics/donald-trump-confirms-mean-health-care/index.html

Wants pre existing condition coverage

https://www.cnbc.com/2018/10/19/trump-says-he-backs-pre-existing-conditions-coverage-his-actions-say-no.html

Said he will always cover pre existing conditions 

https://www.factcheck.org/2018/10/trump-misleads-on-preexisting-conditions/

That’s not free market",MegaBlastoise23,e9m9ofu,conservative
He has no idea what he wants and this is pretty obvious. ,Colorsinthevoid45,e9mhkxm,conservative
"Yes, and what is the typical trend for midterms with a first term president? Widen you're scope a bit. Some of these losses were inevitable. Some of our wins were close. All of it was within relatively normal trends. ",molon-labe7,e9m6599,conservative
They [settled](http://ktar.com/story/2305068/arizona-gop-looks-like-sore-losers-for-vote-challenge-political-expert-says/) one lawsuit and are filing complaints about the Maricopa county [recorder](http://ktar.com/story/2299990/arizona-gop-claims-maricopa-county-destroyed-some-voting-evidence/),mbarnar,e9msryq,conservative
[removed],,e9mhbip,conservative
"White, college educated voters as a % voted more for Romney than Trump. That article doesn’t disprove this.",Colorsinthevoid45,e9noptx,conservative
No one is stopping anyone from running in a primary.  White suburban voters will swing the election in AZ.  This year the candidates didn't speak to the white college educated voters as much as they needed to. ,LordOfTheDerp,e9mxxkw,conservative
"Yeah that's true.  But the people in the sub acting like only pro trump people won and anti trump people lost is not only wrong, its a terrible conclusion to make going forward.  ",hipsterdufus84,e9m67ud,conservative
"Yeah I was pretty sure the one lawsuit was settled. Cause the comment I replied to acted they were sill putting up a fight. McSally concedes, tells Sinema good luck. It’s over with. Meanwhile in GA and FL dem candidates continue to fight. ",Zac1245,e9msxes,conservative
"Um...he needs Congress to touch entitlements. He can't just wipe it away on a whim. 

>ignores the most crucial aspect

Maybe for you. I'm a big fan of his deregulation, his SCOTUS picks, his tax cuts, his foreign policy, and a slew of other things. I would love to cut entitlements (so would he, buy the way) but doing that requires a Congress that would actually be willing to do so. ",Natetendo83,e9miyi9,conservative
"So easy for you to spew this behind your keyboard as if you wouldn't piss your pants when the political shitstorm that comes with entitlement cuts hits. 24/7 cable news networks running stories of 80 year old frail black ladies losing their medicare coverage because of the evil GOP sound good to you? You'd be the first person on here bitching about how it wasn't done correctly, I'm sure. There is a lot of ground to be made up, mostly due to shit tier congressional republicans, before you can even begin to blame Trump for something like that a mere 2 years in. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9mm4nb,conservative
"You talked about suburban white voters overall too. Are you denying that? Seems more important than talking about educational attainment here, plenty of people live in the suburbs. 
",latotokyo123,e9nt896,conservative
"That's like saying anyone can run for president. Trump only stood a chance because he had name recognition and didn't need the GOP establishments support. The same is true for Senators, unless they are self funded or have major name recognition they don't stand a chance. ",Rightquercusalba,e9n4o9k,conservative
"I agree with you, actually. I still think that mudslinging is the wrong move. It doesn't help that she distanced herself from conservatives. So her potentially motivated she wants no apart of and alienates the middle by mudslinging. Bad all around. ",molon-labe7,e9m7671,conservative
"Something like 8/11 people he stumped for, won. It would've been 9 but Manchin broke stride out of necessity and voted 'yes' for Kavanaugh. Trump moves the needle, and any candidates who have half a brain and should wave his flag in the future. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9mmli4,conservative
"There's only so much McSally can do in AZ though because it's not like Florida. They're not finding truckloads of provisional ballots anywhere.

The only thing in AZ is statistical oddities so unless there's something going on behind the scenes any McSally ""fighting"" is seen as sour grapes.

Not to mention she will probably take Kyls seat when he retires, so she needs to maintain a level of composure to stay in the discussion for that spot.

It's not like FL or GA where they're finding truckloads of ballots all over the place, can't compare the two.",mbarnar,e9mvrzt,conservative
"> deregulation, his SCOTUS picks... his foreign policy,

Literally the only things he can do unilaterally have all been conservative except for tariffs. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9myrlr,conservative
"He repeatedly said during the campaign that he would “not touch entitlements” when other candidates were campaigning on it. He’s the president, cry me a river about how tough it is for him. He’s not going to be the one hearing the burden of this staggering debt. All people of working age now will be dealing with this in 10-20 years and there will be massive tax increases.

He hasn’t ever tried to alert Americans or change the narrative surrounding this debt, he simply doesn’t care. Congress bears some blame too but Paul Ryan actually wanted to reform entitlements and Trump shut him down. I know that’s not trendy to acknowledge ere but it is a fact that Ryan wanted entitlement reform and Trump didn’t.",Colorsinthevoid45,e9mrqgp,conservative
"This is true, I didn’t realize this. If anything, that rebutts the talking point that Marxist indoctrination is the reason educated voters/the suburbs went blue this election. 
",Colorsinthevoid45,e9okafs,conservative
She didn't distance herself from conservatives at all. Quit making up shit you don't know about.  Unless you have some sources that us Arizona residents don't because she campaigned side by side with all the major conservatives in this state.,mbarnar,e9m9o8k,conservative
"Yeah. The candidates in red states embrased him.  We would have won IN, ND, MO regardless how he campaigned. He was a liabilty in most places outside red states. ",hipsterdufus84,e9mp457,conservative
Isnt stopping people on this sub from comparing the two and downvoting me when I say they are different lol.,Zac1245,e9mwp2w,conservative
"Easy for Ryan (a professional loser) to say whatever he wants from his position. Trump was commandeering the working class base abandoned by Dems in 08/12, so to campaign on entitlement reform would've been literal suicide. And that if he is going to work on it, it would be the most standard 2nd term issue on the planet. I like how you don't even understand this, yet can speak on Trump's inner most thoughts/what he cares about. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9msl2r,conservative
That argument isn't completely false though. Trump has not lost the suburbs because of a midterm when he's gained more than Romney in the suburbs.,latotokyo123,e9omtql,conservative
"Dude, literally look at the article we're commenting on. Chill out and don't react so insanely. ",molon-labe7,e9m9tn5,conservative
Oh so you can argue we would've won in red states and then turn around and say we wouldn't have lost anyway in blue states? Lmao not even a decent concern troll. ,AmericanYidGunner,e9mpbpg,conservative
"haha I feel ya, a lot of people on this sub don't understand the first thing about our state's political situation, but that won't stop them from acting like they're experts on it lol.",mbarnar,e9mxjf2,conservative
"He gained in 16, but the GOP did bad in suburbia in 18. The exit polls showed a lot more people cast their vote to show opposition to Trump rather than support for him. So yes, he’s lost ground since 2016. 

More realistically though, suburban voters probably just saw him as a lesser of two evils when he ran against Hillary. Now that she’s off the ticket and he’s a stand-alone candidate, the moderates who held their nose and voted Trump are voting for modern Democrats. He may be able to win those people back in 20 if Dems nominate another nutjob candidate.",Colorsinthevoid45,e9onlpk,conservative
Im saying giving trump credit for campaigning in indiana and north dakota is silly.  ,hipsterdufus84,e9mpgho,conservative
"Yeah, AZ is an odd state at times. I mean Janet Napolitano was governor at one point lol",Zac1245,e9mxptm,conservative
"Dems targeted both races as ones they thought they could win. The only silly troll here is you, m8. 

https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/first-read/yes-democrats-do-have-legitimate-path-win-back-senate-n907446",AmericanYidGunner,e9mqc5m,conservative
Yes. Im a Republican trolling someonenwho doesnt understand politics. ,hipsterdufus84,e9mqvn7,conservative
"Nice argument, low IQ concern troll. Crazy how you seem to be so whipped up about politics after having only garnered less than 4k karma in 5 years. Makes sense why you don't talk so much since you obviously are incapable of clicking a link and reading to find out you're objectively wrong. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9mrdr2,conservative
How?,Enzo_SAWFT,e9n6p70,conservative
Hey hack we’ve seen that trick already. Get stepping.,Willie1Eye,e9n5q2a,conservative
"Damn someone should've told me, I should be more afraid",TRKillShot,e9n611x,conservative
If we keep calling him racist than it must be true!,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9ndnq7,conservative
Ignorant hyperbole is best hyperbole,BeachCruisin22,e9n6ojk,conservative
"Lol, he never passes up the chance to be an ignorant twat.",BrighamYoung,e9njbln,conservative
I must of missed that announcement.  /s ,ozric101,e9n5ify,conservative
"Pay your taxes, deadbeat.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9n9cfp,conservative
"If you mean by ""declaring war minority unemployment,"" then you'd be correct.

If you mean that minorities feel attacked by Trump, then it's all in their heads. They believe their own delusions.",Sideswipe0009,e9nwmkm,conservative
"But resist we much.  We must, and we will much, about that, be committed
-Al Sharpton",BrockLee76,e9nw2x5,conservative
By giving them a choice other than the race hustlers like Sharpton and the Dems.,road_warrior_1,e9n99e3,conservative
"They can never explain.

The best they cite is something like how his father was once unsuccessfully sued for housing discrimination fifty years ago.",Telineye,e9ncsby,conservative
All corruption is local to somebody. ,ozric101,e9nyd6k,conservative
"God-fucking-damn it, Florida! Get your shit together already!",unibuckeye,e9m1n8e,conservative
Post this to not the onion. The news subs aren't listening but maybe they will. ,AgrosLastRide,e9m6n4i,conservative
Thought this was a Babylon Bee article at first...,Zac1245,e9llxhv,conservative
How the hell are boxes of provisional ballots just popping up everywhere now? It’s like the meme is real ,i_floop_the_pig,e9m3lrw,conservative
Before the end of the week I’m expecting a box of Florida ballots to mysteriously appear in Detroit.,dasiba,e9m6ddf,conservative
"I thought it was just incompetence and then this:

>Then a “bomb threat” was called in shortly after.

Got to wonder if this was called in to give someone time to remove specific types of votes from the box or if they were known to be Republican votes and someone thought the bomb squad would just blow them up without opening the box. Whatever the case there is some planned and intentional fuckery going on.",FuriousChef,e9m2b80,conservative
This brings up the question of proper custody. Here you have an example of ballots with no proper custody being reported as a suspicious package. They need to go through all of those votes and show an unbroken chain of custody for those ballots they wished to count after the deadline.,Lepew1,e9mddjd,conservative
"I mean, a box of ballots showing up at the FL Airport is pretty suspicious. I'm suspicious that whoever handled it was either grossly incompetent or trying to tamper with the election.",nateious,e9mah04,conservative
"Step 1: Dump Republican votes into random dumpster

Step 2: Return rental car

Step 3: Win election?",PerceivedShift,e9m5is6,conservative
100% Democrat voting no doubt.,Notalent13,e9lyc9a,conservative
blank ballots that have disappeared then reappear all filled out,anonymau5,e9m85nh,conservative
Hahaha,Okchud,e9m5foz,conservative
I was playing Zelda and I broke a vase and I got provisional ballots. ,yeroldpappy,e9nnt43,conservative
We tryin ,Smackwhales,e9m6o3v,conservative
I tried and my post inexplicably failed. You should try.,ajamesmccarthy,e9mc4gj,conservative
"Hah good one, that sub is just /politics for funny titles now.",Dyeredit,e9mjfmd,conservative
Same,Scaria95,e9lwdah,conservative
"I feel like Florida is always a shit show, but because the count is so close this election it's getting much more attention. If the GOP was a couple % points ahead then the provisional ballots might not be counted at all. But now that they matter everyone's looking for them.... and finding them in some interesting places.",ragingcelery,e9mp7kt,conservative
We need accountability on all of this,SuperMarioKartWinner,e9mjseo,conservative
I have to teach tonight. You better believe I'm checking my trunk for ballots.,shinypretty,e9mfm8o,conservative
"[i'll take it from here, boys](https://www.sott.net/image/s22/452058/full/0000000000000000000000000_52_6.jpg)",anonymau5,e9m89x0,conservative
"Never attribute malice to what can reasonably be explained as stupidity.

This *is* Florida, after all.",unibuckeye,e9n7ns9,conservative
But are you really? ,TheMongoose101,e9mlf50,conservative
">inexplicably 

I think we all know the reason haha",stanleythemanley44,e9nbkzr,conservative
\#MeToo,cons_NC,e9m7jhv,conservative
I’d agree if it weren’t for the fact someone called in a bomb threat on the package. ,FuriousChef,e9nhayd,conservative
That's the stupidity.,unibuckeye,e9ni1r7,conservative
"Looks like the author of this piece buys into the Democratic propaganda that when Trump calls out the media for bias and fake news, he is challenging the media in general and not specifically the fake news and bias. He said that directly in the Acosta confrontation. Something to the effect when you report fake news, you are the enemy of the people.  Reason is trying to position itself as the sane middleman, equivocating both sides as undefendable. Here they could find an ally with Trump by standing with him and against fake news.

Who reported on Aveneti's client with allegations of Kavanaugh in sexual trains and doping women? Fake news. That did direct damage to Kavanaugh, and riled up the public. We saw many in the public behaving badly thinking Kavanaugh would be some kind of beast. The only come to sanity moment occurred when Collins had her floor speech in which she went through Kavanaugh's record. Slowly Collins stripped away the propaganda press and showed Kavanaugh to be defendable on his own record, and since that time many on the left have been 'surprised' by how sensibly Kavanaugh has conducted himself on the court.

This fake news does gross public disservice by amping up emotions over reasons, and it is indeed the enemy of the people because it drives up unrest, and makes it harder to find a middle ground. Fake news like this is similar to inciting riot with free speech. ",Lepew1,e9me6l6,conservative
The only way to make control of government stop mattering so much is to greatly reduce the power of government. ,No1Buck,e9m2bbx,conservative
"It really is frightening. Sure, it's bad enough that people are still supporting the Democrat party while they're openly returning to their 1960s-style thuggery, but something about all of this just doesn't seem right. What are the statistical chances of the results the night after the election being *this* wrong? I don't think the cheating is limited to Broward County, I think it may be far more widespread than that. Someone gets one unlikely turn around, you don't bat an eye. This is over a dozen unlikely reversals that just seem far too... Convenient, especially coming from the party that fears voter IDs bringing fraud to light.",MarioFanaticXV,e9ocj54,conservative
this deputy is not coming down for breakfast,virtualmitch101,e9mh8yx,conservative
Fake news,themarshman721,e9ogjwu,conservative
"Huge, if true.",johndeer89,e9ngsj6,conservative
Their entanglement with authoritarian government progressives is essentially fascism.,BrighamYoung,e9nfj37,conservative
"I am an avid listener to Doc Thompson's MOJO 5.0 you can get that on iheart radio, stitcher, Spotify etc. I also love Pat Unleashed on the blaze. They have a lot of humor and they involve the audience with Twitter and MeWe. If your wanting a lot of numbers and stuff, The Wonderful World of Stu can be found on the blaze and I've seen some on YouTube. That's not a pod cast, it's a show. The Conservative Cartel is found on MOJO 5.0. And then there's the biggies like Glenn Beck, Rush Limbaugh, Mark Levin, and Sean Hannity that's on the radio. I'm assuming you can find those guys pretty easily. ",AttackYuuki,e9ng83r,conservative
"For political commentary podcasts, I'm a big fan of Steven Crowder, Dan Bongino, and Buck Sexton. Steven is hilarious and his show includes a lot of comedy. Dan Bongino is a former Secret Service agent, and I like his style. He also did an AMA in this sub. Buck Sexton is a former CIA analyst, so he sometimes has a unique perspective on world events. ",GuitarWizard90,e9ngdux,conservative
"Don’t forget The Ben Shapiro Show, the Andrew Klavan Show, and the Michael Knowles show, all of which are free on iTunes podcasts ",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9nip4v,conservative
"It sounds like you enjoy cerebral, policy-oriented podcasts. In that case, I highly recommend The Conservative Conscience with Daniel Horowitz who is pretty much the best at talking about policy.

My personal favorite podcast is the Andrew Klavan Show. He has the reasoned tone you are looking for and is also very funny. He is a fiction writer by trade and is usually looking at things from an arts and culture perspective.

My next favorite is Mark Levin, whose radio show is available in podcast form as the Mark Levin Audio Rewind. Levin is excellent. He is, in my opinion, the foremost constitutional scholar in the world today. The only thing about Mark is he gets very fired up and yells a lot which isn’t for everyone, but if you can get past that, he is incredibly good. You will learn a tremendous amount from his show and you will be the best-prepared person in the room on almost any political topic. I know you said you listened to Hannity and Rush for years and that they were a little much for you these days so you may have the same problem with Levin, but Levin is on another level as far as his intellect. No disrespect to those guys, I love them too, but Levin is really worth your time and brings something unique to the table.

Buck Sexton is very good and reasonable. He has a few podcasts, the Buck Sexton Show is the one you want.

Michael Knowles is very funny, I really love him.

Ben Shapiro, I personally don’t enjoy him as much as the others but he may be up your alley.

Dan Bongino is great... he has a different kind of style, kind of more of a blue-collar appeal while also being very informative. I really enjoy Dan, but he has an annoying habit of slowing down his show for the lowest common denominator too frequently.

The Larry O’Connor snow is great, he has a very reasonable tone. The only problem with his podcast is for some reason he leaves in all of the radio show commercials which is quite annoying. But the show itself is great if you don’t mind skipping through that stuff.

For something a little different I highly recommend checking out No Agenda with Adam Curry and John C. Dvorak. It’s not exactly a conservative podcast, more of a media deconstruction podcast that leans conservative.

Last but not least, for something also not conservative but great and educational, I highly recommend Dan Carlin’s Hardcore History.",hello_japan,e9od8e4,conservative
There is a great radio show on the west coast that puts their show on a podcast to download.  Check out Armstrong and Getty.  They are libertarian and often get back to back texts by people angry at them for being too pro Trump and too anti Trump.  ,BrockLee76,e9nvr3a,conservative
"I spent years listening to Rush and Sean Hannity. I think they're a little too loud and emotional for my taste, but mostly I think I'm looking for analysis instead of opinion.. Thanks for your suggestions!",M_T_ToeShoes,e9nhu19,conservative
"I second Bongino. He’s great, very grounded and easy to listen to. Crowder is funny mostly but he can get stale.  
  
I haven’t heard Buck Sexton though. I’ll check him out. Based on your other suggestions, I think I’d like him.",jina100,e9nyw4k,conservative
https://bongino.com/,Rightquercusalba,e9o897w,conservative
"I love the bee and r/conservative. I get to play the ""is it real or is it the bee"" on almost every post! 

I called this one! ",Cr8er,e9n6niw,conservative
PLEASE RUN AGAIN,BundyPolkHigh33,e9moldf,conservative
"So.... Florida passed those new BI-partisan voting laws after the Bush v Gore case,
and now all these many years later those counties can not abide by it....    
    
I am sorry but State Law IS State Law, mail in votes that arrived after the deadline are NOT legal votes.",ozric101,e9mx5zh,conservative
And here we go again...fresh off the midterms,abuigues,e9mmgct,conservative
And how many involve Russian collusion?,BeachCruisin22,e9meojl,conservative
"Imagine being so redundant that you have to put innocent people on trial to justify the money spent on your job.

Bob Mueller's investigation is a sham and it's time to stop this witch-hunt.",TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9miw7h,conservative
"A bunch of procedural crimes and unrelated financail shenangians by 4th adn 5th tier government officials. 

End this nonsense. ",Manchurainprez,e9mvf9o,conservative
That dude is still around?,Sketch_Crush,e9meviq,conservative
Yawn. He is boring. ,mods_blow_goats,e9mg9m7,conservative
Maybe Russian dressing. Investigate all salad bars! ,Rightquercusalba,e9mq2d5,conservative
"Now, now. So far exactly one guy has been put on trial by Mueller's team, and he sure seemed pretty damned guilty to me.",GorathThorgath,e9n3h6a,conservative
"What's the difference between the two candidates? Will this actually matter?

Also, who the hell doesn't know their own birthday or can't write their own birthday. I get that there are people who might have problems, but it is, at most, 8 number all of which are grouped mm/dd/yyyy. ",molon-labe7,e9n3mov,conservative
No way she wins without fraud. Diff like 60k votes,ReaganTroll,e9n7r4r,conservative
"This issue isn't whether or not she will win. That is mathematically impossible. In GA you need >50% of the vote to win outright. If no candidate has this then we will have a runoff on December 4th. She needs about 26,000 votes to bring him below 50%. She is pushing for a runoff situation.",yllwjacket,e9nfsif,conservative
"Yeah, because that would go down so well with Arizonan voters.

McSally looked like such a good candidate, but it turns out she had a spectacularly shit campaign.",GorathThorgath,e9mk4r6,conservative
Yeah cause putting a candidate in his place that just rolled over and didn't fight is a great idea. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9mj9g6,conservative
"Yeah, but that's what losers do...",ReaganTroll,e9mi9vh,conservative
Why should we care about her? She had one job in a generally Republican state and blew it.,SickofInternetProgs,e9mz33j,conservative
This article's tone sounds just like the deranged and oblivious December 2016 Hillary articles.,SickofInternetProgs,e9mz6qu,conservative
"It actually wouldn't look too bad for Arizona voters, McSally got more votes in a midterm than Trump got in a presidential election.

She's clearly popular here, just slightly less than Sinema",mbarnar,e9mmi8x,conservative
"It's so funny to see all you non-Arizonan's pretend like you care about our election for like 3 days around November 8th, and then when it doesn't go your way you start spewing off bullshit when in reality you have no clue what you're talking about.",mbarnar,e9mn51b,conservative
"So, Arizona is full of economic illiterates who like Sinema?",MigzMando,e9mna4a,conservative
"It effects us all, I don't think you should want some milquetoast candidate, but if that's truly what you want then so be it, we get Sinema for 6 years to deal with because you turned a blind eye to it. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9mnp9g,conservative
"Sinema's an empty dress - just like the news-readers that basically ran her advertising campaign for her out of the local NBC, ABC, and CBS affiliates. 

We like to pretend people didn't vote based on appearance but it really does happen.",kaioto,e9mo84u,conservative
[removed],,e9mnqak,conservative
[removed],,e9mnzqd,conservative
You seem like the one who needs a break from the internet.,hello_japan,e9mv66p,conservative
I'm just partway through this and it's very good. I think it's an apt assessment. I hope we can learn from this before 2020.,jina100,e9nkozc,conservative
">In this episode Dan addresses the electoral disaster in Arizona and the warning signs that were missed. He also addresses the continued Democratic Party attacks on Matt Whitaker and the reasons behind the attacks. Finally, he address economic warning signs that could cost us everything in the 2020 election.



",Rightquercusalba,e9nj8t7,conservative
I just don’t buy the argument that Voters want to set their house on fire to punish the alarm system for malfunctioning. ,the-divine-comedy,e9nudkl,conservative
">Economic warning signs

Now that the Democrats hold the house it makes it harder for them to run against any economic down fall if they play their obstruction game",Enzo_SAWFT,e9nvazd,conservative
People also aren’t too pleased with a Party that brands itself as fiscally conservative but put out a Trillion dollar deficit ,SilentKiwi23,e9nlm00,conservative
"The war is with Wall St. and the FED, the street wants to keep cheap money and the FED want to raise interest rates.  You can take whatever side you like, but there is a cost to both positions.
     
>""The Great Depression, like most other periods of severe unemployment, was produced by government mismanagement rather than by any inherent instability of the private economy."" 
   
— Milton Friedman      ",ozric101,e9nxylj,conservative
Definitely not going to disagree there. It’s out of control.,jina100,e9nls7u,conservative
Yeah so let’s put in the people who will make it 50 trillion. Sounds smart.,the-divine-comedy,e9ntfde,conservative
"Ha, right?!",jina100,e9nvmj5,conservative
"I’m surprised they aren’t attacking him for being on Fox News a couple weeks ago talking about his new film and his experiences working with real submarine officers to research for the role. 
",YankeeBlues21,e9lnzr0,conservative
"Its the same way on Reddit. If you give any opinion, statement or argument that leftists don't like, instead of answering your post head on, some dipshit will go into your post history to see if there is anything you've said in the past they can attack easier to discredit you and make a reply saying, ""Don't listen to this guy, he posts in r/The_Donald or r/Conservative""

They can't attack ideas, so they attack the people expressing the ideas.",GoldenShadowGS,e9m4fkx,conservative
His house burned down and he's getting tossed under the progressive narrative bus. That's a shitty week for him. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9m91z4,conservative
"This subreddit was very noble in how we heard about Ruth Bader Ginsberg's health issues lately. It drives me nuts when I read shit about how:

""I feel I am very moderate and even voted Republican in many elections.  Then I visited r/conservative and I read things that I thought made me not belong at all, I felt very uncomfortable.""

I always come right at these assholes and ask them, what in particular made you feel like you did not belong?  I **never** hear an answer.

&#x200B;

EDIT: most recent

[https://www.reddit.com/r/The\_Mueller/comments/9txdk3/1000\_correct/e92etci/?context=3](https://www.reddit.com/r/The_Mueller/comments/9txdk3/1000_correct/e92etci/?context=3)",nonamenoslogans2,e9lo7b1,conservative
"Whenever there is ""outrage"" or a group is ""slamming"" someone, 9 times out of 10 it's less than a dozen people just posting one-liners on twitter. I doubt even the people posting even thought about this for more than a single minute.",Bilxor,e9myrqb,conservative
"Is it really because of his support for Israel, or because he has more money than them? ",Sideswipe0009,e9m4fqf,conservative
I think he’s going to be ok.,ColdShowerThoughts,e9m8n1g,conservative
"It is really hard calling yourself the party of tolerance and giving shelter to such hate. Democrats should stand up and denounce those who wish tragedy upon political opponents. It would help set a line for acceptable behavior, and reinforce decency. ",Lepew1,e9meuuu,conservative
And yet they still deny that liberalism is a mental disorder. ,COKETFM,e9lzkpy,conservative
His piles of cash will comfort him. ,theeagle1,e9mqqnq,conservative
"Just throwing it out there, here in California, when wild fires occur, all of us pull together, regardless of party, or any other division. We are still American. ",tucotemerarious,e9nuiim,conservative
Mostly not that bothered about this cuz Gerard might have the coin to be sweet even if his house was destroyed ?,92brickkks,e9m9tqh,conservative
I doubt he gives a shit about the progressives right now ,Gorillagodzilla,e9mf7eb,conservative
"“r/Tuesday is the real conservative sub”

Uhhhh. Tuesday is a place where liberals can go to complain that they’d vote for Republicans and conservatives, if only they’d change their policy to the Democrat parties policy. ",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9m79vj,conservative
"I'd recommend getting off the internet. As a Californian who's seems to evacuate every year now due to fire, no one in the real world is saying this shit, just people far away arguing over some political point that has no tangible significance to the catastrophe at hand. I live 10 miles from Paradise where an elderly and conservative community was lucky to escape with their lives. Everyone is donating, everyone is volunteering, no one asks who anyone has voted for. Tragedy like this brings us together. Mudslinging doesn't do anyone any good. We're all still American, I can't believe this shit has to be repeated. ",tucotemerarious,e9ndfjk,conservative
[removed],,e9lx0fk,conservative
I don’t understand. People visit r/conservative and don’t agree with your views or opinions so it makes them uncomfortable. Why are they assholes for that?,H_crassicornis,e9ly8bh,conservative
Almost all of the elitists at the top of their hierarchy have way more money than they do. ,skarface6,e9mgbul,conservative
It’s not hard if you lack honest introspection.,skarface6,e9mgftw,conservative
"????

That’s a little far fetched isn’t it? ",kirrillik,e9n6hcg,conservative
Exactly. Its a sub for concern trolls and people pretending to be right wing while actually pushing leftist ideologies. And it's also filled with never Trumpers who would rather see the Dems win than see the repubs win under Trump. ,LumpyWumpus,e9m964b,conservative
/r/tuesday is a real conservative sub in the same way that /r/menslib is a real men's advocacy sub and /r/trees is a real horticulture sub.,111122223138,e9mq6id,conservative
"I'd say both honestly. If I wasn't 18 and having to save money for the drop in work in January, I'd donate to both the fire department and Isreal",Dawnrising12,e9m6zor,conservative
Because they never highlight a particular thing maybe? It's like you're preprogrammed to be uncomfortable because you don't know.,Spysix,e9m3vhk,conservative
I meant it to be taken as humorous sarcasm ,COKETFM,e9na0kv,conservative
Thoroughly irresponsible.  That statement alone should get him relieved of his job as a journalist.,thatrightwinger,e9nmq4g,conservative
"I think the coup has been going on for two years now. Who would he order a ""Coup"" against? ",StillANNONin,e9nn9l6,conservative
That's not how military coups work ,searanger62,e9nnwb9,conservative
These people are so obsessed with bashing Trump that they just don't even bother making sense anymore. Who would he be mounting a coup against?... It's so ridiculous.,mastaxn,e9nuo03,conservative
Projecting their yet unrealized fantasies onto Trump.,MisterMouser,e9ntpz5,conservative
"It's a type of coup called a [self-coup](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Self-coup) or autocoup. It's ridiculous to suggest that Trump would do such a thing, though.",PubliusVA,e9o8lvx,conservative
lol like there was ever a doubt. ,iwasthebeaver,e9n880j,conservative
Did anyone actually believe her? ,soxfan90,e9nf7wl,conservative
AZ you got played and played hard and you should have seen it. ,Zac1245,e9nci1f,conservative
Arizona did apparently. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9o76v6,conservative
"Republicans need to stop being so fucking lazy. I'm talking about politicians that play it safe safe, cozy up with establishment Republicans and get lazy with negative  attack ads that are not supported with positive messages and boots on the ground campaigning to energize the base. McSally played not to lose rather than playing to win. Check out Dan Bongino's latest podcast on this issue. Couple that with what Mark Levin said about McSally.

http://pitbulldogbreed.com/mark-levin-says-mcsally-refused-to-go-on-his-show-didnt-want-to-be-tied-to-conservatives/

Pardon the source. But the point is pretty clear. McSally was a Nevertrumper, the Republican governor got more votes than her, he was an early supporter of Trump. Republicans either voted for her opponent or they didn't vote for McSally. That's insane. Trump Republicans are the only ones who stand a chance in close elections. 
",Rightquercusalba,e9nlsqu,conservative
"Or more likely, they didn't care",soxfan90,e9ofo2e,conservative
You have to love how they now admit they are cheating in full view of everyone and still nothing happens.,the-divine-comedy,e9n1s83,conservative
SCOTUS hurry up! Stop this like in 2000.,spfldnet,e9n176i,conservative
"Mark my words, they're going to steal Florida, and then they're going to find a way to steal the runoff in Mississippi, taking the Senate.  

They're already running propaganda against Hyde-Smith.",Telineye,e9n4t0g,conservative
"Yea, thats exactly the point.",jac5,e9n60jb,conservative
They did not repeal and they got replaced.  /s ,ozric101,e9mzn7c,conservative
Government contracting has been one of the best way to get rich in the USA for a very long time. ,ozric101,e9mnda8,conservative
"Here's an idea.  Instead of giving sweetheart tax breaks to giant corporations, how about we just cut the taxes for *everyone* and stop spending so much money on stupid shit?",FelixFuckfurter,e9moo4h,conservative
Stupid shit like the military industrial complex?,MTrying2BEmpathetic,e9ms90m,conservative
Yuuuuuup.,GorathThorgath,e9n3qeh,conservative
This isn't a real lawsuit its just attention whoring and ratings seeking nonsense. ,Doran902,e9n37ct,conservative
"Oh boy, va’s court already fucked over Va-7 (Dave Brat’s district) in 2016.  I guess they want to screw the whole state over now.  ",XMAGA_1776X,e9mo145,conservative
"Virginia is done for. I’m glad I’m leaving next year. Gun control, minimum wage increases are not far off. ",Zac1245,e9mtdgn,conservative
"It's getting hard to run to anywhere else, I think I am going to have to move out of my state within 20 years or maybe sooner than that. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9nfgz3,conservative
What state is that?,Zac1245,e9ng2se,conservative
Texas,Havebaconwilltravel,e9nhioz,conservative
If we lose Texas I doubt we win a presidential election again. ,Zac1245,e9niyj1,conservative
Awww that’s a good doggo,NotUrAvrageFish,e9mm64a,conservative
"The Left's gains in the House and Senate are even more substantial than initially reported last Wednesday. This is not a good sign for Republicans going forward and could present a major problem for President Trump's 2nd term...if he wins re-election.

Something we should all note: the states where Hillary Clinton campaigned *the least* and where she lost were also the states Democrats focused on in 2018 -- Wisconsin, Pennsylvania, Michigan. They are stacking the deck for 2020 and that's not a good sign.",weeaboo_swordsman,e9mixzc,conservative
Sad day that someone like Sinema can win against a Hero like McSally. ,texanSTH,e9mcglw,conservative
What a joke. ,Lionstriker2,e9mcxhn,conservative
She’s pure class ,PhilippeLeBel,e9lzyw9,conservative
"Trump should have campaigned on the economy, and I'm really confused as to why he ignored that in favor of the caravan thing. ",LonelyMachines,e9navea,conservative
"McSally took way too much for granted all season. The GOPe ran her out and goaded Joe Arraipo into splitting the base so they could get her the nomination and then did what they usually do and did a half-ass job running to the middle with 100% of local media outside of talk-radio shilling for the Democrat. 

All props to McSally for her military service but her campaign was bad.",kaioto,e9mnu0y,conservative
[removed],,e9mmpr4,conservative
Quite the stark contrast against sinema.,Liberty_Pr1me,e9m7yqr,conservative
[removed],,e9mks68,conservative
Really? What's so bad about her? She is a Socialist. ,texanSTH,e9mqhne,conservative
"Yeah, Sinema is a pretty disgusting human being who's own words and actions speak volumes. How dare people republish her stupid pink tu-tu stunts that the Arizona Republic wants swept under the rug.",kaioto,e9mnong,conservative
Well and she thinks Arizona is a meth lab of democracy and that it's ok to join the Taliban. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9nfpka,conservative
"We won't need a physical wall *as much* if we can get this system installed at the border.  If everyone who gets close to the wall gets punched in the face with too much heat, I'm good with that.",thatrightwinger,e9ngk75,conservative
I thought that was just the friend zone AMIRITE BOIS,Epic_Penguin96,e9n3qno,conservative
"It’s more fascist than communist since they’ve switched to a market economy.

With absolute party control of nearly everything, this is the actual model for how leftist globalists want to run the entire world.",BrighamYoung,e9m98m2,conservative
"They'll maintain the appearance of democracy, but in reality the result will always be a globalist win.  They just need to keep the borders wide open to dilute the voting power of conservatives.",Reven1911,e9md3g4,conservative
"Yes, that's the problem when an ideaology is used to cover up another one.",goldrotmgonly,e9mkrou,conservative
"Will unlikely make it through the Senate, but good idea to keep an eye on a few of the questionable GOP folks.",cons_NC,e9mpnzl,conservative
"So, they're going to take on *two* causes the Supreme Court shot down in recent history.  And now, they have one very resentful Associate Justice who's going to hear challenges to their legislation.  OK. ",LonelyMachines,e9nb6fh,conservative
"It's definitely all that internalized misogyny at work, and not that women aren't some brainless monolith...🙄

I don't have to even use my brain to hear the sexists calling us ""gender traitors"", as if gender is something we must give ultimate authority over our lives.",Mewster1818,e9n6eat,conservative
Not satire. ,jestew,e9ljn4r,conservative
This one stung me a little too hard :(,bittnerator,e9lrmcs,conservative
Why is it marked satire? Its not like Trump or other leading Republicans are the bastions of western christianity,Mugiwaraluffy69,e9lzh25,conservative
Oof,KingOfTheP4s,e9lowyc,conservative
As a Christian myself I personally feel religion has no place in politics.,M6D_Magnum,e9m2yr9,conservative
Politics ain't going to quit being politics.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9m74du,conservative
"Liberals constantly rail against Christianity, And the practicing of such. How is choosing a religion, any different than choosing a sexuality? You were born a homosexual? Were you born a Christian? Or a Jew? Science has proved that born traits have nothing to do with sexual orientation or religious orientation, why do wile think sexual orientation *isnt* a choice?",Phillipinsocal,e9lvatg,conservative
I haven’t heard Republicans denouncing women who whore themselves out before marriage and demand all legal and social authority over their husbands.,JohnBravo9990,e9lkymh,conservative
"Anyone who defends women whoring themselves out before marriage and having absolute legal power over her husband in court is not a Christian.

Stop pretending.",JohnBravo9990,e9mmezf,conservative
All hail the mighty lobster king. 🦐,manstanband,e9lsuit,conservative
"Trump is as Christian as the Dali Lama.  I think he likes the traditions of Christianity, but no, nothing in the way he's lived his life would give anyone the impression that he actually cares about it.  ",Speedking2281,e9n68xh,conservative
People can vote according to their Christian Morals though. As long as it isn't voting for things that are unconstitutional.,Nonsenseism,e9m703m,conservative
"Why not? Voting according your conscience is the foundation of democracy and christians are expected to follow some moral rules in every action.

A society that doesn't let you exercise your political rights and duties without first stripping you of your principles can't be considered a healthy society.",MayanAnt,e9m5qs9,conservative
"As someone who is agnostic you neither understand what it means to be Christian nor what politics are.

Religion is a defining set of beliefs and values that people live their lives by. Politics is derived from the shared values and beliefs of the population at large.

Having your values derived from religion is not inherently wrong or misguided. Having your values derived from Marx, Lenin, or Mao is. Yet there are significant political forces who are based on the latter in the United States.

It is to their advantage to make people believe their own values should be barred from society, as it leaves theirs uncontested in the public arena.",ultimis,e9mbif5,conservative
Can you send an article demonstrating how scientists have proved that sexual orientation is a choice and has nothing to do with the traits you’re born with? ,H_crassicornis,e9ly1jo,conservative
"This type of stuff belongs in a different thread, preferably askscience.  There is ample evidence that you dont choose what you're attracted to, everyone has a type, straight people included.  There is always room for discussion but fighting this fight politically is pointless.",Falkamper,e9m7ogv,conservative
Hahahah what? Tons of people at my church were not born into Christian families. Some were Muslim and choose Christianity. You can easily pick what ever religion you want. There is no way I could have sex with a man. If I was interested in it I couldn't choose to do it. My body just wouldn't respond.,Nonsenseism,e9m781s,conservative
"> How is choosing a religion, any different than choosing a sexuality?

One is something that you choose to practice and the other is what you find attractive.

You can be a non-practicing hetero/homosexual, I suppose, in that you remain celibate, but that wouldn't make you asexual, it would just make you someone who doesn't engage in intimate relationships.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9ly0gu,conservative
Homosexuality is not a choice.,8K12,e9m7cjs,conservative
Maybe because they aren't misogynist neanderthals like you,chlorinehead,e9mlxv7,conservative
wtf I love republicans now,130818,e9lw1ep,conservative
"Anyone that does not believe that men should die daily for their wives, regardless of her deserving, is not acting like a Christian.",digoryk,e9n3mfl,conservative
There can be only one.👑,bittnerator,e9lvut4,conservative
Of course. But alot of people are voting for religious candidates in the hope they enact religious based laws on things like anti-Abortion and access to birth control. They want control over other people based on their religious beliefs.,M6D_Magnum,e9m7cmn,conservative
Because not everyone is Christian and shouldn't be forced to follow Christian ideals.,M6D_Magnum,e9m6mpq,conservative
"My question is, are people like the previous poster actually bisexual/gay, and “choose” to be straight? That’s the only way I can imagine believing that being gay is a choice.",Storm-Of-Aeons,e9mqemw,conservative
"Yeah exactly. It’s gonna be hard to convince me that homosexuality is a choice (or sexuality in general) when I personally get sick to my stomach if I see two dudes kissing on TV or a movie or something. 

It’s straight up gross to me, but hey I’m into personal freedoms, do who you like, marry who you like etc. It’s really hard for me to believe that people honestly believe sexuality is some kind of choice though. Just think about your own sexuality. Makes me think the people who think it is a choice are probably repressed homosexuals or bisexuals or something. ",FuckTimBeck,e9n80to,conservative
"Don't talk like that about Neanderthals, they were perfectly normal human beings, unlike red-pillers",digoryk,e9n3gm4,conservative
Yeah cuz not wanting a wife that has been used like a public toilet by other men is so misooganichiistical.,JohnBravo9990,e9mm8db,conservative
"That is completely untrue.   The bible demands that wives actually earn their place in a man’s life.  It is a symbiotic relationship, not the perverted slave system that modern “Christians” have adopted.

Btw:  don’t project some Bible thumper persona on me.  I’m referring to the social structure proscribed in the Christian Bible that effectively managed to protect men’s investment in their families for thousands of years.",JohnBravo9990,e9ngufc,conservative
"being pro-life doesn't have to flow from the Bible, the best argument for banning abortion is that you are classifying another human as property and then depriving them of personal liberty. banning abortion isn't ""enacting religious laws"", it's righting one of the most barbaric wrongs in American history, arguably the most barbaric and uncivilized practice in our history.",sylect,e9mbmor,conservative
"Religious people do not oppose abortion for religious reasons, I do not need the Bible to tell me that murdering a tiny human being is wrong, I could have figured that out on my own.",digoryk,e9n386f,conservative
True. 1980s Conservativism. ,Nonsenseism,e9m7mod,conservative
"Nobody is forced to do anything in a democracy, people negotiates the social pact until theres concensus.",MayanAnt,e9m80aq,conservative
All laws force one person to follow someone else's values.,digoryk,e9n3btd,conservative
Can you expand on this?,chaos_m3thod,e9njqah,conservative
"Yep, there are topics like abortion can be disagreed on based on religious or non-religious beliefs. And then there are weird liquor laws, which is just asinine.",chlorinehead,e9mlitc,conservative
"Yeah exactly. I mean I’m in AA and don’t drink. We wouldn’t band together and try to ban alcohol, not sure why Christians try to enforce their beliefs through voting. 

If anything I think having more open liquor laws would probably lead to it being less taboo and perhaps people would less likely become hoarders and then later addicts. 

Alcohol isn’t for me, but I can’t say another person should never use it, plenty of people can use it responsibly. ",FuckTimBeck,e9n87vc,conservative
Thanks be to God.,StJohnTheSwift,e9mxyr0,conservative
"Rules that prevent criminals who have served their time from getting legal jobs encourage them to make money on other ways.

Its important to give people a real chance to start again when they get out. ",SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e9mb77i,conservative
"So, the logic fallacy here is that they are all rehabilitated - and the other logic fallacy of generalization is that they are all violent criminals.  

Neither is the case.  Take each one on an individual basis and determine which ones are rehabilitated to best we can determine.  

And, there's a process for that.. how about that!  
[Snarky tone fully implemented; I apologize.]",xanthine_junkie,e9mcy1v,conservative
It is almost as if young people might want to avoid becoming felons because there is so much drawback to being a felon.,Lepew1,e9mfxdd,conservative
"Yeah, they are inmates 😂😂😂. If we pampered every criminal that even remotely showed they could be rehabilitated, all of them would act that way and then return to their old ways once they got back to the real world. ",Gjabcs,e9m81eo,conservative
"I'd like to see all non-violent/non-sexual crimes be expunged after release.  I'd like to see violent crimes be expunged after 5 years probationary period.  I'd like to see job training and trade schools for inmates.  I'd like to see more compassionate business owners hire released inmates in these fields.  Perhaps offer a tax incentive for business owners who higher former inmates.

I had a felony DUI in college that prohibits me from working in certain fields that I know I would excel in.  Luckily I have been able to still do pretty well for myself.  But a lot of people can't say the same.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9mh9se,conservative
"All while still taking each guy on his individual merits. Too many felons don’t rehabilitate in prison. 
",skarface6,e9mfhqi,conservative
Whats the process?  None of these guys can be hired as firefighters regardless of their individual cases.  Felons are blocked from getting an EMT license which is required to be a firefighter.,canoncam1,e9mjf4i,conservative
"Let's see you take your ass out there to fight those wildfires. They're not forced to, they volunteered to help. That's more than you'll ever do to help others I'm guessing.",DrPhil-TakeNoLs,e9mbek2,conservative
Bro your a dick. Also the new conservatives actually have compassion for people. You seem just like an asshole. ,ayo4tinder,e9mf3q8,conservative
"> I'd like to see all non-violent/non-sexual crimes be expunged after release. 

no, a thief is always a thief and by expunging there record it gives them more incentive to steal again, look at California where they pretty much legalized theft under 950 dollars, if you are caught with stolen goods under that amount you are cited and released told to show up at court on such and such date. Property crime especially for business have increased, san fransico car break ins has gotten so bad that people put signs on their cars saying nothing of value is inside them. Its so bad in some counties police no longer respond to theft calls any more. and violent crimes should never be expunged. They are again likely to commit assault again no matter how far removed.",Delta_25,e9mjwo9,conservative
Also not allowing dangerous/violent criminals back out. I’d like to see harsher punishment for sex crimes.,PurpleAngel23,e9mhvxy,conservative
"The process of expunging a felony varies by state to state, there are of course specific felonies of violent crime, rape and child pronography that are almost never eligible for expungement. 

The process of going to your parole board varies, but there is no doubt that volunteering like this goes a long way to commute your sentence - which is a reward for good behavior.",xanthine_junkie,e9mkal4,conservative
Yeah lets just completely ignore all possibility of recidivism. That'll work out grrrrreat.,rdrptr,e9mgdk3,conservative
😂😂😂😂😂😂😂,Gjabcs,e9mf5hg,conservative
"that's a fair point, I don't have all the answers.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9mk1ut,conservative
"the best answer I would think would be a cultural shift, instead of what the left is doing of going easy on crime and the right go hard on crime, the paradigm shift would be to go back to teaching children that crime is bad and doing the right thing is better. ",Delta_25,e9mlhio,conservative
I have absolutely no issue with that.  A moral society is a free society.  I am against the drug war though.,IvankasFutureHusband,e9mlsx6,conservative
She just wants camera time. She’s going to be doing this kind of thing for years.,HolsterOfNuts,e9neqif,conservative
Doesnt understand how our economy works... not sure how sure understand how our climate does either.,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9ndl6v,conservative
That's like protesting the Iraq War in Nancy Pelosi's office. ,SickofInternetProgs,e9neavf,conservative
“How to Win Friends and Influence People”,justhere2havefun,e9nslvx,conservative
"I think the most realistic one would be infrastructure, and maybe something about prescription drugs. Can't see an immigration deal happening, considering it'll be probably the same or worse than the compromise one from last year.",Leafs_99,e9nzf3g,conservative
"> What deals do you expect to see between Trump and the Dems?


None. Orange man bad. ",soxfan90,e9nf4sm,conservative
This sounds promising. /s,PubliusVA,e9ni1ij,conservative
http://time.com/4942123/donald-trump-daca-dreamers-democrats-deal/        Did it before..,Dudehitscar,e9nga1a,conservative
do you think anything will come out of it?,Dudehitscar,e9ni3nt,conservative
"Instead of the stone wall tactic the left has been using, maybe they will actually do something other than resist. Doubtful, but maybe.",King6of6the6retards,e9op98b,conservative
There will be an impulse to become the party of no like the GOP was under Obama but it will become more interesting if the house passes bills that seem to match trump priorities like infrastructure.  And the senate or trump become the ones saying no.  ,Dudehitscar,e9optk2,conservative
"Fuck that judge, I'm sure just enough ballots will show up to flip the race. ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9n6skz,conservative
Another week...,Enzo_SAWFT,e9n6ohi,conservative
Fake election.,BrighamYoung,e9nessx,conservative
"""Judge orders Palm Beach County recount suspended until Democrats are able to create enough fake ballots to tilt the election result.""",tenshon,e9n7uc3,conservative
"I dont think they can ""find"" random ballots anymore. They have their numbers in concrete now and if 1 or 10,000 are added to their number, more questions will be raised. All this really does is allow them to finish their recount. But personally, I just want this damn thing over with. I felt the same in 2000. Just finish the damn thing.",jedichric,e9nder0,conservative
Wow... Her trigger is based on which bottle of hair dye a woman picked out. ,AttackYuuki,e9ngzeb,conservative
"That house majority isn’t looking so hot for dems. You have crazy socialists who wont support Pelosi, **actual** moderate dems aren’t going to either.",Dank_Cartographer,e9mnbdq,conservative
Why is this woman getting so much coverage on this sub? ,Tmblackflag,e9mo166,conservative
They did it! They ended climate change! /s,superdude411,e9n5qc7,conservative
I think cortez should run for speaker.  I wouldn't know which loon the GOP would root for.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9nbiof,conservative
Is this because Trump expressed support for her becoming the speaker of the house?,MisterMouser,e9njg0y,conservative
"Good. Identity politics will eventually eat itself. 

Also, climate change in the United States is a problem? They seem to forget how the US CO2 production has decreased by *THE MOST* in the world since we left the Paris Climate Accord. 

Do not believe the bullshit liberals tell you about Climate Change. They claim they’re the party of science when it comes to this, but they also believe there is no biological difference between a man and woman. One cannot have both and be a party of science",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mnlmm,conservative
"Sorry, but it's not us paying attention to her that is giving her street cred among Democrats. She's part of the social justice wing of the party. Clinton humiliated Bernie Sanders and robbed them of their socialist hero. Bernie was old and weak, the young up and coming millenial politicians are the future, they won't roll over like Bernie. That's the thought, that's why we are paying attention, because Democrats are going to try to make move on the party establishment. We are witnessing a party split that we have to be prepared for. She's dumb as rocks, but rocks can be dangerous if you don't learn how to deflect or dodge them. ",Rightquercusalba,e9mr0w9,conservative
But I thought they do believe there's a difference between men and women. That's the biological basis of transgenderism.,MisterMouser,e9njabb,conservative
Got it. ,Tmblackflag,e9mrc1w,conservative
">He has not been seen in public since November 2017, and lawyers for the Democratic National Committee questioned whether he was dead.
     
Thoughts on where he has been hiding....        ",ozric101,e9nj1uv,conservative
"I think the stronger argument is ""if sex isn't fixed, why is race?""

Mostly because the left has centered so much of their worldview around the concept of 'consent.' So answering why a 30 year old can't identify as a 5 year old and date little girls isn't actually an argument that will trip up a leftist.

On the other hand unlike gender or age, race actually IS fluid. But because identity politics is so important to the left, they have no cohesive answer for it. Race only exists as long as its convenient to get Dem votes.",ICameHere2LaughAtYou,e9ni5ii,conservative
"Damn white people and

*Shuffles Deck*

Their concept of time ",Enzo_SAWFT,e9nfz2c,conservative
Yeah I’m pretty sure they have clocks on the reservation. These people literally are the most racist people around. They don’t think native Americans can follow a schedule and be on time. Holy shit. ,Zac1245,e9nt0bt,conservative
What is this site? I wanted to see the video but it's just some guy talking to us in a parked car.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9n2hfx,conservative
"It’s my BitChute channel just sharing my opinion on the topic. But here is the SNL vid

https://youtu.be/GKaakjMVtyE",lareform,e9n3lev,conservative
We Were Soldiers does a pretty decent job of capturing an early part of the war.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9nw5nz,conservative
"Forrest Gump isn’t *about* the Vietnam War, but that’s probably the most positive portrayal of the war I can think of in a mainstream movie. If it criticizes anything with regard to it, it’s probably the treatment of vets when they came home (through Lt Dan’s problems over the ensuing decade or so) rather than the war itself. ",YankeeBlues21,e9nvx6q,conservative
"I actually like this voting system more. Also you knew the rules going into the election, you can’t change them because you are afraid of the outcome. ",nowthatsrich,e9mpvg0,conservative
"What is he smoking? That’s the whole point of ranked choice. It’s like an instant runoff. Most states go straight to a runoff if nobody gets above 50, it just costs a lot of money to hold another election. If he’s worried about not having enough votes in the second round, then it’s his own problem and the people of Maine must not like him.",Pyronot,e9mpry8,conservative
What? Is he an idiot? This is the sort of voting system we could use across the nation. It would be good step towards breaking the two party monopoly.,RightMillennial,e9myf2s,conservative
The people of Maine voted for this system.,PM_ME_HUGE_CRITS,e9mw0fx,conservative
Rules are rules.,ReaganTroll,e9mibui,conservative
"This is like Hilary complaining about winning the popular vote. He knew the rules of how the votes would be calculated going in. Whatever strategy he used to try to secure a win didn’t pan out under those rules. Too bad, so sad. ",etherealsmog,e9mvzw4,conservative
"“In 2000, an independent counsel reported that Hillary Clinton had given false testimony about her involvement in the firing of several aides in the White House travel office under her husband, President Bill Clinton.”

Clinton a liar? Who would believe that!!! /s",Zac1245,e9nburb,conservative
It amazes me how obsessed with race these people are. ,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9lrct1,conservative
"The left constantly talks about race, but they're not racist. The right just ignores race, and therefore they're racist. This makes sense, right? ",xJownage,e9lzl1u,conservative
Michelle is racist as fuck. goddamn,Crusader_1096_2,e9m1703,conservative
That’s outrageously racist,YankeeBlues21,e9lruue,conservative
Most divisive admin in the last century. No surprise.  ,greeneyedunicorn2,e9lr4eu,conservative
What's that word again? When you feel or show prejudice and/or discrimination against people of other races? ,rjohnson99,e9m63dx,conservative
The same woman who said the first time she was proud of America was when her husband was nominated for President.,weeaboo_swordsman,e9m8dxe,conservative
"Well, he was raised by white people, right? And he wasn’t raised in the black community. His dad was African, not African-American. Just ask any African person and he’ll tell you how different he is from the black community here. ",skarface6,e9mfnwu,conservative
Michelle is racist.,paulbrook,e9ntezh,conservative
But she's not racist or anything...,JFGFNY,e9mldhr,conservative
"Remember guys, racism is ok if you're black or brown.",Reven1911,e9mcs39,conservative
"This is absolutely absurd.  She is implying that white people liked him and thus that made her suspicious of him... 

With that logic she is suspicious of things white people like...  It's so obvious why race relations in this country have deteriorated.  The Obama's and liberals continue to use smug jabs and insults at white people.  Stuff that would be considered extremely racist if you replaced white with black. ",NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9mjf9r,conservative
Time and Time again she's proven to be one of the most racist people in Washington.  God forbid she ever runs for office,Blown89,e9mgqa8,conservative
She’s just awful,Anon-Ymous929,e9m9zhn,conservative
what a racist cunt,stoffel_bristov,e9mepwv,conservative
Racist asshole,BeachCruisin22,e9meimz,conservative
"Her partisan hate has really tarnished public good will towards the former first lady. Had she just stuck to doing noble causes, she would have a good name. Instead she works with Netflix to skewer the opposition and writes all sorts of caustic hate. In this particular case, she shows what a racist she is by being suspicious of people merely because they are liked by white people. Was there any moral of the story, of how she made a big mistake here, prejudging him? Nope.",Lepew1,e9mfh33,conservative
You know I think that there's a word for that. I can't quite think of it though.,MuricanStephen,e9m4vd2,conservative
"What do you mean by ""these people""?",WooPig45,e9mdh83,conservative
"The comment that made me quit Failbook was when someone said “saying you’re not racist is the most racist thing you can say!”  Meaning if you’re not racist AGAINST whites and asians you are a racist, because whites and asians are the recipients of all the privilege in America. I deleted my profile that day.",booblitchutz,e9m5do4,conservative
She did say she was never proud of her country until it elected her husband... that's pretty fucking hateful.,Reven1911,e9mcpsb,conservative
Progressive?,Tony_Cappuccino,e9ml0nh,conservative
Liberals. ,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mkcle,conservative
It was a joke. The Left is the new racist movement and it isn't even close. ,WooPig45,e9mihdy,conservative
Probably elitists and/or leftists. ,skarface6,e9mfjx6,conservative
black people.    ,stoffel_bristov,e9meuo4,conservative
Nah the best thing you can do about these braindead fools is to just ignore them.,xJownage,e9n5ay7,conservative
You shouldn’t let some dingleberry control your social media fate though.... FB is great for destroying lefties in your family and further ostracizing yourself from them (lol).,JackFucington,e9miioz,conservative
"Let's start calling them blackshirts, these people are not ""anti-fascist"".",357blackhawk,e9mlxpn,conservative
">“Stop letting the Nazis come into town and create violence,”

They say as they literally start violence. ",BruceCampbell123,e9mifb5,conservative
"If this wasn't a setup, the next one certainly will be.

The temptation, as Tucker stated, is to beat the guy with a chair, but this is precisely what they are hoping for.

The best response is to document, document, document.",Tu-ne-cede,e9k6gjq,conservative
"I was just physically assualted!!

&#x200B;

Do I?:

A. Call 911

B. Wait weeks and call Mr. Avenatti?

&#x200B;

Yea this totally passes the smell test",eeeinator,e9kcc79,conservative
Julie Swetnick has come forward as a witness!,eeeinator,e9k4oi6,conservative
Why is Avinatti not disbarred for his shenanigans with Stormy and Kavanaugh. ,Manchurainprez,e9k7z1u,conservative
Avenatti tried to imply on Twitter that there was possible underage drinking because Tucker brought his family with him to one of those fancy clubs. Disgusting.,MyCustomUsername,e9kd9vk,conservative
Calling someone's daughter a whore and a cunt warrants an ass whooping. Consequences be damned. ,goldmouthdawg,e9kdk1v,conservative
"Avennati immediately setting this up as a victim hierarchy thing.  Not only was someone assaulted, but he is a ""gay Latino immigrant"" so you're supposed to care more.  

The mask is truly off these days.",TallDad1,e9kl5i0,conservative
Is ridiculous what they're doing to that guy. People constantly harassing him at home and everywhere he goes. Then he asked did perpetrator was a gay immigrant?  Why would his sexual orientation have anything to do with anything?,DaveP12321,e9k81uh,conservative
"We are living in an insane asylum if people truly think Tucker Carlson of all people is a hateful bigot. The dude is pretty much a classic liberal who preaches family values and sees how the political correctness culture we're in is on the verge of tipping over to complete madness. I watch the show all the time and can't begin to fathom how people would become enraged at him. 

And how can anyone follow Avenatti and think he is even a remotely good person? This guy is just a pure slime ball. At least politicians from both sides will hold babies and give you patriotic talking points and pretend to care. This guy just seems like someone I don't even want to engage in conversation with. ",_my_way,e9kab2g,conservative
what is Tucker’s power level,lancerelliott,e9kdp57,conservative
"This is a hilariously bad play by Avenatti:

&#x200B;

\-Tucker has public opinion on his side from just having his home mobbed by violent leftist thugs.

\-Tucker Carlson humiliated and repudiated Avenatti on his show, and this situation can easily be construed as a revenge play.

\-Avenatti contends that Tucker Carlson's teenage daughter was drunk and is lying, which is a super classy reaction when exactly one minute ago you were representing a woman who had just accused a man of repeated gang-rape.

\-Avenatti is the nexus for complete personal and professional failure at every level

&#x200B;

I predict this charge gets immediately laughed out of a courtroom.",MojoHand052,e9kjsol,conservative
"Fucking cowards attacking someone's daughter like this, pathetic assholes.",PapaGeorgio23,e9kfzov,conservative
"In Avenatti's world, calling a porn star horse face is reprehensible but verbally attacking the daughter of one of your ideological opponents is A-OKAY and any attempt to defend your daughter is considered assault.
",JandM2,e9kmwzc,conservative
"Michael Avenatti has no soul. He is the current winner of the 'self-aggrandizement' award. What a turd.   


PS: This kind of shit is what's going to get Trump elected again.  ",tapeonyournose,e9kkvxj,conservative
Michael Avenatti is turning into the Alex Jones of the Democratic Party.,Russilito,e9kle87,conservative
"Only a degenerate animal would treat a woman this way, let alone the young daughter of a total stranger with whom they disagree politically. And this is how he behaved in public. Imagine what he would've done if he thought no one was watching. It's a story we know all too well.",Silicon_Avatar,e9kmxfa,conservative
">Avenatti disputed that account, saying it’s an “absolute lie.”

believe survivors though",howdatasstaste,e9l9hgk,conservative
"Creepy porn lawyer should go for it. He cost Stormy $300,000 with his trash representstion. Maybe this time he can lose his own money to Tucker when he makes a fool of himself again . ",FreeSpeechRocks,e9khpnb,conservative
He disgusts me ,cmiller1225,e9ks1pi,conservative
"This will not end well. Hey need to crack down on these people hard or something, sooner or later someone's going to get shot.",Oneshoeleroy,e9kvfv7,conservative
Why does this guy still have a license to practice law?,Dstack69,e9l0gt6,conservative
"This “creepy porn lawyer” is a fucking pig and this is nothing more than an attempt to corner Carlson to destroy him. This is especially vile because they are going after his family now. I’m sick of the lengths people are going to to destroy one another if they don’t agree with them. Don’t like Tucker’s show? don’t fucking watch it, go watch your msnbc bullshit. 

I really hate the way things are going in terms of the lengths people will go to to destroy someone’s who’s political ideology is different than theirs. ",Snake_in_my_boots,e9l3458,conservative
Avenatti is such a low life rat. Can’t wait til karma comes for CPL,Canada_high420,e9l9j99,conservative
Avenatti’s such a fucking loser I swear to god ,OprahSwagfrey,e9lh5en,conservative
Call my daughter a cunt and you'll get a lot worse than some wine thrown at you. ,Popular-Uprising-,e9lhh3o,conservative
"So according to Avenatti, calling a porn star ""horse face"" is beyond the pale but verbally abusing the daughter of someone you don't agree with is A-OK.

How does that fuck live with himself.

Edit: I love how the creepy porn lawyer calls Tucker's daughter a liar while representing a woman who is being investigated.",LordAstralWarrior,e9lpw7m,conservative
It should be legal to beat the fuck out of these guys.,tricitythunder,e9ksuf1,conservative
These are the same people who preach tolerance.  Absolute animals,sureissummer,e9klvxl,conservative
Michael Avenatti needs a thorough ass kicking,caferrell,e9kqt22,conservative
"This is good for 2020, we need Pelosi to make a fool of herself as majority leader, and Democrats to look like evil communists protesting the civil American",SwaglordHyperion,e9kj64z,conservative
" Avenatti is a crappy lawyer too. Avenatti is claiming ""underage drinking"" occurred. Maybe, but it's not illegal in VA for Parent to give their child wine. *Virginia permits persons under twenty-one to possess alcoholic beverages due to such person's ""making a delivery of alcoholic beverages by order of his parent."" APIS interprets the phrase “by order of his parent” as providing for parental consent. Va. Code Ann. § 4.1-305.* ",MrRGG,e9kv1fk,conservative
Hard to believe this is what has come down to and scum bags like Avennatti have some form of platform to spout trash. Absolutely Sickening.,non_felon,e9l412i,conservative
"Throwing the wine may technically be assault, but could you get a jury to convict in these circumstances? Idk, but I doubt it.",kanhawk,e9ln4nv,conservative
Is this another ploy for Avenatti to get some more CNN money since he is being sued for millions and likely broke?,cafeRacr,e9lv3sv,conservative
Isnt creepy porn lawyer being charged for lying to the senate re Kavanaugh?,krepogregg,e9lwena,conservative
"Soooo, if creepy por loser uad any prior contact wit vile cowardly piece if human sewage - I would call that STALKING BY PROXY.",StephenScherer1,e9kdnfz,conservative
"If Tucker Carlson, the most regular-ass conservative out there, is a racistsexisthomophobeKKKbigotnazi, then we truly live in a make-believe world.",15dreadnought,e9ks7oa,conservative
*creepy porn lawyer,The-Swat-team,e9kntmb,conservative
[removed],,e9kt14b,conservative
"I can't wait until the inevitable ""Michael Nifong and Michael Avenatti don't walk into a bar"" jokes 
",giobbistar21,e9knwl6,conservative
"They just did this to Kat Timpf. Whenever they tell you that these people aren’t to be tolerated because their policies harm the marginalized (aside from the credibility of the claims, the ethical questions of retaliation, and everything else that makes this a bad justification), they are lying. 

Timpf is an anti-war, libertarian conservative. This makes her positions less harmful to the globally marginalized than HRC or Obama. She’s against the wall and pro-refugees, which makes her friendlier to immigrants than many Democrats, including high profile friends of the “resistance.” She is concerned with police brutality and institutionalized racism. She hits every “woke” liberal point, and they still abused her in public. 

Why? It clearly isn’t for the virtuous cause they claim. Timpf accepts nearly every premise, but thinks the best solutions come from a small government and market economy, rather than big government and central planning. That’s enough to justify violence. ",Kennyv777,e9ktoi3,conservative
How on Earth does Michael Avenatti still have a license to practice law?  The dude's a complete scumbag.  Something tells me he's not married.  ,RageCage05,e9l64ur,conservative
Creepy Porn Lawyer is getting dumber every day,phreshusername,e9l7xly,conservative
This is why I don't care what anyone on our side does to them. ,ravenswin,e9kt3rj,conservative
"Why can't people act civil? I get free speech and all but no decency at all. If I had a daughter and some guy said that to her, it would have gotten physical. ",5_yr_lurker,e9kq9hu,conservative
"There are 3 pieces of good news here.

(1) Carlson and family showed a lot more restraint than most of us would have with that kind of provocation. 

(2) The club denied that badly behaving member his membership. Other businesses should follow this standard of insisting on decency.

(3) Democrats, once again, have creepy porn lawyer in the public light, speaking for them.",Lepew1,e9mepwa,conservative
"Good lord Michael Avanatti is a giant piece of shit.  

Also, obvious setup is obvious.",mahinka,e9meua6,conservative
Freedom of speech.  Either you're 100% invested or you're not.,Reaching2Hard,e9kplgd,conservative
Disgusting how they go after the man's family. What low life scum. Punish a guy's family for his political views. Tucker has said before that he rarely even discuses politics with his family. Imagine being such a vile piece of human trash that you go and call a teenage girl a cunt because of something her father said on tv. It would have been so hard not to punch that guy.,FlawlessCowboy2,e9kvktc,conservative
"Admitting his son threw wine on the guy but didnt assault him? That's assault but, justified I feel.",Wino333,e9l6ppe,conservative
Free speech has consequences.,_Gardien,e9l75y4,conservative
The left is resorting to violence because they literally have no arguments to make. They’re objectively wrong with most major issues. They’re frustrated because more and more people are leaving the left and there’s nothing they can do about it.,survivorfanbilf,e9l54bk,conservative
"The article says Tucker’s son threw a glass of wine in the guy’s face though... 

That is assault, whether the guy was being a prick or not",ThatGuysARealJerk,e9kzl4f,conservative
"                 DEAR GAY GUYS

This behavior is totally vile and UNAmerican. Your problem is that it reflects on YOU!

The most UNAmerican behavior I Have ever seen was after the 2016 election when high end retailers (an industry dominated by gays and Libtards) all dumped TRUMP FAMILY Merchandise at the same time. I no longer go into those stores anymore. (When in doubt I ask the friendly staff to direct me to the TRUMP Lady's fashion merchandise. When there is none I ask the friendly staff to direct me to the door.)

We 🇺🇸 have a long history of obeying the Bible command that the sins of the father shall not be visited upon the son. Attacking family members in any way is OFF LIMITS. You may have noticed TRUMP'S revenge against you - there has been none. The better man is TRUMP.

Hopefully Ann Coulter was right about gays. At present the attitude toward gays is SHIFTING from ""Live and let live"" back to ""Exclude the perverts"". You are your own worst enemy. Force the UNAmerican cowardly trash amoung you to behave much better or go back to where you were 50 years ago.






",StephenScherer1,e9kgy7c,conservative
If one person verbally assaults another and in response a third party commits assault as an act of defence they are still breaking the law. ,NotHankAaron,e9kybwd,conservative
">	I love my children. It took enormous self-control not to beat the man with a chair, which is what I wanted to do. I think any father can understand the overwhelming rage and shock that I felt seeing my teenage daughter attacked by a stranger. But I restrained myself. I did not assault this man, and neither did my son. That is a lie. Nor did I know the man was gay or Latino, not that it would have mattered. ",Kanyetarian,e9kytxb,conservative
"This is pretty atrocious, and I feel for Carlson and his kids shouldn't have to go through this, but from the article:

""My son threw a glass of wine at him...I did not assault this man and neither did my son"".

Pretty sure throwing liquid at someone is considered assault everywhere in this country, and if he hit him with it, it's battery. Even if the instigating language is deemed an invitation to brawl, it's still assault.

Maybe don't openly admit to assaulting someone while claiming not to have assaulted them? This is the kind of thing Avenatti will be all over.",csajhr,e9l6jos,conservative
>They are just waiting for someone to kill another. ,plastiqmanb,e9ki9uc,conservative
"If the events took place as Tucker describes, beating him with a chair is fair game.  The asshole's statements to his daughter are what I'd call fighting words, and eliminate his ability to press charges.

Happens all the time.  Guy gets smart, get's shit kicked out of him, police find out he's an asshole and don't press charges, because it was provoked outside 1A protection.",gabrielmodesta,e9kia65,conservative
I think tucker should wear a body camera. ,HalfFlip,e9lpllz,conservative
"Pepper spray, pepper spray, pepper spray.  ",Fleafleeper,e9l3mth,conservative
"I keep thinking one day they will do it to the wrong person and get shot. It's a terrible idea, but if it keeps on they will run across someone who will.",FractalMantis,e9kpger,conservative
"I cannot for the life of me understand how people can keep doing this and still think they are the good guys. Trump says something mean about CNN and it's a vicious attack on the free press. But it's fair game for *them* to harass and intimidate journalists and their families. I remember how many times over and over I heard ""Love Trumps Hate,"" it's becoming more and more clear every day that it was a totally vacuous phrase. ",RonDeGrasseDawtchins,e9ku4gj,conservative
The way our legal system works is yeah things not expected to qualify as assault do qualify. I'd like to think I'd do the same as Carlson's son. Thankfully judges will take the context I account (informally). That said Tucker Carlson is a scumbag.,armyprivateoctopus99,e9l7ekv,conservative
Tucker and his daughter gang raped the gay Latino. ,Slippery____Pete,e9kb5ta,conservative
I made a joke about that on Twitter and got a bunch of likes. I’m a little worried they took me seriously lol,eccary,e9ktp67,conservative
"It could still happen, Chuck Grassley is having him and his client investigated for perjury. ",ripinpeppers,e9ki0u6,conservative
"It takes years sometimes to disbar someone.  

I’ve been watching the gears moving against an attorney in my jurisdiction for 2 years.  ",IWurgency,e9km49w,conservative
Because that would just propel his political career. For some reason the deranged left worship this ambulance chasing filth.,HardCounter,e9kowoh,conservative
"You're asking why a democrat connected lawyer isn't in legal trouble for breaking the law and being a piece of shit?


ha.  come on.  you know why.

",theawesomethatis,e9l07py,conservative
Cool then the kids get an MIP that would be expundged as a first offense and will stay off their record lol. How petty. ,11-Eleven-11,e9kp7iw,conservative
Not sure what the rules are where Tucker lives but in Texas you’re allowed to drink if your parents are there ,thereisasuperee,e9llnhb,conservative
Or maybe it's because his son threw a glass of wine at the guy? Did he pick that up off someone else's table?,csajhr,e9l5r0a,conservative
"Fightin words are a real thing. There are some things you dont open your pie hole and say to another person, unless you are trying to cause an altercation. ",LordStoffelstein,e9kjoky,conservative
I'm not even a parent but if someone called my kid a whore and a cunt you're damn right there would be an ass whooping in order!,Straight_Ace,e9kmnmj,conservative
"There are unlikely to be consequences. That would require a unanimous jury verdict and ""DADDY"" is unlikely to convict.",StephenScherer1,e9kh89z,conservative
"I don’t like Tucker but kudos to him , fuck that idiot he’s lucky he didn’t get his face smashed in!!",luibot,e9kze7b,conservative
I'd be surprised if thats not exactly what this dude was hoping for. Some people have no limits to how dirty they will get just to make someone look bad.,FlawlessCowboy2,e9kvzei,conservative
"Since he gets to check 2 boxes (gay, Latino), he becomes the victim in all this.",DrKhaylomsky,e9k8nge,conservative
"So the creepy porn lawyer can stroke his ego some more for helping the “disenfranchised.”

One day he will go away. One day. ",diagramoftruth,e9kmfc2,conservative
"Tucker is a lot more ""liberal"" than the average conservative on most major issues. I know for economics he thinks there should be heavy government intervention to protect jobs. I think recently I read he had a whole thing about how we should ban self driving cars/trucks so they don't kill millions of trucker jobs. ",ed_merckx,e9kk2c1,conservative
Regular Americans enrage the rabid left.,hungryColumbite,e9knu7x,conservative
">	classical liberal

¿You mean like, a **literal Nazi**?",HayektheHustler,e9koc4q,conservative
Because people hate Trump so much they blindly follow the goons & their rhetoric. That's why. ,joeysuf,e9lew2t,conservative
"Tucker Carlson exposes the leftists for what they are, and they can't stand it.",mlmack,e9ku2kc,conservative
[removed],,e9ke2k4,conservative
"He has 49 XP, and can cause +38 damage.",justhere2havefun,e9kej8m,conservative
IT'S OVER 9000!,ScarFace88FG,e9kipci,conservative
Women don't lie. Democrats told me so.,unibuckeye,e9krjcv,conservative
They have proven themselves misogynists.,MisterMouser,e9ln4pw,conservative
At least there's some weird conspiracy theories I can listen to Alex Jones ramble on about for pure entertainment sake. I have no legitimate reason at all to ever listen to anything out Avenatti's mouth. ,_my_way,e9ksxll,conservative
"It is, it's called ""fighting words"" and it was ruled as outside of 1A protection in Chaplinsky v New Hampshire. It's basically considered an acceptance of the following fight by the speaker aka consent to be phsyically engaged with another person (just like sex). By calling someone's daughter a cunt in front of them, you're basically creating a situation in which you have invited them to fight. 

No chairs though; that could be considered intent to kill. Tackle and slap them ground to teach them a lesson, but not cause injury.",FiveHits,e9kubtq,conservative
"So, um, there's that approach; I guess.",Odoacer476CE,e9lherl,conservative
Wew,L0rdBumlicker,e9lo8jz,conservative
"If you really think we’re better, then we have to prove that we’re better. Sinking to this level makes us just as bad as them",thereisasuperee,e9lmfha,conservative
Stellar attitude.,csajhr,e9l62d4,conservative
That's the most UN-American behavior you've ever seen? Stores in a a free enterprise society can choose to sell or not sell whatever they want. ,ForbusB,e9khi8s,conservative
Honestly I'm pretty concerned. The level of disrespect that has been made acceptable to display is going to push someone over the edge sooner or later. These people are acting like modern day lynch mobs.,mnslice,e9knkir,conservative
"You're not wrong, but the potential downside for a public figure outweighs the upsides considerably.",Tu-ne-cede,e9ktx3p,conservative
"Is that a real thing? You can legally assault someone if it meets a level of provocation? 


Can you link me to some reading material on that by chance. Just curious about it. I thought that would always be considered assault if you hit first due to words.",therealpumpkinhead,e9kuyds,conservative
My wife would shoot a fucker slamming into the front door if it was just her and the kids.,Oneshoeleroy,e9kvdtc,conservative
"Oh they will. You can also bet that when they do you will never hear the reason, only the victimization of themselves. Momma never told them you reap what you sow.",NotAUser67,e9kq60z,conservative
"I mean, I typically (always right now) vote Democrat but I don't know anyone that doesn't think Avenatti is a complete asshole.  It's a great way to get air time, just watch The Apprentice.",reddits_dead_anyway,e9l57yr,conservative
A lot of the Nazi's thought they were correct. Propaganda is a powerful tool.,Juxen,e9m6dik,conservative
10 separate times!,unibuckeye,e9kqrc7,conservative
They gang raped avanatti?,UNHsignu763,e9l3y4l,conservative
I hope we hear about the results soon. I am sure Avenatti has some fishy sides we will know about soon,defunctAI,e9l4vg6,conservative
"Is that even legal to prosecute at that point? Like, if I told a cop I’ve smoked weed before (non-legal state), would they be able to charge me with a crime? I was under the assumption they had to catch you either doing it, or intoxicated after the fact, in order to charge. ",tathrowaway666,e9l4saq,conservative
Do you think it's illegal for parents to have a glass of wine at dinner when their kids are there?,shatter321,e9m5wtq,conservative
"Am a parent. Those are definitely fighting words. Granted, my daughter is 4 so anyone who's willing to call her that has some serious fucked up issues, but still.",vest_called_a_jerkin,e9kt6jw,conservative
No he’s not.,Slippery____Pete,e9kb6oj,conservative
Ya I mean I tend to agree with him on a lot of stuff and probably not on some stuff. Life shouldn't be black and white. But to disagree about worker protection is a little more mature than calling his daughter a whore. ,_my_way,e9koiq0,conservative
">I think recently I read he had a whole thing about how we should ban self driving cars/trucks so they don't kill millions of trucker jobs.

There's an hour long interview with Shapiro from like a week ago where he discusses exactly this.

https://youtu.be/Bh8vqof9hAk?t=1741

Feel free to rewind for some context on how he thinks it'll impact our social fabric. Mainly, women don't want to marry men who make less than them. If people aren't getting married to raise families it impacts all of us.

",j3utton,e9kmvk2,conservative
"What I dont get is why would the jobs disappear? Like sure you wont be driving it, but someone still needs to be in the truck right? Otherwise what is to prevent new age train robbers from running the trucks off the road and breaking open the back to take all the loot? There's no one to stop them if no one is in the truck.",TheTurtler31,e9kopqw,conservative
Reality enrages the rabid left.,unibuckeye,e9kr59x,conservative
[removed],,e9kzsyx,conservative
"Libtards get owned le epic style 😎

But honestly, Carlson is not a good dude. Watch any of his interviews with people he has disagreeing viewpoints with, and he will not let them get a single word out. His hosting is absolutely disrespectful.

I know the conservative sub isn’t the place to say this, but still.",Atroxo,e9kxkjy,conservative
"Grow up.

He's an opinion show, just like Rachel Maddow is.  Nobody would advocate for doing this to her family. ",phydeaux70,e9keu8a,conservative
"If he’s in a frenzy, he gets an extra attack, though. ",RevBendo,e9kf2rp,conservative
"Say what you want about the man, but Ive yet to find a podcast that even approaches the entertainment value of Rogans episode with Alex Jones ",thereisasuperee,e9lm70s,conservative
"^ Completely wrong.

",AvatarJuan,e9ls6ug,conservative
"They don't play by the rules. The only thing these ""people"" understand is behaviorism.  Positive stimulus for good behavior.  Negative stimulus for bad behavior.  They do not have the intellectual capacity to learn through reason.  They do not have the emotional capacity to learn via empathy.  That is the truth.  You can deny it all you want, but the people who are not playing ""us vs. them"" (as you call it) will be the first to be picked off by the leftist savages. ",ravenswin,e9l7e94,conservative
When are you going to realize we are in the first stages of a genuine civil war?,Odoacer476CE,e9lhd38,conservative
"ATTACKING the family of a man is what is forbidden in the Bible and that is UnAmerican and it simply IS NOT DONE. (Not in this Conetree)

That type of behavior was last showcased by the man who was actually more corrupt than Hillary (we must go back quite a few years to accomplish that feat). Huey Long of Louisiana who was  assassinated in 1935.  (He really had it comming!)

Please be aware that I no longer shop in those stores and I even insisted that my better half return a gift to me that was purchased there. For future reference I reminded her that Brooks Brothers was located in the mall.

",StephenScherer1,e9kup55,conservative
"It's a common bullying tactic. Provoke someone multiple times until they escalate it to another level, and then cry foul. ",spongish,e9l168p,conservative
"> Is that a real thing? You can legally assault someone if it meets a level of provocation?

I'm going to say no, and I wouldn't attempt it.",FelixFuckfurter,e9kx8r3,conservative
"Unless you are a black person being called the n-word, I wouldn't count on a judge or jury cutting you any slack because someone said something mean to you. Pretty sure the fighting words exception corresponded with the ""black rage"" defense. 

It's bullshit either way, striking someone can never be excused by hurtful language.",csajhr,e9l5br0,conservative
No if you can leave the situation and don't you're committing assault plain and simple. ,U_R_Tard,e9lpf64,conservative
"It's a real thing insofar as charges are less likely, even though it's not actually a defense.

Let's say I say some horrible shit to you that provokes you into striking me.  My words are probably not 1A protected (e.g., fighting words), as I understand it.  Your battery is also a crime even though I provoked you to it.

That said, at sentencing, my provocation may be a significant mitigating factor, and particularly if the battery isn't severe, your sentence may be reduced to basically nothing.

There's a few reasons for this, one of them being (in my opinion) prosecutor's never-ending fear of jury nullification, but in practice it just makes more sense.

Cops know all this of course, so in practice, minor shit people do that is provoked is often let go.

From what I read here, Tucker's son is guilty of a crime, TECHNICALLY, but there's basically not going to be a punishment for it, because the guy without a doubt provoked it, and honestly, getting some wine on you is basically nothing.  So Avenatti is playing the 'technically' card over something that nobody prosecutes.

Actually beating the guy with a chair... eh, might cross the line and get you prosecuted, but I'd bet nobody gets prosecuted here.",gabrielmodesta,e9kw5pv,conservative
Fighting words can be mitigating and will occasionally even get you off the hook altogether depending on the circumstances. Prosecutors refused to touch Buzz Aldrin after he punched a moon landing conspiracy theorist in the face on camera in the middle of a crowded street. He probably could have beat with him chair. You certainly don't want to rely on it unless you've walked on the moon. ,ElbowWhisper,e9lgewn,conservative
"I know a few who would do the same. Had a friend living in a bad part of town with a newborn one time. Had a home invasion and she pulled out a shotgun and luckily didn't have to use it. You just never know.

Edit: they moved. ",FractalMantis,e9kvig4,conservative
and she would get off if just one person with kids is on that jury.,VirginWizard69,e9l19j4,conservative
She kept coming to the country club though.,FelixFuckfurter,e9kx9g9,conservative
"Being intoxicated is not illegal. Doing things like operating machinery while intoxicated is illegal. Posession is what gets you in trouble, mostly.",HalfFlip,e9lpu2c,conservative
Clearly this guy deserved the ass whopping as the discipline he didn't get as a kid!,Straight_Ace,e9kxk29,conservative
"You're, right. He isn't, and he shouldn't be, but that's not how the media or the left are going to see it. As far as they're concerned, those with the higher intersectionality bingo score win.",j3utton,e9kn4g2,conservative
I agree with him there however I disagree that jobs will be lost with driverless cars. Someone will still have to be in the truck to protect against new age train robbers from running the trucks off the road to take the free loot.,TheTurtler31,e9kotg9,conservative
"Totally agree. Broken window theory and all. Drastic changes in production like this are rarely just snap your fingers overnight that destroy millions of jobs. By this logic the barcode should have destroyed cashiers jobs, the cotton gin destroyed farm labor, etc. 

These things make us more productive. Productivity increases is the only way for sustained, long run GDP growth. All other things such as manipulating the savings rate, or population (china is a great natural experiment of the later) might have short run impacts, but not long run. 

I was simply pointing out how weird it is the left is going after Tucker of all people. Many of his economic ideals are more in line with the left than the traditional right. ",ed_merckx,e9kpze3,conservative
That would literally not happen.,DraconianDebate,e9m1w54,conservative
I don't think he claims to be a journalist.  He's a talk-show host.  It's not his fault that the leftists are so easily ridiculed.,mlmack,e9l0owb,conservative
"At the end of almost every hostile interview he does that horribly fake laugh when they're out of time. As if to say *""hey I tried, but you're just too much of an idiot that I can't even""*. Like clockwork.

Even if the guest is some looney who deserves to be mocked, it's just kinda low and unprofessional. Definitely feels like insecurity on his part.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9lpl9u,conservative
"Can you imagine if they did though? If people surrounded someone like Don Lemon's place telling him they know where he sleeps at night and to leave town, and someone spraypainted a swastika or something in his driveway...we'd be hearing about this incident all the way up until the election. People like the guy you're responding to would be screaming about it at the top of their lungs and blaming it on all conservatives.

And yet now they're just dismissing it or outright condoning it because the right people were targetted.",DMooseJ,e9kfci9,conservative
He is prone to mob attacks though.,unibuckeye,e9krh6w,conservative
The ends don't justify the means. Your philosophy is evil. ,LegionBaby,e9m34h8,conservative
"Ah yes, that was my tactic as the little brother.",eloncuck,e9l7fbz,conservative
Straight out of Hamas’ handbook,8K12,e9lni0f,conservative
"I agree. I was curious about the law side of it, not because I want to hit anyone lol. ",therealpumpkinhead,e9l5kik,conservative
"Juries can consider any evidence before them and I expect most people will absolutely consider provocation, particularly when it comes to punishment. Also, from a legal perspective, provocation often negates self-defense, but it ultimately depends on the law of your jurisdiction.",Pontius23,e9ma10v,conservative
So it’s more of a “ok we all agree that dude was super fucked up and deserved that even tho he didn’t touch you” type of thing than something that you could cite as law. ,therealpumpkinhead,e9lgm8r,conservative
By intoxicated I meant as someone <21. Should’ve been more clear. Pretty sure being intoxicated is illegal at that point. At least in the couple states I’ve lived in. ,tathrowaway666,e9me07c,conservative
"In their world, yes. But to most rational people, anyone with a child, or sister will not accept this loons behavior. 

It actually will backfire and make Tucker look sympathetic, alienate moderates from the crazies. ",Slippery____Pete,e9knayr,conservative
"I think the better option would be to take these drivers and teach them maintenance and repair on said trucks. Of course, business owners are going to have to take care of their employees better than they have a legal obligation to.",unibuckeye,e9kr03e,conservative
"Eh... These trucks can easily have programmed fail safes to call the police for help in such an event. Any basic security measures are going to need at least a few minutes to overcome, not to mention the time required to transfer the products or switch the trailer. Maybe in some really remote areas this could be feasible, but anywhere police can respond in under 10-15 minutes, I don't see this happening. ",j3utton,e9kpq6n,conservative
"Too bad. He doesn't scream ""ORANGE MAN BAD!"" every night so he must be a nazi.

s/",unibuckeye,e9kr4gs,conservative
"I wasn't trying to argue with you, I was just trying to expound on the topic of the job losses because I find it interesting that people think it will happen like that. Like you said though, changes in production have never wiped out fields overnight.",TheTurtler31,e9l28gi,conservative
"The difference is stark for sure.

Most of the time it's a person on the Left that is trying to frame a right leaning person (NY vandalism, church vandalism, false claims).

And when it's a legitimate crazy right wing person the people on the right don't have any problem disavowing themselves from those types.  I don't want anything to do with crazy abortion rights people.  ",phydeaux70,e9kfjbk,conservative
"[*Chaplinsky v New Hampshire*](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Chaplinsky_v._New_Hampshire) isn't directly applicable, but set the precedent that fighting words aren't protected speech and can be subjected to legal restrictions. This has been used as justification for prosecutorial discretion and has lead to wildly varying opinions that no one really wants to touch.",ElbowWhisper,e9lhklq,conservative
">to most rational people

And there's the problem. These people aren't rational.

For the record, I agree, this won't end in their favor. Honestly, I think we have Avenatti to thank for Kavanaughs confirmation. Absent Avenatti I think Ford's allegations would have stuck. It wasn't until the Swetnick allegations that a lot of people sat up and said ""Hey, what the fuck is this shit?"". Avenatti is doing the same thing here.",j3utton,e9ko05m,conservative
I am always supportive of people learning trades like that. Very great opportunities to be had by those that do.,TheTurtler31,e9l22su,conservative
I mean if I have 3 cars box in the truck and just stop in the road how will the truck know that it's not just stuck in horrible traffic? Cops won't come rescue a driverless truck if it calls for them every time someone 8 miles up the road crashed.,TheTurtler31,e9l2d2z,conservative
"As I understand it from reading. The current rules on fighting words allow the state to sanction someone who utters them (an exemption to the 1st amendment). I know of no laws that allow for a violent response to them. These are two separate issues.

Fighting words may affect the prosecutor's case when it comes to bringing charges. A DA still has to take into account how likely it is to convince a jury that the accused is guilty of doing wrong.",arobkinca,e9lyx28,conservative
"You'd think so, wouldn't you? But the Democrats absolutely took back the House. What they're doing, this constant stream of lies, grotesque misinformation, and fabricated outrage are working.",HardCounter,e9kpdg0,conservative
"Agreed. I worked for a factory that would give you the opportunity to earn a bachelor's degree in advanced manufacturing. They would pay half the  educational costs up front and reimburse you for the other half over the next 6yrs, as an incentive to remain with the company. I was tempted and would have done it but a better job offer came in.",unibuckeye,e9l3ply,conservative
"They can see farther ahead, and behind, then 1 car length. Hell the new early warning collision systems are warning you when cars 5 or 6 ahead of you are breaking suddenly or doing stupid shit. Things you can't even see with your own eyes.

Plus even if it thinks it's in a traffic jam  it'll know if you're trying to open doors or access the trailer. 

I'm sure there are ways to trick it, there always are, but the chances of getting caught are stupid high. These things record and transit back *everything* they can sense. You have a limited time to grab what you can  before police get there, and if you can grab it and get away in time they'll know what you're driving and what way you're going in a remote area. There might even be GPS in the packages. You shouldn't be hard to find. This type of fast ad the furious shit didn't happen in real life. ",j3utton,e9l3e7o,conservative
The truck will call up a remote employee who will view the video feed and call the cops.,DraconianDebate,e9m1uuh,conservative
"Eh, a large group of House Republicans retiring this year didn't help that, along with a number of unrelated factors. The fact that Trump didn't lose nearly as many seats as Obama or Clinton and the gains made in the Senate will likely work to conservatives advantage in 2020.",unibuckeye,e9krfue,conservative
"The president always loses seats in the house in the midterms. It's one of the strongest trends in American politics. Gaining in the Senate is impressive on its own, that doesn't usually happen either, although it's more common than gaining in the house. ",LegionBaby,e9m2rlg,conservative
"> You have a limited time to grab what you can before police get there, and if you can grab it and get away in time they'll know what you're driving and what way you're going in a remote area.

I mean where do you think most trucking happens? Random highways in the middle of the night",TheTurtler31,e9l40j0,conservative
EVERY time it gets stuck in traffic???,TheTurtler31,e9n9js1,conservative
"I suppose. To counter my own statement: I also read that every single person Trump supported won their race. I'm not sure if he visit any swing areas or how the math works out, but it's heartening. Maybe we're weeding out the RINOs at a time when it's not super important we control both House and Senate.

The only thing that might get sticky is if RBG retires.",HardCounter,e9krwcz,conservative
"No, if it detects an intrusion attempt. You are really overestimating the threat of hijacking here bro.",DraconianDebate,e9nczk4,conservative
"Not at all. The House has no say in SCOTUS picks. We just picked up 4-5 seats and no longer have to worry about Flake, Corker, Murkowski, or Collins.",unibuckeye,e9ks39p,conservative
"About 60% of people trump supported were elected. This is across governorships, the house and senate races. Many it seems we’re re-elected in traditionally conservative areas so not a huge effect is swing areas.  ",ThrillHarrelson,e9l06hv,conservative
Oh. For some reason I was under the impression SCOTUS has to be confirmed by both House and Senate. Thanks for the info!,HardCounter,e9kt52p,conservative
It is an *outrage* that they would consider a man over a woman.  Sexists! ,R-M-Renfield,e9n3uzi,conservative
"They reaallly don't want young people in power. Almost as if they worked for something, and did not want it taken away by those who didn't...",ReaganTroll,e9n4bcf,conservative
DONT YOU ASSUME HIS GENDER,PurpleHouseSlippers,e9n3zge,conservative
"YOU DID IT, TOO!",PurpleAngel23,e9n621u,conservative
TOUCHE’!,PurpleHouseSlippers,e9n6x01,conservative
That’s awesome!,PurpleAngel23,e9mwvti,conservative
Great news,BigBoss3737,e9lsb1p,conservative
">That means if Mr. Trump fills all the vacancies, the 9th Circuit’s balance would be 16 Democratic appointees and 13 Republican — not a flip in ideology, but closer to partisan parity.

This is sort of bogus. If you appoint an originalist, they will adhere to the law without bias. By sticking to the law as written, they are apolitical. The assumption here that anyone Trump appoints will have conservative bias is a false one.

When you appoint living document types to the bench, they will pursue partisan bias. Their interpretation, not the law itself, governs their decisions. 

If Trump appoints 6 originalists, the court will remain heavily biased to the left.",Lepew1,e9mg8ji,conservative
gooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooood,sylect,e9mbpld,conservative
Yes indeed ,Chapka69,e9lzq13,conservative
"Of course she won't be charged...
She ran a college into the ground and into bankruptcy and she walks away scot-free without any charges of malfeasance. 
""It's good to be the king.""",Bubbacat7,e9ndumy,conservative
Reading the linked article it appears she made poor financial decisions while in a leadership position. I’m not familiar with the case so where is the criminal content here?,GoHuskies1984,e9np054,conservative
"Why *would* she be charged??  Democrats don't do illegal things, they are just extremely careless.  Oops!  ",Jizzlobber42,e9nh2oh,conservative
Democrats always seem to get away with it,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9ndk1m,conservative
I thought she was broke...,mods_blow_goats,e9mp0ae,conservative
She's already rubbing elbows with Pelosi? I feel like the Democrat establishment is going to chew her up and spit her out pretty fast.,Crusader_1096_2,e9n2pdx,conservative
"She's such a fraud. The headlines in the news make it sound like she is protesting Pelosi. But she is clearly trying to cozy up to her. That's smart. She gets the anti Pelosi support and when Nancy easily maintains her position Cortez can put aside her ""differences"" with Nancy  to unify the party to take on the evil orange man. 

This is just the far left socialist wing trying to gain influence and create the illusion of playing hardball with the Democrat establishment. Don't get me wrong, there is real division within the party, but each side knows that they need the other side to win. The politicians are playing politics within the Democrat party. It's the idiots on the ground so to speak that are getting played. The Democrat establishment always wins, Cortez just like Bernie Sanders will bend the knee when their masters come calling.",Rightquercusalba,e9o8sq4,conservative
"You know if I had 15 grand, I’d not think that was broke. ",Intimidator94,e9mr5cm,conservative
"I am sure she didn't pay for this herself. She's a politician now, Greatest discount there is. ",molon-labe7,e9mt5lu,conservative
Like the joke I saw elsewhere on Reddit this morning... Medicare for all? Just pay for it! Apartment for me? How does that work?,SickofInternetProgs,e9mxw79,conservative
I’m not sure exactly how it works.. but one minute she is flying the nation with Bernie and on talk shows non stop but somehow has no money. I get the campaign stuff may be covered by the DNC but those interviews pay money id bet. ,mods_blow_goats,e9mswd9,conservative
"Agreed. Her “I need my first paycheck” is a lie. She could get any of 10,000 people to fund her move ",mods_blow_goats,e9mt905,conservative
"> somehow has no money.

Socialists don't spend their *own* money silly; when she says she is ""broke"", she means that she doesn't have someone else's money to spend.....yet",Jizzlobber42,e9mw2gr,conservative
Lol. Very true. ,mods_blow_goats,e9mwkar,conservative
"It's going to depend on how much power the Orange Man Bad faction gets.  Since it appears that the driving force behind Democrats is Orange Man Bad, it seems like a safe assumption that Democrats will refuse to work with Republicans.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9nelmd,conservative
Then they will blame Reps for preventing progress.,PurpleAngel23,e9nfuvf,conservative
 Trump endorsing her is still hilarious (and clever) ,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e9n4vsj,conservative
"Isn't that just like #BelieveAllWomen
Topical self-centered, selfish attitude expected by a FemiNazi",,e9n5dof,conservative
Because being a woman is such a huge accomplishment.  I’m sure it’s the result of years of successful efforts on her part.,BrighamYoung,e9nexx8,conservative
"Stan Lee was married for decades.  The assault that is referenced was last year, when he was in his 90s and, by most accounts, senile.  ",Thorpolice,e9n53hp,conservative
"i dont wish harm onto anyone but the enemy. but these people make it so hard to not wish just that upon them. they remind me of some kids when i was a boy. those little pestering bastard children that had parents that bent to their every wish and they would narc u out any chance they got. but than one day you find them with out their parents. and u confront them. and than you beat the piss out of them. and then they stopped being little bastards. i feel, and now thats just me, that these individuals spreading this bull shit need their asses kicked. not put in a hospital or beat to death. just a nice 3 combo hit to the gut and the nose. a little bit of yelling after to let them know why they got hit. and maybe they too stop being little fucking bastards ",donjohn1986,e9n5tx5,conservative
"This whole obsession by Reddit with dead celebrities strikes me as very odd. Stan Lee wrote comic books, for god's sake, he didn't cure cancer. This kind of excessive hero worship is what reminds me how young and immature most of Reddit really is.

Oh, and Robin Williams wasn't very funny.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9n9p5p,conservative
not really an obsession. he was just a really cool dude. ill miss seeing his quick come backs. he was a nice person. ,donjohn1986,e9nbt2p,conservative
But she's not racist or anything...,JFGFNY,e9mlx2l,conservative
Because she knows her husband wanted to nail Margot Robbie and it bothered her big time. ,mods_blow_goats,e9mk7ma,conservative
"Well to be fair, most midgets have inferiority complexes. ",aluminum_lizzard,e9mk6rv,conservative
"This doesn't end until conservatives (almost  all of whom are white, btw, though excluding yours truly) embrace a political stance that not only says it's okay to be white, but that it is unacceptable to attack whites.
",lost_snake,e9mkuku,conservative
What’s your ethnic background?,PurpleAngel23,e9mwkse,conservative
"""Anthropogenic lack of sunspots to bring record cold, warns NASA scientist""

OR

""White Privilege caused lack of sunspots to bring record cold, warns NASA scientist""

There, now it fits the narrative and can be covered by the MSM.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9mo7g9,conservative
"I see nothing that's inconsistent with human-caused climate change. Sunspots are an 11 year cycle, this solar minimum will be cooler than any in the last 70 years. And then in a couple years sunspots will be back. This is not causing any lasting climate change.

",lewie,e9morw7,conservative
"If you need any more proof that the entire media is on board with the climate change narrative- look no further than this.

NASA scientist predicts major cooling- virtually no MSM coverage.

Anything fringe that fits narrative? Wall to wall coverage.",scarmine34,e9mmmfy,conservative
Somehow the left will claim plastic straws kill sunspots.,tenshon,e9mjxtl,conservative
Hahaha,PurpleAngel23,e9mw7n5,conservative
"> I see nothing that's inconsistent with human-caused climate change. Sunspots are an 11 year cycle, this solar minimum will be cooler than any in the last 70 years.

We only have about 100 years' of accurate weather data, largely from which we base our claims of anthropogenic climate change. IOW we really don't have much of a clue about weather, and this is just another example of significant factors outside of our control.",tenshon,e9mr3o9,conservative
Trump killed sun spots /s,Delta_25,e9mlx9k,conservative
"https://www.ncdc.noaa.gov/data-access/paleoclimatology-data/datasets

Now I'm not saying scientists don't have biases, but climatology is a real field of study with a lot of evidence. 

And in fact, we do have past evidence of sunspot activity: https://www.economist.com/science-and-technology/2017/01/21/an-ancient-forest-reveals-the-suns-behaviour-290m-years-ago

""During this period [290m years ago], the solar cycle averaged 10.6 years. That compares with 11.2 years in the modern era, although this figure conceals wide variation in the lengths of individual cycles. Within statistical limits, then, it seems that the sunspot cycle was the same in the early Permian as it is now, suggesting that the sun’s magnetic oscillations were the same then as they are at present.""

[Edit] Here's a more relevant quote:
""On Earth, the increased illumination of solar maxima drives photosynthesis, and thus plant growth. That permits botanists to use trees’ annual growth rings to work out what sunspot activity was like hundreds, and occasionally thousands, of years ago. """,lewie,e9msfvs,conservative
Can you expand on why the fact that we cannot control the sunspots casts doubt on climate change science?,Forever_Goofing,e9msnj3,conservative
potato,mysupersb,e9n6hke,conservative
"So this sunspot activity was significant enough to impact plant growth. There are many natural factors involved in determining our climate, so why are we so certain that humans are such significant contributors, when we have such little accurate data?",tenshon,e9mvg7z,conservative
"It's an example of one of the multitude of factors impacting climate change outside of our control. Relatively speaking we have little accurate historical data on weather. When you combine those facts, it can only cast doubt on our ability to predict or correlate human activity with climate change.",tenshon,e9muwl7,conservative
"> You discredit your larger argument with that statement, because we have plenty of climate data from long before people recorded temperatures.

All of that data consists of very rough estimates, based on averages over broad periods. The 100 years of accurate temperature records we have are just a blip compared to those estimates, and could easily be absorbed into the same overall averages if we extend it to the same periods. ",tenshon,e9n7bk9,conservative
"I'm not a climate scientist, but from what I've read, average temperature in prehistoric times moved much more slowly than current temperatures. You're right there are many variables going on - sunspots, volcanic activity, fires and extinctions. But year to year, decade to decade, we're seeing greater global temp changes than we've seen in the past. 

If you look at [this graph](https://www.temperaturerecord.org), you can see the up and down (presumably due to sunspots) activity, yet also still see a drastic upward temperature trend at the end.

I'm not a doom-and-gloomer, I don't think life will go extinct if we don't act now. But with the accelerated rate global temps are rising since the industrial revolution, there is a strong case that we are affecting our climate.",lewie,e9n1rmu,conservative
">There are many natural factors involved in determining our climate, so why are we so certain that humans are such significant contributors, when we have such little accurate data

What other natural factors that determine our climate have changed since we started collecting data? The only factor I can figure would be humans.",lovemaker69,e9mzvkt,conservative
"Firstly, according to that graph, as soon as we actually started recording temperatures (~1900), there were dramatic changes in temperature. Is it not possible that our *estimates* for temperatures prior to records-keeping could have been wrong? Just seems a bit coincidental. 

Secondly, do you have a more authoritative source for that data? Really not sure how legitimate a domain called temperaturerecord.org actually is.",tenshon,e9n2qe6,conservative
"We just established that solar spots/flares are significant contributors, and these are in constant cycles. Volcanic eruptions, forest fires - cyclical variations in the Earth's orbit around the sun, not to mention the unfathomably vast complexity of moving, interacting and changing energy systems throughout this planet. To name just a few.",tenshon,e9n0pa9,conservative
"1) Since we started recording temps in 1880, we have much more detailed, directly measured temps, so you're going to see much higher fidelity. Could older records be wrong? Well, I guess you'd have to investigate their methodology to determine that. I'm sure their estimates have margins of error. 

To speak authoritatively against their findings, you're gonna have to do a lot more research. You can doubt everything you read if you want, but I'll defer to the experts until I find evidence to the contrary - simply because I don't have the time to become an expert in everything.

2)
[Here](https://www.nature.com/articles/nature03265) is the link to the actual study, but it's behind a paywall. When I get some time I'll try to find a free version.

[And this](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_large-scale_temperature_reconstructions_of_the_last_2,000_years) is a list of climate reconstructions by different groups. I haven't looked through most, but there are some accessable for free.",lewie,e9n5uls,conservative
Part of me thinks the GOP wants this group to stay legal and semi relevant so the base has somthing to point to. Or just to prove that is how leftists really are. ,Nonsenseism,e9m7coo,conservative
I wish.,popsmokeimout,e9kypza,conservative
"God I hope this happens. This would create the next great news cycle of media defending ANTIFA with pictures of soyboys fighting ""fascism""",FallingPinkElephant,e9l9h4m,conservative
I was under the impression this already happened?,MarioFanaticXV,e9le3l2,conservative
A sensible move that will likely be opposed by lefty outrage.,Lepew1,e9mftc0,conservative
"> Former

These things are never from people _currently_ in power so I don't understand why they get pointed out like this.",AntifaArePathetic,e9lsv7c,conservative
"Eh they're not really a *group* from my understanding. It's more of an ideology or an action derived from ideological beliefs, it's not like there's some national Antifa periodical that members receive telling them where to go next or anything like that. What organization exists seems to be almost entirely localized",hisverbisdictis,e9lu4qp,conservative
You're not wrong ,Murican_Freedom1776,e9mc713,conservative
"NJ DHS did. That's the only declaration I'm familiar with.

https://dailycaller.com/2017/09/01/dhs-formally-calls-activities-of-antifa-domestic-terrorist-violence/",ngoni,e9lqvug,conservative
[Antifa is a communist movement founded in 1932](https://founderscode.com/useful-factsbackground-antifa-communist-movement/),PerceivedShift,e9m5xml,conservative
"Nope, that's the line of BS the media repeats without ever investigating it.  In actuality they're all on the payroll for shadowy money men like Soros and they take their orders from their pay masters.  They're well organized, well funded, and completely non organic.",StraightNewt,e9lxdl4,conservative
"Ah, I guess that must be what I had heard of then.",MarioFanaticXV,e9lv0t3,conservative
"I didn't see anything in your link that said it was a ""communist"" movement so much as that its original incarnation in the early 1930s had associations with the left at the time, which included communists. 

Moreover, that original movement was disbanded in the same decade and was not revived until the 1980s, so it seems as though the direct link between communism as an organized movement (USSR, any of various Internationals, etc.) and antifa is shaky at best.

Moreover, even if there were a stronger association, nothing in your link or any evidence that I've seen contradicts my larger assertion that the labeling of Antifa as a ""group"" is inaccurate. Even you identify them as a ""movement,"" which I certainly believe falls more in line with the actuality of Antifa.

Please don't interpret this as a defense of Antifa. I don't support political violence of any kind, and, if actual evidence exists of any kind of organized group planning such acts, then I certainly agree that labeling as a terrorist group is probably appropriate. But I see Antifa being cast as some shadowy boogeyman run by Soros or something but a real lack of evidence to back such an assertion up.

Opposition to this movement is already justified based on the truth about them; I think we do ourselves a disservice by hyperbolizing or indulging in unprovable conspiracy theories.",hisverbisdictis,e9m6htl,conservative
"I'd be interested to see any sources you might have to back that up. I've heard others say the same things, but it seems like it's mostly a conspiracy theory. If there's such a well-organized, well-funded effort, wouldn't there be some kind of paper trail?",hisverbisdictis,e9lxq6p,conservative
"They usually are pictured waving the anarcho-communism flags(red and black) at their ""protests"" so there's definitely evidence to show they generally support communism.",Mewster1818,e9mvh67,conservative
We gotta hide our documentation from the fascists. /s,InsanerobotWargaming,e9m7a8j,conservative
"Thinking from the perspective of Russia, wouldn't a democrat victory be their goal for the midterms?  That keeps the US divided and focused on internal issues instead of unified and interfering in what Russia is doing.  For the next two years very little will get done. That's a win for them.  

I don't think it was ever about a single candidate, their efforts were all about creating crisis and division, as evidenced by their ad buys and created news stories. ",Melesse,e9md0z1,conservative
If Republicans had won the house the story would be about how bad the Russian hacking was. Does anyone outside of r/politics take the Russia hysteria seriously anymore?,LobsterWithAnOpinion,e9lnh2l,conservative
They only push that narrative when they lose big time.  ,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9mjlbr,conservative
The bat signal has been engaged. Do not use the Russian hackers excuse anymore. Attention liberals the narrative shift has been engaged. The Russian hackers excuse has lost all credibility do not use it anymore.,FreeSpeechRocks,e9m1cmp,conservative
Because the DNC(Hillary) did not pay them this time?,ozric101,e9lpo2r,conservative
"Hillary wasn't running, and the Russians only have it in for Hillary.",Lepew1,e9mgco0,conservative
It was the election supervisors turn.,mlmack,e9m7jo0,conservative
Not enough good memes this time,FeelThePorn,e9m9lpw,conservative
"Some do, sadly. But the left doesn't have to believe it in order to spread it. Wait for 2020 when the Dems inform the nation's voters that anyone who doesn't vote for Hillary is a Putin-loving traitor. Maybe they'll strike gold and get a few people killed over it.",jd_porter,e9ls2uv,conservative
That's the point of the story. Nobody buys it anymore. It's used as a lame cover for everyone who posts to the wrong Twitter account and feels dumb. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9m1fjp,conservative
".....""and then eating them""",Charlie8005,e9lnc3m,conservative
"Lmfao, hilarious ",gloobhastan,e9lmunr,conservative
Aaaahaaa-what?!!! Shit what she just say?  I just swallowed my gum! ,AdamFromTheSouth,e9lms3e,conservative
"I got stung. Let's face it: Yes, she is that delusional and egotistical.",MarioFanaticXV,e9m1gyv,conservative
And elections of course,Isredditreal2009,e9lokbo,conservative
"I was a young naive man working at the Winona, MN Red Cross because I hurt myself at my other job as  ManPower associate.  It was 1997.

I was sweeping their drive way or something outside and the elderly man next door kept coming over and talking to me.  He seemed nice and I would talk back to him and he kept saying stuff about Bill Clinton and super crazy stuff I thought at the time.

&#x200B;

It wasn't until I went to prison a few years later and saw how prison was very much like how Democrats want everyone to be equal regardless of how hard the work.  That guy probably had alzeheimers, but he was saying some shit to me I don't know how he knew before the internet was really going on.",nonamenoslogans2,e9lpa4f,conservative
"In my country, some people do say something like this to support a criminal former president : ""Luladrão roubou meu coração"", which would translate as "" 'Stealing Lula' stole my heart""",Ricardo1701,e9m3fw2,conservative
Litterally,freedomhertz,e9lponj,conservative
I honestly believed that before I saw it was babylonbee. Definitely something she could say.,ardee2124,e9m40h5,conservative
Got stung by the bee. This legitimately sounds like the kind of smarmy and self-promoting “humor” Clinton would use. ,etherealsmog,e9m78fw,conservative
And I thought Trump was delusional. She takes the cake. ,Stormtideguy,e9lof07,conservative
And killing all those people that go against her. Ya know it’s really weird how all these that challenge her disappear only to be found dead ... ,_gpbeast_,e9m8bmv,conservative
"""The Only Crime I Ever Committed Was Stealing The Hearts Of The American People...""

""...and then eating them.""",VirginWizard69,e9mtcfm,conservative
Stung by the bee lmao ,timbowen,e9mubhm,conservative
These satire articles are sneaky.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9n2mst,conservative
I was actually expecting the article to be that. ,LinkandShiek,e9lnypj,conservative
Lmao,L0rdBumlicker,e9m8l7j,conservative
"Clearly a comedy site.

""I can't help it if I'm just really good at connecting with the common man, who may only own two or three modest homes and wear suits worth less than $1,000,"" she said. ""I'm just that really down-to-earth kind of person, and you can't blame me for that. It's just who I am, fam!""",run_mollie_run,e9ls03c,conservative
"The way some states bills are written, you would have to have a FFL do a transfer just to use a friends gun at the range or to hunt. It also requires a FFL to give your spouse, child, parent, etc. a firearm. ",Rapidfiremma,e9mb8we,conservative
*laughs in conservative majority supreme court*,_TeamCobra_,e9mn14u,conservative
"What are the pros and cons of a universal background check? How are they any different than the background checks required now? I don't currently know enough to make an opinion on this, and would welcome some input.",Cr8er,e9m8dyc,conservative
"I am not a gun control proponent by any stretch of the imagination, but they aren't focusing on the wrong part of the ""problem""? You want to stop people from getting shot, you have to work on controlling the ammo. ",Fuzzy_Muscle,e9mvn0b,conservative
Fuck that.,Reven1911,e9mde67,conservative
*Cries in Californian*,almightybuffalo,e9mr1bm,conservative
"It's a ploy to:

1. Make transferring a weapon prohibitively expensive & inconvenient by cracking down on FFLs.

2. Eventual nationwide gun registration (and confiscation).

No pros since the demographic of people who commit the *vast* majority of violent crime are obviously not going to bother following these laws.",No1Buck,e9mawy7,conservative
"Universal background check is kind of a misnomer, we already have as close to 'universal' a background check system as is possible without either outlawing private transfers (a non-FFL selling to a non-FFL) or registering every single firearm.  Of course you can make a law that says ""All private transfers must go through an FFL to run a background check"" or you can open up the NICS system to everyone, but the only way you can enforce it is registration.

Aside from private sale/gift, the only other legal way to get a firearm without a background check is to build it yourself.",Science_Monster,e9m9ds5,conservative
A 'universal' background check could lead to the consolidation of data about every single American into one location let alone those who have purchased/sold firearms. And gun sales would only be the beginning because that 'official' data base would eventually be used for other things.,postonrddt,e9mcvj5,conservative
"The real ""problem"" is neither guns nor ammo.  The ""problem"" is our society somehow breeds individuals who are prone to violence and have no qualms with randomly killing others.  That's where we should be focusing our energy. ",TMA2day,e9mz0n2,conservative
"as a Californian Republican, I can say this is accurate. ",Fuzzy_Muscle,e9mvhy7,conservative
"40% of Americans will never relinquish their guns, no matter what law they pass.",Reven1911,e9mdj46,conservative
"Okay, so it's an attempt to outlaw private sales and/or force everyone to register their fire arms? 

I don't really have a problem with requiring an ffl for private transfers, though I doubt that is an major way for bad people to get guns.

I will not register my fire arms. ",Cr8er,e9m9wwf,conservative
"I'm among those people, however, unfortunately I think the true number is much lower than 40%. The good news is we don't need anywhere near 40% for 2A remedies to be effective.",No1Buck,e9mdmv6,conservative
"""I really don't have a problem with the federal government mandating that I use a dealer to sell my car.""

""I really don't have a problem with the federal government mandating that I have to bring my books to Barnes and Noble to give one to a friend.""

""I really don't have a problem with the federal government making my grandmother have to pay Macy's to give me that sweater she knitted.""",Odoacer476CE,e9md9f8,conservative
That's very true.  And that is why they fear us.  ,Reven1911,e9mdqps,conservative
I see your point. I need to do some more thinking and reading on this whole thing.,Cr8er,e9mk3b6,conservative
Excellent! That’s what I like to hear. ,link_ganon,e9mzgyc,conservative
Is the bible or the constitution the law of the land?,nearlygod,e9n08z2,conservative
What do you think? That question is totally irrelevant. ,link_ganon,e9n0nnh,conservative
She wants a run off so bad because most of her voters don’t work! Lol,HolsterOfNuts,e9m558o,conservative
"Nah, the rules for Florida are clear. The county that didnt turn in votes on time disenfranchised voters, not those enforcing the law. Go with election day results, no do overs.",Lionstriker2,e9mdoj2,conservative
Top minds!,SickofInternetProgs,e9mxsbj,conservative
Said by someone who has no merit.,tenshon,e9mxvew,conservative
Why is an election official not using their own car?,Enzo_SAWFT,e9ld42r,conservative
Gee... Wonder why...,_Gardien,e9lecsx,conservative
What the fuck is going on. This is amazing to me. How is this being allowed,KaiserGrant,e9lp15v,conservative
"Bullshit. They are either removing bad ballots or bringing good ballots that have been created to or fro the election location. 
",stoffel_bristov,e9lq81u,conservative
"'provisional' means in case they need it, right? They're just bring prepared.",AddictedToGlue,e9ljg0d,conservative
"My guess (if I'm being cynical) is so that if they were recorded loading ballots in or out of that car, it would be harder to trace it to an individual.",mastaxn,e9lkmjs,conservative
Democrats don't get in trouble,ConsistentlyRight,e9m3wc6,conservative
Probably. The name on the rental car would be Broward County not the name of the person driving it.,Madstork1981,e9mcz9p,conservative
"Age is not fixed, it is constantly increasing, with time. ",ozric101,e9nc13p,conservative
"Good.

&nbsp;

Seems Alyssa Milano’s recent denouncing of Linda Sarsour May have woken some people up... 

&nbsp;

God bless Laura Loomer for calling Milano out and making her face reality.",ClippinWings451,e9kq61n,conservative
Good. Don’t know why they got one to begin with. What have they accomplished?,JAK4189,e9li7j8,conservative
'Bout time really,DK_Tech,e9llgb1,conservative
Must be pretty bad ,polerize,e9m7baf,conservative
Nice flair!,Castaway77,e9lxmwq,conservative
I could say the same for you!,DK_Tech,e9lywy8,conservative
"This article was painful to read. 

I couldn’t even make it thru it to find what she’s fighting. I’m gonna have to search it on my own ",Chapka69,e9mjwto,conservative
"So how does the republican governor win by 15, yet Mcsally loses? That many people split their ticket? ",iwasthebeaver,e9laxnz,conservative
Why is so much of this thread below the threshold? ,cadmus_irl,e9ldq14,conservative
"This is a disaster. 

McSally should challenge her to trial by combat. ",YankeeBlues21,e9la2ph,conservative
"Lol at the people who think it was fraud. She lost by tens of thousands of votes. 

Arizona is becoming bluer. I just hope the CA transplants realize that if they keep voting democrat they will just turn this state into the place they tried to escape. ",patriots0715,e9lkj4a,conservative
"Watching the debate between her and McSally was PAINFUL. Honestly don't understand Arizona's thought process in this, given Sinema's absolute cringe worthy candidacy, other than the fact that they bought into her whole ""I'm an independent"" charade. Can't wait for that honeymoon phase to expire in January.

She'll be a useful vote in the partisan divides coming up the next two years. And thats really all the Dem's need her for, if they can get pick ups elsewhere in 2020. They won't mind losing her in 2024.  

This whole ""Vote Against Trump"" is eeking out the win by just enough to be a problem heading into 2020, and the GOP better fucking wake up about it. ",ZeroTheCat,e9lhzhd,conservative
Should have been an easy win after Kavanaugh and that video of Sinema leaked. If something similar came out with McSally trashing AZ it would have been played in loop in the media.,the-divine-comedy,e9layyp,conservative
"My fear with this is that in six years AZ will be too much of a blue state to get rid of her...

Also should add probably also elected a Democrat Secretary of State, the second in command in the State. ",Zac1245,e9la6qw,conservative
Trump is fucked in 2020. So many states he won are turning blue ,johnson881_,e9lf3di,conservative
McSally ran a pretty lousy campaign.  She was a great candidate but the campaign was bad.   It looks like John Kyl is going to step down at the end of the year and she'll serve out the rest of that term. ,tja_1478,e9lb608,conservative
Stolen,M6D_Magnum,e9m8o1z,conservative
"Is this not OBVIOUS voter fraud?

""Just keep counting ballots until the Democrat wins?"" This result is invalid.",leftajar,e9lql7h,conservative
What a piece of trash. Glad I don’t live in AZ.,PurpleAngel23,e9leozb,conservative
"Shame on Arizona electing a terrorist loving candidate to show how progressive they are. 
The only correct action at this point is it to completely void Arizona from Congress by selling it to China. ",glockedup1,e9la4uk,conservative
"There's no way I'll believe it after Sinema was exposed. The GoP is playing too nice fighting the theft
",Lionstriker2,e9mdc6h,conservative
"Damn that sucks. But the important thing is that we now have enough Senate votes to cancel out Collins/Murkowski, meaning  RBG/Breyer can be replaced with staunch pro-lifers.",WhyDidIDie,e9l9xsf,conservative
Horse apples ,cadmus_irl,e9la9ri,conservative
"Seriously it’s time. How long are we going to let Democrats do anything they want to, just in order to fuck America’s soul to death. This is very blatant fraud, Maricopa County recorder needs to be indicted. It’s time we start playing dirty as well. Conservatives may laugh at protestors but we need to get off our asses and do something if we want to live in a country that resembles America in a few years.",Jebytu,e9lbvf4,conservative
So obvious she cheated,The_Bird_King,e9l9ym9,conservative
"Go on Twitter and all my fellow millennials are blowing this off as a “talking point” by conservatives. That is, when they’re not drinking kambucha and vaping.",CapnCooke,e9lkrb0,conservative
"Arizonan here. It's not suspicious at all when you know the story. Ducey is a well liked governor who has worked on some centrist policies. his opponent in this election, David Garcia, ran of the worst campaigns I've ever seen. He ran on education and had no plans for it, was almost never running ads or doing interviews and even pissed off a couple news radio and tv stations around Phoenix by promising interviews then sketching out last minute. The one thing he did say he would accomplish was abolishment of ice and tearing down the border wall, which even most Hispanics in the area don't want.

Mcsally, on the other hand, ran a very ugly campaigns of viscious mudslinging which turned alot of the independents off. During a telivised debate with Sinema she was asked pointedly why she voted to gut net neutrality and pre existing conditions coverage for healthcare and he became very defensive and blathered on about why she doesn't wear smart watches because it's a privacy concern.  She also badly fumbled a question about roe v wade. At one point she actually tried to play the victim when questioned about her widley publicized voting record. She lost the independents and I think it cost her the election. 

So really you can't compare the Ducey and Garcia race to the sinema mcsally race because David garcias wild incompetence doomed him way before election day 

",PMME-SHIT-TALK,e9ljz6f,conservative
There's been a lot of cases like that (though not as extreme) this election cycle. People vote for candidates they like before they vote for candidates that are on the same nominal team.,ElonMuskForPrison,e9llgxg,conservative
They did elect Flake after all,tja_1478,e9lb6sp,conservative
Shit makes zero sense. The democrat candidate for Secretary of State is also leading. That’s second in command for AZ!,Zac1245,e9lb6ag,conservative
"Election fraud, most likely.",Telineye,e9li10r,conservative
"Communist brigading, as usual. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9lwyrk,conservative
"All we can hope now is Sinema stays true to her idea of being an ""independent"" and not reverting to a radical a radical leftist. Not having high hopes though. ",Zac1245,e9laxhy,conservative
"Are CA transplants to be blamed? Look at Texas, where exit polling (note: by CNN) indicated that native Texans were slightly more likely to vote for Beto than Cruz, while transplants were significantly more likely to vote for Cruz. Which doesn't really surprise me, because someone moving from CA to TX is probably doing that because they think CA is too liberal for them.",GorathThorgath,e9m6h3t,conservative
">Arizona is becoming bluer. 

Arizona is becoming more Hispanic. ",swimcritique,e9m55uz,conservative
">She lost by tens of thousands of votes.

Which only showed up after election day when McSally was leading. ",TheSeaISail,e9m15do,conservative
"> I just hope the CA transplants realize that if they keep voting democrat they will just turn this state into the place they tried to escape.

But their *feels*!!!

",YankeeBlues21,e9m4jp3,conservative
I don’t even know what the GOP is doing anymore. They are pissing away so many opportunities. ,Zac1245,e9ljbpj,conservative
"The more corrupt and distasteful a candidate is the more the democrats will vote for them, can confirm, live in Illinois.",NuclearMisogynyist,e9lhmaq,conservative
"> Should have been an easy

Hard to beat 90% of the media posting propaganda and election fraud.",Telineye,e9li2x9,conservative
Everyone had early voted by that point.  It's why early voting should be scrapped all together. ,tja_1478,e9lb81v,conservative
[deleted],,e9lb52a,conservative
Senate races mean almost nothing when gauging Presidential races. ,WhyDidIDie,e9lkac0,conservative
Then let’s just throw in the towel and save time and money then.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9lh8fj,conservative
Dems got hammered far worse in 2010 and that didn't stop Obama getting back in. ,TheSeaISail,e9m1756,conservative
"Pretty much this. Unless he can pull some more of that 458th dimensional chess out of his ass and clean up the system.. it's not looking good.

The only things that could potentially sway the public to keep him in 2020 are some massive scale events that either make it impossible to not have sympathy for POTUS, or a serious terrorism type event that makes voters unlikely to want a party switch during a crisis.

It's one thing for the political landscape to change, but throw on the constant media bias against him and most people being just uninformed and likely to follow whats popular.. yeah it would be wiser for him to quit after a single term and to go retire somewhere quiet.",AntifaArePathetic,e9ltf5d,conservative
McSally ran a lousy campaign? Did she call Arizona the meth lab of America?,hello_japan,e9lg036,conservative
Can she win re-election tho. That’s the question. ,Zac1245,e9lbik1,conservative
Why is it even on us to run great campaigns when the Dems are running these loonies? ,YankeeBlues21,e9lbwfp,conservative
[removed],,e9lfssn,conservative
Why do you think she loves terrorists?,ThreeStringKa-Tet,e9lqur3,conservative
I live in puma county. Its corrupt as all hell here. Didn't ask for an i.d. or anything when I went to vote.,desertdog19,e9lki1y,conservative
I'm more concerned with 2a than with roe. ,Odoacer476CE,e9livzv,conservative
"The way the dems are fucking the laws, do you think the will respect the supreme court?",Isredditreal2009,e9lotaw,conservative
Make the NFA unconstitutional ,QuantumSwag_,e9mhsff,conservative
"I posted links above

Try to get people to report the fraud instead of twiddling thumbs ",Matthmaroo,e9lcnei,conservative
[removed],,e9ljb2r,conservative
He's a piss baby who cant take blame for anything. He fucked up a primary and pointed the finger at a company that did their job.,dragonkyng,e9lp1nn,conservative
"Please send your proof ( pictures , 1st hand testimony ) McSally campaign


Saying it on Reddit does nothing  

https://mcsallyforsenate.com/contact/


https://www.judicialwatch.org/about/staff-directory/



https://www.projectveritas.com/contact/


REPORT to authorities or people with means to expose the fraud !",Matthmaroo,e9la618,conservative
"I'd say this is very accurate. Sinema aired advertising everywhere and, dare I say it, actually campaigned on moderate liberal policies (healthcare mostly). Meanwhile, McSally ran mudslinging ads with talking points (Sinema in a tutu and go join the taliban).

I learned nothing about McSally.",Kwijiboe,e9me73r,conservative
"People were also put off by Trump's attacks on McCain. I know many people vocally against Sinema, but who didn't vote in the senate race or voted third party just because of that issue alone. I think it's kind of stupid, but to each their own. Another thing I think McSally didn't get was the suburban support that in AZ at least leans pretty right. A lot of people I know in the Scottsdale area really wanted Schweikert to run, and to be quite honest were just unfamiliar with McSally. She's from the Tuscon area and is kind of a new political face up here, so that surely hurt her in Maricopa county. 

If Schweikert would have run he probably wins by 5 points. ",ed_merckx,e9mckhz,conservative
"Thank you, this actually makes sense. I still have concerns about how the votes came in so late, but youre rationale makes a lot of sense. ",iwasthebeaver,e9lm0q4,conservative
What about the Secretary of State race. Dem is leading there. ,Zac1245,e9lmz2u,conservative
[deleted],,e9lma1n,conservative
I guess. It just makes 0 sense ,iwasthebeaver,e9lbe5u,conservative
There is zero percent chance that she will remain moderate.  Zero.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9lb65e,conservative
"There are no moderate Democrats. Their party has sprinted to the left like crazy and Arizona’s new senator said it’s acceptable to defect to the Taliban. She’s a nut. 

But she was right about Arizona being the meth lab of democracy, so I’ll give her that. ",YankeeBlues21,e9lbcui,conservative
"I mean, if she actually votes as a moderate like she claims she is (which is a bold face lie, I've met her in person a couple times and talked to many people who've personally dealt with her, the fact the media portrayed her as this classic purple AZ politician is bullshit) then that would be good. She'd be in support of actual immigration reform that focuses on skills based immigration, more regulatory cuts and what not, as well as moderate judges like we actually do have in AZ.

GOP voters in Maricopa really just stayed away from this race I've come to find out. at a level that I got way wrong. I knew early on there was strong support for Schweikert to run, but figured McSally would be a fine placeholder, but turns out she was a lot more foreign to the GOP up here (she's from the southern part of the state) than expected, and the toxicity of Trump's attack on McCain was still really fresh on a lot of people's mind. McSally's performance in the debates were also a fucking trainwreck.

 The one attack that really hit was that McSally voted to remove protection for pre-existing conditions, which the correct response is that no, the GOP healthcare bill, which didn't pass by the way and isn't law. It would have allowed insurers to charge up to a 30% premium surcharge if you go either 3 or 6 months (I forget excaclty what the final number was in the last bill that got out of the house) without health insurance and then attempt to sign up late for insurance and you have some condition that's on a list. It's well known that one of the major issues with the ACA is that people allowed their insurance to lapse, paid the relatively small penalty on their taxes (or just lied and so long as they don't get audited are fine) and would wait until they get really sick to purchase health insurance. This has a major issue in the ability for insurance actuaries to correctly set premiums as often sick people who will likely need healthcare are not accounted for in the risk pool. about a dozen lines of attack McSally could have gone after Sinema on when it came to the ACA which is horribly unpopular in our state, we were one of the hardest hit by the ACA, but the media is completely dishonest and just magically forgot to cover the yearly massive increase to healthcare premiums, the fact that most areas only have one plan you can chose from in the exchange, but McSally like never brought it up. 

That said, I figure she will handle herself like the far leftist she truly is, people will clearly see it, Schweikert or another central AZ established politician who has notoriety in the phoenix metro area will run and win by 5-10 points easy, just have to wait 6 years I guess....",ed_merckx,e9mdchw,conservative
Weirdly in TX Cruz was doing much better before the Trump stop. I think some lessons are to be learned here that every red state is not the same. ,memberCP,e9md44f,conservative
"There's no way to really know, but I would imagine that most people who flee CA do so because of the cost of living. Was it the deciding factor in the election? Who knows.",patriots0715,e9md46x,conservative
"They always think the footage is doctored, which somehow makes the person caught red handed the victim.. and we know who loves victims!",AntifaArePathetic,e9lt7nm,conservative
Oh. *Nice.*,WebSliceGallery123,e9ld29o,conservative
"It does with Arizona. The Latino population is widening in Arizona and each election the last few cycles have been closer and closer blue. Arizona will be a battleground state likely here on out for another two decades, then be full blue.",Zadiuz,e9m5gd2,conservative
Or just nominate someone else in the primary.,Nukatha,e9lql8u,conservative
He can clean up the system all he wants. Fix everything and head this country in a great direction. It wouldn’t matter with the news media and younger generations.,Zadiuz,e9m5ibs,conservative
She'll have a year of incumbency advantage,tja_1478,e9lbl1k,conservative
"Well, because we need to win by 10 points to overcome the election fraud.",djaeveloplyse,e9lmfs0,conservative
Why are you even here? Go back to the many liberal subs that you frequent and stay away.,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9lgh76,conservative
"The 2nd Amendment is fine for now. Unlikely Democrats take Senate anytime soon, and the Supreme Court also isn't becoming liberal.",WhyDidIDie,e9lk59k,conservative
"How have they been fucking with the laws? I want to hit a friend with some cold, hard facts but I suck at keeping up with the MSM news cycles.",daweinah,e9lvcvd,conservative
Hello fellow “conservative”.,Jebytu,e9ln34l,conservative
It's almost impossible probability wise for the absentee ballots to be this far off from the rest of the state,The_Bird_King,e9laazh,conservative
"Yeah I feel like mcsally picked a bad time to run a mudslinging campaign, what with the recent death of McCain and his stance towards the nasty campaign stuff. At one point after mcsallys ads started Sinema made a point of how she was not going to do alot of those negative ads and made a comment about McCain preference to avoid them as well and I think people noted that. 

Sinema took a stance of ""independent"" and ""country over party"" at a great time in Arizona political history. She milked the McCain tree pretty well",PMME-SHIT-TALK,e9mk3ii,conservative
Schweikert would be a really good candidate and his district is unlikely to flip blue if he were to leave. ,Zac1245,e9mesqg,conservative
"Yeah the late votes have been a big thing with some people. The reason that shook out like that is because Arizona allows early ballots, and apparently those early votes comprise up to 75% of all votes cast in the state. This leaves a huge backlog of votes they being to count on election day. Because of ambiguous state law, All of the counties in Arizona except Maricopa ( where Phoenix is ) and pima ( where tucson is ) have a habit of destroying early voting ballots that do not make a certain time limit to be counted. Well it just so happens that Maricopa and pima were sinemas base, so after the election there were much more sinema ballots coming in then mcsally ballots. Alot of people are mad because they didn't know their ballots were being destoryed and the gop sued to ensure that all early ballots across the state were counted. I don't really know if anyone knows how many ballots were destroyed in those rural counties",PMME-SHIT-TALK,e9lpudx,conservative
Yeah I didn't follow that race too closely but I'd bet it has something to do with the teacher walk out and proposed strike. Our education system is one of the worst in the nation and there was alot of national attention about how poorly our teachers are paid. Again not sure but I'd bet that's a reason for the swing there ,PMME-SHIT-TALK,e9lq2o6,conservative
"Mcsallys ads were egrigiously nasty. One of her early ads was slanting some state bill from sinemas as an attempt to allow men to have sex with children positutes.  I think he phrase at the end was ""protect our young girls from Sinema""

She also accused of her of treason and put out a press release ( right after mcsallys bad debate showing) highlighting that the punishment for treason is prison or execution and that charges should be brought up against her ",PMME-SHIT-TALK,e9lqdgr,conservative
"She is gonna turn into Claire McCaskill redux. At least az will get rid of her in 6 years like mo did with Claire.


Suburban soccer moms won this election for her, much in the same way that they almost staged an upset in tx senate race. The same demographic that propelled bill Clinton into the white house and helped him win az in 96.",dtlv5813,e9lcy3j,conservative
"Unfortunately, the fact that she is LGBT means the chances she has been indoctrinated to be ""progressive"" is extremely high.  I will be shocked if she doesn't vote with the progressive wing of the Democratic party 100% of the time.",Telineye,e9li0ao,conservative
But who? Nobody in the Republican Party can win against Trump.,PhilippeLeBel,e9m02h5,conservative
"Supreme court challenges take months or YEARS to appear on the docket for consideration since the matter has to go through every damn lower court, and even then the matter doesn't have to be considered by SCOTUS and a lower court decision can be upheld.

Meanwhile states can and will pass freedom-violating laws that have an immediate impact.",AntifaArePathetic,e9ltjaz,conservative
I was specifically referring to the election fraud. They did that so blatantly i highly doubt they will treat the sc with any respect when it doesnt suit them,Isredditreal2009,e9lveqa,conservative
"I’m posting links for someone to report it



With this much fraud , someone must of seen something",Matthmaroo,e9lacwx,conservative
[removed],,e9lfko4,conservative
"We love him up here, a community guy, grew up in AZ, went to high school and college here, really governs with his district first, party affiliation second. I've had the chance to work with him on a few AZ things and he's just a good human all around, what you see is what you get. His challenger this election had nearly a 30% turnout increase over the 2016 election, literally the max democrat turnout you could probably get in our district, and Schweikert won by over 10 points. In 2016 he won by like 23 points, and we are not a far right district. I'd color us purple on a lot of issues and maybe even lean left on certain social ones actually. 

He claimed he had no interest in taking Flakes seat, I think part of that is they are good friends, plus he said he still doesn't want to be a senator at this point or so he claims. ",ed_merckx,e9mge4g,conservative
"Fellow AZ here as well. From personal experince if you wait in line during election day, you'll see tons of people walking in with their mail in ballot, and they drop it off on election day. I'd say in the Scottsdale area polling place I go to that for every one person in line, I saw at least two walk in to drop their ballots off. Almost all of my neighbors do early voting, most people in my office as well. I saw multiple co-workers dropping of their entire families mail in ballots at our office's postal drop box.

The primary fuck up a few elections ago where they tried some open polling center crap was also a huge driver of early voting registration. Basically they tried something where anyone could go to any polling place, the idea being you didn't have to spend resources on having every single polling location open, and rather just use larger, more centralized locations. Well this lead to an average wait time of like 3 hours or something ridiculous. Especially in the Phoenix suburbs, you're seeing massive population growth as our business friendly laws and regulations and relatively low cost of living for a very modern high standard of life cities, is driving traffic to be ridiculous as it is. the 101 and 202 often look like the 405 in LA during rush hour. The trend has been for years that you wait hours if you vote on your way home from work. ",ed_merckx,e9mcckq,conservative
"> At least az will get rid of her in 6 years like mo did with Claire.

AZ could be a full-blown blue state by then. ",Zac1245,e9leyoa,conservative
Missouri took 12 years to get rid of that piece of shit. ,soxfan90,e9lfbza,conservative
Very true. I had a feeling her being against an assault weapons ban and such was just to win votes. ,Zac1245,e9lj7ng,conservative
Literally any of the other Republicans would have beat him in 2016 if the field was 1v1.,Nukatha,e9m5ekg,conservative
"Oh, my bad. Election fraud wasn't in the post you responded to and you didn't say anything about in yours so I didn't know.

Can they get around the SC though? Esp with Kavanaugh and Gorsuch there now.",daweinah,e9lvxw7,conservative
I’m assuming they are on the phone with project veritas or judicial watch,Matthmaroo,e9lfqg3,conservative
"Open your eyes dude, boxes of ballots showing up only benefited democrats",The_Bird_King,e9lgtsa,conservative
"Yeah I am from his district, grew up there. Moving back soon actually gotta get out of this liberal hole that Virginia is becoming! ",Zac1245,e9mgvaj,conservative
"Wrong.


Az would not have re-elected their unabashedly conservative governor by 17 points if they were actually turning blue. ",dtlv5813,e9lfh9f,conservative
But now? And the field was 1v1 for a large part of the primary ,PhilippeLeBel,e9m8qw7,conservative
I dont know how but they are obviously willing to do whatever it takes.,Isredditreal2009,e9lw1md,conservative
"That’s what I’m talking about 

People need to video that shit or take the boxes and report to James okeefe 


Stand the fuck up instead of bitching on Reddit 


We have so much proof , someone turn it in",Matthmaroo,e9llgtx,conservative
[removed],,e9lh3zt,conservative
"Yet Trump only won the state by like 3%, they may elect a Democrat secretary of state and six years is a long time. ",Zac1245,e9lg14g,conservative
[removed],,e9lfuea,conservative
"Sorry I feel out of the loop again and you seem to know what's going on.. what have the dems been up doing? i know Georgia and Florida are wonky, something about finding votes and the counts being really close

edit: nm I found this a few posts down https://www.newsbusters.org/blogs/nb/nicholas-fondacaro/2018/11/11/abc-nbc-ignore-court-rulings-against-dems-florida-election",daweinah,e9lwazk,conservative
"Let me guess, you believe all the ballots in Florida are real too ",The_Bird_King,e9lhgwb,conservative
AZ collects old people like a coin collector collects coins.,arobkinca,e9lz0um,conservative
[removed],,e9lg0i0,conservative
He's saying conspiracy theories aren't enough to over turn an election. You need proof. Just like you need proof to accuse someone of sexual assault.,NuclearMisogynyist,e9lhqqf,conservative
"People say they have proof 


I’m saying make a difference and turn the proof into project veritas ",Matthmaroo,e9lljvc,conservative
"Suck my independent dick you Russian troll.

See? I can make baseless accusations too.",ElTaco12Pac,e9lg836,conservative
"When Democrats accuse a Republican of election fraud with manufactured evidence, we get the full force of the FBI to investigate for two years.

When Republicans accuse Democrats of election fraud with circumstantial evidence, we for whatever reason need strong upfront evidence before anything is done.

Do what they did to Trump.  Give the FBI free reign for two years and see what they can find in Arizona and Florida.",Telineye,e9li852,conservative
Exactly! This deserves 2 years of follow through if the country is to be saved from this mess. I guarentee it will turn up more than thr Mueller nonsense.,Lionstriker2,e9mdhfp,conservative
"Straight up incompetence/corruption in Broward County, from the police (Parkland shooting), to their Sheriff, to their election officials and Brenda Snipes. What a national disgrace.",conceiv3d-in-lib3rty,e9jusdx,conservative
This gets me wondering - why can't I jump online and see the results of my specific ballot?,voicesinmyhand,e9k1mv5,conservative
Is there any legal recourse? ,BeardsArePeopleToo,e9k39p3,conservative
You need to be able to see your personal voting records online if we don’t want America to fall to corruption. ,1TrickDoomFist,e9kq6b6,conservative
"So I was listening to NPR earlier and they were talking about this issue. They played a soundbite from Snipes' lawyer claiming there was no evidence. Then the host stated that the claims were not based in any evidence. Then they had not one but two guests come on and state that there was no evidence. (Indeed there may have been more than two, but I got sick of it and turned the radio off).  
  
But what was really interesting is that after one of these folks would claim that there was no evidence they would list off some of the evidence. It would be like:  

  
>'There's no evidence to support what the Republicans are saying. Snipes has been under investigation before and was reprimanded by a judge but there's no evidence that anything happened this time.'  
  
Or:  
  
>'It's disturbing how the Republicans are saying that these things without evidence. It should be noted though that there are a large number of suspicious ballots that only voted for one person [governor or Senator I can't remember which one]. Sure you *can* vote for just one, but statistically it seems unlikely that that many people would choose not to vote for the other office.  
  
And it's like, **that's the evidence guys!** No, it is not (at this point) definitive proof but there is a *lot* of evidence of at least gross incompetence if not outright fraud. And this is how investigations start. You never start with red-handed proof. If that were the case then we wouldn't need criminal investigators at all. You start with some evidence that looks fishy and you then dig deeper.  
  
But the propaganda machine was insistent that there was no evidence. The irony is I actually had not heard the piece of evidence concerning the ballots that had only voted for one office. Sure it doesn't *prove* anything at this point, but it is evidence of something strange going on and I learned of that particular piece of evidence by someone insisting that there was no evidence at all.  
  
N.b. The quotes from NPR from above are not to be taken as exact words by any stretch of the imagination. They are loose summaries of what I remember hearing.",BTFoundation,e9kgdqe,conservative
But I was told voter fraud never happens unless the Russians are involved somehow,bea4abbnrq16,e9knswe,conservative
"geez, that absolutely sucks dude. here’s hoping every vote gets counted this time around 

~~why do we still have a problem with this tbh~~",autism_vro,e9lg573,conservative
"Just out of morbid curiosity, has anyone added the number of ""found"" votes to to the last reported totals.... then compared to county census data?

Likely to be spectacular mathematical gymnastics.... but that's not evidence. ",MarvinsBoy,e9knm4m,conservative
"Can't believe she's still in office. If everyone really wants honest and fair elections, don't have people like Snipes destroy trust in the political system. If this were a GOP location doing this to Democratic votes, there would be people dragged through the streets without question. 

Also, just got my Flair-did :)  ",Dutchtroll5,e9ljnvq,conservative
Watching r/politics rage against Trump for saying this election might be tainted is hilarious.,SickofInternetProgs,e9l04az,conservative
This is completely unacceptable. How can we elect people who are clearly unable to fulfill their duties into these positions of power? This is straight up fraud and there needs to be punishments handed out.,goldrotmgonly,e9ktuic,conservative
We keep getting in the news. Sorry about David Hogg.,Okchud,e9k1i3c,conservative
Almost like the governor is completely incompetent ,doorknobman,e9lf79o,conservative
you really want your vote to be personally identifiable?,snazztasticmatt,e9k3hjo,conservative
"In Indiana we can to a degree. For example I can see that this year I voted early in person, where, and what date. It doesn't show who I voted for but it does show that I voted.",aCreditGuru,e9k7w7x,conservative
"Whether you voted or not is public record, but not who you voted for. Keeping the information in ballots secret is an important part of preserving democracy. Having the information on a ballot be visible after-the-fact opens us up to vote-buying, corruption, and coercion. These were all things that actually happened in the mid-19th century in the U.S. when ballots weren't secret everywhere. Voter intimidation and vote-purchasing was commonplace when these restrictions were non-existent.

Any secondary presentation of the information on your ballot (even a ""private"" one that technically only you're supposed to see) opens up the option for some third party to verify that you voted the way they wanted you to.

While you can technically still intimidate or pay someone to vote in a specific way today, you can't actually verify that the person in question actually voted how you wanted, making these tactics quite useless thanks to secret ballots. There's nothing stopping me from voting for candidate B even after you payed me 100 bucks to vote for candidate A, and there's no way you can know what I did.

While I understand the desire to be able to ensure your vote was counted appropriately, the implications of making that information viewable after the fact is very dangerous. Whether or not you voted is already public record, and I think that is a fair enough middle ground to be able to verify whether your ballot was counted, even if you still need to blindly trust that your votes went to the right place.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9kfsng,conservative
Then there would be concerns of security if those records were somehow breached. Thoughts?,goldrotmgonly,e9ktwn4,conservative
"Evidence is only required when the allegation is against a democrat. Accusing republicans of something? No evidence required. Demanding evidence just means you're a (insert people group type here)ist.

/s, obviously. ",d_grizzle,e9kk8pl,conservative
"Standard of evidence against Democrats: Must have unedited video footage of Brenda Snipes walking into the room, pulling out provisional ballots, and filling in the bubbles for Gillum and Nelson herself.

Standard of evidence against Republicans: I remember someone doing a bad thing to me 36 years ago. I forget where it happened and when it happened. None of the people I say witnessed the event were actually there. But string the guy up anyways.",GameShowWerewolf,e9ldsou,conservative
"Take it back and don't let it out of it's cage again, please and thank you",dicaparly,e9kgym8,conservative
"That's preferable to lots of people on both sides of the aisle claiming disenfranchisement. You could also show online only whether or not an eligible person's vote was included in the official count, rather than how they voted. ",ripinpeppers,e9k455k,conservative
It wouldn't have to be personally identifiable. It could be something as simple as getting a serial number generated during your vote that you could enter online to view a record of your vote.,nmj95123,e9khdq9,conservative
"I mean do it like bar exam results. They're posted online for anyone to see and extrapolate bar passage percantages... but all the exam takers are identified only by serial number.

So give voters serial numbers, which are blinded to the intake system, but then posted online so people can then view their ""results"". ",kawklee,e9kic1d,conservative
How do you see that?,CapnPear,e9kdvtd,conservative
Couldn't you still do this by making the person take a picture with their smart phone of the ballot? ,AF_Fresh,e9kwevk,conservative
Better security. And voter data privacy isn’t really as fundamental as election integrity ,1TrickDoomFist,e9kyce1,conservative
The juxtaposition of these two events really is astonishing. The Kavanaugh stuff was definitive proof and if you didn't believe it then you didn't believe women and were just as bad as the rapists. But if you believe that the Snipes stuff *might* warrant being investigated then you are a conspiracy theorist.,BTFoundation,e9leirg,conservative
Also feed him a few sandwiches. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9kqyaz,conservative
I have to agree ,merkmerk73,e9k5lqc,conservative
">  You could also show online only whether or not an eligible person's vote was included in the official count, rather than how they voted.

you also open up all people who didn't vote to harassment by keeping them searchable. Isn't that just as bad?",snazztasticmatt,e9kgjip,conservative
They do this in California. One of the few things my state does I actually approve of. ,d_grizzle,e9kjpp0,conservative
log in to indianavoters.com by clicking the 'check your registration record' and then my record is under the absentee ballot information since I voted early.,aCreditGuru,e9keebf,conservative
"I messed up my vote ballot when I went to vote last Tuesday. The lady at the election center told me to put it into the shredder there, and get a new ballot. Apparently you are allowed to redo it once if you mess up the first one. Therefore, take a picture of the vote they wanted on your smart phone, shred it, and then get a new ballot with your real vote. ",Bacardiologist,e9l7j6q,conservative
"Nope, you just use a code on the ballot that lets you see it. No personally identifiable information needs to be available.",s0v3r1gn,e9kidc6,conservative
I’m willing to bet unskilled violent immigrants would vote for Democrats ,Chapka69,e9mto0f,conservative
"Wait a minute, I thought we stopped talking about the caravans now that the election is over?",justhere2havefun,e9n22cs,conservative
They always seem to leave out the fact that Trump is just responding to the mocking from Macron. ,iwasthebeaver,e9n2nq0,conservative
"What is 'American culture' after waves and waves of unassimilable immigrants have been imported, and the craven right , craving respectability they never get, has cosigned the left's extirpation of every person in every institution who does not fit 21st century progressive mores?

The RNC and GOP hated Kelli Ward and pushed Amnesty Martha and *lost* while the governor won (after staking out positions against Middle East refugee resettlement and attending an ICE honor function in August with the POTUS). 

And yet, the GOP's Paul Ryan and Conservatism Inc. does what on immigration? 

Nothing - worse than nothing, they sideline people who want to do something.

American culture is vanishing, and it is being replaced by mindless consumerism and CNN and McDonalds. Flatscreen tvs and diabetes as the only common cultural touchpoints. 


",lost_snake,e9mfxyj,conservative
"Likely scenarios:

* If he does, Graham becomes Judiciary chairman
* If he stays, then Crapo to Finance and Toomey to Banking",ReaganTroll,e9mqwml,conservative
Don't leave! ,soxfan90,e9n0po2,conservative
"Haha, on what grounds does Maryland thinks it gets a say in the executive branch of the federal government?",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9n13n4,conservative
"They are intending to argue that the federal vacancies reform act wasn’t meant to apply to “important” positions. 

If they don’t lose this, they certainly will at the Supreme Court. ",tm1087,e9n3qou,conservative
">The White House has said Whitaker's appointment was justified under the 1998 Federal Vacancies Act, but Maryland argues that law applies to routine positions and not one as important and powerful as the nation's top law enforcement officer.


Seems like the Trump administration is quoting an exact precedent while Maryland is just saying it’s in the Constitution. Does anyone have the exact part that they are using as precedent against Trump?",Enzo_SAWFT,e9n7f3m,conservative
Our entire legal system has gone full retard. ,ozric101,e9n1qco,conservative
You never go full retard.,PurpleAngel23,e9n24dt,conservative
"Crony capitalism. 

New York had go get taxpayers to bring Amazon in. Because going to Florida or Texas was too obvious of a great place to go. ",Chapka69,e9mknxq,conservative
"I hate deals like this.  Screwing the taxpayer. 

Wisconsin's deal with FoxConn is worse.  Wisconsin taxpayers will pay $219,000 per job. And that money isn't from tax relief, that's straight up CASH from Wisconsin taxpayers.  

"" the company could receive up to $192.9 million in state payments for investments in its plant in each of seven years running from 2020 to 2026. So by the 2022 fiscal year the state could be making an annual payment of $313 million to Foxconn. ""


It will take them 25 years to recoup that money. ",LordOfTheDerp,e9muwbq,conservative
"I disagree NYC didn't have to, they were forced to by the process. 

It was always going to be those two location. The selection process was just a way to get them to raise the offer. 

It's smart but shouldn't be allowed. ",memberCP,e9n34qa,conservative
"It’s such a bizarre move. How can you just give these companies money like this. 

It’s because people don’t think about that tax money. They just hear a big company coming and “creating” jobs 

",Chapka69,e9n332m,conservative
"I agree with you. Everyone “proposing offers” was just all these cities begging the company to open shop in that town for the politicians to look good. 
 
What I meant by had to go to the tax payer was they had to go into tax payers pockets and take it. NYC is charging it to the tax payers. So city programs and departments that need money  will get less because they handed amazon 1.5 billion.

",Chapka69,e9n3ssy,conservative
It's probably the reason Scott Walker lost reelection.  The people aren't too keen on the whole idea/process. ,LordOfTheDerp,e9n3boi,conservative
"Because people are small picture short sighted. They look for what’s best right here right now, not the big picture thinking 

Dangle 5 dollars in front of you while stealing 100 dollars from your back pocket ",Chapka69,e9n43kg,conservative
Guess how long the Sessions firing was talking about... ,molon-labe7,e9m3j4b,conservative
"This headline implies that the White House was looking for a fight and selected Acosta to have it with.

Absolute BS.  Acosta started this with his consistently caustic behavior.",BrighamYoung,e9m6xh6,conservative
"I actually think it is good that Trump is finally calling out the press for what it is. I am old enough to remember the Watergate hearings on TV as a kid (they interrupted my favorite kids shows!). They were non-stop bashing on Nixon. And every network at the time played them all day, 8-4, every day while they were going on. And, this was before cable TV was available. They were 100% biased in their coverage. It was the end of the world, Nixon was the new Hitler.... I think a lot more of the country is now aware of just how biased the press is. And the leftists don't care because, for them, the ends justify the means.

The reality of it is that Obama's administration blocking of congressional data requests, for any scandal they call ""fake"", is in reality way worse than the worst of Nixon. The leftists are still so enshrined in the DoJ that Judicial Watch still has lawsuits going on about blocked FOIA requests. ",ctrocks,e9m46tx,conservative
Maybe it's not a good strategy but geez it sure feels good to see Trump fight back against these hyper-partisan arrogant hacks who think it's their duty to pontificate instead of report.  They will never give Trump or any Repub a fair question.  So screw them all.,GMU1993,e9m2ujl,conservative
Should just ban him for general decorum. President says no stop talking ,memberCP,e9n30p9,conservative
"Yes, but Trump doesn't have to take questions from Acosta.",ReaganTroll,e9m7vr8,conservative
"You’re right, refusing to ever call on CNN wouldn’t cause any controversy whatsoever.  I doubt any media outlet would even mention it at all. /s",BrighamYoung,e9m8tkm,conservative
This guy is a modern Napoleon III.,SickofInternetProgs,e9myzib,conservative
No shit? You had the entire government for two years and accomplished almost nothing. ,Odoacer476CE,e9l14r0,conservative
"Planned Parenthood is still funded, there's no border wall, and Obamacare wasn't repealed.",chabanais,e9k7k6o,conservative
"It's not a tough pill to swallow, it's the truth.  Almost no progress on any front with co trolling majorities, a media fiasco, and the danger of a generation lost to any sort of conservative ideas.  The vote tallies are in and their population is growing.  

The last two years drove moderates away, and did serious damage to the movement as a whole.",Falkamper,e9l0dcm,conservative
I am a Republican. One of the biggest blunders by the GOP was failing to truly repeal and replace the ACA when Trump took office. Shame on them.,aaronholliday,e9k73kn,conservative
"100% Correct. Hell, if we handled the last 6 months differently, we would have grown our leads in both houses. ",VXMerlinXV,e9k6xs2,conservative
If the GOP acted like Graham had in the last 3 months they would have crushed it.,Emperor_Aurelian,e9kcti8,conservative
"LMAO literally all of modern political history says the GOP wouldn't hold onto the house this election, not to defend them, I fucking hate the republican party, i just hate them a lot less than the democrats, I would prefer the government accomplish absolutely nothing instead of passing democrats agenda or most of trumps agenda.",LSU_Coonass,e9kg9i4,conservative
Wow someone who might learn from mistakes?!  ,nooneuknow42,e9kk7m8,conservative
Kept the Senate because McConnell & company actually did things. Shoutout to Paul Ryan.,MyCustomUsername,e9kej37,conservative
"Says Jim Jordan, the leader of the group that sink the Obamacare repeal and replace because it wasn't shitty enough. (Downvotes all you want, he led the group that killed the original repeal and replace, so now we have it)",SickofInternetProgs,e9k8e5t,conservative
"Yeah, and Hillary would be President.  I'll take the orange man over the house any day of the week.",Rip_Van_Finkle,e9kefzn,conservative
"Honestly, I get a kick out of Trump's tweets. I love 'em, and his IDGAF attitude. However, a lot of the millennials I know who I've talked to don't like him purely because of his attitude. They don't pay enough attention to policies to even know what's going on, how good the economy is doing, etc. All they see is ""Trump made a bad tweet!"" and dislike him and Republicans in general because of it.

It's sad, but it's true. I wonder what effect it would have if Trump stopped with a lot of the tweeting, or kept it strictly professional.",grdlock,e9kju3o,conservative
I believe if they had fully funded the wall they would still have the House. Ryan was not helpful. They should choose Jordan. He is a fighter.,epictetusdouglas,e9le5d4,conservative
"This is just me, but I voted Trump simply for the court picks. In that regard I'm as happy as a clam. ",brubeck5,e9lhnhx,conservative
"My father has worked in the medical industry for the past 30 or so years as an ENT Doc.  I have heard him say many times that Medicare is not helping pay the bills.  Free healthcare means that no one is going to want to be a doctor anymore because of the low pay.  If John McCain hadn’t done the thumbs down on repealing Obamacare, the medical industry and doctors most likely would have seen a boost in their pay.",Aldyssie,e9l0eh8,conservative
"They increased federal spending, the exact opposite thing they ran on.",flippy76,e9ldm17,conservative
"If you think the last two years were nothin, *just wait* to see how little gets done the next two",WeimarRepublic,e9l8lka,conservative
The House really did pass a lot of stuff. But it always got held up in the Senate.,FullConservative,e9m3vsa,conservative
"Didn’t pass anything relating to gun right either. National reciprocity didn’t go anything, neither did the hearing protection act. All talk, no action. ",Zac1245,e9k901f,conservative
"Exactly. Is the repubs actually had spines, they would have motivated their base to get out and vote. Instead, they showed us that it doesnt matter if we win or lose, we still won't get what we want. ",LumpyWumpus,e9lacrr,conservative
It’s like the Senate got used to doing literally nothing during Obama’s years. ,bongo1138,e9l75l5,conservative
They'll never defund PP. It's a great talking point. They're too cowardly to truly defend life and talk about how evil the organization is and bring up all the federally funded alternatives that don't kill babies.,neemarita,e9lnjft,conservative
[removed],,e9kd9pr,conservative
But the military needs to be funded /s,GameShowWerewolf,e9klvao,conservative
Because they didnt have a plan. They had 8 years to come up with something and just didn't. ,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9llz3t,conservative
"So true. We spent 8 years slamming that disaster of a law, but didn’t take the time to think of an alternative. We should have had our leaders building a consensus on healthcare policy from the outset. 

That’s partly why I think the repeal effort failed: we don’t have a consensus on how to proceed afterwards. Some people want just straight repeal and no replacement, others just want to tweak the law, and still others want to flip the board and start from scratch.

We need a thought leader(definitely not the president) on the right to start really building a new consensus on how to reform healthcare or we will be stuck with single payer. ",robopolis1,e9lab5m,conservative
Thank McCain for that one,Russki1993,e9kd6fy,conservative
Thanks McCain!!! A true American hero,TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9kj2bf,conservative
Why the hell are we replacing the aca? Just scrap it. ,MegaBlastoise23,e9kvgfl,conservative
You mean shame on John McCain ,kotov9syndrome,e9ljrur,conservative
"god, fuck mccain for that so much",GeoStarRunner,e9ln5cx,conservative
Just a bunch of RINO’s. Not much was done in the past two years unfortunately,Jokeri009,e9l6gz2,conservative
"Amen. I'm trying to find the ""OFF"" switch on the ballot I get each year, and so far, Trump was the closest thing.

Any republican who campaigns on actually shutting down the federal government, firing the millions and millions of federal employees and reducing the federal budget down to the millions of dollars, or simply just abolishing the Federal Reserve, or just BUILD THAT FREAKING WALL will get my time and attention in the elections. Here in Washington State, republicans are running around wondering whether they can even endorse Donald Trump. It's pathetic.",jgardner,e9knods,conservative
Republicans learn from their mistakes? Don't make me laugh.,jgardner,e9knfxy,conservative
the Dems overreach on Kavanaugh might have been the only thing that kept it for us,rebelde_sin_causa,e9lbbgu,conservative
But the Freedom Caucus stood by its principals. They claimed it didn't go far enough so they made us keep all of it.  The Freedom Caucus sure showed us!,swanspank,e9l6z2j,conservative
"But what are his policies? I am not being facetious at all either, genuinely asking. As an independent, I've been trying to give him a fair shake since, after all, hes our president but it seems like there is no coherent policy. A lot of his ""policies"" are just talking points with nothing substantial backing it up. For instance, even with the tax cuts. Sure, he cut taxes but they raised spending so it's a negative impact in the end. I don't know, forgive me, I am not trying to be a trump hater but I just dont see any clear direction to his ""policies""

Edit. Just to further clarify. He says build a wall. But that's all he says. He never articulates what his vision of the wall is, what it would entail from us a nation, financial burden vs security, etc. He just repeats a talking point.",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lmabu,conservative
[removed],,e9kmacp,conservative
[removed],,e9l1be3,conservative
Exactly. ,Odoacer476CE,e9lfr5v,conservative
"Frankly, I'm pretty happy when government does nothing. The less those fucks do, the less things they ruin. My point is that the 'Pubs ran on expanding liberty and contracting government. They did exactly none of that. 

",Odoacer476CE,e9lfp06,conservative
Gridlock that prevents the growth of the creeping cancer that is government is a perfectly acceptable consolation prize. ,ElbowWhisper,e9li43o,conservative
All talk to get elected.  Then nothing.,R0binSage,e9l2h7q,conservative
The fact that the Hearing Protection Act didn’t get passed is so damn stupid. Suppressors are less regulated in Europe than they are here ,thereisasuperee,e9l1rcp,conservative
They did some stuff but not as much as they needed to do.,chabanais,e9k94ib,conservative
"The Republican party is fake, sponsored opposition, I'm forced to conclude.",leftajar,e9lp8h6,conservative
"Pretty much anyone who pays taxes got a cut.  Trouble is, when 50% of the population doesn't even pay Federal taxes it's not as good as you'd think.",chabanais,e9kdfqk,conservative
"> Tax cuts for rich people?

You mean the people who are functionally paying all the income tax in America?",soylent_absinthe,e9kmtqq,conservative
"rich individuals didn't really make out of this tax cut as great as the Dems would like to paint it as. Most of that talking point comes from the corporate tax rate being slashed from 35% to 21%, which is the major contributing factor in so many companies coming back to establish themselves and manufacture in the US. Which also leads to more job openings, higher wages, and GDP growth.

I wish republicans would have explained this as the main selling point, rather than just saying 90% of taxpayers will see a marginal tax cut. Though that is probably harder to get through to an uninformed public with a biased media.",Kirkin_While_Workin,e9kjeng,conservative
"You mean tax cuts for people who pay taxes? If you're going to spew democrat talking points, can you do it elsewhere?",SilverHerfer,e9kp41e,conservative
The federal government is constitutionally required to fund the military.,SilverHerfer,e9kp69e,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> We need a thought leader(definitely not the president) on the right to start really building a new consensus on how to reform healthcare or we will be stuck with single payer. 

Agreed, one of the major issues with Trump is that there's not much of a coherent ideology. Unfortunately, that makes certain policy moves very challenging. ",psstein,e9lfggg,conservative
"What was the replacement? I know the party was echoing ""repeal and replace"" but I don't recall anyone having any sort of coherent replacement. As a lestist, it seemed to me more like ""repeal and let's see what happens"". ",yM32R8fw,e9knyab,conservative
Chucking 20-30 million off healthcare with no plan do do anything about it but mumble something about personal responsibility would destroy the electoral chances of the Republican party for a generation.,likelybullshit,e9l71kd,conservative
[removed],,e9lfaiw,conservative
So federal budget down to the millions but border wall projected to cost billions. I think we need to be honest about the federal budget. The money spent on elections is already a billion dollars. Social security is over 900 billion dollars and ending that program would absolutely destroy the livelihood of millions of lower income Americans not to mention two generations of people who have paid into social security that would have to be reimbursed if it was abolished. A federal budget in the millions is absolutely not happening.,SkippingRecord,e9l7s2c,conservative
"This is why I never will get on board with these groups.  They lose track of the good for the perfect.  I love that they want ideological purity, but that isn't politics and it never will be.  The tactics of Jordan and the Freedom Caucus contributed to us losing the House, along with Paul Ryan.              ",TBSportsFan1254,e9l9ii8,conservative
"The fact is that Donald Trump did not get a majority of the votes during the Republican primary. Contrast this with 2012 when Romney did, and 2000 when Bush did. (2008 is a slight outlier, but even then McCain got more than double the total number of votes than the 2nd place finisher, Romney, did).  
If we had a ranked voting system in the primaries, either Rubio or Cruz would be in the Oval Office right now, with probably larger House/Senate majorities for Republicans.  
I would like nothing more than for a primary season next year that looks like [1976](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Republican_Party_presidential_primaries,_1976), except with the challenger winning.  
I don't think Cruz or Rubio could pull it off, but I think Mike Lee could, and he would get my vote in a heartbeat.
If we have exactly ONE Republican primary Trump, I think we have a much better chance of having a solid, conservative government.
I expect the leftists will run someone articulate with very little baggage in 2020, and Trump doesn't stand a chance.",Nukatha,e9knpvj,conservative
"In my opinion, politicians do too much pandering. Always putting on a fake face, saying bullshit just to make people happy, doing things that are shitty just because some people want them to

That's what I like about trump. He doesn't give a shot about appearance, and imo that's exactly what this country needed. Someone who isn't going to pander to audiences to get good ratings on the news, or be all PC about everything as to not offend anyone. That's a weak leader, imo. Trump does what needs to be done, and says what needs to be said, and doesn't care if democrats like it, or of it pleases other countries. He believes in doing stuff to make the US stronger and better off economically, and that's that.

I'd actually say he has a great attitude, and terrific public presence.",grdlock,e9la6f7,conservative
They kept their promises to those who own and feed them ,Bentaeriel,e9lk5zj,conservative
"The only thing the two parties differ on is social issues. No party spends less than the other, they just like to spend it on different things ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9llmxi,conservative
I love this comment lol,TheBreakfastMan,e9lw5l7,conservative
"But not of interest to this issue, gun owners didn't vote Democrat because of that not being passed, right?",GBrQB1kjUMF0VOspaSi8,e9l5e82,conservative
"Can buy one off the shelf in Finland.

&#x200B;",WIlf_Brim,e9lllv5,conservative
"Their goal is to disarm us, why reduce any regulation at all? You expected any kind of consistency?",Liberty_Pr1me,e9m841b,conservative
The only pro-gun bill to pass was a Congressional Review Act bill undoing an Obama-era regulation. And that was just in the first month of the 115th Congress.,Taylor814,e9ke9no,conservative
Mitt Romney said the same thing you said and got killed over it,game46312,e9kp6tr,conservative
"> Pretty much anyone who pays taxes got a cut.

The vast majority of the cut was for the wealthy and you know it",Sea_Safe,e9ljhyh,conservative
"I never said I was against it, I support tax cuts for pretty much anyone. But to me at least it's a lower priority than immigration, school reforms, law enforcement etc. Great people got money but I'd say the whole west has more urgent issues atm.",snoppballe,e9l096y,conservative
Cool. You want to finance their tax cut from your own social security and medicare rather than mine & my family's?,Sea_Safe,e9ljjmx,conservative
Can you link some sources in relation to companies coming back? Harley Davidson jumped ship with their tax cut in pocket and that’s the only one I heard about ,Whatifimjesus,e9l017l,conservative
I think it is becoming more clear now as companies report profits and begin handing out bonuses. I have a relative who is ecstatic about how good Trump has been for business. They reluctantly voted for a Trump but may happily vote for him now. I would NEVER have expected to hear them say this.,GladysCravesRitz,e9ksyq0,conservative
"I never said I was against it, I support tax cuts for pretty much anyone. But to me at least it's a lower priority than immigration, school reforms, law enforcement etc. Great people got money but I'd say the whole west has more urgent issues atm.",snoppballe,e9l08tc,conservative
"Yeah, but it's the most over funded military in human history, by a lot.",Saganaut5589134,e9l7144,conservative
And that is why we will continue to fund Planned Parenthood and not fund the wall; because military funding keeps being held hostage.,GameShowWerewolf,e9kszn3,conservative
"The military will work for free, right!? ",psstein,e9lfde9,conservative
"No on-paper replacement would have withstood the first debate. Just like how Obamacare was completely different when it was first proposed. By the end of the debates and amendments, it had become a grotesque shit ghost of itself.",varemia,e9kpuhd,conservative
Personal responsibility for one's healthcare?  Why do we need a nanny state government to replace it with anything?,sahuxley2,e9koic7,conservative
"It's not chucking 20-30 million people off of healthcare; that's preposterous. It's getting rid of their current insurance, which is not the same as healthcare. On top of that, almost all of those people are likely to get a new, better, and cheaper insurance plan after that when the ACA regulations are eliminated from a repeal.

Edit: not quite the same argument that I was making, but here's something for the leftist downvote brigade to read. It's ridiculous to think that 20 - 30 million people will have the rug pulled out from under them.

https://www.dailywire.com/news/13913/7-myths-about-obamacare-debunked-aaron-bandler",Hayes_for_days,e9lelrr,conservative
"Spoiler alert:he probably loooooves the F-35.

But he’s a fiscal conservative!",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9liqrg,conservative
"Entitlement reform needs to happen. By 2028, interest on the debt will overtake almost all discretionary expenditures. In the next 10 years, we're going to see that we can't keep kicking the can down the road. Either real changes happen, or there are going to be severe austerity measures just to pay for basic government operations. ",psstein,e9lfmmo,conservative
"I am a major proponent of compromise in regard to the budget, and I think you hit the nail on the guy above who seems to desire a tea party revival. How can there possibly be a compromise between two sides of the republican party if Trump's side wants to stack the national debt until his agenda has been passed including the wall, and the other side wants to bring it down to practically nothing while still keeping the defense budget high. It's time for one or the other and if its the former, then interest rates should be balanced so a recession can be avoided",Wildera,e9lf7mr,conservative
"I like Jordan, tend to like the freedom caucus.  But they screwed us this time wanting it all or nothing.  Well, the Democrats out played them this time.  Now they have lost power and will be crying for our votes.  Two years with all the cards and Republicans managed to screw it up.  But they stood by their principals. Isn't that good for THEM, not so good for us.",swanspank,e9lat40,conservative
"> If we had a ranked voting system in the primaries, Hillary Clinton would be in the Oval Office right now, with probably larger House/Senate majorities for Republicans. 

Fixed it for you. ",psstein,e9lfrky,conservative
"Agreed. Literally the only difference between 'Pubs and Dumbs is what they want to tell you that you can't do, and what they want to spend the mobey they steal from you on. Dumbs wanna take my money and give it to illegals and Johns Hopkins for gender reassignment surgeries. 'Pubs wanna take it to build nations 10,000 miles away hoping they'll love us and give cops tanks. No thanks.
",Odoacer476CE,e9m52yt,conservative
National carry should have gotten done.  Paul Ryan is a POS.,chabanais,e9keq7i,conservative
"People don’t want to hear that coming from someone who has more money than god, but that doesn’t mean its not true. Wish people thought with their hearts less ",thereisasuperee,e9l1okk,conservative
It's still true though ,ConsistentlyRight,e9kqzbx,conservative
"It’s almost like context and how you say something matters.  An Obama 2012 campaign speechwriter couldn’t have done a better job crafting a setting, audience, and script to make Romney look like an out of touch rich guy.",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9lj3yx,conservative
He also got killed because he coupled it with “[obama] starts out with 47% of the vote...people who don’t want to take control over their own lives”,MegaBlastoise23,e9kvel0,conservative
"Mitt Tardney.

He said it worse.",chabanais,e9kut7k,conservative
"Factually incorrect. 

https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/80-percent-of-taxpayers-would-get-tax-cuts-next-year-under-gop-bill-think-tank-says",chabanais,e9lk2q5,conservative
"Also, since the state and local tax deductions were capped, many high income earners will see net increase.",WIlf_Brim,e9lluqh,conservative
"The top 1% of income earners pay about 70% of all taxes, the top 10% pay nearly all the taxes collected. If you cut taxes, who then saves money? Use your head. My wife and I made about 75k last year, and we dropped from 15% to 12% bracket from the tax cuts. Look at the charts, theres no need to debate it.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e9ma07a,conservative
"Makes sense. I agree that immigration is a bigger priority to fix, and unless the tax cuts were coupled with lowered spending, then it's a half-measure. ",soylent_absinthe,e9l0f2l,conservative
"Considering that in-service aircraft can't get replacement parts, it's not overfunded, it's overfunded in the wrong areas. 

",psstein,e9lfcek,conservative
[removed],,e9koxj9,conservative
Incredible that you got downvoted for that comment on this sub,Doegewoon,e9lsxa8,conservative
I honestly don't know if fiscal conservatism is even a thing. When is the last time a Republican president has left office with a lower deficit than when they entered office? Genuinely curious,_Renegade_Sock_,e9ll2jm,conservative
Interest rates should be balanced?  What does that even mean?,mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9litrz,conservative
"If you really think Trump did better than a Rubio or Cruz would have, I don't even know what to think.",Nukatha,e9lgjr2,conservative
"Ryan attached Fix NICS to the Concealed Carry bill. It passed.

Then when the budget fight came around, he used Fix NICS as a bargaining chip to vote for the budget. He ended up pushing more background checks through, but left Concealed Carry on the cutting room floor. ",Taylor814,e9keuvh,conservative
"Interesting note, the term ""bleeding heart liberal"" was first used to reprimand Washington liberals for pushing a bill that provided penalties for lynchings. ",Kotaku,e9lgt16,conservative
"> High-income earners would see the biggest tax cuts, the Tax Policy Center finds


??

people didn't elect a populist for him to give the 1% a tax cut",Sea_Safe,e9lktd9,conservative
It's a half-measure that's blown up the deficit,eclaircissement,e9l2cxr,conservative
"Tax cuts should even be talked about for a least a decade. You need to cut spending slowly and let the uncut taxes pay down some of the debt. Then start reducing taxes as we reach a stabilized, lower spending point ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9llukp,conservative
That's fair.  No reason to promise a replacement if they didn't have one.,sahuxley2,e9kp0t4,conservative
Because Trump added the replace part in his campaign planks.,PhaetonsFolly,e9l7fvk,conservative
"I’m not sure.  I share your cynicism, though.  I do think that there’s a sizable voting bloc for whom it’s a desired thing.  ",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9llro2,conservative
"Fiscal conservativism is certainly a thing amongst conservative/libertarian voters. Unfortunately, it's not a thing amongst Republican politicians (with a few notable exceptions like Rand Paul). ",that_originalist_01,e9m987t,conservative
"I don't think Cruz or Rubio would've won in the Rust Belt. 

Cruz and Rubio are both fiscal conservatives. Fiscal conservatism is, unfortunately, not a winning message at the national level. Give it 10 years when entitlement reform becomes inescapable, but not right now. ",psstein,e9lgsvd,conservative
RYAN is one of the reasons we could have done more.,hundycougar,e9knyek,conservative
Ryan wants amnesty for his corporate donors.,chabanais,e9kezcb,conservative
"Bleeding heart itself was a derogatory term for Catholics.

Before a certain time, ""bleeding heart liberal"" meant, very specifically: Catholic liberal.",Bentaeriel,e9lkndc,conservative
"If you pay more taxes you see more savings.

People who pay no Federal taxes see zero savings.

Duh.",chabanais,e9llgz3,conservative
"Yeah and honestly it's fine if they don't care that much about the deficit, I just want them to stop pretending they care about it every time Republicans aren't in power.",_Renegade_Sock_,e9lnrlk,conservative
"Is it? Republicans voters support building the wall, increasingly military funding, possible war with Iran or NK, tax cuts when deficit is extremely high, a president that wastes an absurd amount of money visiting his hotel/resort constantly, etc.

I suppose they'd want to cut things like welfare but I don't think they understand how they benefit from things like welfare programs or Medicaid. There are a shitload of dirt poor red states with all their jobs taken by the Chinese; gonna bet they have a lot of welfare recipients
",_Renegade_Sock_,e9mfjjc,conservative
"As disappointed as I was to lose the house, the Congressmen that lost were mostly RINOs. For example, Kevin Yoder (R-KS) tried to sneak an amendment through this summer to give asylum to anyone who shows up at the border claiming to be a victim of spousal abuse.

A silver lining: at least with most of these RINOs gone, we can run principled Conservatives to try to win back the seats.",Taylor814,e9koq81,conservative
Fortunately for us he is out and can't do any more damage.,anuser999,e9krec7,conservative
">True worship is to work for justice and care for the poor and oppressed.

Isaiah 58:5-7

Doesn't really jive with those who thought of lynchings as just a social ill falling out of favor, not really something we need to legislate about.",Kotaku,e9lt6rv,conservative
"That’s exactly how I feel about it, too.  One of my biggest pet peeves in life in general, goes way beyond politics, is people acting in bad faith or pretending to want /not want something when they actually don’t.  I kinda put ‘fiscal conservatives’ (I’m talking elected officials not the actual voters) and all the ‘repeal and replace’ people in this bucket.",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9lo03r,conservative
"> A silver lining: at least with most of these RINOs gone, we can run principled Conservatives to try to win back the seats.

Sometimes the hardest part is unseating the incumbent.  I think we ought to be more open to strategically letting some seats go (D) for a cycle. You don't have to vote for the Dem, just don't vote for that office. This lets us use NPCs on both sides to accomplish our goals. D's will always vote D and R's will always vote R. So use the D's to unseat the RINO's and then use our R's to put in MAGA.

To be clear I'm not saying purge it all in one election and lose a huge majority but in moderation this can help us.",0xc0c0c0c0,e9kqbu6,conservative
Yup fuck that tard.,chabanais,e9kuu95,conservative
"This is a standard Democrat/leftist/liberal strategy.  Portray actual conservatives as extremists.  I've never seen it so transparently pushed than in social media.  Infiltrate areas of discourse that are not evenly remotely connected to politics and make political posts/comments to act like their ideology is ""normal"" and mainstream.  It's why you see r/conservative brigaded, it's why r/libertarian gets so many posts from people who are obviously not libertarian (those mods need to do something rather than sitting on their hands because of freedom even though freedom is being victimized by subterfuge right under their noses by trolls).

&#x200B;

I've personally had interactions with multiple people who claimed they were conservative or libertarian and went on to say r/politcs is completely unbiased, and the only people they had to tag there were raving right with lunatics.  It's sad when people have to debate disingenuously like that.

&#x200B;

But, but Russian trolls!!!!!",nonamenoslogans2,e9l3cja,conservative
So that means they admit there is shady election management going on ,healthcarebill,e9m6khw,conservative
Ministry of Truth,puddboy,e9mb822,conservative
"I don't think even libs believe that /r/politics is unbiased (I'm liberal and that sub is so left-leaning, it's about to fall over).

It would take some staggering willful ignorance for anyone right of center to say it is a place for honest, open, political discourse.",csajhr,e9lpet7,conservative
"Go on over to r/conservativecartoons. There are 2 posts there (same image, different text) that is triggering them BAD. usually posts over there get 1 or 2 comments. These are getting heated arguments in there. We found what triggers them, and we need to hit them with it HARD.",unibuckeye,e9lbwrk,conservative
"I agree that this is a huge issue with the way politics are discussed these days. Unfortunately, I have seen numerous examples of it being done by both democrats and republicans.

Why do you bring this up in relation to this post though?",TokenRedditGuy,e9lct56,conservative
[deleted],,e9lc5e3,conservative
">	Why do you bring this up in relation to this post though?

I believe this individual said something along the lines of ""this is a common tactic I noticed"", followed by another example.",zwiebelsaft,e9lp78l,conservative
Wtf?,unibuckeye,e9lcihz,conservative
"Maybe not, mistake you for someone else.

Sorry about that.

&#x200B;",nonamenoslogans2,e9lcnk5,conservative
"I only saw the ""I voted and voted and voted..."" one.

&#x200B;",nonamenoslogans2,e9ldeis,conservative
No prob. Just confused.,unibuckeye,e9lgja1,conservative
They’re like the Cuomo brothers. They’re racing to see who is the dumbest,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mldi5,conservative
"""Common sense"" gun control = ambush and firefight.  Got it.",BrighamYoung,e9m77zg,conservative
Ruby Ridge anyone?,PurpleAngel23,e9led5r,conservative
"I’m not 100% on Maryland’s laws or what a red flag law is but, if it’s a law to take guns wouldn’t common sense dictate serving the warrant outside of the home? And if this happened to me I’d have to be shot and killed too fuck taking my rights away. ",CassieJK,e9lcp38,conservative
You are damn right it is.,Conlon76,e9l6trm,conservative
"What????

No. This is what happens when someone fights police, grabs a gun, and fires it. 

They had a court order. 

This is a really irresponsible post. ",KhabibHeelTurn,e9lwmt6,conservative
"I can't wait to get out of this stupid state. I just hope they don't kill me first since that's now a thing, apparently... ",Maswasnos,e9m4wg7,conservative
[removed],,e9lna90,conservative
It also doesn’t seem prudent to bang on a gun owners door at 5 in the morning to take their guns. Guess what most gun owners are going to answer the door with when there’s a bunch of banging that wakes you up.,averydoggo,e9ldb20,conservative
[removed],,e9lwnm8,conservative
"Wait, before we get outraged, we need to know what color everyone is /s",BrockLee76,e9l9mzn,conservative
"They had a court order that unconstitutionally took his rights away without due process. 

Imagine if you owned a rifle to protect yourself and stand against government tyranny. Then the government showed up at your door at 5AM and out numbered you 5-1 demanding your firearms. You had committed no crime, threatened no person, had no chance to appeal someone had just decided you were a threat to society therefore your rights are forfeit.

When the British came to seize guns and powder we started a war. This IS government tyranny. 

Get yourself a spine.",PeLight,e9lyg1j,conservative
No. This is what happens when someone shows up to your house for no reason demanding to seize your weapons violating your 2nd and 4th amendment rights. Court order doesn’t mean shit. Use your head. ,UNHsignu763,e9nai4m,conservative
I mean it’s kind of one of the reasons I own a gun. ,CassieJK,e9lde9a,conservative
"What an idiotic response. 

So a bunch of police knock on your door, likely say it’s the police, are wearing a bunch of clothing saying they’re the police, 

And you’re going to.... fight? After you let them in?  

Cmon y’all ",KhabibHeelTurn,e9lwpog,conservative
"I'm not sure if you know this or not, but laws can be wrong. ",Odoacer476CE,e9m5lqt,conservative
"Everyone knows you have to follow all laws if your republic, should have told her had a bunch of clean voters ballots they would have gave him an escort to turn them in",TxRandyMarsh,e9m34si,conservative
Haha.  Well played sir!,Conlon76,e9lc117,conservative
Exactly right. The criteria for these “red flags” are not clearly defined. Anyone who knows you can call the police and say you are acting suspicious and you think he/she should have their guns taken away. No due process. ,UNHsignu763,e9nabn7,conservative
[removed],,e9lypyk,conservative
"The 1 time I woke up to someone banging on my door, I forgot to grab my gun.  It ended up being a local sheriff looking for someone else.  ",BrockLee76,e9lh9fc,conservative
"Home invaders never dress up like cops, right?",StraightNewt,e9lx9wy,conservative
"""BuT iT's ThE law!"" ",Krieger117,e9ms4eq,conservative
"The complaint was made by his sister. The mans niece said the reason for the order was “family just being family.”

Within the first month 114 orders were signed in Maryland and not a single one was denied. These are being rubber stamped on the hearsay of a citizens complaint. There is no follow up from local or state PD’s on any of the cases before a judge signs an order. You’ve no ability to appeal an order until after your rights have been stripped. There was no due process here. Having a complaint made and a judge signing a confiscation order without any investigation is not due process.

4th Amendment protects against unreasonable search and seizures.

The government does plenty that is neither constitutional or legal. Just because you don’t care about your constitutional rights doesn’t mean the rest of the country is going to feel the same

edit: missed a word",PeLight,e9lz4uz,conservative
">Unconstitutional? Nope.

Any form of gun control is a infringement of the 2nd amendment and is therefore unconstitutional. What part of ""SHALL NOT BE INFRINGED"" dont you understand?",M6D_Magnum,e9m91bv,conservative
"*__YOU HAVE A CONSTITUTIONAL RIGHT TO FACE YOUR ACCUSER(S).__*

The fact that these ""red flag orders"" don't give you that opportunity means they are *prima facie* Unconstitutional. Defend this bullshit if you want. But you're wrong. This is 100% unconstitutional and unAmerican.

",Odoacer476CE,e9m5i3j,conservative
"Never? I’m not going to say never. But generally? Yes I’m honna go out on a limb and say it’s maybe happened .00000001% of all home invasions. 

Also, they didn’t invade. They knocked. He answered. He put the gun down when he saw it was the police. Then he chose to fight and pick it back up and fire it. 

Maybe there’s a reason this court order was granted. Hmmmmmmmmmmmmmm

",KhabibHeelTurn,e9lygya,conservative
[removed],,e9m0jer,conservative
"Orrrrr he found out they wanted to take his rights away and wasn’t going to allow it, rather die than be forced to give up his guns. Many would do the same in that situation. And 
Mayyyybbeeee you should stop being such a condescending prick.",didenkal2019,e9m910l,conservative
"All I know is that the do nothing attitude of Republicans has led to elections being stolen, mobs chasing conservatives out of public areas, mobs appearing at conservatives houses, and now people having their guns confiscated. When do you take action?",J0kerr,e9m1jgn,conservative
Whatever you say bootlicker,PeLight,e9m0lpt,conservative
Sure showed him.,prometheud,e9m4itn,conservative
He's right.,Odoacer476CE,e9m5jwu,conservative
Why was she not booted after 2016.,lax714,e9k3bee,conservative
"Again, if Scott knew she was just as bad as her predecessor who was forced out of office for similar shenanigans, why didn't he have Snipes removed back in 2016?",justhere2havefun,e9kecmj,conservative
Booted?  Bitch needs to be incarcerated ,Jizzlobber42,e9kavmd,conservative
if this Florida election flips to democrat I don't know how we are supposed to accept it as legitimate. ,McBonderson,e9kbjn1,conservative
I like how the article mentions incompetence when it's obviously malfeasance.,pacifist228,e9k9edc,conservative
Bullshit...mandatory jail time and fines!,Bubbacat7,e9kduic,conservative
"Why, did they hide some more votes in there?",mlmack,e9k7f7u,conservative
"just reading about Snipes it sounds like she should have been booted years ago

on a sidenote: just looking at her, I wouldn't trust her to oversee bingo night",greatatdrinking,e9kvu1e,conservative
"Broward County had similar problems before Snipes, I don't think firing her is going to change anything",rebelde_sin_causa,e9lb5eb,conservative
"Treason: Noun

Definition:
 
'the crime of betraying one's country, especially by attempting to kill the sovereign or **overthrow the government**.'
",mattcruise,e9kdae3,conservative
"The fine must exceed the benefit gained from the crime.  Evil pharma company saves $3m by illegally dumping? The $500k is a business expense, not a penalty. 

Conclusion: nullify all votes from the county for 2018 election. ",Moderately_blue,e9kf8k3,conservative
She looks like the wicked witch of the West. ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e9l4ga9,conservative
Do it already.,jamesthunder88,e9k6kp0,conservative
"I'll believe it when I see it. They are playing with fire, I don't think they understand what this could lead to.",rjohnson99,e9kkquj,conservative
Big if true. ,ErtzHurtz,e9kxcvk,conservative
Good she reeks of corruption she is long overdue to get fired,smartguy360,e9l80y6,conservative
I hope this isn't a consolation prize taking the place of a fair and just election. This crooked bitch getting her comeuppance isn't a substitute for lawful democracy.,Armageddon_It,e9llmq9,conservative
"You simply cannot put Democrats in charge of anything like elections.  The temptation is too great to corrupt the process.  The difference between Dems and the GOP is that the GOP is too embarrassed to get caught corrupting the process because they have morals, and Democrats couldn't give a damn about getting caught so they don't see any downside.

Snipes needs to be wearing handcuffs and ankle chains...and the university who gave her the advanced degree that she has needs to lose its southeastern states accreditation..or did she get her doctorate from Sears & Roebuck?",superuseroot,e9kz38x,conservative
Lock Her Up!,JKfreebitch,e9kh2n3,conservative
"Sounds like it's a little late, eh?",BeauRyker,e9kqxqr,conservative
Can she also get a jail cell?,PerceivedShift,e9m6jzg,conservative
What's going on in FL is also happened in AZ.  I was told by a person involved with the AZ GOP that reams of blank ballots may have been in some of the elementary schools and worked on by kids during recess over the last few months.  Carloads of ballots were supposedly delivered late to the Maricopa canvasing center and each and every one sequentially was a Dem vote. BIG TIME FRAUD.,superuseroot,e9l0dad,conservative
She should have been legally barred from her position in 2016.,molon-labe7,e9k78o2,conservative
"I know it's not treason because in the US we have a very specific definition for that, but what she's doing is really a crime not only against the people in Broward County but also the entire country.  This kind of stuff undermines faith in our republic and exacerbates political violence.  When people feel they don't have a voice in their government, or worse yet that it's been *stolen* from them, then they have lost one of the peaceful means to work out problems facing them.  That's when peaceful protests start turning into riots.  This kind of stuff causes wars and assassinations.  It hasn't in this country *yet* but a quick look at, oh, just about any South American country in the 20th century and you'll see plenty of evidence that it creates a potential for political violence.

They should bury this bitch under the prison.  I'm not a huge draconian punishment guy but I'm perfectly okay with them making an example out of anyone that tries to influence elections by fucking with the vote count.

",Arm-the-homeless,e9kvlr4,conservative
"They expect you to bend over. They know people arn't going to uprise over it and the GOP can file all the lawsuits they want, the Dems don't follow the law. Truly if there is election fraud and I think it is more widespread than just this, the conservative movement is dead in the water. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9kfrq6,conservative
"The same way the democrats accepted Bush's win in 2000 even though he actually lost but SCOTUS ruled him the victor.

She should have been booted long ago, get rid of her and move on.",csajhr,e9l6y1x,conservative
Hanlon's razor. Never attribute to malice that which can be adequately explained by stupidity.,csajhr,e9l6rze,conservative
"The optics on that would be horrific. Disenfranchising an entire county because of the incompetence or even corruption of the officials will immediately paint the Republican party as trying to silence opposition. And to some degree, that label will be earned.

Ultimately, the move here needs to be much stricter rules about provisional ballots and voter ID. It needs to be made as difficult as possible for hacks like Snipes to manufacture ballots out of thin air. Boxes of ballots that are suddenly ""found"" days after the fact should automatically be invalid, no exceptions. Put the onus on the election officials to produce all ballots in a timely manner; if they can't, then they're the ones at fault for disenfranchising their district and their constituents can hold them accountable.

The one thing I've learned from these midterms is that as bad as it is that we have deep blue states that run their governments into the ground, it's the states that are practically divided 50/50 that are the bigger concerns. The stakes are at their highest in these places, and Democrats know it. It's the reason Al Franken became the 60th senator to pass Obamacare. And in this situation, it might be the reason why Barrett doesn't make it on the Supreme Court, because Murkowski and Collins will still hold sway when that time comes.",GameShowWerewolf,e9kls02,conservative
"Conservatives: ""OMG look at the laws you are breaking! If you had our values then you'd feel so guilty and would realize the fault of your ways!""

Democrats: ""What the fuck are you talking about? We'll just always play victim and then do whatever we want and that way we win in the end. Watch us do this next trick!""


Should conservatives play dirty? Some say yes, others say no, but there IS a real problem when the opposition is not playing by your rule book, but **your** only nexus of reference is your rule book.

It's like playing chess with someone who believes that every piece has the movement power of the Queen. What the fuck do you tell them to convince them to not play like that?",AntifaArePathetic,e9lt2kq,conservative
Every single recount involving legal and valid ballots had Bush in the lead. Every. One.,GameShowWerewolf,e9ldx2i,conservative
"There was massive voter fraud that election, too. This stuff isn't new; this is just the first time we've had a non-fake-Republican president and an alternative media.",leftajar,e9lpxqr,conservative
"We're way beyond Hanlon's razor. Wake the hell up, man. This shit has been going on for a long time and the ""mistakes"" only go one direction, to reduce Republican votes and increase Democrat totals. They do it to other Democrat challengers too in primary races. ",PhilosoGuido,e9lmcn9,conservative
"If they've already spread invalid/manufactured ballots in with the real ones, how can anyone know the true outcome of the election?  The fact so many new democratic votes just ""appear"", should give some solid evidence of that.  

The only thing that can be done is to hold the election again, tightly supervised, or invalidate those counts.

&#x200B;

You can't just accept it, why the hell would they ever stop doing it, if it's known to work, and be allowed to happen?  If you rob a steal from a store, you don't get to keep the item you stole.  

&#x200B;

Similarly, if they steal an election, they should not be allowed the win.",Human_Ballistics_Gel,e9l731e,conservative
"Not true
https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/2000_United_States_presidential_election_recount_in_Florida
",FI_notRE,e9lgcqm,conservative
"> Bush led the election-night vote count in Florida by 1,784 votes.

> That first day's results reduced the margin to just over 900 votes.

>  reduced Bush's lead to 327 votes.

> Bush held a 300-vote lead.

>  increasing Bush's lead to 930 votes.

> Bush ahead by 537 votes.

**EVERY. ONE.**",GameShowWerewolf,e9lmjcr,conservative
"Which, in the state of California, is illegal. Political affiliation and activities are a protected class:

https://www.employmentattorneyla.com/blog/2017/06/what-are-californias-protected-classes-in-employment.shtml

>In addition to the protected classes under federal law, California law prohibits your employer from subjecting you to discrimination based on your:

Sexual orientation

Gender identity and gender expression

Race

Color

Ancestry

National origin

Religion

Sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical conditions)

Medical conditions

AIDS/HIV

Disability: physical or mental

Age (40 and older)

Genetic information

Marital Status

Military or Veteran status

**Political affiliations or activities**

Status as a victim of domestic violence, assault, or stalking",ngoni,e9kg3us,conservative
Zuckerburg is a dick,NightFreak87,e9kdwbq,conservative
Why is everything political now?,eceme98,e9knbd6,conservative
"Dang, this hits me as a conservative and as a vr enthusiast. Poor guy.",9cames03,e9kb4jp,conservative
LOL I hope they keep this up.  Talent retention is so hard at these giant tech companies.  Very smart people are needed to run these companies and if you start hiring people based off their political beliefs rather than their skills/abilities you're in for a bad time.,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9krl8h,conservative
I can't imagine working at a place where everyone is so emotionally fragile.  ,mlmack,e9l2iu3,conservative
Did someone say lawsuit?,InsanerobotWargaming,e9khg1j,conservative
I heard from another thread on r/oculus that political affiliation is not a protected class for executive positions in California.  Is that true?,insomagent,e9khirp,conservative
They did the same thing to the Firefox exec over Prop 8. ,Kreetle,e9kyoxv,conservative
Uhh the Dems doesn’t know what The term “law” means.,igor_otsky,e9ks37k,conservative
">Which, in the state of California, is illegal. Political affiliation and activities are a protected class

(laughs internally)

Damore lawsuit got kicked to permanent arbitration.

Life under Communism.",darthhayek,e9lfj7s,conservative
"Does anybody here actually read the article?

They settled and apparently have a separation agreement. 


",infectedtwin,e9lkwfm,conservative
Didn't you read the article? They fired him because he hired someone who brought in stolen proprietary code. I'm sure they created a great paper trail and it would be very hard to prove otherwise.,csajhr,e9ll5em,conservative
*reptile,Puig_Destroyer,e9khhq4,conservative
"The world has always been about politics. Only difference from now compared to say 300 years ago is that  today you can get fucked over financially, back then you'd just be killed or run out your town/country.",Thrakbal_the_huggles,e9kuyss,conservative
"Why? Because politics have become so rooted in emotion and fear, and these emotions have taken over our ability to make just decisions. I'm scared for the future of America. It literally cannot be more divided than it is now.",goldrotmgonly,e9ktzw3,conservative
Social media.,mlmack,e9l7eff,conservative
It went to court and he got 80 million,SickofInternetProgs,e9l43uj,conservative
I hope so. I just bought a fkn oculus.,MallowPallow,e9ki0yt,conservative
Why would executive positions be different than other positions?,Splickity-Lit,e9ksj6m,conservative
"People over at r/firefox are openly communist, the developers and their reddit community for some bizarre reason think open source = communism.",Dyeredit,e9mkhur,conservative
It's the thing you use to get other people's money,RedLanceVeritas,e9ku0d9,conservative
"What other articles have written are framing it as [""His donation sparked a backlash from his colleagues""](https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.ndtv.com/world-news/facebook-fired-palmer-luckey-oculus-vr-co-founder-as-he-supported-donald-trump-wall-street-journal-r-1945866%3famp=1&akamai-rum=off)",Thrakbal_the_huggles,e9kvf5k,conservative
"I mean half the country literally seceded and fought a war against the other half once, so I’d say it could get a lot worse lol. Don’t fall into the fear mongering trap enforced by the media on both sides of the aisle. ",jaskins811,e9l1bw7,conservative
"Chump change for facebook, this serves as no deterrent.",Dyeredit,e9mke13,conservative
Why would you buy anything from Facebook?,Escenze,e9l3tmr,conservative
Makes about as much sense as the rest of California law.,Liberty_Pr1me,e9kv80k,conservative
"Those in executive positions represent the company more than the average employee, so I'd guess CA is trying to let companies protect their image by allowing them to boot executives over political differences. It's for appearances.",tryingtoplaymonaco,e9kwf9a,conservative
And which doesn't apply to them,Liberty_Pr1me,e9kv92i,conservative
"Because i liked the features of the rift better than the vive. I’m one of those people that don’t give a shit about drama within a company.

 From a consumer perspective, i just want to buy the best product, regardless of the company’s political views or standings.",MallowPallow,e9l3ytn,conservative
I rarely botcott companies myself tbh. Only if there's good alternatives. I just really hate Facebook because they're awful people haha.,Escenze,e9l4nuk,conservative
I think that's just his normal face.,PlateCaptain,e9k7x99,conservative
"Trump is like WTF dude,,,,,",BuckeyeDood,e9jefui,conservative
King of Morocco is pulling a Ginsburg...,brubeck5,e9kebm8,conservative
I feel like Trump is low key saying “Wake yo disrespectful ass up” 😂😂,Gastronius,e9jhf5w,conservative
His face!!!! Hahahaha. ,genie73118,e9jrwrl,conservative
Would have been awesome if Melania gave him the sharp elbow.  ,chelseaannehubble,e9jw4xw,conservative
I thought Trump completely abandoned this event and was Hitler? ,AgrosLastRide,e9jq9bv,conservative
"Interesting trivia, Morocco was one of the first countries to recognize the U.S as an independent country. ",Nodal-Novel,e9kvukv,conservative
"Low stamina
",Dr0n3r,e9jpqdj,conservative
out  president is the best lol i love it,donjohn1986,e9jeirr,conservative
and Merkel is listening to Beyonce,Philletto,e9jicou,conservative
I don't think Trump is looking at him. There are others looking in the same direction but clearly not at the King,wotdsm,e9jynct,conservative
The Kings son isn’t bad looking. ,GoHuskies1984,e9kg6aj,conservative
Good Lord this is hilarious!,RYtrinity,e9jyjwh,conservative
"Well, after the opening of the French leader he probably just tuned him out",jollybeaker,e9ji6yh,conservative
[removed],,e9jnkk7,conservative
[removed],,e9kbtdu,conservative
Trump letting out his grandfather side,Emperor_Aurelian,e9kcnj6,conservative
holy shit thats a crazy mean mug,KingCervie,e9kqr8y,conservative
"If both Trump and Merkel look at you at the same time with a disapproving face, you know you did something wrong.",Galrey_Fardhin,e9l3f84,conservative
This actually makes me like him ,PrincessBubblegummm,e9k7hma,conservative
I laughed uncommonly hard at this. ,etherealsmog,e9jtvpz,conservative
Trumps face says pure disgust! 😂😂😂 Rofl,kawaiguy3,e9jw84c,conservative
Like everybody in the back row is asleep too! ,lil-inconsiderate,e9jq68w,conservative
"Utterly disgraceful! The troops of this world fought for his freedom and still are, and he thinks he has the right to fall asleep for the two minutes a year everybody pays their respects!

😠😠😠😠😠",radioStar05,e9jlm5z,conservative
It is boring.,StephenScherer1,e9jhtth,conservative
Trump sleeps 4 hours a day and does all that he does. And he's probably like wtf is this guy so tired for?,Barthaneous,e9k68ku,conservative
[removed],,e9k0xqk,conservative
I love Trump!!!,Naz-One,e9k7nag,conservative
This is an amazing look lol,Just_a_Drunk_Gambler,e9jxm8w,conservative
That is fucking rad hahahahaha trump can do great things sometimes hahaha,steelallz,e9jr575,conservative
"Our president is a badass! Would be so funny to see him wake him up, give the guy a rude awakening.",Knowsekr,e9jvb4e,conservative
Side tangent to complain about Morocco.  I was just their and how bad they screwed up the daylight savings thing on the day of my flight was really annoying.  Not even the airport knew what time it was.,ISwallowedALego,e9k7sen,conservative
I would be bored too listen to Macron Yammer on about the evils of nationalism,Emperor_Aurelian,e9l592l,conservative
"To be fair, listening to the European version of Trudeau is boring as hell.",Kutepov,e9k9lw0,conservative
And remember that Trump hardly sleeps himself.,Cyclopsturtle,e9k78z3,conservative
He's normally disapproving of something.,Emperor_Aurelian,e9kcixm,conservative
I'm 71 years old what's your excuse? - Trump,InquisitorThorn,e9jhxaa,conservative
reminder that Trump didn't show up to at least two different commemorations this week-end,Historiaaa,e9lf7mm,conservative
But trump missed the memorial.. for rain.. ,Whatifimjesus,e9kzuvj,conservative
"You thought wrong. He missed the ceremony at Aisne-Marne, not this one.",dedragon40,e9jrkow,conservative
Endurance -50,YaBoiRexTillerson,e9js6jz,conservative
He’s pondering placing Marocco under tariffs,BimboDickins,e9jxfk6,conservative
President Trump does not like this at all and he’s making sure anyone that’s observing knows about it,SuperMarioKartWinner,e9jop72,conservative
Agree! Hahaha! Love the President's reaction lol,trumpfangirl2020,e9k2rx1,conservative
"Nah, Beyoncé is haram",ravenswin,e9m3q8j,conservative
"You can see at the start of the gif that Trump’s head is pointed in that direction, then later you see that his head is still pointed that way, but his eyes have shifted towards the King of Morocco.",LessThinky,e9k0tho,conservative
[removed],,e9jpjcb,conservative
It was raining at this one.,mlmack,e9kvadn,conservative
"> Marine one assessed that it would be unsafe to fly in the rain, and it would be pretty messy to transport Trump on the streets of Paris.

Because Marine One assessed that it would be unsafe to fly in the rain, and transporting President Trump on the streets of Paris was not a feasible option.",Silicon_Avatar,e9ko3nd,conservative
Then went to speak a a memorial service the next day with his umbrella closed on the floor while he spoke in the rain (falling on him) to make up for it.,CreativeRoutine,e9kdrgf,conservative
Pretty sure you gain the ability to give the disapproving look at a public function when your children have their children. ,thereisasuperee,e9l1em7,conservative
King of Marrocco now can buddy buddy with Acosta.,renata-h,e9k3c8c,conservative
"You might think that at first but I doubt this guy took a snooze on purpose. I have narcolepsy and can't control when I fall asleep sometimes. Falling asleep like this used to happen everyday in class and I would bite my tongue trying to stay awake but I simply could not control it. Even when I got my diagnosis and meds and my professors knew about my condition I still felt really bad when it happened. This can happen to me with Adderall and coffee in my system. Maybe this guy was running on 2 hours of sleep, maybe he had jet lag. You never know what someone's situation is. Maybe don't be so quick to judge. ",Doodlesdork,e9kcn5c,conservative
72,SuperMarioKartWinner,e9jopx0,conservative
Bad weather. ,Mobigsley,e9l0xvr,conservative
"reminder that he doesn't get to fly if his security tells him it isn't safe.
macron just got done dealing with an assassination attempt the week before yoloing it through traffic isn't an option. 

""orange man bad scared of rain dnc media tell me so.""

no he is scared of some nutjob trying to kill him in the street or having a helicopter """"""""accident"""""""" cough cough Princess Diana cough cough.

",lulshitpost,e9lxvbn,conservative
And he couldn’t be bothered showing up at Arlington today,modehead,e9lerqy,conservative
"Do you know why he missed it? I think I saw it written about in r/worldnews, which didn’t provide any helpful analysis or explanation. ",Akoniti,e9jsude,conservative
But I was told he was unpatriotic and was having a sex meeting with Putin instead of showing up.,AgrosLastRide,e9jtx2u,conservative
"Which, given the pitiful, short-sighted, and flagrantly historically wrong speech Macron gave, was not a bad move.",Jackoffalltrades89,e9jtngj,conservative
And followed that up by skipping the Arlington National Cemetary ceremony on Veterans Day. 2 miles from his location in the White House.,Centurychip46,e9krdbw,conservative
Shouldn’t have to have the entire world call you a pussy for you to pay respects or “make up for it” ,Sunofabeach24,e9kgqzz,conservative
"Ah, understandable have a nice day",YaBoiRexTillerson,e9js53i,conservative
602 in dog years,CuddlyCactus2k19,e9luhua,conservative
"Marine one assessed that it would be unsafe to fly in the rain, and it would be pretty messy to transport Trump on the streets of Paris.",dedragon40,e9juaid,conservative
"Helicopter can't take off in rain/poor conditions 
  
",AThiccMeme,e9ju2sz,conservative
It's okay. He's visited the troops in war zones enough to make up for it.,BlueWater321,e9k3aby,conservative
"Well yea, but that was the Communist News Network reporting on that, so you can safely disregard",delancey517,e9k06xv,conservative
"Did the reddit resistards tell you this?

Look at those brave snowflake downvotes",jesse11551,e9k3nn9,conservative
Care to explain? Genuinely curious,OUsnr7,e9jyd37,conservative
[removed],,e9kdqmb,conservative
[removed],,e9k5b3a,conservative
"I mean, this is obviously a massive over simplification, but a pretty damn significant part of WWI was the thousand and one mutual defense pacts the various nations had all signed.  Either as legitimate requirements of aid, or as pretense to begin offensives, e.g., Russia will be backing Serbia (running on little sleep and memory, so full disclosure, I don’t remember who exactly signed pacts with whom), they have a pact, so we must invade Russia now because we can’t stop them once the massive army gets going.  After all, why the fuck else would France and Germany be duking it out against each other over an assassination of an Austro-Hungarian diplomat by some Serbians?  So to say that WWI proves we need to jump in and always support our “friends” rings just a little bit hollow.",Jackoffalltrades89,e9jz2ze,conservative
"Point of order, I said it turned out to be a good move, not that it was a good idea.  Proverbial falling up the stairs, as it were.  Macron’s speech was obviously aimed at Trump, as well as historically inaccurate and rather offensive to the memory of the fallen.  But with Trump not there, it rings hollow.  He looks like a cowardly blowhard, only willing to smack talk his opponent when he’s unable to respond in kind.  Had Trump been there, Macron looks braver for “speaking truth to power.”

I don’t think this was a tactical decision on Trump’s part, just that it worked out for him, like taking the wrong turn at a light and finding out there’s been a great Chinese restaurant 5 minutes from the office all this time.  ...Okay, so the analogy needs work.  Sue me.",Jackoffalltrades89,e9kglxy,conservative
"Probably because everyone else had preplanned their motorcades.

Serious failure to which aides didn't think clearly for a plan B.",Sanctus3x,e9k65og,conservative
Everyone else has their own individual assessments of their own individual security threats.,hello_japan,e9k8hii,conservative
"Because one is the President of the United States and the others aren’t?

He’s the most heavily guarded person on the planet. Anywhere Trump goes a small army of aides and support staff have to follow. 

The routes have to be preplanned and secured ahead of the time. ",novacham,e9l8aeo,conservative
"In fairness, not just a diplomat but the next ruler of Austria Hungary who would have been in charge within 2 years. ",piper06w,e9kbcd6,conservative
"The real cause of WWI was the technological advancements that led to a huge population boom in Europe. Russia and Germany were becoming absolute titans and pretty much everyone anticipated one or the other eventually taking the continent. Everyone set themselves up strategically for what they viewed as an inevitable conflict and it became a self fulfilling prophecy. 

The same would have happened between the US and USSR if there wasn't the threat of nuclear annihilation. All of human history has been the story of competing empires. There are always people with ambition, talent, and a lust for power in every society and those are the ones who rise to the top. They are natural conquerors. Global conquest is the ultimate prize for these people. Caesar, Genghis Khan, Hitler, Stalin, Alexander, Napoleon, Cyrus the Great, etc. 

The only thing that keeps us from having WWIII is nuclear deterrence. This idea that liberal democracy and economic globalization lead to peace is a farce. Nuclear deterrence creates peace, which allows for liberal democracy and economic globalization to continue. ",Poolooloo,e9kfiom,conservative
"Excluding, of course, NATO which has pretty much kept peace in Europe for the last 70+ years.",RunnerTenor,e9lvvbf,conservative
"This is what I'm reminded when NATO expands to countries we have no interest in protecting.  Estonia?  Are we going to war to protect Estonia?  And McCain and the establishment wants Ukraine too.

NATO's expansion into former Russian territories I don't agree with.",ChunkyArsenio,e9lfx3d,conservative
I can understand that. I don’t think falling upward is exactly anything to be proud of BUT I see where you’re coming from. ,Jollybeard99,e9kh9p0,conservative
That's called a contingency plan... something they obviously didn't have. ,Stevedaveken,e9lfn5n,conservative
"Yes, but in counter fairness, a very pro-Serbian autonomy diplomat and nascent ruler.  And that still doesn’t really take it beyond minor international incident between those two states.  Why the hell were Germany and the UK and all the rest involved in that?",Jackoffalltrades89,e9kc8xc,conservative
A contingency plan to shut down half of Paris to drive 2 hours to a ceremony?,novacham,e9nev7l,conservative
"Oh I agree with the sentiment, that Russia shouldn't have been involved, because then Germany wouldn't have been involved because then France wouldn't have been involved, because then Belgium wouldn't have been involved, because then Britain wouldn't have been involved because then the Turks wouldn't have been involved, because then the greeks wouldn't have been involved, because then the Bulgarians wouldn't have been involved, because then the Romanians wouldn't have been involved. etc.",piper06w,e9kd5zl,conservative
"Sounds like a great court case. Unless the school can PROVE BEYOND A REASONABLE DOUBT, they had best open their bank account very very wide. My advice to the male student is go look at Bentleys, chicks love elegant cars.",StephenScherer1,e9kdflq,conservative
"Even if they had him dead to rights - which they clearly don't - if he's only four days from graduation, why wouldn't they just let him get on with it and be glad to be rid of him? Isn't the point of academic discipline to protect their institution and their students, not to hand down spiteful punishments and open themselves to litigation?

Are they just insane?",SeaborneMecha,e9kgb6m,conservative
Chicago is usually a pretty based institution. This is outbof character for them,stonewall55,e9k53aj,conservative
"This should not be a political issue. ""Women lie about sexual assault."" is not a political stance.",Davecantdothat,e9lbk6d,conservative
Pussies,SamAcarious,e9k1aho,conservative
BELEEVE WYMEN,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9lswky,conservative
I'm sure the feminist triers of fact were fascinated by his account. ,grewapair,e9ltxxe,conservative
"After what he's been through, I'm pretty sure he's not going to be giving much thought to what chicks love.",disayle32,e9ky4y1,conservative
"> The preponderance-of-the-evidence standard is the default for most civil lawsuits. In these cases a plaintiff is typically suing a defendant for lost money because of acts like breaking a contract or causing a car accident (the money loss might be due to vehicle damage and medical bills, for example). Preponderance of the evidence is met if the trier of fact (judge or jury) believes the evidence shows the defendant is more likely than not—more than 50% likely to be—responsible.

I do agree it sounds like he has a good case.",arobkinca,e9l1o81,conservative
"> Are they just insane?

Um... you might want to have a seat for this news...

Yes.",HardCounter,e9ktaze,conservative
Only the economics department. The rest of the university is just as evil as the rest of them.,CentrismIsExtremism,e9kqr2r,conservative
I was suggesting he get a good lawyer sounds like he has a good case.,StephenScherer1,e9l51gt,conservative
The decision of the school LOWERS his earning ability FOR LIFE. Sounds like big bucks plus triple damages.,StephenScherer1,e9l60d9,conservative
"Agree, top economics program that is relatively untouched by the problems of politics.",goldrotmgonly,e9ku38h,conservative
"If it's not fake news, I bet it's over election security concerns.",Lionstriker2,e9mdwmw,conservative
He should replace her with Kris Kobach.,jina100,e9lrvon,conservative
"I think Kris Kobach would be a good pick! 
",Chapka69,e9lzudk,conservative
Apparently others don’t agree. I’m curious as to why.,jina100,e9mg6os,conservative
I think he’s a hard liner on immigration with a good back round to prove it. ,Chapka69,e9mh4ql,conservative
"Downvotes don’t mean anything on this sub, it’s constantly being brigaded by losers with nothing better to do.",hello_japan,e9mityz,conservative
For sure. I think he’d be perfect for the position.,jina100,e9mh6ae,conservative
"Ah, I see. I mean, if I’m wrong in my assessment and being downvoted for that, that’s cool. I’d just like to hear why Kobach wouldn’t be a good pick.",jina100,e9mjhwc,conservative
"You’re not wrong. If anyone downvoting you had a good argument to make, they would make it.",hello_japan,e9mjjpa,conservative
We are talking about a network that got less viewers than *Ancient Aliens*.,soxfan90,e9lfkey,conservative
"Huge grain of salt:

1) This is one night only - a Friday - not the most representative night nor an average over a week or month, as is typical.

2) The source - Showbuzzdaily? - is not the standard for tv viewership numbers. That'd be Nielsen.

3) These shows are cable only. Their numbers are a small fraction of broadcast network viewers.",RunnerTenor,e9lwmr2,conservative
"Hmm okay. Did you make this? I'd like to see more numbers than this... Like people listening to  podcasts, YouTube, or radios shows on both sides. I think media has advanced past TV and I think your trying to imply that the left has less viewers or supporters? I might be over think this but I'm a conservative and I've seen Fox news.... Maybe a hand full of times in my 20-30 years on the earth. I've probably watch more CNN since it's on in the airports :) haha. Strange.",Kinamya,e9lmfwd,conservative
"I would be far more interested in website hits.  I think the number of people watching news on TV has diminished exponentially over the past decade.  So much so that I doubt most people get their national news from any TV station anymore, it's all online, and the online presentations are much different than television counterparts.",Falkamper,e9m9dbu,conservative
Ron Maddow has the highest numbers? Wow.,LosSpamFighters,e9l3m98,conservative
"Hey give Ancient Aliens some credit, at least the people are more grounded in reality than anyone on CNN.",etibbs,e9lmt9c,conservative
Hey at least the archeology on that show is real even if their conclusions are dubious.,FeelThePorn,e9m9wrb,conservative
"Absolutely NO. Reagan already fucked us over with amnesty for illegal alien invaders once, we dont need this shit happening again. I hope you are smart enough to reject this Trump and GOP, unless you want to actually purposely lose everything.",LastationNeoCon,e9lsa4t,conservative
"Fuck the Kock brothers.  I wish people would stop referring to these two tools as Republicans.
If they really want to improve the lot of illegals, build a factory in Honduras.
Either that or they should take financial and legal responsibility for all 3.5 million and their entire families until they are 26.  One requirement would be to learn English.  Additional fines for each, if they cannot speak and read after one year.  Paid by the Kock brothers.
Fuck these guys.",GlenGanges,e9m46ob,conservative
That's because there is no defense against them.  Which means we need a working Hypersonic weapon ASAP to deter those who have them.,StraightNewt,e9na2f0,conservative
Source is AIDS,GrayFox787,e9n5w0l,conservative
Looks like a spam account.,PubliusVA,e9n7u2o,conservative
If she is the front runner for the dems that automatically secures my vote to Trump. I refuse to vote for her again. ,datworkaccountdo,e9k2gb5,conservative
"""Do it.""  - John Oliver",FelixFuckfurter,e9k1iwt,conservative
Of course she will her ego says so,wpgcyan777,e9jymgq,conservative
She would actually go to Wisconsin this time... only to lose by much bigger margin.,ReaganTroll,e9k2uqd,conservative
"Run for what?  The Democrats are dumb, but they aren't dumb enough to have that two-time loser run for them.  Besides, she barely made it through the last campaign.  They'd have to wheel her around on a dolly like Hannibal Lecter.",mlmack,e9k69ns,conservative
If you’re reading this Hillary— please run! I can’t think of any candidate who scares me less as a contender against the President than Mrs. Clinton. ,COKETFM,e9k7w6k,conservative
Oh no it's over for orange man now /s,FreeSpeechRocks,e9k3nyu,conservative
I will bet money that she wont make it through the primaries. Bernie supporters will not forget what happened in 2016.,BruceCampbell123,e9krth3,conservative
"Please do. I could do with a stress free election after the nonstop tension fest that was the last one. 

I mean, there were a ton of people that voted for Trump as a way of voting against Hilary, and now most of those people will vote for Trump because they like trump. Since coming into office, Trump has only gotten more popular.  She literally couldn't beat him at his lowest point, and she wants to take him on now that he is even stronger? Fucking do it. Please",LumpyWumpus,e9k3luf,conservative
"""The definition of insanity is doing the same thing over and over again and expecting different results."" - Albert Einstein",Sketch_Crush,e9ktjqb,conservative
"Is this from Babylon Bee?  If not, then I see that the Ctrl-Left has learned a lot from 2016 ^/s",Jizzlobber42,e9k8vz3,conservative
"What will the chant be now?? ""Actually lock her up?""",abuigues,e9k1hac,conservative
Dems will lose if she is the candidate (she is a proven loser). I will not vote for a president if she is the democratic candidate which essentially is a vote for Trump.,5_yr_lurker,e9kqfx4,conservative
"As a left leaning centrist,  I wouldn't vote for her in 2016 and won't vote for her in 2020. I hate political dynasties and believe it's diametrically opposed to what the founding fathers envisioned: a country ran by the people.",ElectricFuneralHome,e9kwqlo,conservative
"> Get ready for Hillary Clinton 4.0. More than 30 years in the making, this new version of Mrs. Clinton

How do they still not understand people hate exactly this about Hillary Clinton? She’s manufactured. She has no beliefs of her own. They are all public opinion tested, politically correct regurgitated talking points. She will literally be whatever you want her to be in order to get elected. ",pk3maross,e9kwrxu,conservative
"Good luck, Dems.  HAHAHA!",StephenNesbit,e9kxf0v,conservative
">Rather than casting herself as a moderate to win over the Midwestern Democrats who defected to vote for Trump, Penn and Stein argue Clinton should run as a hard-left partisan.

(Former) Midwestern Democrat here; Hillary definitely did not come across as anything even remotely close to moderate in the last election. She is the only reason I voted for Trump, and if she runs in 2020 I will be voting for him again. 

Hell, given the democrat's antics over the past 2 years, I can't really see a reason why I wouldn't be voting republican in 2020 anyways.",Nordrhein,e9k4f8a,conservative
This may be the one thing that ensures a second term for Trump. The debates would be amazing. Trump may commit suicide if he lost to her,healthcarebill,e9m4djc,conservative
Yet Hillary is unhealthy as fuck. More unhealthy than Trump by ten fold.,massmakr,e9m6ms9,conservative
There’s also talk of Avenatti running.,PurpleAngel23,e9mf9pl,conservative
"Why would you do the same thing over and over and expecting different results? If Hillary gets on the ballot you’ve guaranteed Trump a second term.

The last thing that the Democrats need is a career corporatist warmonger who flops on all social issues whichever way the wind is blowing. Give us someone worthwhile. Transfer Bernie’s consciousness into a robot and give us that.",Warga5m,e9mfyxh,conservative
"If Hillary Clinton runs, I might actually switch my registration and become a member of the Democrat party in order to vote for her in the primaries. She can then forever be known as Adlai. ",BudrickBundy,e9kts8o,conservative
"Weekend at Bernie's III, Return of the Old Hag.",_Gardien,e9l7cc8,conservative
this is the republicans dream scenario they would be assured of victory because nobody motivates the base like her and nobody doesn't inspire democrats like her,smartguy360,e9l7x5u,conservative
Was there ever a doubt?,cchris_39,e9l8pkk,conservative
"It wouldnt be funny and it wouldnt be a good race.

It would be an indication of continued complacency in not locking up a clear criminal who posed a real threat to our government through the corruption of multiiple branches of government and at some point those who DONT PUT HER IN JAIL  start carrying the blame.

Indeed such a race would he an indication that the supoosed opposition to hillary is actually involved in a greater conspiracy and more evidence that its all a big game and make beleive competition.

If hillary hasnt been indicted hy 2020  i will likely be far less energetic for Trump and any other hillary opposition because frankly i will no longer beleive they are true opposition despite policiy differences.

The fact is the wall isnt built and republicans had three branches and helathcare is as expensive as ever and criminals from the fbi and hillarys administration havent been indicted. Now tariffs stopping globalization are a great thing but we need to walk and chew gum at tue same time. High treason level criminals need indictments.

Now maybe a change will happen now that sessions is FINALLY gone but it BETTER happen or I wont be wasting much more time on politics in my life.",Aszaszasz,e9jyyld,conservative
Let me guess 3 mid west states will go strongly trump then votes are magically found and she wins.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9kdxff,conservative
"No way. I don't believe it. She's too old, she's in poor health, and the Democrat machine will not allow it. 

She has run twice and lost. No way they back a loser like her again.",elvisjulep,e9kbi1o,conservative
"I think of myself as moderate, but I vote Democrat probably a little more than I do republican because I lean more liberal on social issues. That being said, I have a zero percent chance of voting for Hillary. The Dems must really be struggling if this is their answer to Trump, which is sad because I want to see all sides put up good candidates. ",kingkinyu,e9kol1k,conservative
Just trying to make people complacent.  I mean Trump wouldn't even need to campaign.,indrid_colder,e9kvpme,conservative
If she lives that long....?,bigdaveyl,e9kxg5d,conservative
Same advisor who guaranteed her victory in 2016?,william_sr,e9kz36h,conservative
"If she does, this old Cromwell speech (repeated by Leo Amery in the ouster of Neville Chamberlain) should be uttered at her during a town hall:

*You have sat too long here for any good you have been doing. Depart, I say, and let us have done with you. In the name of God, go.*",machlangsam,e9l7wca,conservative
"\> Not the Onion

\> Not the Bee

Oh shiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii",WeimarRepublic,e9l7xt8,conservative
Oh god please no. I voted for her in 2016 but I would not vote for her nor do I want her to run again -_-,thejappster,e9lc4vx,conservative
Can somebody explain why Hillary is so bad?,_Renegade_Sock_,e9lg3ho,conservative
Translation: no one sane is going to run against Trump. She's the only one who doesn't care about being trounced. ,grewapair,e9lu0vn,conservative
She has my full support during the primaries. Can we have her run with Cortez?,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9kg27n,conservative
Hillary just needs to fade away from politics. She’s tried and failed at trying to be president so many times already. She even stole the Democratic nomination and failed to put together a good campaign. She ran on “I’m not Trump” and it failed. I hope she doesn’t run again,hybridfrost,e9kj77s,conservative
Ha! She will not get the nomination this time around unless she has dirt on everyone. My running theory is currently. Michelle Obama is going to run. The Obama's have come out of the woodwork and are making the rounds on the TV circuit. I have noticed most of it has been focused on Michelle.,pharacon,e9kl2ih,conservative
Yes she is getting her team together now and by team I mean the guys that help her stand up and walk up stairs. ,TrashyTeeVee,e9k85tr,conservative
"So, it’s come to this. Democrats - you better figure your shit out because this will NEVER fly.",Otto-Carpenter,e9k4b3k,conservative
Please ,lonemaverick87,e9ka73w,conservative
They are already asking for volunteers to fill out ballots for the deceased.,StephenScherer1,e9khkfh,conservative
"> Get ready for Hillary Clinton 4.0

I can't believe Hillary's advisor says this un ironically. ",Not_Gay_Jared,e9kjz58,conservative
DO IT!! ,not_me_but_still,e9kk43n,conservative
With or without her mental meds? Not that either would matter. ,BeardsArePeopleToo,e9kf3bd,conservative
As a Wisconsinite based on the last election I don’t know if my state would vote Republican again.  My state likes to disappoint me.,Lustan,e9kgd9w,conservative
Good!,nathanweisser,e9kl0h7,conservative
Imagine the coughing fits and fainting issues. 73. And as lazy as she was last time.... It will only be worse. ,SickofInternetProgs,e9l42i8,conservative
This is an opinion piece from a guy who was fired from her 2008 campaign and hasn't been involved in politics since. I wouldn't read too much into this.,officejoe,e9l4pw9,conservative
Goodness!!! ,southasiangirl,e9l5yl3,conservative
"He can say that all he likes, Hillary has lost several times, it wouldn't be a good move for the Dems to run her again. If they are that stupid however, I fully encourage it. Just makes a conservative win easier. ",WarriorArus,e9le07j,conservative
What is the dems platform anyways? Jobs? Economy? Lower taxes? ,VeganMcVeganface,e9kdhx8,conservative
"Yikes. Trump is a grade A trash bag of a human, but Hillary just isn’t going to win the battle over dumb white america. ",MizzyBlades,e9leaxl,conservative
*H A L L E U J A H*,lancerelliott,e9kdrio,conservative
"PLEEEEEEEEAAAAAASSSSSE RUN
",TehSTDs2017,e9kfb97,conservative
[Good.  Good ](http://uniteordie-usa.com/wp-content/uploads/2018/07/Emperor-Palpatine-says-Good-Good-Let-the-White-Guilt-Flow-Through-You.png),tehForce,e9km2lb,conservative
"This is why I said all along that she needed to be fairly investigated, fairly indicted, fairly tried, fairly convicted, and fairly jailed. So that no Clinton could ever run for political office again.",SilverHerfer,e9knvk3,conservative
"All anyone running against her has to do is bring up the rigging of the 2016 Democrat primaries, to remind everyone, and she's toast.  Every Democrat should know their votes don't count or matter.",skankblunt42,e9l0pwz,conservative
Only potential candidate I think could beat Trump is Michelle Obama’s or maybe Beto,Jayttt98,e9l9x8a,conservative
Don't we someday want a Hillary Clinton president?             ,tau_decay,e9k3ivw,conservative
"Haven't they learned that Hillary cannot get the Dems out to vote? They need a more charismatic, younger, fresher person to get behind. She is the reason Trump won. 

But sure. Go right ahead! Third loss in a presidential race is the charm!",I_WANT_TO_LOSE_3_LBS,e9keyz9,conservative
"As someone who leans more Democrat, after last election I can’t see her ever securing enough votes to make it out of primaries. Her chances for president are 0. I would rather vote for Ralph Nader ",ckeeyz09,e9k4qer,conservative
"I voted for neither since I wasn't a big fan of either one. I dont regret my vote, but at this point in time I'm *insanely* grateful that Clinton is not our president. Trump has his issues but he's shown up to the plate and made moves that I appreciate, especially since Clinton would have done the exact opposite.  
  
This time around, especially if Clinton is running, I'll be voting for Trump. He'll have to have a plethora of monumental fuck ups for me to consider otherwise.",OrwellianLiberty,e9k90tv,conservative
"Please. Europe is still laughing at your childish president. Make it stop.

100 years end to WWI killings millions, united in peace for the future generations and your president cant even show any friendly words?

Ask yourself. What would Jesus do?",ortskenntnis,e9l8dj8,conservative
"If you are okay voting for trump after what's happened so far in this administration, why were you willing to vote for her to begin with?

I'm a liberal, but I didn't vote for her, because I don't want an entrenched career politician in the white house and I didn't really think trump would be that bad. But after this circus sideshow that the last two years has been, I would absolutely for her to vote against trump.

However, she will never see a nomination for president again, and I can't believe she's so solipsistic as to run. She has been identified as the one person on earth who couldn't beat Donald Trump in an election. She should spend the rest of her days hiding in shame.",csajhr,e9kqsze,conservative
"Yes, I’d vote for Trump over Hillary again, and I’d campaign for him and against her. She is a menace.",GladysCravesRitz,e9l6wir,conservative
"Be careful what you wish for. 

The death vs birth rate among non-Hispanic Whites (the people who actually vote for Republicans) in 2016, for the first time since 1790, indicated more whites dying than being born (under the pretty expansive census definition of 'white') and most of those dying are dying in areas Trump needs to win, while the demographic shift of most crucial states like TX and GA and FL have worsened dramatically.

For all the money, time, and effort the GOP and right wing at large put into 'winning the black vote' or 'Dems r da real racists' and '#walkaway', look at how blacks in Florida voted in Gillum vs DeSantis

Or Kemp vs Abrams. 

Decades and decades of neglect of their actual voter base (because of everything from basic discomfort with them culturally to the outright hatred of White Christian America, especially Rural America, that was on full display from the NeverTrumper Establishment in 2016) has potentially doomed the GOP and the right wing forever.


The margins of victory in 2016 in WI, MI, PA, FL, and TX were **slim**

And slim on a promise of immigration restriction, enforcement, a WALL, and infrastructure.

Instead we got Paul Ryan's agenda of fiddling with healthcare and taxcuts and.....a move of an embassy in Israel? 

and airstrikes in Syria?

Huh.Okay.

But now the GOP doesn't have the House to even pass any legislation in the next two years - - - so what can Trump promise this time? 

Tough sell, IMHO.
",lost_snake,e9k4fhz,conservative
- Sheev Palpatine*,Rarth-Devan,e9kxkhl,conservative
[deleted],,e9k77r5,conservative
This seems like pure speculation tho this adviser was fired from her campaign a decade ago.... ,W3NTZ,e9l4ysx,conservative
😂,chabanais,e9k45al,conservative
Will the Russians let her go to Wisconsin this time?,lastbastion,e9k9ks8,conservative
"She'll go to Wisconsin and start taking about how much she loves cheese and maple syrup, quote me on this. ",Ung-Tik,e9kyiy5,conservative
">Run for what?

Dairy Princess",tehForce,e9l1dlf,conservative
"They're fine tuning their vote finding and ballot stuffing in Florida, that's the plan for 2020 regardless of candidate. ",Liberty_Pr1me,e9kifrv,conservative
"Yea, they are.... Kinda of...     

Also they are fucking terrified of Hillary and her cult, any democrat who objects will have a gym accident.  The only person who could primay Hillary was Obama, because he was the deep state choice. ",ozric101,e9kic6u,conservative
I’m imagining Weekend at Bernie’s.,PurpleAngel23,e9kjsyz,conservative
"Yeah, but watching her crash and burn would be deeply, spiritually fulfilling.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9kxd6k,conservative
"Agreed. I will never forgive her. I will never forget. When I volunteered to do gotv for Trump, they told me their best volunteers were furious Sanders supporters.",GladysCravesRitz,e9l7jfe,conservative
Does Bernie really have supporters left? I backed him in 2016 but at this point his voice is indistinguishable from the drone of corporate democrats so I stopped caring. I assumed most everyone else did too. ,oldfrostedone,e9ktpzr,conservative
“I’ll personally write her a campaign check”. ,Techno_Destruct0,e9l6zp8,conservative
Literally if anyone but hillary runs against trump he loses.,GachiGachiFireBall,e9lpesu,conservative
She isn’t hard-left. She is extreme/radical-left.,PurpleAngel23,e9kjyhe,conservative
But this time she'll visit Wisconsin!  /s,TunaMustard,e9kmxag,conservative
Nice concern trolling.  ,timbowen,e9k3bed,conservative
"Also, I find it mildly interesting that my phone auto capitalized Democrat but not republican",kingkinyu,e9koq21,conservative
"If she had the best advisors, she wouldn't have lost.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9l1x3b,conservative
"I hope she does. If she swindles the nomination again, it will virtually guarantee Trump's re-election. ",mfinn999,e9kowsu,conservative
"I would be very surprised if there are people in high places within the DNC that Hillary doesn’t have enough information on to leverage, especially considering what Donna Brazile had to say in her book after the election.",Strait409,e9km9o4,conservative
"I wouldn't be shocked if Michelle was encouraged to run, she'd get the female and black vote plus anyone who liked Obama might assume he'd be running things anyway.",jap411,e9kmfbi,conservative
Ex advisor fired 10 years ago. ,DataBound,e9kno92,conservative
What are those? - Eyeing an identity politics t-shirt. ,BeardsArePeopleToo,e9kf5j3,conservative
"No jobs, bad economy and higher taxes.",scoobydoo4you,e9kfdyi,conservative
No. ,LumpyWumpus,e9kb2wy,conservative
[removed],,e9lk8zc,conservative
[removed],,e9lw6w6,conservative
[removed],,e9m87ve,conservative
[removed],,e9kmzln,conservative
"Looks like the top minds have decided [to pay us a visit yet again. ](https://np.reddit.com/r/TopMindsOfReddit/comments/9wl12c/top_mind_suggests_that_hillary_lost_because)

I've banned 3 already. And it's only been a short while. I look forward to banning a lot more. 

Ooh. We got some report spam in now. The admins love that. I've had people get their accounts suspended for that. So thanks for giving me this. I look forward to a couple of you losing your accounts  :)",LumpyWumpus,e9ml3l0,conservative
"Who would run against her is the question. I have not yet identified someone I think would make a good democrat contender against her. She seems not to be well liked by moderates but the base left loves her. I still see and hear people arguing ""she won the popular vote"" to this day. ",datworkaccountdo,e9k648k,conservative
"If she didn't run in 2016, Trump wouldn't win.  A LOT of the vote was more against Hilary than for Trump.

&#x200B;

Of course, that assumes they could find any other qualified candidate.  In 2020 it'll be harder if the economy stays hot.  Trump SHOULD be in the drivers seat.",Edwardian,e9kkggu,conservative
It wouldn’t matter they would just rig it again. Bernie should’ve beat her. ,preston_garvey4,e9kra6x,conservative
"She doesn't need the majority of votes to win the primary.

The DNC's superdelegates can decide to front her anyway.

That's ironically what happened to her in 2008. 

She won the majority but the DNC decided to give it to Obama instead. ",DrapeRape,e9kh8w4,conservative
She owned the DNC last primary and she owns them now.  It's not hard to stuff the ballots in favor of Hillary when the people doing the counting are all on her payroll.,StraightNewt,e9kbnr7,conservative
"She didn't have a chance in the last primaries, either. Popularity doesn't matter when you're trying to game the system.",Knuckle14,e9kvos1,conservative
"I voted for her in the 2016 election. Back then I didn't trust Trump and figured more of the same was better than a wild card.

Present day Trump has proved himself. Facts are facts, jobs are up, the economy is up. If Trump can get jail reform and drug policy reform done he would go down as one of the greats. ",datworkaccountdo,e9kb3ut,conservative
"I share this sentiment. I am not a ""liberal"" but I didnt vote for either of them last time. But I'd think I'd rather her ""more of the same bullshit"" right now versus the uncertainty of Trump. He doesn't have actual policy. Just talking points with no real plans behind them ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lny72,conservative
could you elaborate ?,130818,e9lw2ie,conservative
A financial crisis between now and 2020 could even the odds... we live in dangerous times.,idgaf-,e9kubv4,conservative
"And what do you think the democrat House is going to get done in the next 2 years?

",ozric101,e9ki297,conservative
Demography is destiny,groyperslefthand,e9kvhvf,conservative
"IMO, this would be the only real reason she'd run.",scoobydoo4you,e9kfba8,conservative
">""She'll go to Wisconsin and start taking about how much she loves cheese and maple syrup, quote me on this.""

  ~u/Ung-Tik Nov 12, 2018",tehForce,e9l1avj,conservative
I think hillary is the deep state choice,Mugiwaraluffy69,e9laku9,conservative
"What is ""Weekend at Berine's""? I've seen this in reference to Ginburg as well.",RightMillennial,e9kwate,conservative
"I do not think so. They already got all the "" TrumpsANazi"" votes available and Trump won. There are no new ""TrumpsANazi"" votes available excluding likely election fraud of course. The democrats need independent votes to tip the balance, these votes are also available to conservatives. I do not think running a more conservative-ish/moderate democrat is going to attract votes away from Trump, who is already doing this job. Are they willing to compromise on gun control? How about abortion? Unlikely. They need those issues to appear to placate their base. You are not going to pull a conservative vote unless you are willing to compromise somewhere. They need to pick someone who will appeal to libertarians or progressives, if they chose someone who was prolegalization of marijuana and strong in one other area, like...the environment or eliminating the for profit prison system, then they would win. But they don't want to do that, because of where democrats get big donations from. Likewise, a prolegalization republican could pick up more libertarians and others. 

For Trump to lose the democrats have to have either improved their cheating( likely) or run someone young people and disenchanted independents/progressives feel passionate about, they might try to tell you that person is O'Rouke or Warren or Biden, but it is not. They don't have what the voters they need, want.",GladysCravesRitz,e9mxcgs,conservative
"So standing for principle is now being avoded by declaring it concern trolling?

About we actually support upholding the law?",Aszaszasz,e9k41bh,conservative
It started out as anti-HRC and went anti-Trump.,PurpleAngel23,e9kk7bz,conservative
https://media.breitbart.com/media/2017/02/hillary-crying-reuters-640x480.jpg,tau_decay,e9kbgst,conservative
[removed],,e9ma6lr,conservative
[removed],,e9mbre9,conservative
[removed],,e9kxn25,conservative
Both Joe Biden and Bernie Sanders are better candidates than her.  I like neither of them but at least Bernie has a message (that message is fucked up but at least he has a message).  ,stoffel_bristov,e9kk0dw,conservative
I think their best candidate would be Tulsi Gabbard or someone in line with her.  But I doubt it happens.,NovaX81,e9kadsj,conservative
"I think the incredible voter apathy in 2016 speaks volumes about how little people on the left side of the aisle like her. My parents generation eat her shit up, but people in my age demographic think she’s a liar and an empty candidate. 

As for who would run versus her, who knows. I’m always hoping for the next coming of a young progressive candidate like JFK but those times may have passed us",ckeeyz09,e9k6iqz,conservative
"She did win the popular vote, that's a fact not a statement of endearment. I don't think as much of the left base likes her as you seem to. She was an abject failure as a candidate and I don't believe she's really be stupid enough to run again.

Beto O'Rourk cold run against her and easily win.",csajhr,e9krafi,conservative
"The the only platform democrats have is “Trump Bad”. 


Well President Trump has been in office for two years and the economy is great, unemployment is low and he is the only politician that actually does what he promised his constituents. 

Wasn’t he supposed to round up gay and trans people and ship them to gulags? 

The racist, sexist, masgonist, Russia blah, blah blah labels played on loop are totally exhausted. 

Not even hard core lefties can use them as an excuse with a straight face. 

If the DNC makes the same mistake twice they deserve what they get. ",clrd2land,e9k8jhz,conservative
"Ohio Sen. Brown [is considering running](https://www.cleveland.com/metro/index.ssf/2018/11/sen_sherrod_brown_of_ohio_is_w.html).  He's pretty well liked here, but I don't know how much of a reputation he has outside of Ohio.

Ohio is going to be a tough state for the dems to gain back in 2020, so it might make sense strategically, even if just as the VP choice.",TunaMustard,e9kmt6i,conservative
"> Who would run against her is the question.

Avenatti, hopefully...",remybob78,e9kr1rs,conservative
Beto? ,prey4villains,e9k97tj,conservative
Well Ocasio-Cortez is a shoe in... she's been elected to congress so she's definitely ready to be president now. She just needs a birth certificate that says she's 35.,APyritesApatite,e9korqn,conservative
I think Amy Klobuchar is going to be on the ticket somewhere ,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lmqg6,conservative
Agreed. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9l79dw,conservative
"Superdelegate reform actually did happen.

Hillary would actually need a majority or enough votes to tie to win the primary.",Tolken,e9l2ja7,conservative
"I keep saying he's going to go after federal marijuana decriminalization. I just believe he's keeping in his back pocket for the election 

Edit. I still don't see him doing anything for prison reform. Especially, after nominating someone like Sessions to AG.(I know hes gone now but still)",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lnrx9,conservative
About why I prefer trump to Clinton or how to campaign against someone?,GladysCravesRitz,e9m20x0,conservative
"It’s an old movie about a boss that gets knocked off, and everyone just pretends he’s still alive. It’s funny.",PurpleAngel23,e9l491m,conservative
Breitbart... ehhhh,lancerelliott,e9kdscg,conservative
[removed],,e9mchkw,conservative
[removed],,e9mbsya,conservative
[removed],,e9lwvsf,conservative
My grandfather said he thinks they are going to run Kamala Harris.,PurpleAngel23,e9kjl5g,conservative
She seems too moderate for the DNC to back her. ,datworkaccountdo,e9kend1,conservative
"If they were smart they would run Gabbard, shes a veteran too. but the other commenter is right that she appears too moderate for the base.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e9l2xn7,conservative
Their best candidate would be either Gabbard or Ojeda. Both of them would make great presidents. I would even vote for them. But they will never win nomination. Instead some retard like Cory Booker or Elizabeth Warren will win the Dem nomination and get totally smoked by Trump.,FullConservative,e9lbxes,conservative
"If Bernie decides to run and she does also, they will surely be on the same ticket. ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lqlev,conservative
"Imo she “won” the popular vote. A lot of those votes were Trumps, Johnson’s and Steins. I would not vote for Beto. I don’t think he has a real shot after dropping the f bomb in his speech. That is not presidential. ",GladysCravesRitz,e9l76mf,conservative
"> The the only platform democrats have is “Trump Bad”. 

They need a lot of reform. All of this literal screaming about the potus is tiring. The quote on the sidebar from Ryan should be hung in every democrat office across the country. 

",datworkaccountdo,e9kaxfx,conservative
">The the only platform democrats have is “Trump Bad”. 
>

Do you seriously believe that? Hurr Durr the Democrats wanna take my guns away but they simultaneously don't have a platform",_Renegade_Sock_,e9lfr6e,conservative
"The HRC dems have no platform. But someone like Bernie has a legitimate platform and if he reigned in some of the spending ideas I think he would honestly beat Trump. He covers more middle ground policy areas that Trump just doesnt. Criminal Justice reform, an actual plan for healthcare(whether you agree with his or not), strong Antitrust laws, etc. I think if he stopped talking about the ""free college"" thing so much he would win easily ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9ln3h8,conservative
[removed],,e9kght1,conservative
He said he'd implement a 10% tax cut for the middle class before the midterms. Where is it?,Lasshandra,e9kqi81,conservative
"The economy is not great because of any of his policies.

Wasn't his entire campaign platform building a wall and making Mexico pay for it? It was certainly his biggest promise. Has he built that wall? Has he even started? Does he even have any funding for it? Is Mexico going to pay? No across the board.

I'm interested to hear what promises he made and kept, because the only people I see squeezing even an iota of benefit from this administration are the wealthy elite.",csajhr,e9kqbjn,conservative
Could you imagine that debate stage? My god... ,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lnjeg,conservative
"> Beto? 

Good point there. He might be one of few who could run against her. If I had to choose, I'd take Beto over her any day. 

",datworkaccountdo,e9kb3wg,conservative
Pick an authentic hispanic,mxthor,e9klcul,conservative
"Nope; would still be a white male running against a woman.

His supporters would be called ~~Obama/Sanders~~ Beto Boys/Bros and dismissed. 

Clintons campaign has done it twice now lol.",DrapeRape,e9khkt6,conservative
>Beta,tehForce,e9kdp9j,conservative
"I think it's safe to say that most of the liberals here in the People's Republic of Austin have never heard of him and know nothing about him. All they know is that it's cool to hate Ted Cruz. The next day, most all of the yard signs and bumper stickers were gone.",scottbomb,e9ku0a7,conservative
What the f is the media's sycophantic fauning over diaBetos about? From all of the articles you'd think he was Christ. He is handsome?  He speaks well? He hates guns? ,cokernoodle,e9lcf14,conservative
That or she could just “identify” as 35.,bimyo,e9lw6we,conservative
the former,130818,e9m2svz,conservative
[removed],,e9mjrxy,conservative
[removed],,e9mbulw,conservative
No they wont. They know she wouldn't be able to win the general election. I am not saying she wont try but it definitely wouldnt be the DNCs pick ,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lmsax,conservative
She's not that moderate. She quit the DNC so she could publicly support Bernie.,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lmugc,conservative
The progressive part of the base loves her. I’d be very pleased to see her run. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9l6tg4,conservative
"If the last 3 years have taught the world anything, it's that questionable language isn't enough to disqualify someone from office.",deadlysyntax,e9ldq5o,conservative
You forgot the /s at the end there..,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lmx9r,conservative
">...she’s just gotta win dammit for her narcissistic self.

Is that her only reason? Just to say she’s won? ",PurpleAngel23,e9kjh7h,conservative
He promised to cut Federal regulations in order to stimulate the economy by freeing American businesses of excessive red tape. He has exceeded his promises in this area (e.g. https://www.politifact.com/truth-o-meter/promises/trumpometer/promise/1353/slash-federal-regulations/). This thinning of Federal regulations is often cited as one of the drivers of the improved economy.,Claytonious,e9l1rmt,conservative
He promised not to pass the TPP. No TPP. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9l6zds,conservative
"> I'm interested to hear what promises he made and kept

How about 2 conservative Supreme Court judges?",remybob78,e9kr5yq,conservative
I mean he came close in Texas.. a lot of people got behind him in that race and I think the younger Dems will push for a younger candidate. They might want to separate themselves from the likes of Hillary just as they might want to move on from Pelosi as speaker. ,prey4villains,e9kem28,conservative
Dont forget Oprah. The media made a lot of noise about it months ago,igor_otsky,e9krudk,conservative
She will never be a major party nominee again. ,AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lnm3w,conservative
We shall see! If so they’ll only have themselves to blame again if they lose ,prey4villains,e9klt9d,conservative
"I upvoted you, this is true.",GladysCravesRitz,e9mw6zk,conservative
Beta? It’s Beto ,prey4villains,e9keiom,conservative
No idea man. ,prey4villains,e9lco9q,conservative
If I look at your comments it looks like you replied to me but I can't find it and it's not in my notifications. I don't know what's up with that. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9msna8,conservative
"I prefer Trump to Clinton number one because he is not her. I hate her. I loathe her. I will not vote for her. 

Number two. I did not want the TPP. the most dangerous and least discussed election issue. Trump said he would not pass the TPP and he did not. I believe he is also working to change NAFTA. 

He won his primary fairly, even when many in the Republican Party detested him. She cheated. I don't care if you personally don't believe or are pretending to believe she did not. She did. And I will never endorse election  fraud, ever. 

Trump is better on gay rights than Hillary. I don't care what the media screeches. I researched this for myself and he is better than she is. 

I am pleased he negotiated a ceasefire with Syria. 

I totally agree with him that a lot of news is fake.  i have nothing but contempt for the trash spewed by CNN etc. ",GladysCravesRitz,e9mlbey,conservative
[removed],,e9mk6xx,conservative
[removed],,e9mcs92,conservative
Who do you think their pick is?,PurpleAngel23,e9locv3,conservative
"No I don’t agree. And the context is different. 

Also there was very suspicious happenings with Robert what ever his appropriated nickname is campaign funds and he is gonna lose his indie ”cred”once it’s more public that daddy is a billionaire. ",GladysCravesRitz,e9leaub,conservative
Power is an addiction stronger than any drug can be.  She's a power junkie. She will do anything for her next fix ,podestaspassword,e9kp5k6,conservative
Revenge... She wants the closure,mxthor,e9kl9sr,conservative
"Honestly if the economy is still this good by the end of his term then I will give him full credit. I am just someone that believes the economy during a presidents first term is largely attributed to the previous administration. That goes for any president, any party. I just don't believe our country's economy moves as fast as people think it does to reflect policy changes. If something major or drastic happens(2008) then sure we will see sudden swings. But tweaks in policy changes wouldnt be felt for probably 5 years. It is even going to be years before we start to see the ill effects of the this years tax cuts(not saying tax cuts are bad, but of you don't cut spending then yes, they are)",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lncyl,conservative
"That's a layup though, come on. How hard is it to get that done when you have the house majority? I'm not trying to be an ass but I wouldn't really call that a promise kept. I think OP was referring to policy more so?",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lnhdp,conservative
Robert Francis lol,RyanBlueThunder,e9kgs2l,conservative
He's not Hispanic. ,scottbomb,e9ktsgk,conservative
"It's Beta.  Second after Ted ""Alpha""Cruz",tehForce,e9l1gcm,conservative
[removed],,e9mikg8,conservative
"I honestly don't know. If Bernie decides to run, i am sure it will be him. A Sanders/Gabbard ticket would be interesting to see. 

There's always the rumors Biden will run. 

Longer shot but i can see them running is Klobuchar. 

I do not think the DNC will back any type of Booker or Harris ticket because they(i believe) would lose to Trump in the general. 

I think their best shot would be Sanders/Gabbard(or Gabbard/Sanders) if he and/or she decides to run",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lqhh0,conservative
What happens when that high wears off? ,PurpleAngel23,e9l3h9f,conservative
"And then what? There’s a whole country (and eventually, the globe) at risk.",PurpleAngel23,e9klzvz,conservative
"That’s straight bullshit. Obama’s economic contributions can be solely attributed to the federal reserve kicking the debt can down the road. Several of rounds of QE where the stock market went up directly proportional to the printed funny-money, and the interest rates being rock bottom. It has nothing to do with any economy that Obama had a hand in building. 

Trump on the other hand, came in with an immediate jobs strategy and deregulation platform and the market shot up, and business confidence soared. It’s important to draw that distinction. The economic effects were immediate and noticeable.",JackFucington,e9lxdea,conservative
Obama had a majority and got almost nothing done.,GladysCravesRitz,e9mw3ab,conservative
Lol got it,prey4villains,e9l2uo3,conservative
Sanders barely made it out alive last election. Could he really pull it off? Could he live that long?,PurpleAngel23,e9lrwlm,conservative
"I disagree. Any chart(GDP, unemployment, etc) you look at shows a continuous trend in the current direction we are in since Obama. There's no abrupt change. And as I said with something as major as the tax cuts + spending increase we haven't even seen the effects of that yet, and we probably wont for a few years. 
",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9mhv64,conservative
"How do you mean? Like physically? Because he still seems to be in as good of health as he was. 

Also, hes only 5 years older than Trump. I know that means more at their ages but still",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lsyme,conservative
"GDP growth rate bottomed out in 2008/2009, and then shot up in 2010 to around 3.5%. Since then it has peaked and nulled wildly between 0% and 4%, with the only real pattern that can be interpreted from the data as a steady rise since 2016, completely lacking those spastic nulls from 2009 to 2016. I’m simply saying that the strategy of kicking the debt can down the road is not a strategy, and certainly not one that should be lauded as a success in any way.",JackFucington,e9ml4gm,conservative
"I did not know that. People made it seem like he was ancient and in poor health. Of course that was HRC supporters, so shame on me for listening to them anyway. 

But he barely made it out politically. Is running again a good idea? What’s with the new trend of doing it twice?",PurpleAngel23,e9mf7ll,conservative
"I don't know what you mean by didn't make it out politically? He's doing fine from what I see. Doing it twice isn't a new trend either. Also since he really didnt get a fair shake from the DNC the first time, the situation is a little different. ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9mhmt6,conservative
Didn’t make it out politically = he lost to HRC,PurpleAngel23,e9mia1a,conservative
"That is why they re-named the Dept of War years ago, so they could say this.

The US spends very little on actual defense, hell we can not even get a wall built on the southern border. ",ozric101,e9lf5kx,conservative
"It’s fine, nothing to see here....


/s",Rabidraccoon76,e9l7ard,conservative
The defence budget is the military etc. Trump is trying to increase the defence budget to $639 billion which is just under 3 times what China spends.  The reason the US will be spending more on debt is because it is truly massive and not paying it back will have huge knock on effects. The wall being built is not a part of defence spending and has to be budgeted for separately through the Senate. ,towhom_it_mayconcern,e9m28iu,conservative
">  debt is because it is truly massive and not paying it back will have huge knock on effect

Like what, how will it affect your life personally?",ozric101,e9melyo,conservative
Where do you think the government gets money?,turtlturtl,e9moap0,conservative
What does that have to do with your personal debt? ,ozric101,e9mrzdp,conservative
Graham The Hammer,ot4842,e9lag19,conservative
GRAHAMBO,UNHsignu763,e9l64m9,conservative
"Lindsey needs a new name to go with his new attitude.  
  
I suggest ""Uppercut Graham.""",FelixFuckfurter,e9kp2r0,conservative
"What about Arizona Graham?  GOP just lost a Senate seat due to large amounts of uncounted votes that all happen to be D votes.  What are you going to ACTUALLY do about it?  Your words are cheap.  If something illegal happened, DO SOMETHING ABOUT IT!!!!!!  Or just accept defeat by a crazy Taliban sympathizing socialists and move on, but don’t complain, because you are one of a few in this world who CAN do something about it.",mattmcd20,e9kz9ho,conservative
"Narrator voice: ""But they could, and did.""
",Colonize_The_Moon,e9kqnvn,conservative
Grammer?,jd_porter,e9lazg9,conservative
Graham Hammer. ,gizayabasu,e9lhz40,conservative
The Graham Slam.,HORSE_COCK_JUGGLER,e9lec76,conservative
INB4 Graham shaves racing stripes on the sides of his head,Death_AllHisFriends,e9kxrue,conservative
Bad attitude ,Slippery____Pete,e9kr6wd,conservative
Dah Grammer?,ot4842,e9lbwfs,conservative
"And yet, it's realistic.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9kt036,conservative
That sounds like his less impressive Instagram star of a sibling,superAL1394,e9lhik9,conservative
We'll see. Was the R pushback this hard when Norm Coleman had his seat stolen?,greeneyedunicorn2,e9ktxce,conservative
"Exactly, we’re taking it lying down anymore.",Slippery____Pete,e9kxlgg,conservative
"You a word.

*not*",ConsistentlyRight,e9lay42,conservative
"I think what he meant to state was that it was ""Crony Capitalists"". Once they have used the system to get to the top it is less effort to pay big government to lock down the competition.",ultimis,e9n2r15,conservative
"His work brought joy and entertainment to millions, that is a life well spent. ",ozric101,e9n4mc7,conservative
"The place of comic books in the human tradition of myth-making struck me recently as I was listening to ""Something Just Like This"" by Coldplay and The Chainsmokers:

>I've been reading books of old

>The legends and the myths

>Achilles and his gold

>Hercules and his gifts

>Spiderman's control

>And Batman with his fists

>And clearly I don't see myself upon that list",PubliusVA,e9n6mtf,conservative
"Stickying this since every story about this has been a circle jerk of leftist brigaders and sadly even many conservatives are unquestioningly accepting the left's narrative. A statement from the White House says: 

> “The President and First Lady’s trip to Ainse-Marne American Cemetery and Memorial has been canceled due to scheduling and logistical difficulties caused by the weather. An American delegation led by Chief of Staff General John Kelly and Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff General Joe Dunford will attend on their behalf.”

Let's apply some common sense to the left's narrative that is being sold to us. Some counter-points to consider:

1. The President has been arguably the strongest supporter of veterans issues in the office since Reagan. Is it more likely that he doesn't care and ditched the event purposely or that this was, in fact, a logistical error in the Secret Service planning for an alternate transportation method?

2. The President has security requirements that far exceed that of other dignitaries, officials or even foreign heads of state, especially in a nation of extreme leftists that hate this President. If a contingency plan for a motorcade was not in place already, it is impossible that a proper one could be developed immediately on the fly. 

3. The Secret Service is not perfect and has suffered a [number of recent high profile scandals](https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2015/03/secret-service-disaster-timeline/387643/) (drunk-driving, prostitution, sloppy investigations and advance work, multiple cases of unauthorized persons breaching barriers). These occurred under Obama, and strangely the leftist media never had personal criticism for Obama over their failures. This, however, must be all Trump's fault. In fact, we're supposed to believe that he just didn't want to go and this is a coverup.

4. If the President didn't plan on attending, why would he have made the trip over there in the first place?

5. The left loves to attack their opponents of what they are guilty of. The left has a long history of disrespect for the military and for veterans. From spitting on soldiers, to burning flags, to insulting veterans, to kneeling for the anthem, to attempting to disenfranchise servicemen's absentee ballots, to endless attempts to defund the military, accusations of war crimes, etc, etc. Are we really getting the whole truth from the leftist media, or is this an attempt to attack a Republican to detract from their long history of the same?",PhilosoGuido,e9lndah,conservative
[removed],,e9lg81x,conservative
He also gave a speech in the rain literally the next day... also conveniently ignored.,___-III----III-___,e9kehyy,conservative
The radio news was blaming it on the rain this morning (with apologies to Milli Vanilli).,Khalinov,e9kbeyu,conservative
[removed],,e9l4tv7,conservative
[removed],,e9kuj4e,conservative
">a fact the media ignored

Shocked I tell you",FallingPinkElephant,e9kndhn,conservative
[removed],,e9l76jg,conservative
"Ya know, I was shocked and saddened to see so many conservatives fall for this one.  Where have you all been the past two years? You knew this shit was another set up by media and still bit. It's the same story with republicans losing the house. Where the fuck is everyone? 

I mean I still think the the midterms faired out ok for us and the blue water e was a mere ripple but still.... Where are you?",abuigues,e9ltac9,conservative
[Sarah Sanders Explains Exactly Why Trump Could Not Attend French Memorial Service](https://townhall.com/tipsheet/juliorosas/2018/11/12/sarah-sanders-explains-exactly-why-trump-could-not-attend-french-memorial-service-n2535767),guanaco55,e9kb1ca,conservative
Wow. And now we know the rest of the story.,SickofInternetProgs,e9l47jl,conservative
the fake news was at its finest with this story,smartguy360,e9l82wh,conservative
Great points!  Thanks!,guanaco55,e9mgr9y,conservative
I'd like to hear more about this USMC helicopter that cannot get airborne in a light to moderate rain.,Bentaeriel,e9llvi8,conservative
"The MSM mantra is that ""Trump is an idiot"" and they will shape any ""news"" to reinforce that view.",guanaco55,e9kbrmg,conservative
Don't apologize.  They know what they did.,user1492,e9ko698,conservative
John Kelly has a much lower security footprint but you already knew that.,ngoni,e9l76vj,conservative
"No. No, they don't. The President of the United States is unlike any other world leader. Period. And when travel by road isn't the original plan, I am sure that the precautions taken are even more disruptive because they could not be as precise and thus more generalized.",mattyice18,e9kuqqw,conservative
Classy. ,swolemedic,e9l7pei,conservative
"Yes, I was amazed when I found out.  The sad reality is that if he HAD  gone and Paris traffic was gridlock, then he would have been criticized for that!  ",guanaco55,e9l4t0w,conservative
[removed],,e9l90wl,conservative
[removed],,e9lbyyk,conservative
[removed],,e9l7nmc,conservative
Didn't Bush delay going to new Orleans after Katrina for the same reason?  Shocking that the fake news media ripped him for it too.,BrockLee76,e9lhwbx,conservative
Your posts are sounding more than a bit like concern trolling. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9lari4,conservative
Calm down foreigner. Stop trying to influence US elections. ,orangeeyedunicorn,e9ldfwy,conservative
[removed],,e9lb9m5,conservative
You are aware that this sub is for conservatives *only* right? ,ConsistentlyRight,e9lbgd7,conservative
"[Some clips of the rocket attacks](https://imgur.com/gallery/lQPwxb0)
",freedomhertz,e9lny7q,conservative
Because obviously it's okay to kill it. ,xJownage,e9lzj4m,conservative
This made my feel ill. Looking at a baby and saying that it is okay to murder it... What sort of monster do you have to be to do that?,ItsMikeUh,e9mu0lu,conservative
No one wants that. You seem uninformed,Mattprather2112,e9nfv33,conservative
"*Recall, she's elected.",Hinnaku,e9lhj3f,conservative
"Mission Statement:

We provide a place on Reddit for conservatives, both fiscal and social, to read and discuss political and **cultural** 
issues from a distinctly conservative point of view.",tehForce,e9l0x25,conservative
So sad. Gave a lot of people a lot of heroes. ,molon-labe7,e9klol7,conservative
May he RIP.,Manach_Irish,e9kng93,conservative
"RIP, Stan. Excelsior!",PubliusVA,e9kly70,conservative
"Today, we say goodbye to a true storyteller, a man who understood the importance of fighting the true wrongs in the world, and an writer who knew the necessity for heroes and heroic actions. Excelsior, Stan.",TruthfulTrolling,e9l6mn8,conservative
Well he's gonna be missed. He did have a long life and very cool career though. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9kmdgo,conservative
"Think they got him an unfinished copy of the last infinity war movie, before he kicked?",probablybiased,e9klk64,conservative
RIP after the bs he went through with his family I hope he found peace in the end,Delta_25,e9l1szv,conservative
He was a true legend. His impact on American culture is so large that it cannot even be measured. May he rest in peace. ,LumpyWumpus,e9lbnwy,conservative
A legend. May his Rest In Peace ,littlebit90_,e9l3ob2,conservative
"RIP Stan, Excelsior.  He was an amazing storyteller that gave us some of the greatest heroes.  He will be missed.",Obversaria,e9l9l7c,conservative
"RIP and excelsior, you were a shining light in this world.",hello_japan,e9lfrz8,conservative
Not sure but hopefully they got his cameo in there. I know they filmed a bunch at once a while ago but not sure if this is one they got too. RIP the legend.,WhitaThanBleach,e9kmlfn,conservative
"If I remember correctly, they had already filmed a couple movies in advance. No sure how that works but with CGI, anything is possible. ",Applesauce_Police,e9ks4ll,conservative
"I'm almost certain filming for that had already finished, but I definitely think it will be his last cameo.",infinitycore,e9kys6i,conservative
I’m sure his cameo is in multiple movies upcoming ,kotov9syndrome,e9lk03h,conservative
Didn’t he run his 2016 senate campaign on abolishing Obamacare?,bisectual,e9kgvep,conservative
"ya McCain gave the thumbs down so that sucks.  But what the hell was the house and senate doing for the past 8 years.  Honestly f*** them all.  Burn the whole shit down.

Edit: The biggest problem is the astronomical pricing of everything, from MRI's to Xrays, to operations.  Can't reduce those costs without cutting regulations.  Insurance will never get cheaper until you have true free market.  I don't think we will ever have true free market.  ",IvankasFutureHusband,e9kf07c,conservative
Healthcare *was* the highest polling voter priority this time around. McCain’s vote denied the GOP the chance to prove they could chart a different course on the issue and made swing voters cling to Obamacare tighter. The Dems wouldn’t have their double digit polling advantage on the issue if we’d made progress. ,YankeeBlues21,e9kdcig,conservative
"No, no, no!  Take accountability.  Look at what you told GOP voters what you would do, them look at what you actually did.  The answer was for MOST of the last few years we GOP voters have been highly disappointed with your performance.  We were not fired up enough and you didn’t give us enough legs to stand on to convince our moderate friends you were the right choice.   That is why you lost!  Accept it and get better!!!!!!  I’m so sick of blaming other people.  That is what liberals do, be better than that!",mattmcd20,e9ks8lx,conservative
"I’m still stuck on healthcare, How can the GOP sell their idea of healthcare? ",speedybuddy562,e9kj16c,conservative
[removed],,e9kpwec,conservative
Part of the reason I could see yes. I understand the point he’s making and there is corroborating evidence . Shame he lost to a democrat.,Jebytu,e9ln8z0,conservative
His never Trumpism hurt the entire party. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9keeug,conservative
McCain wasn’t a good senator but that’s ridiculous lol.  ,NCSUGrad2012,e9kddi8,conservative
"I’ll never get over McCain’s no vote. 

He lost to Obama’s in 2008, it’s his fault we have Obamacare in the first place. And then after all the GOP’s campaigning against Obamacare, he stabs them in the back at their last chance to repeal it.",gster50,e9kgm9t,conservative
"He did.  He promised to literally lead the charge - his words - on that.  

And then he backstabbed all of his voters because Orange Man Bad.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9kqbsk,conservative
"Trump promised that, on day 1, he would replace Obamacare with a much better plan that would be less expensive and provide better care. And it would be ""so easy"".

Promises made. Promises kept?",RunnerTenor,e9lxebj,conservative
(You’ll never have cheap prices when insurance is in the middle),BeggarsAreChoosers,e9lfe8h,conservative
Yep. It pisses me off so much (regardless of party) when they start going on about “if you elect us we’ll do this this and that!” meanwhile they were just in power for years and did sweet fuck all as far as major agenda pushing goes. I voted straight Republican and would do it again but to hear McCarthy go on tv last weekend and talk about all the stuff the GOP would do if they regained the house makes me roll my eyes. I say the same about Pelosi and company. ,Knollsit,e9kww2g,conservative
McCain sucked but let's be honest: that Republican healthcare bill was Obamacare Lite. It was garbage.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9khd9h,conservative
"So much this, if McCain had given his own party a shot at fixing it this would not have been that big of an issue.",Racheakt,e9kebme,conservative
"Its tough, they have to be louder than the other side and the media who are happy to print patent falsities.

Another great example was the recent tax cuts, the left said that the cuts were for the wealthy bit their own numbers showed that a large majority of Americans would see their tax bill lowered. There are still articles pushing those points...",freedomhertz,e9kymf4,conservative
"> 
> 
> 
> 
> McCain was a national hero. What a sad excuse. 

His heroism in Vietnam has nothing to do with his service as a Senator. Bob Kerrey (former D-NB) was a Medal of Honor winner in Vietnam. John Kerry won the Navy Cross. 

Criticizing their Senatorial tenures is not equivalent to criticizing their war exploits. ",psstein,e9kyr5o,conservative
"""National Hero"" != infallible. McCain's service in the military has nothing to do with his political career. In fact, you can argue that the former is tarnished by the latter.",GameShowWerewolf,e9ksi0f,conservative
">He was in the navy so he can't do anything wrong!

???",shatter321,e9kvyya,conservative
"Audie Murphy, John Basilone, and Chesty Puller were national heroes.  

McCain was a POW who suffered horribly in captivity, refused early release and thereby kept faith with his fellow prisoners, and upon retirement as an O-6 went into politics, where he would spend literally the rest of his life.  Calling him a 'national hero' is inaccurate. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9l01fl,conservative
"Didn’t he tell his captors information that got many Americans killed? 

Honestly, fuck him. ",Bears_Bearing_Arms,e9lfmcn,conservative
He was praised for “working across the aisle” but what they really meant was he about as anti Trump as any democrat.,Jabronies96,e9knkh3,conservative
"I do not understand NeverTrumpers. Trump has faithfully enacted a pretty good Republican agenda. If you're against Trump, you're against a conservative justices and for high taxes. I saw some whiny op-ed about civility and humility- if you value those over a conservative SCOTUS, you're not a conservative.",___-III----III-___,e9kerjv,conservative
"Didn't trump insult him o  the campaign trail?  He should be above it, but a part of me can understand where he's coming from.",Falkamper,e9kzys0,conservative
"> He lost to Obama’s in 2008, it’s his fault we have the law in Obamacare.

No Republican could have beaten Obama in 2008.",FelixFuckfurter,e9kmkv5,conservative
"All because of his issues w/ Trump. When it comes to McCain, I'll believe The Man triumphed over The Myth: A bitter Washington insider w/ nothing to lose aside from his personal battle w/ cancer is more truthful than the presidential nominee who showboated a neocon foreign policy and a first female VP nod. In the end, McCain got what he wanted and is still being fed the limelight posthumously ",ENEB1487,e9khen7,conservative
I’m sure his buddy Jeff Flake is legit thrilled that Sinema will take over one of the AZ seats. He probably has his fingers crossed for the other seat flipping during the next election cycle. The NeverTrump people are fucking crazy in their resistance. ,Knollsit,e9kx9ho,conservative
[removed],,e9lfgzw,conservative
Let's be fair that had nothing to do with why McCain blocked it.,ultimis,e9kmv9k,conservative
"Agreed, but it was incremental progress and momentum on the issue. It was us reclaiming the ball. ",YankeeBlues21,e9khfvg,conservative
"Obamacare lite is better than Obamacare. There was a gadfly wing of the party who fumbled the ball on the 1 yard line because it wasn't conservative enough. 

Trump got voted in because people hoped he would care about common people problems. Dipsticks who think a person making 18k a year should pay $500 a month for a plan with a $7k deductible are suited for teaching political theory at Hillsdale College, not screwing up a softball opportunity for the Republican party and conservative movement.",SickofInternetProgs,e9l4n13,conservative
Fixing it huh,water_bottle_goggles,e9keyiq,conservative
[removed],,e9l4bfs,conservative
"Nope, that's a myth that was completely made up to smear him and has been debunked for a long time. ",CFC509,e9lgwmi,conservative
Happy veterans day!,Marmar1117,e9lgfud,conservative
"The only time they had credibility was when the election was taking place and Trump was not yet in the position to push policy. Now that he is President, they don't have that as a valid reason anymore. NeverTrumpers who have not abandoned that stance are showing that they have no credibility as conservatives.

For example, look at Bill Kristol.",houseoftolstoy,e9kgcrj,conservative
"I literally argue with one Conservative guy on social media who refuses to vote for Trump, or any Trump supporting candidates because of the President's position on eminent domain. I shit you not...",Taylor814,e9knbbj,conservative
This is the truth. There was no way in hell that McCain or any Republican was going to win that election.,FloatyFish,e9kn70o,conservative
"As close as it was with Palin as the VP pick? I heartily disagree. If he had not picked an ignorant political hack as his backup with his advancing age, I would have welcomed a McCain presidency. However, I would never even think of running the risk of that moron being the leader of the free world of he should fall ill or die. I think you underestimate how many people share that sentiment.",csajhr,e9l2k99,conservative
"McCain polled better than Obama when he picked Palin. No doubt it was a up hill battle, but you needed to be aggressive against the no experience Obama who should never been a contender for the highest office in the land.",ultimis,e9kn8f2,conservative
That seat was flat out stolen.,Odoacer476CE,e9l0wss,conservative
"It's fine. They will suffer the consequences in the form of high taxes, shit healthcare, illegal immigration, sanctuary cities, refugee cities, and rampant violent crime. Sadly, the people around them will suffer too. They knew what they were getting themselves into and voted democrat out of spite. No sympathy.",ObamaDasGayBoi,e9lto2s,conservative
Please edify us then ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9lhm9z,conservative
"First you pass incremental progress, then you cry at the press conference that the legislation “doesn’t go far enough” but that you took what you could against the “unreasonable opposition to a common sense solution” and “look forward to pressing the issue after the upcoming election.”",SaltineAmerican_1970,e9kluc0,conservative
"Not really, I am not sticking up for Obamacare but if you take the core things out of Obamacare that allow it to function and try to make that the new plan it would have left us worse off. ",AverageJoeJohnSmith,e9lleks,conservative
Replace is a better term.,Racheakt,e9kfim2,conservative
"Wow it's almost as if when you pay more in taxes the greatest net gain goes to you.  The poor do not even pay income taxes, so unless you can figure out a way to go lower than 0 I'm not sure what your point is.   

The literal only way to solve the debt is entitlement reform.  Not passing a tax bill wouldn't solve shit.   I bet you're one of those ""conservatives"" who think we need to keep bloating entitlements. ",tja_1478,e9l7drk,conservative
"The greatest net gain was the top 5% because they pay a greater share of taxes...but that's assuming that this is a zero sum game.

What do you think they are doing with the money they aren't paying in taxes? Scrooge Mcducking ever night into a pool of hundies? Who are companies buying (at a premium) their stocks back from?

I'm all for putting a curb on debt, stop forcing me to pay into the ponzi scheme that is Social Security. Hell, if I invested what I had to pay into social security/medicare(caid) I could pay for my medical expenses and have more than enough left to put my kids through college. 

I suggest you spend some time thinking about things instead of spouting off bylines from r/politics",freedomhertz,e9l6sr0,conservative
">Bill Kristol

Bill Kristol is the poster child for exactly what is wrong with NeverTrumpers, and with mainstream Republicans.",Strait409,e9l92au,conservative
"They hardly had any credibility then either imo. It was pretty obvious what a Trump presidency would be like, but they gave into fear mongering from the left. ",___-III----III-___,e9kgnd7,conservative
"Obama won 365 electoral votes, including basically every modern swing state plus Indiana. He came within 4,000 votes of winning Missouri and only lost Montana by about 2%. If you shift every state 9.5% towards McCain he still loses.

Bush's approval ratings were in the toilet, there was war and recession. It wasn't a winnable election, no matter who the VP pick was.",eclaircissement,e9lxngo,conservative
">McCain polled better than Obama when he picked Palin.  
  
Presumably this was prior to anyone hearing Palin talk.  
  
The economy was collapsing, the country was tired of war, and the Mark Foley scandal was relatively fresh in the memory.  That's just a toxic cocktail for the party in office.",FelixFuckfurter,e9ko9o0,conservative
"I agree. I guarantee millions of illegals voted this election cycle and its obviously apparent in FL, AZ, WI, GA, MT, everywhere. They don't even attempt to hide it anymore. Shit, Nelson and gillum just sued to have illegal votes counted. Its insane. They hide in back rooms, filling out ""damaged"" ballets, deciding what the voter 'intended"" without bipartisan supervision.

&#x200B;

Tens of thousands of votes come in, late, all accross the country AFTER the election is over leaning - in some cases - 9:1 in favor of democrats. But it ALWAYS favors democrats and its ALWAYS just enough to push them over the edge to avoid a recount. Our democracy is a joke. How lucky can you be? Down maybe 10-50k votes and all of a sudden \*POOF\* magically we find thousands of ballots and oh my god, look! They favor dems, in these few boxes, just coincidentally 5:1 to give us the win!",ObamaDasGayBoi,e9ltpvp,conservative
"Not just absolute dollar value, but proportionally. Most people saved money on their taxes, but the 95th-99th income percentiles saw the greatest percentage gain in after tax income. See the first chart in [this report](https://www.taxpolicycenter.org/publications/distributional-analysis-conference-agreement-tax-cuts-and-jobs-act/full).

Not only that, but after the individual cuts expire in 2025, nearly all of the savings will accrue to the top percentile. It was not a very friendly bill for the middle class. We probably won't be able to afford to extend the individual cuts.

Republicans in Congress also failed to deliver spending cuts and actually did the opposite. Deficits and debt projections are up. We are in a worse position fiscally than we were two years ago.

",eclaircissement,e9lpnd8,conservative
">  It was pretty obvious what a Trump presidency would be like

I don't really agree with that.  Trump was saying plenty about protectionism, government involvement in health care, and picking winners and losers in the market.  My favorite ever Ben Shapiro Show moment was when he plays a clip of Trump describing his vision for health care and then Ben comes in and says ""OK, that's exactly Obamacare.""",FelixFuckfurter,e9klwm5,conservative
"This was after her Republican National Convention speech which hit it out of the park.

Of course it was, but it was also toxic for Obama in 2012, but his aggressive tactics against Romney ensured a president over seeing one of the shittiest economies since the great depression got re-elected.

McCain refused to go after Obama on his weak spots. And since Obama had no policy to criticized it allowed him to slide into office nearly unopposed. Clinton put up more of a fight against Obama than McCain did.",ultimis,e9kstfm,conservative
The legislative branch writes the laws...,___-III----III-___,e9kmezt,conservative
"Ben Shapiro, the guy that literally defended Jim Acosta because he had to keep up his delusional defense of Michelle Fields. ",tja_1478,e9l796y,conservative
"But the President sets the agenda.  
  
That's not how it should be, but it is.",FelixFuckfurter,e9kob3g,conservative
I didn't know Wisconsin was British Protectorate... ,memberCP,e9n2wcu,conservative
"Imagine being so authoritarian you want legal sanctions against students for a photo taken off school property and not at a school event.

What is there to investigate? They didn't break any laws. This police department needs to stop virtue signaling and go find actual crimes to solve. They are assisting an Antifa-led witch hunt into a high school prank. I didn't realize that high school pranks, totally protected under the first amendment, were a police matter worthy of investigation.

What crime did they commit? This is America, not Europe- we have free speech here. It's not the police's job to monitor free speech. We live in a free country.",CAGUnion404,e9mcsgc,conservative
Probably a sarcastic response to being under the thumb of the authoritarian leftist educational system.,BrighamYoung,e9m918d,conservative
"Wouldn’t surprise me.  45 years ago, my hippie ass dad would have done the same thing at a college protest.",zwiebelsaft,e9o1vht,conservative
"Damn, he got out while the time was right.

Also surprising to see a newswars link go through. I thought everything Alex Jones-related was sitewide filtered now.",darthhayek,e9ljpiw,conservative
She means if the DNC will call her. It has nothing to do with the American people or even the average democratic voter. ,Subvet98,e9m5m4y,conservative
"If a Republican said this, they would be painted as a religious nutjob by the media. ",frasierfonzie,e9mcm7w,conservative
All too fitting to see leftism adopt religious vernacular like this.,BrighamYoung,e9m95v9,conservative
Don't you mean you need to check with Chuck to see if it's okay?,JFGFNY,e9mliql,conservative
Standing up for himself and is nation doesn't make him a bully.,expendable_Henchman,e9mvgbo,conservative
"It’s a guy, so.",HolsterOfNuts,e9kotug,conservative
"If sex and gender are different, wouldn't this still be a male student, but a transwoman?",PubliusVA,e9l011z,conservative
"Ive got to say Im suprised to see this article on my favourite subreddit. This is my university and I know the professor. The situation is rather interesting and has even sparked some talk among students after it was publicly released. The fine young man who had his feelings hurt is not a typical Democrat but a typical leftist. He was certainly more vocal about his disagreement than the article states, referring to the professor with similar terms that Samantha Bee used about Ivanka Trump. Im certainly hoping that this could be a win for Free Speech, but Im not sure what the future holds for this case.",Voisardian,e9lx65m,conservative
  ^ male student,tenshon,e9ko4lq,conservative
"This was bound to happen. I'm just waiting for it to happen even more. Compelled speech on a public campus is a direct violation of 1st amendment rights in both the free speech category and potentially freedom of religion; not to be able to discriminate, but to uphold the truth even when the truth may offend someone.",cons_NC,e9lhjdp,conservative
"Reminds me of that SNL skit - ""A Him or A Her...A Ma'am or a Sir? It's just Pat"". 

Suddenly there are so many people questioning their gender you can't keep up. You're teaching class ans trying to juggle your lecture, what your eyes see and what various people wish to be called!",JFGFNY,e9mlu31,conservative
Marcie used to call Peppermint Patty. It’s not exclusive to the male sex,pdcrawjr,e9l91lm,conservative
"I'm confused, doesn't a female transgender *want* to be called ""sir""? Isn't that typically what they pretend at anyways?",MarioFanaticXV,e9lev19,conservative
At every college in the US they have pronoun training and this person willfully ignores it to be a dick. Lol just do your fucking job ,benmcsausage,e9lu52o,conservative
"If libs had their way, you'd go to jail for writing that.",tenshon,e9kqyrc,conservative
http://imgur.com/gallery/inXUsRI,AManHasNoFear,e9lh3u4,conservative
I think by female transgender they mean the guy became a girl.,hexcodeblue,e9lnq5h,conservative
"""Pronoun training"" > 1st Amendment",PubliusVA,e9m0lqd,conservative
"Speech control. If they can dictate what words mean, they'll win every argument. ",triggernaut,e9ks1oo,conservative
"Not all libs feel that way. Forced speech is not okay and should never fly in this country.

Discrimination is defined as prejudicial or unjust treatment, where were either of those things here?

I'm all for being nice and trying to respect people's wishes on what to be called, but we can not and should not force people to adhere to those wishes as a matter of law.",csajhr,e9loaby,conservative
Agreed. It’s pathetic.,HolsterOfNuts,e9ksau9,conservative
"Ah, I thought it meant a woman that was pretending to be a man, not the other way around..",MarioFanaticXV,e9luojx,conservative
I didn’t say that ,benmcsausage,e9m2jh8,conservative
"Right. Like trans*phobia* - as if opposition to transgenderism isn't the stating of scientific facts, it's now an *irrational psychological disorder* like any other phobia.",tenshon,e9kstxa,conservative
"Doesn't phobia translate into ""fearful of?"" Do they really think people ""fear"" transgenders, or gays, or any (social) <insert>phobia?",cons_NC,e9lhlwe,conservative
And like Islamophobia - notice how there isn't a Christian corollary? ,triggernaut,e9ktnm7,conservative
Great point.,PurpleAngel23,e9l4uh3,conservative
Great point.,PurpleAngel23,e9l4u67,conservative
Yeah like the DNC gives a shit about what its voters want lol ,Manchurainprez,e9kazwq,conservative
"Democrats, you *will* have Pelosi as speaker, whether you want to or not!!!",PerceivedShift,e9kp9wb,conservative
Too bad. Trump decided for you. LMAO,ReaganTroll,e9k00tx,conservative
I really want them to find somebody moderate to come in and actually try and pass some kind of legislation. I don't have high hopes though. ,iwasthebeaver,e9k346b,conservative
As a filthy liberal I'm  just as sick of her  as all if you are.,protoleg,e9l9n4n,conservative
Like the Democrats have ever cared about what the voters wanted.,Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9k128t,conservative
"If they are smart, she wont be. Good for us though.",M6D_Magnum,e9k7ikm,conservative
"I want Ocasio-Cortez as Speaker. Ignore that this is her first term, she's the VANGUARD of the new Democratic Party! 

Seriously, I'd love to see her try to respond to the SOTU. ",psstein,e9kz23f,conservative
Do Republicans in the House get to vote for Speaker? They should all vote Pelosi. I want her to be the face of the Democrat Party. ,GuitarWizard90,e9llbwz,conservative
"""We'll tell you what we want you to think.""",CondoPresident,e9lhqej,conservative
Right now Pelosi might be a moderate.,ReaganTroll,e9k3v3x,conservative
">  really want them to find somebody moderate to come in and actually try and pass some kind of legislation

I don't think I want any kind of legislation the Dems want to pass.",soylent_absinthe,e9krabl,conservative
"Sadly, it’s Pelosi or someone to her left.",xwhy,e9ljwaj,conservative
+1 for Ocasio-Cortez as speaker. We need fresh faces in Congressional leadership.,ot4842,e9ladr0,conservative
the fact that you're right is really scary. ,iwasthebeaver,e9k3wxf,conservative
I never thought this day would come but here we are. ,DMooseJ,e9l8sp1,conservative
At least most of the challengers that flipped red seats last week were moderates. They're gonna be gone in 2-4 years once the Dems ignore them though lol. ,latotokyo123,e9k9neu,conservative
How the hell does an unborn child make a choice? ,PurpleAngel23,e9mittc,conservative
"If they were just going to steal elections the old fashioned way, could they have spared us the importing of the 3rd world?",Silicon_Avatar,e9l0ps8,conservative
"If the media doesn't report it, is it real?  For most of the country that's the case.",StraightNewt,e9kb9z7,conservative
Doesn't fit the preferred narrative.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9kr75h,conservative
"Nothing to see here people.  Meanwhile in France,  Orange man bad!",wynhdo,e9l2z9k,conservative
"He’s got a great point, the media has already lost credibility. ",bhowell999,e9kmd5u,conservative
"I like both Ben and Trump and I've got to agree with Ben here.

I have held the same feelings for the media since the Duke Lacrosse situation. I really appreciate what Trump has done flipping over the rock and shining a light on what the media is, but these feeling have been boiling over for almost a decade throughout the country. Trump is just the first person to do something about it. ",crapinmypants_gross,e9k5zdp,conservative
"Okay, this is epic.",FantasticFerd,e9koyip,conservative
"Conservative Commentator Ben Shapiro holds up the mirror of TRUTH to the media's face. The resulting image is so indescribably horrible that it drives them to insanity. They now spend their days perclaiming that Hitler has taken over the United States and they are the brave few who dare to resist him and his transgressions against them. So everything's the exact same as its always been. Trigger warning I'm MuricanStephen, please hire me for the Andrew Klavan show.",MuricanStephen,e9k02sb,conservative
"Old Ben never misses a chance, even a made up one- the media is still intact--to subtract from Trump. At this point, Trump is like Tesla, it'll take decades for him to start getting the credit he deserves. ",triggernaut,e9jrif9,conservative
"Ben Shapiro absolutely loathes Trump, and would've happily crowed about how smart he was and how dumb and racist Trump supporters were had Hillary won and a 'Good Conservative' like Cruz or Jeb! not gotten the nomination.

",lost_snake,e9k3ver,conservative
"Trump is rubber, the media is glue...  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9kn8gs,conservative
What is this clip from?,wmansir,e9k6xbg,conservative
"I always think back to what that idiot michael moore said the media promoted trump and loved him when he was still just a fringe candidate who they didn't think could win, they gave him over a billion worth of free air time and now that he won they hate him when its partially there fault he won in the first place",smartguy360,e9l8721,conservative
The soap opera demographic is becoming more politically active...,Richandler,e9lnuku,conservative
"His wife’s a doctor, you know...",lancerelliott,e9ke2b0,conservative
"I think it's funny how the left is fast to lose trust in a lot of things/people yet the ones I talk to are completely oblivious to how the media is run these days. I mean, just look at Jim Acosta and how the left sees him as a martyr.

It's ridiculous.

I'm a conservative but that doesn't mean that specific politicians and people in conservative media can't do wrong in my eyes. Not to mention, when someone of the more radical left does something incredibly disrespectful or **completely illegal** they *praise* the individual(s) involved but when conservatives *condemn* such actions no matter who the suspect is.",PHNX_xRapTor,e9l3gor,conservative
"Dude, the quote starts with, ""As much as Trump destroyed the press.....""

Watch the vid before you start lobbing accusations or possibly shouting JOOOOOOOOOOO!

Edit: amending to communicate the point better. Not changing the statement because I had no way of knowing if who I was replying to was Jewish.

Given the antisemitism that is directed at Shapiro by bad actors, I'm not apologizing for the assumption.",Argonut32,e9jtroj,conservative
"His Friday show was the WORST one I've ever listened to.  It starts off talking about how there is an attempt to steal the election in Florida and then morphed directly into how bad it's going to be because Trump is the worst and talks to much!?!?  ARE YOU FUCKING KIDDING ME?  Democrats are actively trying to get non-citizens votes counted and he's talking about how Trump talks to reporters?  I wish there was a better show.  I'm slowly leaning towards Klavan's who I like but not 100% sold on it yet, but I like the fast pace of Shipiro's show.  ",jedichric,e9k571q,conservative
"Its from the election night special.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kbnLuv5H41Y",_glenn_,e9kdm7g,conservative
"I don't think the left is in love with Acosta, but when the WH removes a journalist for specious reasons and provides doctored evidence to support it, people are going to cry foul.

If they had just removed his credentials and said he was disrespectful and needlessly pugilistic, there wouldn't have been nearly this response. The WH made him a martyr.",csajhr,e9lntyp,conservative
"Sinclair is a conservative media company that owns close to 70% of all local news channels. Clear channel, a conservative media company, rules the airwaves. Fox News, the news org ran by former Nixon advisor Roger Ailes, shapes news cycles. The Grover Norquist meetings make all pundits adhere to the same conservative talking points. 

Together, conservatives rule the media and news cycle. Together, they crushed the “liberal media”. 

Remember when you could have a debate with a liberal? Well now it’s impossible because we can’t even agree on objective reality. And it’s exactly what they want.",cryptroop,e9ljq5g,conservative
Is it possible to criticize a Jewish person with being called anti-semitic?  ,swimcritique,e9k2trh,conservative
"> Watch the vid before you start lobbying accusations or shouting JOOOOOOOOOOO!

That's weird, /u/Argonaut32, the comment  of /u/triggernaut you're replying to is:


>Old Ben never misses a chance, even a made up one- the media is still intact--to subtract from Trump. At this point, Trump is like Tesla, it'll take decades for him to start getting the credit he deserves.

Can you tell us why you're implying triggernaut is an anti-Semite? 

Very strange.
",lost_snake,e9k3ysm,conservative
No one brought up race/religion until **you** did.,ConsistentlyRight,e9jveqp,conservative
"It’s ‘lobbing’ accusations, and you are the one lobbing accusations. I’m Jewish and there was nothing at all in the comment you replied to that justified “lobbying” accusations of anti-Semitism. Get a grip.",hello_japan,e9k4o0j,conservative
Jooooo,lancerelliott,e9kdyky,conservative
Ben’s problem is that he’s a rich lawyer that lives in a very nice part of California. Literally no policy (except maybe a tax raise) will affect him in any meaningful way. He will never understand that every battle is important.,CSGOW1ld,e9k9pke,conservative
"Mark Levin Audio Rewind is the best, his podcast comes out very quickly after his radio show is off the air and you can listen at your leisure. He keeps a pretty fast pace, and he is extremely knowledgeable and informative. The only thing is he kind of yells a lot, which isn’t for everybody.

Buck Sexton is also really good, I’ve been getting into him lately.

Love Klavan and Knowles, of course.

Dan Bongino is good, but he has a different kind of style. He can go very deep and in-depth—he has done the best and most comprehensive work regarding Spygate of any podcaster—but at the same time has a habit of dumbing things down for the lowest common denominator and repeating himself a lot. It’s an odd combination of great, insightful analysis and then repeating himself and dumbing things down for five minutes. I still really enjoy him.

Daniel Horowitz has a podcast called the Conservative Conscience that’s very cerebral and policy-oriented.

Larry O’Connor is great, but his podcast for some reason keeps the commercials from his radio show and it’s really annoying. 

For something a little different, I highly recommend No Agenda with Adam Curry and John C. Dvorak. It’s not exactly a conservative podcast, it’s more of a media deconstruction podcast that leans conservative simply because the media is so wildly leftist and disingenuous. They are really great. They have been doing the show for eleven years and its been a lot of fun to see them get pushed more and more to the right over the years as the media moves further and further left.",hello_japan,e9k6w0u,conservative
"I agree. I personally am not of the crowd that believes Acosta ""pushed"" the intern and think it was stupid of the WH to focus accusations on that rather than what he *did* do. Athough, that doesn't change what Acosta did, in fact, do.",PHNX_xRapTor,e9lo9zs,conservative
That's pretty insane.,PHNX_xRapTor,e9lkq24,conservative
"I edited the comment to expand on my thoughts.

Now, tell me where I'm wrong, because I'm not.",Argonut32,e9k7wub,conservative
"Edited the post for the minor spelling mistake. 

Where am I wrong about the original poster being completely incorrect about what Shapiro said?",Argonut32,e9k80ba,conservative
Thank you for those options!  I'll check out Mark Levin's show tomorrow.  ,jedichric,e9k9dgz,conservative
"I mean, you still assumed anti-Semitism with absolutely no basis in the original comment.  
  
I don't see that as any different than a leftist getting triggered and screeching racism whenever Obama is criticized.",diehardgiraffe,e9k9i4u,conservative
You are 100% correct on what the guy said related to Shapiro's comment.  You are 100% incorrect when you assumed the guys motivations.  Didn't Shapiro address this very topic in the last couple weeks where people are assuming others peoples motives. ,_glenn_,e9kd6bb,conservative
"Right, which is why I amended my original post and explained the thought process. 

I'm not apologizing for the assumption given some of the nonsense I've seen from bad actors coming into the sub. 

Again, where am I wrong?",Argonut32,e9kjf1i,conservative
"I don't think I'm out of line by assuming that someone with that criticism would follow up with some crack about Shapiro's religion given the same statement he made often is followed in that way.

I think I'm being downvoted for stupid reasons.",Argonut32,e9kr8qr,conservative
"I'm classifying you immediately jumping to anti-Semitism as the reason for dissent to be the part where you are wrong. Sure, you clarified. Doesn't change that you jumped straight to screeching about a perceived injustice rather than addressing the points made.  
  
That's a leftist strategy. I'm still not a fan even when employed by a conservative.",diehardgiraffe,e9klwfu,conservative
You are applying a precieved generality  to a specific person.  That is unfair to that person to be criticized for something he didn't do.,_glenn_,e9ldc1e,conservative
What point did he make? He was completely wrong.,Argonut32,e9kqwt7,conservative
"I never said Shapiro didn't have a valid point to his statement about an anti-media sentiment existing before Trump. My point was that any time Shapiro talks about Trump, his tone is negative. ",triggernaut,e9krgvf,conservative
You must have missed the post Gorsuch episode.,Argonut32,e9kysld,conservative
She's worried.,ReaganTroll,e9mpfd4,conservative
Well she doesn't want to be ousted. She doesn't care about other women. ,cargopantspirate,e9msgbj,conservative
Who else is going to throw their budenovka into the ring?,SickofInternetProgs,e9mxnyv,conservative
"You have to vote for it to find out whats inside.

I have to give it to her, she did beat the gaming industry with loot boxes. ",ozric101,e9ms7qp,conservative
"Did Rosenstein have to consult with ethics officials over possible recusal considering he recommended Comey’s firing, which was the impetus for the special counsel in the first place and considering that he will be a *primary witness* in any obstruction case against Trump? Did the Democrats request to have that ethics recommendation in writing? No? What a shock.",hello_japan,e9mvx9s,conservative
He better not recuse himself,iwasthebeaver,e9m5vkl,conservative
Recuses himself over what? At least with Sessions the argument made was he talked to some Russians on the campaign trail. What’s the basis for him needing to recuse? The fact he thinks it’s a farce?,Enzo_SAWFT,e9mayga,conservative
Hell no!,cantcforest,e9m9gmm,conservative
"Belief in the fake charges is not required for the job.  If Rosenstein didn’t have to recuse, this’s is a nothing burger ",BeachCruisin22,e9mes7y,conservative
"Did Rosenstein have to consult with ethics officials over possible recusal considering he recommended Comey’s firing, which was the impetus for the special counsel in the first place and considering that he will be a *fucking primary witness in any obstruction case against Trump*? This is a joke, a usual.",hello_japan,e9mj50f,conservative
I have no faith left in the system and have resigned myself to the fact that he will probably recuse himself. ,iwasthebeaver,e9m9wty,conservative
Trumo needs EXTREMELY biased people who would never recuse themselves,ExpensiveMention,e9mac4h,conservative
like how the democrats operate?,iwasthebeaver,e9mawyl,conservative
Is “fash” slang for fascist or fashion show? You really can’t tell. ,CASunDevil24,e9lmaaa,conservative
"Straight up, one girl level punch to the nose and that dude would go down crying.",BaronFalcon,e9m9ji9,conservative
Its just proof they are doing it to be cool. They dont care about the politics just the likes and shares they get.,probablybiased,e9m0ozk,conservative
Yeah they can't spell so they made up a word they could.,ngoni,e9lr9g7,conservative
"Well, if you ever want to know the secret sauce to winning office in Arizona, just say your state is a meth lab and praise the Taliban. ",YankeeBlues21,e9kdknf,conservative
[deleted],,e9ktymd,conservative
"It's looking more and more like we got nothing out of the midterms. Lost the House, and only held onto our 51 Senate seats.

Is this a bad sign? ",uniquecannon,e9khtpa,conservative
We’re supposed to believe that she got more votes than either Obama or Trump. ,_Hospitaller_,e9kd3td,conservative
FUCK,Jizzlobber42,e9kdb2t,conservative
"It shouldn't have even been close. Words cannot express how profoundly disappointed I am in the people of the State of Arizona, and the general cultural decay our nation is experiencing.",Tu-ne-cede,e9kujo1,conservative
So this “news article” is going to make a rather huge claim of fraud in the title and that’s it? No documentation of it? No sources? Just make a claim and that’s that? ,sde1500,e9l9750,conservative
"Arizona getting worse and worse. First they impose John McCain on the country for about 30 years, then they give us Jeff Flake, and now they send a far-left pinko Senator to make laws that affect our lives. Insanity. 

&#x200B;

The thing that makes me mad is that these same people voted to have a conservative governor lead their own state and yet they elect a Senator who gets to destroy the whole country.  ",Sola__Fide,e9kfkcc,conservative
"Once they see it is possible to steal elections expect this to become commonplace.

>Where-ever law ends, tyranny begins.

The Democrats are playing with fire. Once they've stolen the House and the Senate and begin passing gun bans, hate speech laws, and start hiking taxes what recourse do they leave us? I have no intention of living as a subject with the heel of government on my neck. The Senate is close to becoming an illegitimate body.",rjohnson99,e9kvlpd,conservative
"Funny. Conservatives are calling her far left, liberals are calling her a Blue Dog(conservative Democrat).",AnnualThrowaway,e9lb11d,conservative
"I haven't heard anything about this being fraudulent, just taking time to count the votes. Arizona isn't Florida, where it does look very suspicious. ",Falkamper,e9l3wo3,conservative
"Dear Senate,

This is obviously fraud. Refuse to seat her until a full investigation can be held. If counties can't prove that they only counted legal votes, then refuse to seat her at all.

The governor can appoint a replacement.",jgardner,e9ko1u1,conservative
Very disappointed. As much as I'm not a Flake fan he did vote conservative despite him not kissing the foot of Trump. ,ConservativeChicano,e9l8wul,conservative
Wait. What?,Snake_in_my_boots,e9kyiwu,conservative
"It’s a disaster. The senate map was great for us this year. Either Trump will have amazing coattails in 2020 to win re-election, retake the House, & give us GOP Senators in blue states, or we’re getting destroyed across the board ",YankeeBlues21,e9ki6yx,conservative
"...what? We already have 52 because Scott is going to hold on, and we will win Mississippi. That’s 53. Not to mention we knocked Donnelly, Heitkamp, and McCaskill out",1wjl1,e9kwkb6,conservative
Where are you getting 51? It's still 53 last I checked.,alivmo,e9klnx8,conservative
"it is absolutely a bad sign. dems had a lot of seats to defend; gop didn't. not a blue wave exactly but if we didn't know we were in a culture war -- well, we do now.",SKWM3000,e9lnt5a,conservative
Didn't the Republicans flip a few seats?,mkgandkembafan,e9klldd,conservative
"We've entered into the mass voter fraud stage in the death of the republic.

""A Republic, if You Can Keep It"" - Benjamin Franklin
",StraightNewt,e9km0jt,conservative
That's what they want us to think .. and repubs are so spineless that we'll let them,ll_Atlanta_ll,e9kmhv5,conservative
The Gateway Pundit is sort of like a political National Inquirer. ,psstein,e9le5te,conservative
"There are perfectly legitimate reasons to be suspicious of fraud considering that Sinema got more votes than Obama or Trump, the fact that about 300k more people voted for the Republican governor than the Democratic senator and the disproportionate way the late ballots broke for Sinema. There is more than enough to warrant an investigation, given the Russia investigation that we have been subjected to with zero solid evidence and only suspicions. I don’t know where people expect hard evidence to come from in a situation like this without someone coming forward.

But yeah, the gateway pundit is a click bait site. Doesn’t mean that this should not be thoroughly investigated.",hello_japan,e9lgny4,conservative
"They didnt elect her, it was stolen thats final. No way she got more votes than trump or obama
",notviolence,e9kgmqg,conservative
"In reality Sinema is pretty moderate. McSally will end up taking the incumbent seat as well most likely.

Arizona is quite a curious state. We elect a Republican governor, random dems into other positions, and a lot of the measures that were voted on went a bunch of different ways.

Signs of a blue takeover? Not likely. People here just didn’t take well to McSally’s brand of trump. Granted I am not happy about Sinema but if she gets something done and keeps out of the headlines, good on her. 

",Icedtarmac,e9kgmqz,conservative
War. The last recourse is war. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9lb739,conservative
Yep. She did both.,Corbanis_Maximus,e9legap,conservative
"Welp, I'm going to start panic buying now. Just to be on the safe side, also to stay ahead of the inevitable price gouging. ",uniquecannon,e9kj7wj,conservative
It's going to be 50 once you subtract the 3 GOP libs.,StraightNewt,e9kmays,conservative
"Most election trackers are saying 51, with 3 races still not decided (Florida, Arizona, Mississippi Special). It's looking like we won't gain the first 2, and Miss is headed for a runoff. ",uniquecannon,e9knf9q,conservative
"I'm just glad we've packed the courts. Might be our last line of defense if 2020 doesn't shape up very well for us. I'm seeing a best case scenario that we maintain the presidency, but end up losing the senate (we're defending 22 seats vs the Dems 12 seats).",uniquecannon,e9lob06,conservative
"They flipped 3 (Indiana, Missouri, ND). Dems flipped 2 (Nevada, Arizona), and they will likely get Florida when all's said and done. ",uniquecannon,e9kn5wc,conservative
"> We've entered into the mass voter fraud stage in the death of the republic.

At least the part where it gets fixed is coming up soon, I guess.

Hope the ol' Tree of Liberty is thirsty.",soylent_absinthe,e9kn3ml,conservative
And there’s also no way 10% of Ducey voters chose Sinema,1wjl1,e9kwhh5,conservative
"> In reality Sinema is pretty moderate

She a leader of the netroots organization.  From what I have seen of that organization, she is a radical leftist.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9kkrct,conservative
She’s a Democrat (leaving aside bizarre stuff like praising the Taliban). Moderate Democrats are Republicans today. They’ve long abandoned being the party of Truman and JFK. ,YankeeBlues21,e9kic77,conservative
Better stock up on your guns and water.,PurpleAngel23,e9kmhgp,conservative
"Well, McCain and Flake are gone.  That leave's Lisa Murkowski.  Susan Collins is a wild card but usually sides with the GOP, and if the GOP takes Florida, which I think is likely, then that's a 52 seat Majority (with Murkowski making 53).  They'll most likely take the senate again in 2020 due to the way the map is shaping up again.

EDIT: clarifications",jedichric,e9knt57,conservative
"Miss is guaranteed R, why do you think F is not going R?",alivmo,e9ku2m1,conservative
"Doubt they'll get Florida. Even with all the bitching, it's going to go for Scott at this point. ",Chapped_Assets,e9kw9v4,conservative
"Unfortunately I really think we're heading there. Between the lefty Brownshirts getting progressively worse, and now hidden ballots flipping elections nearly week after?

I don't see this deescalating anytime soon. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9l46nv,conservative
"In Congress she's voted as a moderate.   She's a smart politician.    She figured out that her political career in Arizona would be limited if she stayed on the far left so she moved herself more to the center.   On major issues she'll vote with Democrats, on a lot of minor stuff she'll jump in with Republicans so she appears to be very balanced and independent.   



It didn't help that McSally has a voice that sounds like nails on chalkboard and ran a pretty flawed, weak campaign that relied far too much on negative ads.  
",JessumB,e9l8xka,conservative
"Murkowski, Collins, and Romney.",StraightNewt,e9kvlbf,conservative
"Because they haven't *found* enough votes yet, at least until Nelson wins. ",uniquecannon,e9kv0as,conservative
Depends how many more Dem votes they *find*,uniquecannon,e9kwfjc,conservative
"Gillibrand played a moderate until she went into the Senate, too. 

",psstein,e9le4sn,conservative
"I don't really think Romney will stifle the most important thing Trump will do next year when he replaces Ginsburg.  A Conservative Supreme Court for the next 40 years is what Romney wants also. As for Trump's administration legislation, the Democrats in the House will derail that. 

Edit: Grammar ",jedichric,e9ky6kd,conservative
"They won't be finding any more now, too much attention.  The recounts will at most change votes by a few hundred.",alivmo,e9kxzu6,conservative
Been boycotting Vice Media ever since they published that piece written by a convicted pedophile. Feels good. ,mattr50,e9kpysf,conservative
The greatest outrage of all was their hit piece on Waluigi,soxfan90,e9kn3ur,conservative
anything short of 100% is not enough.,superdude411,e9m2eyj,conservative
Posted in the hit piece journal. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9kma6c,conservative
This didn't come from the Jeff Bezos blogpost.,SuperCharged2000,e9kmw66,conservative
Looks the part exactly. It's amazing how stereotypes work so well,slotrot,e9l3gf7,conservative
What a lovely human being. Mom and dad must be so proud. Wow. ,BeardsArePeopleToo,e9kfpxr,conservative
"Here we go with ""It was Trump's fault.""",mlmack,e9kkbbv,conservative
"That guy openly denied the Holocaust in public, on camera, and will (most likely) not be punished. A white guy who had his dog sieg heil was fined and charged with a hate crime. ",lazerpantherr,e9l4ict,conservative
This is where someone needs to get stabbed from the invading side.,coolgenner,e9l1n3h,conservative
[removed],,e9m6kvy,conservative
Your name is highly appropriate.,hello_japan,e9m71sl,conservative
[removed],,e9m748y,conservative
"Yeah, it’s so dysfunctional to replace people who are not performing up to your standards. Oh, the horror!",hello_japan,e9m7mpg,conservative
If they are all such losers why he nominate them all?,hipsterdufus84,e9m7nnf,conservative
"Who said they were “such losers”? If you have to resort to straw man arguments to defend your stupid opinions, that should tell you something. Now try it again with “people who were not performing up to your standards” and see if that helps you work through this.",hello_japan,e9m82va,conservative
"I manage people at work. I also hire them. If everyone I hire doesnt work out, maybe the problem is with me.  ",hipsterdufus84,e9m84wa,conservative
"Great, you sound terrible at your job. Maybe try firing underperforming employees and see how that works out for you, Mr. Dufus. And what a shock that you have already advanced another straw man that “everyone” he hired doesn’t work out. The team he has in place now is far superior to the team he had when he assumed office... gee, I wonder how that happened?",hello_japan,e9m8i2a,conservative
You are drinking the koolaide.  Done talking to you. ,hipsterdufus84,e9m8kqu,conservative
"Yeah, I’m drinking the Kool-Aid! When I criticize Trump’s protectionist trade policies, it’s totally because I think he should never be criticized! It’s not at all that your criticism is so weak and pathetic that you have to resort to straw man arguments in half of your posts in this thread, it’s totally because I looooove that Kool-Aid. Have a nice day, dufus.",hello_japan,e9m8sos,conservative
"... any more than ""Zionist"" means ""Jew"".",MisterMouser,e9louwb,conservative
"To be fair, Hitler was originally a Zionist. He proposed a mass exodus of Jews to Madagascar to all places, but Hitler realised that the Nazi occupation and invasion of Madagascar was unfeasible. A shame, if it worked we could have seen millions of lives spared. ",McBeanyBaby,e9n1cl2,conservative
"My point is that a lot of people use ""Zionist"" as a dogwhistle term to complain about Jews in general. Not everyone, though, just like not everyone who uses the term ""globalist"" means it as a dogwhistle for ""Jews"".  ",MisterMouser,e9n2qae,conservative
"You lost, get over it.",ozric101,e9ln0sx,conservative
"It doesn't even make sense.  They say that there are as many as 27,000 provisional ballots.  Let's do the math:

Here are the current vote totals:
Kemp 1,976,214	

Abrams: 1,918,064

Total (adding 37,165 from Metz): 3,931,443 
 
If we take the maximum of 27,000 provisional vote and decide they are all valid, we have a total of 3,958,443 votes.  Next let's add 3008 votes to Kemp.  That gives Kemp 1,979,222 votes.  1,979,222/3,958,443 is above 50%.  So therefore, Abrams can push Kemp below 50% if she gets 88.86%, or 23,992 out of the 27,000 provisional votes.  I've got news for her: that isn't happening.  It gets worse for her when the number of provisional ballots goes down, or Metz gains some of those votes.",r777m,e9lpqsk,conservative
"She's pretty sure all those votes are for her, though. Wish I had that self confidence and preternatural foresight.",Upnsmoque,e9muo5u,conservative
"Controlled burns are racist and release massive amounts of evil carbon.  It's much better to wait until Gaia decides that the forests need to be renewed, because the uncontrollable mega-inferno that results is natural and not the work of evil humans. /s",Colonize_The_Moon,e9l8dcd,conservative
"I wish this article had statistics and data for an in depth reason of why. 

California definitely needs to something about this destruction. But they’re too worried about straws and helping illegals ",Chapka69,e9l96rc,conservative
">California definitely needs to something about this destruction. But they’re too worried about straws and helping illegals 

Except most of California forests are federal land so that's their responsibility. Paradise itself is right next to a national forest. ",yngwiej,e9le8ru,conservative
">Except most of California forests are federal land so that's their responsibility. 

Lies.  CA is in charge of managing federal forests.  It's part of an agreement with the feds.  The feds fund CA and they manage the forests.  Trump's tweets on the subject are about removing CA's management of federal lands because they've been screwing it up.",StraightNewt,e9lx8eg,conservative
I like her. I’m glad Trump picked her.,PurpleAngel23,e9mx14m,conservative
"the Administration can ban people from the White House... 

Lil jimmy can go pound sand...   ",ozric101,e9mkd7f,conservative
"They have no case. None, zero, nada. The white house can ban anyone they want. For no reason at all",MaddSim,e9mmkdy,conservative
The lawyer who filed this joke should be disbarred.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9mjpw5,conservative
Use the Patriot Act. Hell you don’t have to give a reason then ,Intimidator94,e9mrhe3,conservative
"He cannot win this. Even if he “wins” the suit, Huckabee-Sanders can just not call on him to ask questions for the remainder of Trump’s term. ",mikeygio,e9mk3p4,conservative
Probably Avenatti,HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mm99o,conservative
"I disagree.  If CNN wins this, than Acosta could do whatever he wants.  Yell during other peoples questions; interrupt the president whenever he wants.  Maybe, he wouldn't be called on but Jim could do whatever and he couldn't have his credentials revoked.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9mkaqw,conservative
"If he acted like more of an ass than he already is, the press corps would cease to support him as they are somewhat supporting him to a certain extent now. That would end. Nobody wants to be constantly interrupted by a person who makes it obvious that the story is more about himself than it is about the questions being asked. 

Trump and Sanders will use peer pressure to squash him if they lose the lawsuit. There’s also no rule that says they have to have daily pressers. They can scrap that and put the blame on Acosta. There’s a lot of things they can do and place the blame squarely on Acosta. ",mikeygio,e9mmgwo,conservative
If Acosta wins this then I think Trump should cancel all media events for the foreseeable future. Let them sit and speculate. Control the narrative from the White House and speak directly to the people.,HolsterOfNuts,e9mmoxg,conservative
"Worse comes to worst, it goes to the Supreme Court...and well...",HippyDippyCommieGuy,e9mmapi,conservative
This poor woman should get at least a few weeks off to recover with family and friends. While I admire her dedication it truly makes my heart ache that she can't spare some time for her own wellbeing in her twilight years.,Mewster1818,e9mq2i1,conservative
"The only thing #Metoo has taught men is that sexual assault can literally mean anything and everything.  Any physical contact especially with a stranger is putting yourself in a risky situation.  
",NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9kr52t,conservative
"I had to do CPR on an older lady in Macy's including the use of an AED so her chest was exposed. People stopped and gawked at the situation before them. One *brave* woman litterally placed a sheet over me and the patient's chest while doing compressions. My partner yanked the sheet away before I could even react and chewed her out for her 'concerned help"". 
",BroseidonZ,e9l0sq4,conservative
Duh... #MeToo,CalvinCoolest,e9ko8ao,conservative
"There was an incident in Japan where a man needed to remove a woman's bra for the use of a defibrillator to restart her heart and save her life. [He was later socially branded as a pervert for removing her clothes](https://japantoday.com/category/national/man-revives-woman-with-aed-but-branded-pervert-for-removing-her-clothes-to-apply-electrode-pads). For those who might not know, most bras have metal wiring in them. If you were to use an AED on someone wearing a bra like that, they would received severe burns, possibly even setting their clothes on fire.",BruceCampbell123,e9kv4x6,conservative
"IOW, the rules are whatever womyn want them to be.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9kxfiw,conservative
"The hysterical leadership and press coverage of the #MeToo movement, to be exact.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9kopzk,conservative
I like the gesture but why change the flag?  I dunno call me old fashioned. ,steelallz,e9jr754,conservative
r/trashy,SaveShannara,e9jxo46,conservative
"Gorgeous. Love it. Thank you, veterans.",Terra_green2,e9jfm6j,conservative
Freedom isn't free. Thank you all. ,f0ru0l0rd,e9jpfbi,conservative
"That's what I was saying. Its not a flag. Our Veterans deserve our absolute respect.  Flying an authentic flag in the best shape available is the only way to show it.  
That might as well have been a video of a beach towel. 
Thank you to your family's service.  
And mine.",allarene,e9luxot,conservative
Beautiful!! Thank you to our heroes!! ,southasiangirl,e9ji8d8,conservative
"The thing is, That is not a video of an American Flag. 
That is a video of a banner with alternating camouflage and red stripes, with a blue patch that contains stars. It is not an American Flag. 
I don’t see what the deal is. 
Any way. Thank you Veterans. ",allarene,e9lirfh,conservative
God bless our great nation!,C2thehris,e9jjs12,conservative
This would make a great live wallpaper,Vega0820,e9jqg8k,conservative
Pretty damn cool. ,BuckeyeDood,e9jawwa,conservative
Beautiful,linklitter,e9jqgxt,conservative
Doesnt get anymore 'murica than that. Epic video man. ,mikelarue1,e9ju590,conservative
"I agree. I really wish people would stop dicking with our colors. The flag says all it needs to say as it is. No need to add your stupid little blue line, change it black, add camo, change the stars to skulls or any of that stupid bullshit. ",MrFizzardsWizard,e9jw7me,conservative
Yeah seriously the camo American flag is pretty whack. ,SpineEater,e9jvl4l,conservative
"If it’s for a cause we agree, we let it slide. Simple as that. ",MrPrestonRX,e9jvcck,conservative
"Eh, it's kind of cool we have a flag so recognizable that you can change it a thousand different ways and the rest of the world still knows exactly what flag it is.

Change any of the colors or designs on those 'three color stripe' flags like France, Russia, Germany, etc. and no one's gonna know whose it is.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9l5u66,conservative
Wtf He just says he just doesn't like the fact that its camo,The_Fyrd,e9ktu77,conservative
"This was being flown and posted on veterans day.... What else could this be other than a defaced American flag? My grandfather was buried 3 days ago, he was a Chief Master Sargent and served for 63 years. I'm pretty sure the flag they gave my grandmother looked something like this, but it was red, white, and blue. Honoring our veterans with this fake flag is a disgrace. ",SaveShannara,e9lufw5,conservative
Yep even the police flag is stupid.  They should make their own flag and leave off the elements from the iconic US flag.,insomagent,e9k67n5,conservative
We don't all agree....,SaveShannara,e9lbdlo,conservative
 Sorry I'm not fan of defacing the American flag,SaveShannara,e9kugzl,conservative
"Technically I believe they had made their own (I could be wrong).

Last second edit: [Here's one!](https://www.thinbluelineusa.com/collections/flags/products/thin-blue-line-garden-flag-12-5-x-18-inches)

I'll say I disagree that the thin blue and thin red lined flags are stupid as they have meaning to them same as the U.S. flag.

According to [Wikipedia](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thin_blue_line), the thin blue line originated in reference to the U.S. army but adopted it's own meaning being an honor to fallen law enforcement officers (flags also fly around the world with the same concept in mind).

The thin red line represents fallen firefighters, of course, but the idea came from a concept by the British military.

I'll definitely say it's really only an opinion whether U.S. law enforcement and firefighters should fly flags like that and I'm not picky about it myself considering I'm interested being in one of the two lines of work.",PHNX_xRapTor,e9l651z,conservative
We don’t all support Veterans Day?,MrPrestonRX,e9leg0u,conservative
I am also not a fan of it but I care more about people burning then people changing it in their own ways.,The_Fyrd,e9kukdc,conservative
This isn't an American flag.... ,SaveShannara,e9livir,conservative
What does burning the flag have to do with anything? You should neither burn or deface the flag... People burning the flag doesn't give you a pass to do this,SaveShannara,e9kz1mr,conservative
 I agree it isn't right to alter the flag but it isn't scummy to a certain extent; what we should be doing is trying to stop worse forms of disrespect for the flag like burning ,The_Fyrd,e9la4a7,conservative
This is scummy.... It's defacing the flag. Once again bringing flag burning into this doesn't make this okay. ,SaveShannara,e9lb8ej,conservative
Let's agree to disagree.,The_Fyrd,e9ldh5f,conservative
"Well duh,how will they win then ?",magadoodle,e9kmcmg,conservative
Count them. And them charge the officials that oversaw the elections with that many counts of voter fraud.,Cr8er,e9kv762,conservative
"I'm glad that she's doing well and hope that she's not uncomfortable, although broken ribs tend to be quite painful.  I don't agree with this woman, but I have great respect for her and wish her well.",Charlie8005,e9nb67d,conservative
if i broke my ribs i'd take my sweet fucking time going back to work,SKWM3000,e9o0pka,conservative
"WE need Physicals for any Public Office with lifetime appointments...

She should be retired....     ",ozric101,e9mkihn,conservative
"Godspeed, RBG.",jina100,e9mjs1l,conservative
hell no. The physicals would become politicized and the GOP and conservatives always lose when bureaucrats make decisions.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9nccw1,conservative
So you have no problem when people are no longer able to do the jobs for health reasons just taking up space at the taxpayer expense? ,ozric101,e9necjn,conservative
If they're a Supreme Court Justice then we should just wait for them to step down. ,Crusader_1096_2,e9nua7e,conservative
Many people do not recognize when it is time to go out to pasture. ,ozric101,e9nx24w,conservative
This is a good one,McKnight36,e9l0m0f,conservative
r/madlads,fletch39a,e9l1n9t,conservative
"Whoops I r/atetheonion

I came here with outrage before seeing the sub. I just assumed this was your typical r/news and r/politics bullshit",yaddibo,e9l1fc9,conservative
I will make wars great again!,RKfan,e9lenuf,conservative
">Election security and hacking attempts

You uh, really want to open that can?",Enzo_SAWFT,e9lm3z5,conservative
"It reads like rocky and bullwinkle... 

Get Moose an Squirrel (Trump and Kushner)  /s     
    
I really hope they push this kind of crap from day one.    
",ozric101,e9lq42n,conservative
"Too bad you can't say anything about it because saying anything about crimes non-white people commit is racist.  Regardless of whether they were allowed in the country or not and a local jurisdiction allowed let him go instead of forwarding him to ICE.

I don't give a shit if these people are Polish or Honduran.  They ALL need to respect our laws, including how to come here.

I am not allowed to go to Canada, the UK, or Australia.  It doesn't matter how long I wait, or what paperwork I file, or how much I pay.  I am not allowed.  I am not going to throw a fucking tantrum over it.  ",nonamenoslogans2,e9lbfi1,conservative
But will get re-elected because of the D after the name.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9lbv06,conservative
"Jim Kennedy is a total bum. And part of liberal cesspool that brews in these cities.   

It’s a damn shame this is allowed to happen. That poor child. 

I hope Jim Kennedy is satisfied ",Chapka69,e9la0ql,conservative
">""Governor Scott won the election by a margin that is mathematically impossible to close without fraud, and Bill Nelson can decline a recount at any time,"" he said. ""Bill Nelson's legacy is on the line, but legacies don't pay Marc Elias's bills. Lawsuits do.""
      
Now that is how, you do it people....    Bravo....      ",ozric101,e9km2yi,conservative
Soo that's it? Is it called for Scott and desantis?!? Can I fucking breathe now and that cunt snipes at least be fined?,abuigues,e9lisiu,conservative
ELI5? ,molon-labe7,e9kmpcw,conservative
"If there’s 100,000 people registered to vote, they’ve already got 98,000 votes tallied and the divide between them is 5,000 votes.  Even if they get the rest counted and don’t throw out any votes, he’s still winning by 3,000.  The only way to lose is to have fraudulent ballots appear out of nowhere that could not have existed before the election because there’s simply not enough registered votes to make up the difference.",Jackoffalltrades89,e9kpo0e,conservative
"That was a great exploration, thank you! ",molon-labe7,e9ksmdh,conservative
I wouldn't be so sure. Georgia came within inches of electing a Democrat governor who openly supported door to door gun confiscations.,nmj95123,e9ke45j,conservative
"Will it though? We just saw a bunch of districts in red states disregard Republican policy achievements in favor of “Trump is mean”. Seems they’d rather Democrats who fundamentally change America, but are polite while they do it, than abrasive Republicans who are pissed off about having to defend American ideals on every front. ",YankeeBlues21,e9k8gvq,conservative
"Repubs need to focus on healthcare, an actual repeal.  Run on infrastructure, and continue with hard lined immigration policy.  I think the best hope is Pelosi actually being speaker, and moderate dems and independents who voted blue will see that they don't care about fixing these problems they only care about muh inpeachmints.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9kcdav,conservative
"The issues I have with this way of thinking is that it assumes that a majority of people consider these plans crazy.  It's all relative, conservatives struck out on selling themselves as fiscally responsible these past two years in a big way, rural populations are in decline, there are no conservative voices in academia, this seems like pure wishful thinking to me without any conservative counter plan the Democrats still win by default because they'll blame Senate Republicans and Trump, who have lost the media war and need to figure out a way back to the middle.",Falkamper,e9l3agn,conservative
"With Republicans controlling the Senate and the White House, all they can really do is endless investigations.  That might play well to their base, but I don't think it plays well to the majority of Americans.  
  
The author suggests an infrastructure bill, but working with Trump in any way, shape or form is going to get Dems primaried. ",FelixFuckfurter,e9k42r9,conservative
2 years of gun control screeching. Gonna be hell.,M6D_Magnum,e9k70zr,conservative
Great policy plans to move the nation forward?,lax714,e9k5vb8,conservative
">...who openly supported door to door gun confiscations.

That’s terrifying.",PurpleAngel23,e9kkz02,conservative
"Yes, voting has become too much of a popularity contest.  As long as the media portrays the left as being objectively good anything is possible.

An ad about an illegal immigrant murdering Americans was deemed as racist soley becuase the illegal immigrant was latino.  It was compared to the ""racist"" Willie Horton ad that was racist solely because Horton was black.  Evidently it would have been completely ok if either of these guys raped and murdered people because they were white.",nonamenoslogans2,e9l08k9,conservative
"And still may since they are ""finding"" votes still.",Havebaconwilltravel,e9kg67b,conservative
Source?,everburningblue,e9kqjek,conservative
I think Republicans need to focus the next two years on winning back college educated women for precisely this reason,irishchris1,e9k9wok,conservative
Well said.,hello_japan,e9k964g,conservative
I mean it worked for Benghazi,ISwallowedALego,e9k7nhq,conservative
"They can also shutdown the goverment, defund ICE, etc.  The house is a very valuable thing to have.

",StraightNewt,e9kailn,conservative
"It'll be action.They'll pass all sorts of crap guaranteed.

It'll be up to the Senate to stop it. Hopefully Mitch won't allow them to even see the floor.",workaccount35,e9krc1n,conservative
"And, hopefully, they'll then be voted out to stop the noise.",guanaco55,e9kank3,conservative
"Yes, yes it is. But remember, it's the Republicans that are the authoritarians.",nmj95123,e9kqln1,conservative
"At best, she'll trigger a runoff, which she'll lose since the Dems' biggest problem is getting their supporters to actually get off their asses and vote.",nmj95123,e9kgpqq,conservative
https://www.georgiagunowners.org/2018/06/08/stacey-abrams-send-gbi-to-seize-and-destroy-weapons-magazines-bullets/,nmj95123,e9kr3o3,conservative
"The issue is that they seem to be such a fickle voting block that I struggle to see the message that holds true to our values and brings them over to us again. They want a good economy, but as soon as that happens, they vote their gender and “Orange man bad” stuff instead of against the left’s social divisiveness and have little to no issue with big government (obviously, as a group, not every individual).  

What would be your marketing angle to them, without fundamentally changing anything about the current GOP?",YankeeBlues21,e9kbjvq,conservative
"Oh no, a government shutdown, how will I live????",gt4674b,e9kb9k4,conservative
"Right.

🙄",PurpleAngel23,e9l3mt7,conservative
"You are probably right, but enough of the Dems got off their asses this midterm. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9kh0x2,conservative
Who needs voters when you have control of the ballots. Boxes and boxes of ballots.,cchris_39,e9l9qf6,conservative
"I think there needs to be a repositioning as the ‘party of strong women’. My angle would be to get Nikki Haley in as SoS. With hindsight losing her from the administration so far out from the election was a mistake. 

I think to blame women for not voting Rep is to not learn a lesson. Insanity if nothing changes before 2020.",irishchris1,e9kq4jc,conservative
"> They want a good economy, but as soon as that happens, they vote their gender and “Orange man bad” stuff instead of against the left’s social divisiveness and have little to no issue with big government (obviously, as a group, not every individual).

This is the most truest saying I've seen explaining current voter sentiment.  ",jedichric,e9kcpct,conservative
"I’m a college educated, multiracial woman. I happily voted Trump, and will be voting for him again. He’s one of the best presidents I have ever seen. I’m hard-core Conservative. I can’t stand what the Left stands for.

As for why I vote the way I do, maybe it’s because I was raised in a Conservative Christian home. By white parents. Sort of. My mom is Native American and Irish, but she looks white. My adopted dad is a red headed German. My biological dad is a black man who can’t keep promises. Sounds like someone else I know...

Anyway, that’s my two cents.",PurpleAngel23,e9klmyq,conservative
"One of my best friends told me that it doesn't matter how well the economy does or how well the country is doing overall, she would never support Trump because she ""know and I've met men like him and supporting someone like that goes against every fiber of my being"".

And I have to admit maybe I'm just too pragmatic to understand it, I don't vote for elected officials based on feeling like they're a good person(if they're in politics, I guarantee they aren't). All that matters to me is how much I can trust and depend on them to implement the legislation I want. 

Example: Would I want to go to a football game with someone like Trump? No, not really. But can I look at his track record and say overall I can depend on him to make good decisions more often than not? At this point in time I believe the answer to be yes and I would currently vote for him.

But then again I'm one of those ""ignorant, internalized misogyny, gender traitors"" since I think with my brain not my heart or ovaries... ",Mewster1818,e9kjxwy,conservative
You might not enjoy one that involves the entire border patrol and military being laid off.  If the Dems get away with the very obvious voter fraud they're engaged in and the almost total control the media covering it then voting in 2020 won't mater.   With no fear about 2020 they can do just about anything they want with the purse strings.,StraightNewt,e9kbk9p,conservative
Will they remember to do it when literally every website on the internet isn't reminding them to vote?,GameShowWerewolf,e9kydsk,conservative
Or when you're in charge of your own election. ,xonthemark,e9lco4i,conservative
"> I think to blame women for not voting Rep is to not learn a lesson. 

Agreed, it's just as stupid as the ""voters didn't vote Democratic, therefore they're racist!"" idiocy.",psstein,e9kz6tk,conservative
"I appreciate your POV, and we’ll need more of it to gain ground on these voting demographics, but I’m not sure how to package that to voters. Seems to cut a little too close to demographics-as-destiny to make a coercive argument. It seems that you’re saying that you’re a conservative because of your environment rather than the superiority of our ideals winning you over. ",YankeeBlues21,e9kqvwf,conservative
"
>As for why I vote the way I do, maybe it’s because I was raised in a Conservative Christian home. By white parents. Sort of. My mom is Native American and Irish, but she looks white. My adopted dad is a red headed German. My biological dad is a black man who can’t keep promises. Sounds like someone else I know...

Be honest.  Is there a chance that Al Sharpton is your father?",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9ljo0e,conservative
"
>One of my best friends told me that it doesn't matter how well the economy does or how well the country is doing overall, she would never support Trump because she ""know and I've met men like him and supporting someone like that goes against every fiber of my being"".

>And I have to admit maybe I'm just too pragmatic to understand it

Here’s pragmatic for you.  This woman who told you this view is your friend, right?  Even if you see things somewhat differently you probably view her as a reasonable, rational person.  So now you personally know someone who is a reasonable person and has personal dislike for Trump.  She might even have female friends who feel the same way.

So if, *IF* the Republican Party wants to appeal to women like this, find a presidential candidate that has mostly the same political positions minus the grab them by the pussy stuff.  There were like 19 others to choose from last time, I’m sure one of them could have checked the right boxes.  Pragmatic is finding the right mix of personal traits and policy positions in a candidate.  Are you pragmatic?

",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9lk6fe,conservative
"Ask her if she voted for Mitt Romney. Because that’s roughly the policy she’d apparently support without the personal flaws. If she still wouldn’t, then it’s just a cop out to talk about behavior. 

I’m with you, I don’t understand when people say things like “the midterms were votes for candidates in individual races”. They’re not, they’re R vs D. That Nevada state race where Dennis Hof won was the perfect example of politics today. At least the dead pimp doesn’t hate America and won’t infringe people’s rights like the live D would. ",YankeeBlues21,e9kka71,conservative
"That’s not exactly where I was going. Yes, I was raised with those ideals at home. However, they are my own ideals as well. Hence why I don’t buy in to the Leftist agenda. 

I don’t consider being “won over” because I’ve pretty much believed that way my whole life. 

I just wanted to share some hope that not all was lost.

Maybe my scenario just isn’t applicable to what you are saying. My apologies.

Edit: my reference to being raised by White parents was meant as a jab at the Left, because I’m sure that’s what they would say to my views. “You only think that way because the WASPs told you to.”",PurpleAngel23,e9l4778,conservative
"Haha. Thankfully, no. If anything, he’s an ugly version of Samuel L. Jackson.",PurpleAngel23,e9lobb1,conservative
"I didn't support Trump in 2016(I didn't support Clinton either). I only support him currently based on his performance thus far exceeding my expectations.

He's still not my favorite politician by a long shot, I just don't care about his personal demeanor so long as he's doing his job well. If he wins the Republican nomination again chances are I will vote for him in 2020 at this rate, but it's not as if I alone have the power to decide who the Republican nominee is.",Mewster1818,e9m5wuq,conservative
"She wasn't a citizen when Romney was running so I don't know if she'dbe able to answer that. Overall she's lightly conservative, she is just now getting more interested in politics since becoming a citizen earlier this year. Since she's on her journey I have been trying my best to describe policy from both parties perspectives so she can make her own decisions, but she leans Republican after most of my explanations since she believes in personal responsibility and doing things by the book(like going through the proper channels and procedures to become an American.)",Mewster1818,e9klixp,conservative
"Don’t apologize, I’m glad to have the POV, I just meant that I’m not sure how to sell our message to people who didn’t have a positive home life. A healthy upbringing absolutely lends itself to conservatism, just as it does to good relationship decisions and behaviors like delayed gratification. But we need to crack the code to figure out what the right frame is to use on our ideals and values for people who weren’t as lucky in their early days, but think that their experience is the human condition rather than a flaw born of individual life choices. 

Just thinking out loud, not relying on us to reach an answer here",YankeeBlues21,e9l539k,conservative
"For what it’s worth, I think you need to stress what the Dems have become and *why* Trump and the base seem so angry. She’s coming into a story midway through. 

Put another way, Keanu Reeves looks like the villain of John Wick, or Liam Neeson of Taken, if you skip the first half hour and why theyre killing all those people. ",YankeeBlues21,e9km0hn,conservative
"Thank you for explaining that. 

I’ve always felt that some of my bad experiences have helped solidify my Conservative views. 

As an example (and not for profit), I was sexually assaulted/borderline raped between the ages of 6-8. I stand with Brett. A part of that is due to my treatment at the hands of Leftists and Feminists. Another part of that is the actual experience. I know what it’s like to be held down and have someone force his way on top of me. It’s not the mockery the Left has made it out to be. Not even close. 

Maybe we’re looking at this the wrong way. It could be that the people who get the easy life and free handouts are the ones who aren’t buying our message. If everything is easy and free, then discomfort is seen as pain. Hence why being “offended” conjures up the some kind of high. For those of us who have walked through the fire, we can handle the pressure, and even a little bit of pain.

But like you, I’m thinking out loud.

Edit: To better explain my point, those that I have met that have such an extreme-leftist approach to sexual assault have usually never experienced it (or their definition is very broad). Obviously, not everyone is like that. However, that has been my experience. 

Basically, what if the Left is made up of pansy/victim-wannabes who have never been through any real horrifying experiences?",PurpleAngel23,e9lczo6,conservative
">Corsi described his experience with the investigation as “a horror show” and “a nightmare,” telling ABC News the special counsel’s probe, “Is an inquisition worthy of the KGB or the Gestapo. I feel like I've been through an interrogation session in North Korea in the Korean war.”

That’s scary ",Enzo_SAWFT,e9lcxns,conservative
Imagine being lauded as one of the most prominent federal law enforcement officials in recent history and being reduced to laying perjury traps for Infowars conspiracy theorists lmfao.  What a fall from grace. ,tja_1478,e9legr1,conservative
"Mueller is about to slander and destroy the life of yet another innocent man with hyped up charges. I hope with Sessions gone, Mueller will finally get the boot.",NY_Driver,e9lbz2u,conservative
"You guys I've been saying this bullshit has been going on for years.  Democrats have outright weaponized investigations.  Tom Delay, Ted Stevens, Rick Perry, Scott Walker, this is absolute bullshit.

Even when Republicans are vindicated (everyone of my examples)  Democrats get what they want usually, Delay and Stevans were removed from office, Walker was labeled a crook in WI.",nonamenoslogans2,e9loz4g,conservative
They are authoritarian tyrants.,hello_japan,e9m73y9,conservative
Did Zuk lie to Congress? ,memberCP,e9n364z,conservative
"He absolutely did. I know for a fact that Mr. Zuckerberg lied to Congress. Whether or not it constitutes perjury, is another story altogether. 

This is a comment of mine from a Top Secret conversation that I had on the subject, when it happened earlier in the year: 

>You know what, I think Zuck's being clever here. He didn't fire Palmer because of a political *view*. Shithead. 

Go back and look at the words, carefully. Zuck's a dishonest piece of sh-t but he's not stupid. 
",BudrickBundy,e9n3l6s,conservative
Let’s be honest. The anti trump rhetoric group was determined to come out this election.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9ke2h0,conservative
Is there any hope of stopping this insane SJW/socialist movement? It seems unstoppable. Someone talk me off the metaphorical ledge please,bartoksic,e9kug17,conservative
"Midterms are about candidates mostly. Not demographics. Too many variables to make conclusions on a single election. Presidential race is more imformative, cause you have same choice everywhere.",ReaganTroll,e9kdxf7,conservative
"Run hard left, gain voters. Preside over a roaring economy, get the finger. 

What’s even the point? ",YankeeBlues21,e9kdzbx,conservative
"Takeaways from [this article](https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2018/11/07/us/elections/house-exit-polls-analysis.html), we did worse pretty much uniformly which means this was likely an issue with turnout. So let's work on fixing that. Gun ownership also massively correlates to voting Republican so it's a less contentious way to convert voters. Why argue about healthcare when *personal* gun ownership works?",___-III----III-___,e9khgfg,conservative
"Piece seems to be implying shifts within demographic groups when it doesn't actually show that - lots of people voted in 2018 who didn't in 2014 and to a lesser extent vice versa.                     

It doesn't even attempt to tease apart people changing their minds by demographic breakdown versus a base turnout race which historically should go badly for the GOP, with a mid first term GOP president.                  

It also doesn't frame the 2014->2018 differential versus 2006->2010 for example, which would be interesting.                

 ",tau_decay,e9khh3g,conservative
I mean kind of. This happens no matter who was president. Then again at this point I truly believe trump being trump is a net negative ,MegaBlastoise23,e9m2rbg,conservative
"The Democrats won the culture wars.  Plain and simple. I think back to 2003-2004 sometimes and wonder just how far to the left mainstream culture really has drifted.  We laughed at Tumblr and we laugh at Reddit. then again, Reddit is the 5th most popular website in *the country* and we occupy a tiny little corner of it.

We've let entertainment conglomerates buy and buy each other up over the last 35 years. 5 companies located in a 3-square mile neighborhood of Los Angeles now controls 85% of *all media* in the country.... Blockbusters now make more overseas than domestically. Why would Hollywood SJW execs cater to American political culture (conservative capitalist) when they make twice as much money in communist  china?  

Universities have relied upon increasing federal loans to make up their revenue.  Hiring process used to be *mainly* handled by the faculty, but over the decades as more and more cheap federal money has made its way into the system; these bloated budgets have given *much* more power to the administration over the faculty... and at this point,  Public University administrations are basically government offices, so of course they're going to be *naturally* left 

Now the most significant aspect: **Immigration**. In 1980, Non-Hispanic Whites made up over 80% of the population. It's now at roughly 60% and *all* projections have Whites becoming a minority within a generation. Compare this to the *insanely high* fertility rates of Latinos, Blacks, and Asians.  They literally have 3rd world birthrates. This is why well never win California again. This came from the Immigrarion Act of 1965 (Ted Kennedy's creation).  

**Femminism has led to the collapse of the family. And this collapse is directly tied to the decline of traditional masculine values of strength and self-sufficiency & the loss of middleclass blue-collar jobs has eroded the economic foundation of the nuclear family**

We relaxed while the left geared up for war. We thought, ""Never here"" we thought immigrants from communist counties would vote Republican, right? How could they come to this paradise from hells on Earth and vote *left?* We were absolute fools. We imported immigrants from Communist East Asia & Latin America who were taught to *hate* us as children in their home countries.  We were fools 

Once the baby boomers die and we become a minority, it's either Civil War /Resistance or the uniqueness of American civilization simply fades into the static of hsitory just as Christianity will... and Marxism will finally have finally conquored the West",Hohenschweinen,e9l8epe,conservative
"As long as trumps president, off year elections probable will favor democrats 


Basically the opposite of the Obama years 


Majorities wax and wane, eventually the GOP will regain majority 

",Matthmaroo,e9l5pok,conservative
"The issue is, they're like parasites. They'll try to infiltrate communities in the name of acceptance and open mindedness, but the second the power tilts their way they will do everything they can to silence everyone who isn't in full support of them. They've done this for everything. 

Remember when atheism was edgy and ""cool""? It's all soyboys and SJWs now. 

Remember when the technology community (linux, specifically) cared about making good products for people everywhere to use? Now it's all about how meritocracy is racist and how conservatives should be banned from contributing to projects. 

What about /pol/, the antithesis to SJWs? When 4chan is supporting morality, religion, and not rigging elections, you know the world is fucked up. For the first time in history, /pol/ is starting to look more and more like the good guys in this situation.

And what happened to the entire UE education system? It's all liberal indoctrination now.",Batbat_,e9l5j1n,conservative
[removed],,e9kfgqe,conservative
"To be fair, the economy is roaring on paper, but the average worker isn't feeling that much.
I know personally, the tax law netted me somehing like $30 extra a month due to the withholding changes. While I'm grateful for *something*, it's not a situation changing amount of money, nor is it any real substantial increase of disposable income.
",workaccount35,e9kku22,conservative
Trump actually did much bette then average for his first mid term. And it was only the 4th time in this situation the party in power gained Senate Seats. They threw everything at us but the kitchen sink these last 2 years. I think things look really good for 2020z,SnickersReese,e9kn1oj,conservative
"I've always been curious about this, what % of the economy's performance is due to politicians? When there was the 90's dot com bubble, right before the crash, should we have praised the dems? Was the 73-75 recession Nixon's fault? Was the 07 crash Bushes fault? When the next recession hits, will it be all of Trumps fault?",Robertooshka,e9ki3cf,conservative
"Because the GOP doesnt really care about gun rights, or they would have done something for them in the last 2 years",Sp01-07,e9kk5bd,conservative
"Because the base is full of apathy. The GOP lets the democrats skirt the law and escape justice time after time. So all that really matters to them anymore is they keep the guns and be left alone, because it looks like the rule of law is breaking down and collapsing.
    
The GOP is not full of activate or radicals, it is hard to engage voters who want less Government  NOT more.          ",ozric101,e9kjmz4,conservative
The result are very normal. The last 4 presidents all had the same r results. Obama lost more Dem seats then Trump lost GOP seats in his 1st mid term. Clinton and the Bushes both lost the house. ,Emperor_Aurelian,e9l60bl,conservative
Something that I noticed is that any election that is good for the Democrats is ALWAYS reported on up the wazoo as a “Trend”. It doesn’t matter if it’s state or Federal. And any election good for Republicans is ALWAYS reported on as a “Fluke” or the Last Time Republicans will win that election.,SnickersReese,e9kmpjy,conservative
"Was that more of that senate map favoring the GOP

23 defending democrats , 10 defending GOP


3 GOP pick ups , 1 democratic pickup


This was a rough election , however the pendulum will swing back eventually ",Matthmaroo,e9l5zlr,conservative
">I've always been curious about this, what % of the economy's performance is due to politicians?

Not much. The fact of the matter is the only thing politicians control is regulation. Most economic activity is due to manipulations by the Federal Reserve, which I guess is something you can say Trump technically controls.",mkgandkembafan,e9klsu1,conservative
Federal reserve,Emperor_Aurelian,e9l61wg,conservative
Federal reserve,Emperor_Aurelian,e9l623f,conservative
"They had bills coming through that looked promising until a mass shooting occurred. There were a lot of snakes in the Senate anyway. And you cant discount judges although they could do better on the ""shall not be infringed"" part...",___-III----III-___,e9kkn3z,conservative
What could they do? Not enough votes in the Senate.,workaccount35,e9kkx2t,conservative
"Yeah you are correct. 

The fact is it wasn’t a total ass kicking like what usually happens during a Presidents first midterm. I mean Obama lost I think 4 Senate Seats and twice as many house seats his first time and was pretty easily re-elected as sitting Presidents usually are. Plus most of those seats lost this midterm were very close. I think a lot of them will be recaptured in 2020.",SnickersReese,e9l6koe,conservative
"Trump doesn't really control it.  It's set up as an independent corporation that doesn't report to any branch of the government, including the president.  It's controlled by the board of governors (normally seven members, but they have three vacancies).  They are appointed by the president, with senate confirmation, but once they're on the board the president has zero authority over them, can't fire them, they don't even receive funding from congress.  Of the board's current membership, two are Obama appointees and two are Trump appointees (with three Trump nominees waiting in the senate to fill the vacancies).

Interestingly, one of the Obama appointees is a Republican, who Trump appointed as Chairman back in February.",gameinator3000,e9kp2sn,conservative
">The fact of the matter is the only thing politicians control is regulation.

You could almost blame Clinton for the 08 crash due to him repealing Glass Steagall. Well, he didn't make the banks make risky loans/investments or make up derivatives. It was the bankers who did it.",Robertooshka,e9kpnz8,conservative
"That's why I said technically. But regardless, I think it's a stretch to still consider the Fed ""independent."" One look at the ballooning size of M1 after WFC I and it's clear they were acting at the behest of Obama.",mkgandkembafan,e9kt6xv,conservative
"[Good response from Tom Woods on what he likes to call the ""deregulation boogeyman""] (https://www.regulationmyths.com/)",mkgandkembafan,e9kt0u0,conservative
"Nevada is gone, now Arizona begins its change into a blue-ish state.

All of the losses would be fine, if Republicans locked Wisconsin & Michigan, which they fail to do.

In 2020 there's a election to fill McCain's seat. We'll see.

He & Flake didn't help Republicans' image there, too.

Sinema voting record is not radical to be honest, still sucks though.",ReaganTroll,e9k9mxv,conservative
"Man, someone remind me that if I run for office I need to constantly shit on my voters. Then they’ll elect me. Arizona, you guys are fucking stupid.",HolsterOfNuts,e9kc12h,conservative
I don’t know how McSally wins at this point. She needs to have a large majority of the remaining votes to have a chance. ,Zac1245,e9k8w5i,conservative
"I'm honestly astound the vote went this way - I don't have much faith in our voting system here though. Lately, I've been noticing a lot of California plates on my morning commute. This is all anecdotal but there is a slow culture/demographic shift happening here in Arizona. A lot of the people moving here are going to vote opposite of the way that makes Arizona a great state and I'm sad to see it happen. ",UncleRedGreen,e9kg4o1,conservative
They replaced the Maricopa County Sheriff with a Democrat - and suddenly people are harvesting mail-in ballots and running illicit polling stations and ignoring chain-of-custody regulations for election integrity with impunity. Go figure. ,kaioto,e9ks2zw,conservative
Shame on Arizona. ,YankeeBlues21,e9k97bd,conservative
[deleted],,e9kt7zm,conservative
Disgusting,rpm3311,e9khhjb,conservative
Confused?  Once the democrats created enough votes for her to win why didn't they just stop counting?  We all know that the republican won but the new thing is that we have to win with at 55% or they will simply conjurer up enough votes to steal the election,stancrouch,e9kb64x,conservative
I have a solution for culling the dem vote. Give more blacks and Latinos guns tell them to go wild on them and their shit cities.,Ketydubs,e9laaqv,conservative
"This is a bit dramatic, Sinema is a well known local figure McSally was basically a ghost and she has a dumb name, she ran a dumb uninteresting campaign and Sinema does a good job presenting herself as a moderate despite beign very far left. 

Arpio split the Primary vote and killed off Kelli Ward who would have and should have won, Im not surprised by this at all. Want to blame anyone blame idiots like Joe Arpio ",Manchurainprez,e9kk85x,conservative
"Based on the video from Project Veritas and some of the private speeches she’s given, her votes will be radical soon enough.",MyCustomUsername,e9kgmaw,conservative
"I live in Dane County WI just outside Madison, the GOP didn’t even try around here. We got a flyer 3 days before election and that was it. We had flyers, door hangers, people out on the streets, and going door to door MONTHS before the election for the democrats. Now we have a weasel for governor and Tammy Baldwin still in the senate (Wisconsin’s sorry for Baldwin)",PeLight,e9lm6t9,conservative
Well see how long the state government can hold. ,Zac1245,e9k9osk,conservative
"> Arizona, you guys are fucking stupid.

-Kyrsten Sinema",FelixFuckfurter,e9kcy0l,conservative
At last count how many outstanding votes are there?,Madstork1981,e9kbltk,conservative
"Once again, I am not surprised, Sinema was a popular and well seen figure in congress and McSally was a virtually uknown who ran a bad campaing. 

Arizona leans red consistantly but its never been a sure thing for the GOP and they had a bad candidate run against a popular candidate",Manchurainprez,e9kkbpp,conservative
Yeah I grew up and there and am moving back soon. Sad to see this happening. ,Zac1245,e9khtu3,conservative
send the pictures or first hand accounts of fraud to the McSally campaign ,Matthmaroo,e9l67lz,conservative
"Pisses me off so much man, I grew up there and am probably moving back. Sad to see the direction it’s going. ",Zac1245,e9k9bdb,conservative
Because it's not a 'fraudalent steal'.,CountArchibald,e9kzqb2,conservative
"Any proof at all it’s fraudulent?

Pictures , 1st hand testimony 

Arizona mail in ballot system seems very secure to me ",Matthmaroo,e9l5gef,conservative
"Can you please link pictures or 1st hand accounts of the cheating 


If you can 


I am sure lawsuits will follow  by the GOP and McSally ",Matthmaroo,e9l5jng,conservative
Actual quote. Lmao ,HolsterOfNuts,e9kgaq2,conservative
"I think 200,000 but the thing is every batch they count Sinema continues to lead. So there would need to be a large amount of McSally votes left in there. ",Zac1245,e9kc6sn,conservative
At least 160000 in Maricopa alone,Enzo_SAWFT,e9kbzag,conservative
"
>Arizona leans red consistantly but its never been a sure thing for the GOP 

I mean it kinda has tho.. 30+ years of red senators",mbarnar,e9l5qas,conservative
"You don’t think Arizona will go the way of Colorado , New Mexico and Nevada ?",Matthmaroo,e9l5d88,conservative
"But it has had democratic congressman and govenors, voted for clinton been pretty split 50/50 on most presidential elections and Flake and McCain were moderate at best. ",Manchurainprez,e9mv1bw,conservative
"New mexico and nevada have been pretty blue for a very long time.

Colorado has been a swing state,  the calls for Arizona to ""go blue""  remind me of texas, I dont think tis going to happen, we get a lot of people from California and the Midwest but may of them are pretty right leaning, one of the reasons they move from those states",Manchurainprez,e9mv56y,conservative
">With votes still being counted, Democrats last week may have picked up as many as 40 seats in the House of Representatives. That would be their biggest gain since the Watergate year of 1974, and naturally progressives are expressing satisfaction. “Make No Mistake, the Midterm Elections Were a Democratic Victory,” chortled the New Yorker. Apparently American democracy works—at least when Democrats win.  
>  
>Yet it’s worth recalling that this wasn’t the view two years ago after Donald Trump’s unexpected victory. Then the cry was all about a stolen election, Vladimir Putin’s collusion with Mr. Trump, the need to rewrite the Constitution to banish the Electoral College, and the looming threat of an authoritarian coup. “If You’re Not Scared About Fascism in the US, You Should Be,” declared a headline in the New York Times as recently as mid-October this year.  
>  
>So what happened to the coup? Did Mr. Trump call it off? It turns out the U.S. had a relatively normal midterm election in which the party not holding the White House gained a substantial number of seats. Conservatives aren’t complaining about their losses, other than to worry with good cause that Democrats are violating the law as they count votes in counties they control in southern Florida. At least one judge has already ruled in the GOP’s favor.  
>  
>Meanwhile, the fair conclusion is that all of that talk about a fascist takeover was nothing more than partisan posturing intended to stigmatize the opposition and win an election.

&#x200B;",ReaganTroll,e9jp6ob,conservative
Is this any different than Trump claiming for months leading up to 2016 that the election was rigged? That line went away pretty quickly after the first week of November that year,ChompGatorsChomp,e9kdb4s,conservative
"And in the right light, it looks like some Dems' only incintive to vote was that they were taking down the bad orange man, not participating in their republic like in every election before. And in that same light, you wonder if they would gladly give up voting in exchange for a second coming of Obama, or someone else they could crown king. ",triggernaut,e9jrsk5,conservative
"""Conservatives aren’t complaining about their losses, other than to worry with good cause that Democrats are violating the law as they count votes in counties they control in southern Florida.""

The exact same good cause that the democrats had to claim foul in the 2016 election. You can't have it both ways. I'm okay with calling the dems or for what they did, but it's the same conspiracy theory bullshit that's happening in broward county now.",csajhr,e9k9ew5,conservative
"Democracy = demo - cracy

Cracy = power

Demo = ~~peoples~~ Democrats

So Democracy = power to the ~~peoples~~ Democrats

That's how etymology works, right?
",MoiMagnus,e9kbakw,conservative
[deleted],,e9klrdh,conservative
">Meanwhile, the fair conclusion is that all of that talk about a fascist takeover was nothing more than partisan posturing intended to stigmatize the opposition and win an election.
     
Like the WSJ has clean hands... LOL      

 ",ozric101,e9jph96,conservative
"These are the kinds of comments that are totally worthless. 

The FL situation is suspicious to say the least. It's not reasonable to assume that every loss is voter fraud related. That's the same anti-intellectual level as ""MUH RUSSIA!"" ",psstein,e9kyhob,conservative
"This is simply a lie, and is essentially a trolling comment that does nothing but foment hate.",Falkamper,e9l3otp,conservative
"What happened to trumps voter fraud commission


We need to be posting  those results ",Matthmaroo,e9l4sc0,conservative
"It's kind of funny to see us go from ""PewDiePie is a Russian Nazi"" to Bonus Meme with Ben Shapiro.",darthhayek,e9ljtgj,conservative
"I assumed this was another Babylon bee article... Wow.

Edit: ""Broward Sheriff Scott Israel controlling what media can / cannot get in."" Why is he still the sheriff there?",thisisausername190,e9jvowk,conservative
"Hah, I used to work for Avis, they found weed, used condoms, guns, tubes and needles for crack, meth, and heroin all the time. Generally Avis didn't find it, a freaked out customer did after the car was put back in circulation. The story would be more believable if they played it like-

...that...that's not the Babylon Bee's domain. That's Gateway Pundit...Oh my vengeful God, this isn't clever satire, this is real. This isn't a parody, someone actually found a bunch of fuckey ballots in the back of an Avis rental car. Which was doubtless overdue for an oil change and had a slow leak in the rear left tire, never rent from Avis btw, they're legitimately horrible. But what the fuck, THIS ISN'T SATIRE? WHAT THE ACTUAL FUCK?",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9jkmnh,conservative
This is just insanity now. They even suck at cheating. ,StockSkys,e9jio60,conservative
Come on.  How many more are out there?,mlmack,e9jvo4n,conservative
"As a non-American, all this seems almost surreal to me. ",Kutepov,e9kanjc,conservative
"No

fucking

way",the_mad_mad_cow,e9jmk9x,conservative
"If they learn they can get away with it they’ll do it again, are these GOP lawsuits actually getting anywhere?",galapogas,e9joqbz,conservative
"Oh these are just simple mistakes by people who totally would never rig ballots at all...../s


Yet the media will still focus on how Kemp was still secretary of state counting ballots while running for governor, they wont mention that the secretary of state doesn't count the ballots. ",chugonthis,e9jnf4n,conservative
"I agree there is almost certainly fraud being committed in this election, but the article just says a box was discovered. No word on whether there were any ballots in the box.",No1Buck,e9jt3zf,conservative
"How about a new amendment to the Constitution? If a city, county, state or any other municipality can't get a their elections to  send folks to Washington sorted in 24 hours like everyone else, they lose representation until the next election for those seats. ",triggernaut,e9jr6e2,conservative
"They're provisional ballots, from Broward County.  These were likely not counted, or thrown out because they couldn't be verified as eligible voters and likely will not be counted in any recount.

",conantheking,e9jrk0h,conservative
"On a tangental note: Avis is a terrible car rental company, I do not recomend. ",Manchurainprez,e9kh8v6,conservative
Read the title as “Elvis employee.” I was very confused for a second there ,Sheriff_Hopper,e9kibyb,conservative
I think Indian Jones is trekking to parts unknown in search of more boxes ,Delta_25,e9l1xf8,conservative
They seem to be showing up like magic! Perhaps they've been hidden under Harry Potter's invisability cloak!,JFGFNY,e9mm12f,conservative
No doubt these boxes will be popping up everywhere. Not unlike mushrooms grown in manure.,JFGFNY,e9kolqs,conservative
DWS,AntifaArePathetic,e9jxwx6,conservative
"He wasn't canned after his deputies sat outside Stoneman Douglas High **on his orders** while that shooter massacred students inside.  If he gets away with that, he's untouchable.",GoldenGonzo,e9kzjq2,conservative
Rolla coaster of rambling.  I dig it. ,Lobo0084,e9juy9q,conservative
"""It's not cheating if you don't get caught"" - 2020",fifaislife206,e9k08hj,conservative
"Yeah, this is descending well past incompetence.  Hell, it's descended lower than garden variety corruption.  This is a mockery of the republic.  This is a farce and an insult to democracy.",nited_states,e9jn2ls,conservative
"Completely depends on what the number to win beyond the possibility of a recount is. And will go on as long as it takes to forge that many ballots.

I mean hypothetically speaking of course.",cysghost,e9jzaz4,conservative
They've been getting away with it for 100 years ,notviolence,e9jtx9z,conservative
[deleted],,e9jrbet,conservative
"No, the BOX was for provisional ballots. We don’t know if it was full or empty. And if empty... where did the ballots go?",Colonize_The_Moon,e9k0g01,conservative
"They’re all untouchable. Broward County is the only hope for the Democrats to win any Florida election. 2000, Parkland, and now 2018 it’s all insane. Living here it is terrifying how powerful that county is in term of Florida politics. Once Florida goes Blue the nation is fucked. ",Tau23481992,e9lmaji,conservative
""" If you aint cheating, you aint tryin'"" - Democrats 2020",TxScarletRaider,e9k3mbd,conservative
"That's why I just laugh when people have these sweeping conspiracy theories.  It's like, people, the *President of the United States* couldn't even arrange a hotel burglary without fucking it up.",FelixFuckfurter,e9k1tbb,conservative
They can't keep getting away with it!,AntifaArePathetic,e9jxxek,conservative
Start?,fifaislife206,e9k0ct9,conservative
"The filled out provisional ballots are not supposed to ever be transported in that box, they go into color coded bags, there was another article about the exact same grey tub getting left at a middle school and the police came and opened it and it just had office supplies in it.",niakarad,e9k51ny,conservative
But you want Broward County (Democrat stronghold) to not be counted,conantheking,e9k4d4c,conservative
"58% has less than 1 year of working in Bussiness

Less than 20% has a bussiness degree either BA or MBA",Enzo_SAWFT,e9kz9fj,conservative
"Essentially 50% of financial journalists could be anyone who is liberal, has only a journalism degree, and less than 1 years experience in the financial industry before reporting on it. 

And people wonder why I say I’m skeptical of predictions of recession coming sooner rather than 5-10 years from now. ",c_ward5,e9l5clh,conservative
"While I agree that a recession is not 'imminent', we are coming close to the longest period of economic growth since we began tracking GDP. It has been 113 months of continuous GDP growth, the longest ever was march '91 to march '01 at 120 months.

That said, anyone who is outside the coastal megalopolises will tell you they still see slack in the economy. My gut feeling is we have at least 2 years of solid growth left barring anything catastrophic. Eventually, however, the business cycle comes due. My prediction is the first domino to fall will be the federal government being forced to impose deep cuts due to climbing debt service.",superAL1394,e9locll,conservative
So the UN want to ban guns but rockets are OK?  ,ozric101,e9mkpn2,conservative
"LOL. 

I am personally ambivalent about abortion, but even to me this ad is hilariously poorly done. It's almost like a parody of a pro choice ad. ",GorathThorgath,e9jz62a,conservative
"This is horrible. They’re finally fucking honest about killing children. Despicable monsters, they dropped the sheep’s clothing on this one. They oughta be shut down and locked away for the rest of their lives.",Locke-the-Door,e9k6rbk,conservative
The most terrifying aspect of this ad is that the pro-abortion side is *finally* starting to be honest about their beliefs and a large number of Americans are willing to turn a blind eye to the horror of abortion.,user1492,e9kf3hg,conservative
"#Number one rule of running an ad in support of abortions: don’t show an actual live baby. 

Good one guys. ",RawrZZZZZZ,e9kz4w3,conservative
"Agenda Project videos are hilariously awful. I can't decide if they're tone-deaf Progressives, or a clever false flag.",ManRAh,e9kk6vp,conservative
"Somewhat comforting news you guys: the video has 62 likes, *5110 dislikes* ",MisterMouser,e9lo6hj,conservative
"Oooooof. I get the point they are trying to make, but gooood daaaamn man how can you be that short sighted",Jakefiz,e9kf529,conservative
What in the actual fuck. ,misterd0t,e9jyqhz,conservative
"I really think the Republicans could run on ""we dont literally kill babies"" platform.",notagooduname,e9kokvl,conservative
"Only in America you're allowed to have abortions UP until the moment of birth, without any authorization, counseling, regulations, or parental consent(if you're a minor), PAYED by the taxpayers.

There's a no other country on the planet that does that.

Especially when PP donates money to the Democratic party(what reproductive rights organizations donates money to political parties, in other parts of the world??????).",Azul19,e9lyklc,conservative
Planned parenthood pretty much said: “She deserves to be aborted.” Oh wow.,McBeanyBaby,e9n1ixw,conservative
I'm sure the ad's creators don't see it that way. They can't conceive of the possibility that someone may think differently.,Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9k1ctr,conservative
They have a video depicting Paul Ryan wheeling an old lady over a cliff. It seriously looks like parody.,ManRAh,e9kk9qv,conservative
"Only the Democrats are going to support taxpayer funded abortions UP until the moment of birth, for whatever reason.

There's no other country on the planet that does that.",Azul19,e9lylxt,conservative
"They endorse late-term abortions, they'd even support post-birth abortions if they could.

Tell me which other country on the world has such lax abortion laws as in America...",Azul19,e9lyr7m,conservative
"MSM and leftists have done way too good of a job convincing Americans that killing a baby is not actually killing a baby, so that won't work out well. ",diehardgiraffe,e9l73tp,conservative
PAYED by your taxes of course.,Azul19,e9lyph7,conservative
"Unless I'm missing something the article states that that number is unsubstantiated. They believe the president got that number from the FAIR report that has numerous flaws.

I don't think this article supports your title.",Luke_Flyswatter,e9l0brm,conservative
Who cares what number he said? Do we know how much just 1 billion is? Understanding just that would make any effort to curb illegal immigration worth it. ,probablybiased,e9klzyn,conservative
What is unsubstantiated about the number?,Playaguy,e9li2yf,conservative
"The article said the number (100 billion) was unsubstantiated. The reason is because the estimation has only a few variables but those variables vary widely. Firstly we don't actually know how many illegals are in the country to begin with. Some studies say less than 10M and others say  a little over 20 million. We also don't really have a good idea of what money they generate and take from the economy. 

It's a lack of information. Since we just don't know those numbers for sure could be extremely high or right on the button. The president also didn't cite where he got that number from so the article had to guess. 

So we have a statement where we don't know what's being referenced about a dollar amount we can't measure very accurately.",Luke_Flyswatter,e9lmd8o,conservative
"The line about people learning German in Paris actually made me laugh, but I wish he would pull his head out of his ass and have DHS look at voter fraud in places like Florida and Wisconsin. ",iwasthebeaver,e9m9yrk,conservative
People get the government they deserve.,_Gardien,e9lel6h,conservative
 Blame the Democrats. The first thing these morons are going to do is subpoena Trump because he was a meanie head to Jeff Bezos. I love how the “party of the people” promptly act as Amazon’s attack dog. ,link_ganon,e9m1z0b,conservative
"Competition should be illegal, you heard it here first.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9ll6g6,conservative
"It's not competition when the *government* does it with taxpayer dollars. 

Its bribery. ",memberCP,e9lmfki,conservative
Seattle drove Amazon out with punitive taxes. Why is Amazon not allowed to move to the most beneficial locations in response? ,ljmiller62,e9m4g06,conservative
Agreed.  I am a pretty strict fiscal conservative and I generally want the government to stay out of business affairs.  In this case I can't agree with governments playing favorites and making special laws that aim to benefit one business over others.,theheadfl,e9lobcs,conservative
This started far before Seattle proposed the tax that they cancelled,memberCP,e9m55ky,conservative
"We’ve literally always done this. Why do you think movies are shot in particular areas or tv shows? It’s because they get special rules. Even smaller companies who love get special laws, it’s how States attract business. ",HonorMyBeetus,e9m0vbg,conservative
"At least what you're talking about is for entire classes of companies and not extremely narrowly targeted, but I think it's still questionable as to whether we as conservatives should be supporting this kind of thing.  The government picking winners and losers with tax law is not free market capitalism at all.

edit: Another way states attract business is by simply being a better environment (taxes, and other factors) than neighboring states.  But there is no reason these have to be tied to a specific industry or handful of companies.",theheadfl,e9m3vxs,conservative
It's still bad. Just like stadiums and other corporate welfare from the Obama administration (solyndra),memberCP,e9m57or,conservative
this came after Hamas rocketed Israeli with over 100 rockets https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9wg70y/hamas_fires_100_rockets_into_israel_forces/,Delta_25,e9lb2ha,conservative
"People cast their ballots based on the system being used. They may have decided to cast a ballot with a first preference for a third party candidate and a second preference for one of the major candidates, knowing that the third party candidate had almost no chance of winning and relying on the fact that their ballot would be counted for their second preference. If the rules had been different, they would have voted differently.

I don't think candidates should get to challenge the basic ground rules of the election after the fact. It's like the liberals who say ""but Hillary won the popular vote, so Trump is an illegitimate president."" There *was* no popular vote total in the law, and if the law had been different then campaign strategies and voting behavior would have been different as well.",PubliusVA,e9myuzr,conservative
"Coming from the state that sent Keith Ellison to Congress, it's not surprising, but still pretty horrible anyway.",Strait409,e9la7q6,conservative
"This is something I think an honest person might recuse themselves from being publicly vocal about.  Honestly?  Like this couldn't be tied to the fact Palestinian leaderships have outright said they want to destroy Israel and push them into the sea instead of actually working towards peace?

Good luck not being painted as anti-semite in two years.",nonamenoslogans2,e9l86xl,conservative
I can’t get past the fact that there is a magazine called *Muslim Girl*.,PurpleAngel23,e9le7r1,conservative
A Muslim who wants to wipe out the Jews and Israel? Color me shocked. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9kx46e,conservative
Exactly who i expected,Dank_Cartographer,e9ksrbb,conservative
"> ""Ilhan believes in and supports the BDS movement, and has fought to make sure people’s right to support it isn’t criminalized. She does however, have reservations on the effectiveness of the movement in accomplishing a lasting solution,"" her campaign told Muslim Girl in a feature published on Sunday.

In before she starts supporting some kind of final solution.",XYZ-Wing,e9kt45j,conservative
Ironically that district has the highest concentration of Jewish voters in Minnesota,zwiebelsaft,e9lnnj4,conservative
"Hell, she’s painting herself as one now.",PurpleAngel23,e9ldsma,conservative
"The only people she has to appeal to is her voting base.

Which is basically the dumpster fire of diversity.",zwiebelsaft,e9lpywa,conservative
"I wonder what the centerfold is like.

",mlmack,e9lkiem,conservative
"""Wir müssen den Weissen Männer ausrotten."" -Ilhan, probably",zwiebelsaft,e9lpxlx,conservative
I hope I never see it.,PurpleAngel23,e9loc6m,conservative
They just lie.  They know that isn't the truth but they just lie.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9l2qd6,conservative
Source: https://grrrgraphics.com/little-jimmy-acosta/,tehForce,e9k8hkr,conservative
Back at it weaponizing every piece of government they can control.  This is why Democrats cannot be trusted with power.,BrighamYoung,e9l6gkr,conservative
"I have no doubt that the house dems will completely overreach and make giant asses of themselves.  Barron Trump's lemonade stand is probably a target.  

The frothing of the mouth that we are going to see for the next two years will guarantee a Trump re-election as the american people are turned off by this bullshit.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9ncsn8,conservative
"Raise your hand if you're surprised.


Put your hand down!",justhere2havefun,e9kunvd,conservative
Context?,SaltineAmerican_1970,e9kkv5h,conservative
Good not hack all their bank accounts and iras rob them Putin. I’d watch the shit out of a soy mass suicide.,Ketydubs,e9lfenm,conservative
https://baltimore.cbslocal.com/2018/11/12/facebook-outage-down/amp,tehForce,e9kl0xm,conservative
Huh?,prometheud,e9m4ws6,conservative
Ah. Yes. Well I’m not in Baltimore and I don’t use Facebook.,SaltineAmerican_1970,e9kl5o4,conservative
That was the first article that came up.  It was a world wide outage.   I'd love to know how much money they lost.,tehForce,e9klm3f,conservative
Not enough. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9kmj0t,conservative
Gasp. Who could have predicted this. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9kcvbv,conservative
[removed],,e9ke2hs,conservative
"> I don’t understand. I thought we had a peace agreement with Kim himself?

Yeah, it's kinda like that piece of shit Iran deal that you leftists jizzed your pants over. The one that gave them everything they need to develop a weapons program and just asked them nicely not to build one. *""Please don't build one at any of the sites that are off-limits to inspectors.""* At least Trump didn't have to give the Kim regime $150 billion to get empty promises. He also got hostages back and didn't have to fly in 3 private jets full of cash ($1.3 billion) to get them like that treacherous fuck Obama did. Trump also got them to cease missile and nuclear tests for the time being. Mike Pompeo had his eyes open with this. He has realistic expectations. So far it's at least a small win for zero cost. Unlike Obama, which was a no win, for a massive cost.",PhilosoGuido,e9lp8z0,conservative
I’m no leftist holmes ,pur3fr33dom,e9lwbu2,conservative
"You say that, yet I've looked through your post history and I can't find you advocating anything conservative. ",PhilosoGuido,e9nl997,conservative
"It’s funny how pissy all of these world leaders get when it comes to us putting ourselves first for a change.  You know damn well that as soon as some shit goes down on the world stage that requires military intervention, their heads will whip around as they look directly to us to handle it. ",ccampb6,e9kqf63,conservative
"1. The 8,000 ballots were not lost and then found - they were absentee ballots which for whatever reason went uncounted. 
1. What was the lead before the absentee ballots were counted.
1. Does this box come with a verified chain of custody? 
1. Can we count it if it didn't? (Legally, in NM)
1. What was the split of this county outside of these extra ballots?
1. What was the split of these ballots?
1. Has a single 'extra box' been found anywhere that favors Republicans? It would seem that if this is a regular, natural occurrence we would see that happen at least once.",AddictedToGlue,e9k9h22,conservative
Possibly planning this for two years after Trump won. This is all a trial to see if they can get away with it in 2020. Interesting to see if Republicans do anything about their elections being stolen or if they just roll over and say oh well.,the-divine-comedy,e9k9okm,conservative
"Notice how these close races never flip from Democrat to GOP. They never find more Republican ballots in a warehouse. They never find thousands of provisional GOP ballots. These late reporting districts that just keep revising their totals never seem to be GOP strongholds. How long are we going to put up with this bullshit? We need investigations and criminal prosecutions. We need to demand that election fraud receives at least as harsh prison sentences as financial fraud. We need voter ID laws in every state. We need to demand voter rolls tightened to remove dead, fraudulent, non citizens, and non state residents. We need voter results protected with tamper proof blockchain technology, and verification methods where a voter can log in securely after the election and see if their vote was recorded and/or changed. ",PhilosoGuido,e9lodq7,conservative
No one else that can actually do something about this seems to be asking these questions. Do we have any over-site for elections in this country? ,the-divine-comedy,e9kadcn,conservative
"The problem is - as in Florida - all ballots must be in and counted by a certain time and date after the election.  In Florida you had a county that was blown apart by a hurricane get it done whereas in Broward Co. which was untouched new ballots were being ""discovered"" 4 days after the election.",chabanais,e9kbvli,conservative
"This happened when Al Franken won MN.  Oh look, some ballots over here!  Oh look some more over here.  Coleman went from victory election night to losing by less than a 1000 votes I think.

Edit: Franken won by 312 votes after being down about 300 after election night.",nonamenoslogans2,e9konqf,conservative
That was my thinking too. Small test runs to perfect it for 2020 ,Chapka69,e9k9rns,conservative
And i cannot believe the amount of rolling over. ,Isredditreal2009,e9kgt02,conservative
"They might be answered, and there's a non-zero chance that the answers are reasonable. But I don't see anything in this article or on the google that answers them to my satisfaction.",AddictedToGlue,e9kbjp9,conservative
People that have pictures of fraud need to send the proof to the campaigns ,Matthmaroo,e9l6hqt,conservative
"We need to do like one article suggested and throw out *all* the votes from Broward and Palm Beach. Folks will hate it, but they can blame their incompetent (or criminal) officials for acting in ways that would disqualify those ballots.  

If there's no consequence or accountability, the problem will only get worse.",robotoverlordz,e9lsmnx,conservative
"Raise one hand if you speak French. Raise both hands if you are French.
",chabanais,e9kwgaq,conservative
Meh Paris is a shithole anyway.  Only nice part of that country is. Normandy ,DPistola,e9kntyr,conservative
"Alright thats about it for me, Lets prepare our memes! its officially trolling season! FUCK FRANCE!",MinimumMonitor7,e9kr7q9,conservative
"Trump might not be welcome, but terrorists sure are. ",RKfan,e9lf0j3,conservative
That dude probably speaks German when at home while in BDSM NAZI latex cosplay.  What a tool.,GlenGanges,e9l48ch,conservative
"> Meh Paris is a shithole anyway.

[Beautiful place.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yqopPs5Tp-I)",Silicon_Avatar,e9kocw5,conservative
After visiting it’s always fun to shoot down women’s obsession with the place and how romantic it is ,DPistola,e9kowan,conservative
"""Found"".  Yeah, right.  These are brownshirt votes, nothing else.
",BrighamYoung,e9l6dwf,conservative
Aren't these the overseas military ballots?,O_Hai_Thur,e9kzyvb,conservative
Of course they could. That is the whole reason these fake ballots were created in the first place. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9kwzb1,conservative
 Can’t we find out if they’re fake? And can’t somebody please tell me how ballots just go missing? Isn’t that gross incompetence? And why does it always favor Dems?,the-divine-comedy,e9kzqmw,conservative
Why are liberals obsessed with hijacking Florida?,McKnight36,e9l0pwc,conservative
I'm still waiting on my 08' absentee ballot. No one from my unit received one overseas.,popsmokeimout,e9l2665,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/bJUfGMV.png,alc59,e9l2tqx,conservative
"I think everyone ageees she needs to be canned and probably arrested. Her actions, even if only incompetence, damage the country. ",PTLove,e9l4guf,conservative
Nobody is right or wrong all the time.,ozric101,e9l69xc,conservative
Guac boy is going for that redemption arc,Dank_Cartographer,e9l2w8b,conservative
Please clap. ,Zac1245,e9lisnx,conservative
Holy Guacamole ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9l4pkq,conservative
You forgot the exclamation point; that's mandatory when talking about Jeb!. Please clap. ,soxfan90,e9lfh2n,conservative
Doors this mean he's removed the 'I'm with her' bumper sticker from his truck?,BrockLee76,e9lhcvq,conservative
It sure doors. ,link_ganon,e9m20bn,conservative
This is cynicism at its worst. Maybe some of these folks will become Christians out of this. The Word of God does not return to him void. ,triggernaut,e9kspqc,conservative
"Security concerns just means ""might upset the Muslims"" ",CAGUnion404,e9kh5xr,conservative
Cowards.,brogarn,e9kp20u,conservative
"I posted this in /r/worldnews and it was given the ""misleading title"" flair and then deleted by a mod. ",atomicdiarrhea4000,e9l863o,conservative
Could this flip the Senate?,the-divine-comedy,e9l5ihd,conservative
Even if they steal Florida and win this one (they won't) that's 51 seats. This is only a runoff because two Republican candianates ran and the 3rd place Republican took over 15% of the vote. ,latotokyo123,e9l5yay,conservative
No. Think the gop is locked at 51. Just trying to make up the Maine Alaska buffer now.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9l5x04,conservative
"We gained MO, IN, ND, and (likely) FL, and lost NV and (likely) AZ. It’ll most likely be 53-47
",YankeeBlues21,e9l88vf,conservative
"Arizona is gone, AP called it 10 minutes ago",SilentKiwi23,e9l9060,conservative
[Ugh...](https://media.giphy.com/media/taQrKowQa0UBa/giphy.gif),YankeeBlues21,e9l945f,conservative
"""Braces for volatile"" means we are calling you out on your bullshit and not letting it slip.",RoninIV,e9kw0e0,conservative
"Finally!  As someone who works at the VA and has even been ""forcibly"" represented by the AFGE, this is very much needed.  The entire union is a joke at the VA.
Beach-front yearly symposioms
Quarterly ""member picnic"" when they purposely over-buy food to stock their personal food pantry at home. 
Super long lunch breaks
Sometimes not come into work at as all... because who's watching them? 
Stealing government time. Etc, 

On the other hand,  this will force the HR department to represent and protect their employees instead of outsourcing that responsibility to a bunch of unknowledgable union volunteers. 
",fizicks11,e9ju414,conservative
"I’d like him to do whatever he could to hamstring public unions. They’re such a drain on our government. 
",skarface6,e9kj2vu,conservative
"> On the other hand, this will force the HR department to represent and protect their employees instead of outsourcing that responsibility to a bunch of unknowledgable union volunteers.

I've always heard that HR departments protect the Company/Organization, not the employee. What makes you think the VA will be any different? Trading union rent seekers for standard issue Government bureaucrats doesn't necessarily strike me as a gain in this example.

",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9jz6nk,conservative
"Forcibly represented? You didn't opt out? I opted out after being in for a year. I don't pay dues anymore. I'm not going to argue with you on them being a bit of a joke though. Despite opting out, they left me on their email list and I was cc'ed in on a chain of gossip emails from our local union reps recently. It was absolutely unprofessional and just sad. ",Fair_enough42,e9ky4kf,conservative
"I didn't say the other hand was better... A good company has a vested interest in protecting a good supervisor/management/staff.  In my 10 years experience, I've seen VA leadership and AFGE work together in far too many situations to conclude that union ""representation"" is any different than HR representation.   The only upside,  IMO is that HR has a LEGAL obligation to represent you. AFGE can get off the hook in every situation by claiming ignorance.  True story. ",fizicks11,e9k0p7j,conservative
"It could be a state thing.  Where I live, Unions are basically put before God himself among the religious working class (even if they don't admit it).",zwiebelsaft,e9lq54u,conservative
Could the gop fall in line and vote for a less liberal Democrat to try and persuade other Dems? Or do we want pelosi to make her party look bad?,johndeer89,e9kem4h,conservative
Watch out.  We got a smart one here.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9kgcuy,conservative
Want Pelosi to divide Dems and yell her crazy from the roof tops. ,c_ward5,e9kg0ha,conservative
Are there voting records that can show me how my vote was counted?  I would be curious to double check to see my information and how it was tallied,mattmcd20,e9l0l08,conservative
"I am a liberal Democrat, and seeing this appear on r/all is a truly heartwarming thing. It makes me believe we can unify as one country, and one people and it's thanks to brave men and women like our veterans. So, from the other side of the aisle, I just want to say I'm proud of the freedom we can all share together. ",The_Green_Sun,e9hqank,conservative
"This is exactly why, no matter what side you're one, I'm glad there's been an increase in veteran Congress members in the midterms. They're probably the key to bipartisanship and uniting our country. ",UhOhSpaghettioos,e9i9qd0,conservative
God I love America,Nihilo1999,e9hhykm,conservative
Medal of Honor on Netflix is definitely worth a watch btw. I’ve cried every episode so far. ,wine_o_clock,e9ho617,conservative
So wholesome,SirTalkALot406,e9hle7q,conservative
I miss when this was commonplace. ,RegretPoweredRocket,e9hkize,conservative
"Nice, but, there are no more surviving WWI vets, so this picture can't physically happen any more.  Just saying.",paulbrook,e9hl3hj,conservative
"Who would downvote this? 

Edit: What a mess! Our Veterans are heroes. Even when anonymous, show some respect.  ",silentbob_,e9hjpr3,conservative
"Oh ok, so not a common thing. Good to know!",Ilikeminewelldone,e9l3zl7,conservative
This is Great.,onekingdom1,e9hkpvq,conservative
[deleted],,e9ho3wz,conservative
"My age seems to correspond to my respect for our military and the men and women who protect our way of life.  With the wave of crimigrants invading our country, it has become a more and more difficult job.  Thank you. ",capoferrorocks,e9hyohy,conservative
"Agreed, but what is up with the post tag? ""Conservatives Only"" What is that supposed to mean? ",CommentToBeDeleted,e9i4yv4,conservative
"When things are so divisive it can be difficult to remember that we’re all on the same team. I need to do a better job of it, personally. Here’s to trying! Happy Veterans Day, everyone. ",DoktorKruel,e9ijbcd,conservative
Pretty far right Republican here.  Love you friend.  We're all in this together.  ,Scrotucles,e9i4cmw,conservative
Greatest country on the planet. ,LumpyWumpus,e9hqwwh,conservative
"Me too patriot 🇺🇸

I am forever grateful ",hat_wine_clock,e9i3656,conservative
[deleted],,e9hy4nk,conservative
r/WholesomeConservative ,RonTheOrc,e9i2vrz,conservative
It is. More now than any time in my life.,Nonsenseism,e9hv98y,conservative
"It is. So much so that I have been thanked before I even joined when I told someone I was going to boot. Then again, I'm from Texas. ",Towns-a-Million,e9hw9di,conservative
"I mean I am only ROTC so I haven’t served yet, but we have uniform days and my professors have thanked me before. It was weird since I haven’t done anything yet but the gratitude is still there even on college campuses :)",Ilikeminewelldone,e9hqiip,conservative
"Well, he looks more like a WWII vet. And im pretty sure we have a few of those left. ",AnoK760,e9hm58e,conservative
"Take a wild guess.

Edit: looks like the brigade is out today.",TheGeek100,e9hk4oi,conservative
Pinko commie bastards,DPistola,e9hmdg2,conservative
[removed],,e9hpdim,conservative
"It means that only people with flairs can comment. We have to do this because threads like this will be filled with leftists throwing insults at us and this system drastically cuts down on the work us mods need to do. It sucks that we have to do it, but unfortunately we need to. 

If you don't like it, blame [people like this](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9w4f0z/thank_you/e9i3f5z)",LumpyWumpus,e9i8kez,conservative
Happy Veterans day!,Landale,e9k7ntf,conservative
"Liberal here, I love you dude. I hope you have a great day",Angela_Amari,e9jr82c,conservative
"Ahem, in the universe. ",Philmecrakin,e9hxb45,conservative
[deleted],,e9htbya,conservative
"Hahahahhaha if there is one country that deserves a nuclear holocaust, Its America ",LeaderOfRoost,e9i3f5z,conservative
"Non-citizens serve all the time, and it's often used as a [path to citizenship](https://www.uscis.gov/military/naturalization-through-military-service). It'll take extra paperwork, which a recruiter can help you with. If you have your personal documents (e.g. birth certificate, passport issued by a non-hostile nation) it shouldn't be an issue. If you're serious about it, call a recruiter before arrival in the States to see what exactly you'll need. ",junkthejunker,e9i3fgx,conservative
"You can join and earn citizenship.

Edit: OP deleted his post, he was asking if he could join the US Military as a non citizen and later become a US citizen. I'm a US Army Combat Veteran and served with a very brave and awesome brother who was a citizen of Spain who had joined the US Army and served to gain US Citizenship and then bring his wife and kids to the US. It's all totally legal, and IMO one of the best ways to show your ""Love of America""(tm) and earn your Citizenship. My Spanish brother put his life on the line for the US Army, and earned his right to become an American the legal way, the only way.

 EditX2: I'm a conservative and this story is the truth.",Fuel4U,e9i4d05,conservative
"I often hear of people serving to gain citizenship. 

It’s definitely possible. 

https://www.uscis.gov/military/naturalization-through-military-service",AgentTakeru,e9i5o4d,conservative
Email a recruiter. Military service can be a path to citizenship,ShillinTheVillain,e9ijky0,conservative
Your best bet would be to speak with an army recruiter. ,rustyspurs87,e9i68r8,conservative
"You can enlist as a legal immigrant without citizenship.

Edit: Here’s my source: https://www.usa.gov/join-military
",Mysticccccc,e9i8dwz,conservative
"It was so weird to get the ""Thank you for your service"" when I was still in school. There were some ladies in the my preferred dining hall that always made the most profuse thanks.

But what's even weirder, in my opinion, is when I get it...at work. On a military installation. I work with a lot of government civilians, and there are a few that drop it when they pass those of us in uniform.",awksomepenguin,e9jf4ad,conservative
Sadly not for long :/ another 30 years and all the Vietnam vets will be gone too...,-AirplaneShane-,e9hpirt,conservative
"Oh, right.  I was thinking of Armistice Day (also today)--WWI being the original basis for both holidays.",paulbrook,e9hwqn4,conservative
[removed],,e9hosgi,conservative
[removed],,e9hklu2,conservative
Communists loved their military. ,Nonsenseism,e9hvb0q,conservative
[removed],,e9hpkni,conservative
"Just curious, I read this sub a lot but post very little. I see that I can't control my flair. I'd be happy to tell you what I am. Or does it need to be from reputation in the sub? ",workalotic,e9i9uh6,conservative
"I agree with the guy that responded to you. I work with kids, and at my work we have some very... troubled children, I mean like kindergarten age kids who swear at you and throw abuse around. So I've recently taken to just writing down what they say and telling them I'll just show it to their parents.

I think the same applies here. Let's just document what people say and how people say it and keep it on file, I think it will be a lot more effective in the long run.",Atherum,e9ilhqg,conservative
">Hey lumpy. Why do you put threads like this in conservatives only mode?

This is why. ",LumpyWumpus,e9i8g2c,conservative
I have a friend that is originally from Colombia that served in the Navy.  He met his wife there and he has been living and working here in the U.S for a couple decades now.  One of the best people I've ever met!,Landale,e9k80sd,conservative
"Wow, I am excited to go active but that will be weird if I get thanked on base all the time. At least then I will be active duty so I won’t feel as guilty.",Ilikeminewelldone,e9jh3zs,conservative
"Yeah, but then there will be Iraq/Afghanistan ones. And probably some more after, from a war yet to be determined. 

Every war post WW2 has been a net waste of lives and money. I'm a fan of the Paul family approach of maybe we should stay the hell out of other people's business",GorathThorgath,e9hqco8,conservative
Be glad they get to pass on now rather than in the 1940s. That's a blessing.,Fabermetrics,e9hqegp,conservative
Yeah but thats just how it goes. Eventually there wont be any Gulf war vets either. And Iraq/Afghanistan. And whatever war we get into next. ,AnoK760,e9hwo6i,conservative
understandable.,AnoK760,e9ib6j8,conservative
L i b e r a l s,LawnMowerNationalism,e9hkplq,conservative
"Probably, but I was thinking more of all the liberals who hate our nations military.",TheGeek100,e9hlf1q,conservative
**Their** military,KamaCosby,e9hxete,conservative
So much so that the Soviets sent hundreds of thousands of their own [WWII POWs and veterans to gulags](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Soviet_repressions_against_former_prisoners_of_war) due to being contaminated by western capitalist society while they were being held.  ,sau1_g0odman,e9i3lg3,conservative
You should just make a list of posts like this to point to when people ask why we can't have nice things.,DJ_Zephyr,e9ibc6m,conservative
"Like I said, I work with a LOT of civilians. I'm an engineer at a depot base. My supervisor, a lieutenant colonel in the same career field, has told me that he's never seen this many civilians in an organization like this before. ",awksomepenguin,e9l1rbz,conservative
all wars are a waste of lives. We should only go into wars if it's in self defense or in defense of very important allies.,ItsReasonOrTreason,e9hzci9,conservative
"Or if we do intervene, we go all in",Natanyul,e9hu38m,conservative
Second Civil War at some point,ConsistentlyRight,e9jh2nb,conservative
[removed],,e9hloxz,conservative
[removed],,e9hnix2,conservative
[deleted],,e9hxltg,conservative
I'm not going to argue because it is a bannable offence. But to think Communist countries didnt love their military is absurd.,Nonsenseism,e9idyfp,conservative
"oh definitely. No this time around though. I have the feeling its going to be resource oriented and result in a balkanization of the US. But not for at least another 50-100 years. And MORE than likely will be man-made resource shortages headed by massive corporations. 

There wont be an ideologically based civil war. Not enough people give a fuck. 
",AnoK760,e9jh5xl,conservative
"Upvote.  The  rhetoric is really fucking idiotic sometimes.

Often, actually.",Ovedya2011,e9hplxn,conservative
"I didn't say all liberals, I said all the liberals who hate the military.",TheGeek100,e9hltcy,conservative
[deleted],,e9hmjs7,conservative
Why are you here ,silentbob_,e9hlw3s,conservative
Please leave,HOOPER_FULL_THROTTLE,e9hppvc,conservative
That might be a stretch to say most communist countries love their military.   Might be more forced love than actual ,DPistola,e9hxxz3,conservative
Touche. ,cormamin101,e9hm5fq,conservative
I have. ,cormamin101,e9hmlc3,conservative
[removed],,e9hm470,conservative
"fair enough, used to trolls ",silentbob_,e9hm94p,conservative
It can have them all,soxfan90,e9lflrc,conservative
Also The seats the Dems gained were mostly filled with Neo-Cons also so. But of course the retards in the media are too stupid to see that. But it still will be interesting to see how that plays out.,SnickersReese,e9kor0g,conservative
"Well this is fake news so there's that.

Edit: I knew I was going to get the downvote :P https://i.redd.it/bhhbrue8syx11.png
",Havebaconwilltravel,e9ksf9t,conservative
"If Trump did go speak, they'd rant about that too. ",triggernaut,e9krt74,conservative
"The title of the article reads

> Trump Panned For Apparently Skipping Arlington Visit on Veterans Day

He did skip that visit. He did not skip an official wreath-laying ceremony at Arlington Cemetery, though.

Here is a link to the very article you cited as your source:

https://www.motherjones.com/kevin-drum/2018/11/trump-decides-to-skip-arlington-ceremony-too/

The new update there reads as follows:

> I misinterpreted the tweet above, thinking that it meant there was an official wreath-laying ceremony at Arlington Cemetery today and that Trump was skipping it. There isn’t. All it means is that Trump did nothing public either yesterday or today in memory of Veterans Day. Apologies.",Pilzemann,e9ltmlx,conservative
I love that the US is  Shaking up OPEC ,Chapka69,e9lan1s,conservative
This is so weird to me. It's as if they are just now paying even slight attention to notice that Linda Sarsour is foaming at the mouth anti-western psycho trying to hurt western culture and doing it under the guise of leftist rhetoric. Linda Sarsour hates America and all western culture and that includes white women.,SullyDuggs,e9jdamo,conservative
"Not to mention that one of the speakers at the first Women's March was a woman who participated in the kidnapping, rape, torture and murder of a man: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Donna_Hylton  

The level of hypocrisy is out of this world. This is a movement that will protest and end a person's career for making a misogynistic joke. You can't make this shit up, if a conservative wrote it as fiction or satire you would tell them to tone it down a bit.",redthrow1125,e9jiovd,conservative
"Good on them for changing course, but it's pathetic it took this long considering how public Linda Sarsour's record is.",joozian_,e9jta10,conservative
We should just keep pointing this kind of thing out constantly until they completely devour their own.,HolsterOfNuts,e9j9qrc,conservative
finally some sense already ,marku1,e9jr1fb,conservative
"I disagree with Alyssa Milano on nearly every single point imaginable but I want to write her a letter thanking her for disavowing Linda Sarsour. Its increasingly disturbing to me that the women following the womens march have NO idea who they are rallying behind, and it's a definite net positive for Alyssa to be putting the spotlight on that.  ",MrFizzardsWizard,e9jwi2w,conservative
"Why are there marches anyways? Women in the US and the Western World have more rights than any other place in the world. In fact, I'd say women in the US have more rights than men do. ",Shortmanloosinghope,e9k4319,conservative
"This is a CYA move. They're just saying this so that in the future, they can point to it and say that they did the right thing. In the meantime, Sarsour & Co. will continue bashing the Jews and doing Farrakhan's bidding. Nothing of substance will change.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9jyibp,conservative
Good for them. Finally something we can agree on.,CouLesKy,e9k4ufh,conservative
Yeah let's celebrate these dumb old hags. The organization marches for rights they already have. It doesn't matter if they found out about a few bad apples two years after the fact. The march organization is pointless and so are these washed up celebs and their political opinions. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9jvhk0,conservative
Pretty sad that it took the vile actions of an anti-semite in the form of a synagogue shooting to make them admit that their own shit stinks. ,globosingentes,e9k2d1b,conservative
Will someone please just grab them by the pussies so we can all get on with our lives?,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9juviw,conservative
Why is the world so obsessed with not offending Jews,FantasticFerd,e9kpi68,conservative
"Better late than never though.

Most people operate on limited attention span. They just hear the women's march cue and assume it's people who share their views without paying attention to who they are.

I'm glad at last the awareness is finally spreading and that it will hopefully make them examine their ""allies"" more carefully.",Terra_green2,e9jfjpc,conservative
"How many years has this been pointed out and they're acting like they just discovered this little tidbit?  And, really, why would anyone even need to be told?",I_am_really_shocked,e9jdnvn,conservative
Muslims are overwhelmingly pro-life and anti-gay. How does the left reconcile this? ,nano8150,e9jiv5m,conservative
"Linda Sarsour wants to import Sharia Law in America and establish an Islamic Theocracy in the West.

And she played a prominent role in the Women's March.

Go figure.",Azul19,e9jwi9h,conservative
"> This is so weird to me. It's as if they are just now paying even slight attention to notice that Linda Sarsour is foaming at the mouth anti-western psycho trying to hurt western culture 


Ever think that's maybe the whole point? 

Steve King can be attacked as an anti-Semite, but she won't be, ever. 

It's not a contradiction unless you think 'anti-Semitism' is really the issue.

",lost_snake,e9jzgh1,conservative
"> Not to mention that one of the speakers at the first Women's March was a woman who participated in the kidnapping, rape, torture and murder of a man: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Donna_Hylton
> 

Not even the worst offender. The since deported Rasmea Odeh was convicted for her role in a 1969 supermarket bombing that killed two in Jerusalem before she went on to commit immigration fraud when coming to the US.",gprime,e9jm6iw,conservative
"Linda Sarsour(a prominent leader of the Women's March), said that Sharia Law is progressive.

Go figure.",Azul19,e9jx43e,conservative
"Even though they've got some accurate points(such as sexual assault, discrimination in the workforce, sexism etc.), most of those lads are marching just for attention.

These are the same lads that want to disarm women, import an islamic theocracy in the west, shame women for their religious/spiritual beliefs, shame women for their lifestyle choices, as wanting to TAX pro-life women and force them to foot the bill for their abotions.

This doesn't seem very empowering to me.

They were never pro-women, they're just trying to virtue signal how ""progressive and liberal"" they are, in order to appear open-minded and to feel important about themselves.

Complete cookery mate.",Azul19,e9jxfb3,conservative
"They don't have much going on anymore, give them a break. 

I just wish they stayed in their little cesspool of Hollywood and cleaned that up, instead of spreading out to the normal world. ",crapinmypants_gross,e9k50f3,conservative
Nobody wants that nasty old ham hot pocket. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9jvlkn,conservative
"Linda Sarsour and Louis Farrakhan don't just ""offend Jews."" They offend basic human decency.",Strait409,e9lbogs,conservative
I'm assuming Alyssa Milano just wasn't paying attention and just assumed that any anti-trump and anti-pussy hat discussion was spitting vileness. I think we give too much credit to these people for knowing reality because they just endorse the general message of the nonsense. I think we give detractors far too much credit. ,SullyDuggs,e9jdupl,conservative
Muslims are overwhelmingly anti-christian and anti-western civilization.   They have a lot in common with the leftists.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9jnf8z,conservative
"It's wrong to think as the left based on values and principles. Things must be viewed under the lens of oppression. Not saying that everyone or even the majority of people on the left think like this, but the loudest voices echo these ideas. ",fcuk_the_king,e9jxgc8,conservative
I guess I wasn't explicit but that is her whole point. She knows these progressives are dumb. They can deny it all they want but Linda Sarsour is a snake in the grass for Feminists. You can't wear a hijab and be a Feminist at the same time they are ideologically exclusive.,SullyDuggs,e9k9k8r,conservative
"Nah, I think torturing someone to death over two weeks is worse than blowing them up.",redthrow1125,e9k4v1g,conservative
I have nothing but contempt for these celeberty political stunts. They're all forced to do it because virtue signaling is required in that town. None of them have a clue what they're talking about and they don't have the good sense to at least be entertaining about it. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9k5obc,conservative
Makes ya think ,OprahSwagfrey,e9jowih,conservative
"Targeting civilians to cause terror is pretty awful, too. ",skarface6,e9kiv2a,conservative
Everything I've posted today is at 0. I think some mad idiot from politics is following me around. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9k8oh6,conservative
almonds = activated,AntifaArePathetic,e9jxzh6,conservative
"""nonprofit"". Nice joke. They're more like campaign donations. ",xJownage,e9lzlne,conservative
"Yes, we can send them back.  Yes, we should send them back.  We've already done amnesty.  I don't care if it takes a Constitutional Amendment to revoke their citizenship.  That would just be the civil law catching up to the natural law.  Build the wall and throw every illegal immigrant over it along with any kids they've popped out.  Justice demands it.  
  
Send back all the H1B scabs and their kids as well.  We should reset the guest worker system and then follow Japan's lead.  Immigration should be very rare.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9k83x3,conservative
"And so continues wasteful spending and stupidity.  Please democrats, do not f#ck up the economic roll we're in.  The middle class needs these record gains not seen in decades.  So again,  DON'T F#CK WITH IT!",Wiseguy2013,e9k9iak,conservative
Irrelevant. None of this matters elections have been compromised in this country. Until we fix election fraud Trump won’t win.,the-divine-comedy,e9ka7sn,conservative
We need to do everything we possibly can to subvert the house completely.,HolsterOfNuts,e9kbxcb,conservative
The economy and the Democrats behavior/extreme left turn should have already been enough to re-elect Trump. But America is the meth lab of democracy (am I convincing voters correctly Arizona?) so they just went back to the Dems. ,YankeeBlues21,e9ke9ef,conservative
Why would impeaching Trump fuck up the economy? R's would still hold the executive branch and the senate,Okilurknomore,e9l6vvk,conservative
"NY voted for Ocasio Cortez are you really surprised? Half the country believes they're a victim of some faux oppression creating the ""forever victim"". And this thought is courtesy of the leftist. LBJ had a plan and he was 100% correct. 200 years.",Wiseguy2013,e9la5cp,conservative
It's not the R's that instill consumer confidence. And the evidence has been the market since the presidential  election. Most of the R's are failures anyway. ,Wiseguy2013,e9l9ocw,conservative
"Yes it is though. Trump is nothing special, the economy started surging in 2014 after R swept Congress in the midterms.",Okilurknomore,e9m4nqp,conservative
"Id hardly call the 2014-2016 growth a 'surge'.  It was stagnant growth that my investments were paying the tab for. Stagnant meaning, the economy was way below typical so the growth during that time basically brought us back up to square 1. Literally the first week of Trump taking office not only recouped the growth loss of the previous decade, but continually increasing dramatically today.  

The previous administration's borrowed for what growth they were able to gain.  Trump is not special and for that you're right.  But the market confidence seems to love him.  Because of that my investments are finally breaking gain records that I haven't seen since the 90's(when growth was based on the borrowed dollar).",Wiseguy2013,e9m8u1c,conservative
This seems like one that will be hotly contested. I'd rather have them post the Ten Amendments (Bill of Rights). Teach it to them young and why it's important. ,Zylo_001,e9jj3ne,conservative
What happened to separation of church and state?,frozenrope22,e9ka7ws,conservative
"Alabama: let’s break the state monopoly on liquor sales and open it up to competition

Alabama: let’s start a lottery and raise money for schools

Alabama legislature: okay but the 10 Commandments ",Wake_of_the_Flood,e9jf7gy,conservative
"Eh... not that I see any harm in this, it does seem like something kinda odd to push for. But thats just me, im obviously biased. ",Ledcookey,e9jaytu,conservative
[deleted],,e9je32a,conservative
useless.,LilUziHertz,e9jmncj,conservative
"Alabama resident here. It’s important to note that the amendment would not allow government money to be spent on the posting of the ten commandments, which I’ve seen get left out a lot.",HylianINTJ,e9jjrs1,conservative
"""No other Gods before me*""

*except Nick Saban",chlorinehead,e9jfp3a,conservative
Didn’t think it would make for salt mining on this sub.,Lepreco-Inc,e9jgbim,conservative
[removed],,e9j9iu6,conservative
Huge step backwards,Mattprather2112,e9ng5q9,conservative
"This would probably pass constitutional muster given the current makeup of the Supreme Court ([*Van Orden v. Perry*](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Van_Orden_v._Perry)).  But I don't think any cases have yet challenged *new* displays of this nature, and that's where it gets a bit dicey.  

I don't have a problem with the display, but it just seems like these are designed to pick a fight.",joozian_,e9jtsll,conservative
Damn right we did!,Hughwalker0,e9jcqh6,conservative
[deleted],,e9jlt7t,conservative
Good for them!,War-Damn-America,e9kkk00,conservative
Great!,link_ganon,e9jpr3s,conservative
Doesn't matter. Either way some lefty court will declare it unconstitutional and the lawyers get to decide what we are allowed to do.,unibuckeye,e9juv4i,conservative
Weird flex but ok,InquisitorThorn,e9jhzmm,conservative
"It's more neocon'ish, which I'm not a fan of. I think neocons completely held back the Republicans and dropping their rhetoric will only benefit the party. I'm agnostic, but I find no issue with Christianity embedded in the culture and actually dislike atheists trying to seemingly rip things down. I do think things like the bible or general religious teaching can be a positive too.

Saying that, having public schools allowing this is where it rubs me wrong. Private schools, I don't care at all. Public schools there should be a level of not imposing religion on kids. If schools already have these things (ex. a statue of ten commandments), it doesn't make sense to take it down, but to add them in now is where it's crossing a line.",demoloition,e9jfria,conservative
Do you want Baphomets? Because this is how you get Baphomets!,chlorinehead,e9jfn46,conservative
Exactly what I was thinking haha...,WDE45,e9kdey3,conservative
I thought it just disallowed public funds to be used for defending against any lawsuits.,weedful_things,e9jokrv,conservative
Money in fungible,International_Way,e9kbylh,conservative
Rollmen!,fifaislife206,e9k0gy5,conservative
The comments aren't organic,KingOfTheP4s,e9jifbl,conservative
More a quality of soul issue than a quality of life issue I guess.,tenshon,e9j9n0h,conservative
Well if everyone read and followed them it would.,Bejeweled_Bird,e9jl7bq,conservative
Maybe it's time we started picking a gew fights.,unibuckeye,e9jv00s,conservative
Are you going to contribute to the gofundme to pay for the inevitable lawsuits this will bring since public funds won't pay for them? ,weedful_things,e9jom29,conservative
"It is very possible; however, I don't believe that posting the constitution will be as likely to be termed unconstitutional as posting the Ten Commandments. This could be deemed to be favoring one religion over another unless other religious texts/quotes were provided for educational purposes. This would be their strongest argument against this law, and I do not know enough about legal responses to say what the best response against that would be.",Zylo_001,e9jxux0,conservative
not the right context for it bud,LilUziHertz,e9jmnjc,conservative
">It's more neocon'ish

Neoconish would've been erecting a tribute wall to Israel and NAFTA.",lost_snake,e9jws6c,conservative
[deleted],,e9jl6fl,conservative
"As a Christian: I have no problem with Satanists worshipping, as long as they allow me to worship in my way.",unibuckeye,e9juwxa,conservative
"Actually, you’re right. I misremembered, thanks for the correction!",HylianINTJ,e9jrnn4,conservative
Are you implying these comments are shills? They’re all pretty reasonable or just light jokes,demoloition,e9jjizo,conservative
You would be surprised schools have gotten flack for just about every little thing including Bill of Rights,callthereaper64,e9k1jsz,conservative
I don’t think I’ve ever seen someone on reddit use that phrase correctly. ,VeryMint,e9k14v7,conservative
"We would've also accepted ""This ain't it, chief""

Show him what he's won!",lost_snake,e9jwq8m,conservative
"It’s public schools, what free market?",demoloition,e9jm9jn,conservative
"Cosigned. 

Sadly though a lot of people don't realize freedom of religion is freedom for all religions. ",datworkaccountdo,e9k2w5n,conservative
Shhh bby is okay.,weedful_things,e9kfkf2,conservative
What are they so scared about?,mlmack,e9kcvsa,conservative
That would be unconstitutional. Schumer knows that and is just posturing and buying time before he inevitably gets smacked down by the Supreme Court.,hello_japan,e9juxqq,conservative
">Vote for us. We shut down the government over Mueller

DNC 2020",Enzo_SAWFT,e9jssq9,conservative
Doesn't the President have to sign that spending bill? Like he would if they tried.,Havebaconwilltravel,e9jyikx,conservative
Maybe you should pay for it yourself. ,ozric101,e9jsmcu,conservative
"Go ahead, Schumer, shutdown the government, I don’t care. ",superdude411,e9k537o,conservative
Go right ahead.  It'll be Dems that get blamed for the shutdown.,AM_Kylearan,e9k4b5b,conservative
"Why would it be unconstitutional? 

Mueller is not a principle officer of the United States and we have statutes that limit the ability of the president to remove officers. ",memberCP,e9l5apz,conservative
"Mueller seized more assets from Manafort than the entire investigation cost, so isn't *the Mueller probe* paying for it itself?",Ranlier,e9jtkrz,conservative
"> It'll be Dems that get blamed for the shutdown.

""Hold my pumpkin-spice soy latte"" - MSM",Jizzlobber42,e9kesil,conservative
"Because Muller is under the authority of the DOJ which is in the executive branch which is under the authority of the president. What statute limits the ability of the president to remove positions that are not even mentioned in the constitution? I would question whether such a statute was itself constitutional.

Also whether or not he is a principal officer is an open question. [Levin](https://www.crtv.com/video/ep454--levintv-exclusive-robert-muellers-appointment-is-unconstitutional?utm_source=cr&utm_medium=referral&utm_campaign=levin-free-episodes&utm_term=levin&utm_content=levin-ep-454-link-052218-cr) and Dr. Calabresi have been arguing for some time that, as Muller is far more powerful than any prosecutor in the US that he is in fact a principal officer and as such he should have been confirmed by the senate and as he was not confirmed, he is violating the Appointments Clause of the constitution.",hello_japan,e9l8bo9,conservative
its not like those assets go right into the special counsels budget. ,iwasthebeaver,e9jvn2s,conservative
"The Congress can bind the process for which the president fires someone to one of for cause. Which would limit the ability of the president. It doesn't prevent it wholesale, but it does make them follow a process. ",memberCP,e9l97n6,conservative
"> What statute limits the ability of the president to remove positions that are not even mentioned in the constitution?

https://www.ecfr.gov/cgi-bin/text-idx?SID=28f9a33cf15632118467b6a4974270e0&mc=true&node=pt28.2.600&rgn=div5

>  The Special Counsel may be disciplined or removed from office only by the personal action of the Attorney General. The Attorney General may remove a Special Counsel for misconduct, dereliction of duty, incapacity, conflict of interest, or for other good cause, including violation of Departmental policies. The Attorney General shall inform the Special Counsel in writing of the specific reason for his or her removal.

What are your arguments that this statute is unconstitutional?",Mamposteao,e9olyr5,conservative
100% Correct. But they *do* prevent the SC from being a net drain on taxpayer resources.,Ranlier,e9jvxmz,conservative
Wouldn’t it be a violation of separation of powers for congress to prevent or limit the president from firing someone in the executive branch? I’m fairly certain that that would also be unconstitutional.,hello_japan,e9l9jax,conservative
Who does the attorney general work for? And in what branch? And who is the head of that branch? Let’s start there.,hello_japan,e9ompce,conservative
The money the special counsel is ~~spending~~ wasting is probably the last item on my list of complaints about it. ,iwasthebeaver,e9jvzqr,conservative
"For example, when Comey was fired he went through a process and Rosenstein had to clearly define what the cause is for.

Congress can make rules, but they cannot go to far. There's a balance. ",memberCP,e9lcrbg,conservative
Feel free to lay out your complete argument. ,Mamposteao,e9omsmq,conservative
"What's top then? Mueller is a seasoned law enforcement official finding and prosecuting criminals, the question is what *else* he's doing and how appropriate.",Ranlier,e9jw58v,conservative
"Rosenstein was not constitutionally required to define what the cause was for. He recommended that Comey be fired in a memo, but the decision was ultimately entirely Trumps. Rosenstein had zero authority to fire Comey as deputy AG. The constitutional authority rests with Trump as the head of the executive branch. The deputy AG is not even mentioned in the constitution.

Congress has no authority over the executive branch whatsoever except for rare situations that are clearly delineated by the constitution like their role in impeachment or the 25th amendment, that is the essence of separation of powers. Nor does Trump have the power to fire any congressperson. Trump firing a congressperson would be an equivalent constitutional violation to congress preventing Trump from firing someone in the executive branch. It’s not to say that they won’t try, but it would be unconstitutional, as many things they try and do are unconstitutional and our current Supreme Court would almost certainly rule that it was unconstitutional.",hello_japan,e9ld3ds,conservative
"Feel free to answer my questions, I’m not writing you a legal brief on request. We can have a discussion if you like, or not.",hello_japan,e9on65q,conservative
"My biggest complaint is that Rosenstein changed the scope of the investigation and refuses to tell anybody why or what the scope was changed to, including the judges overseeing his ~~persecutions~~ prosecutions.",iwasthebeaver,e9jwn08,conservative
"Mueller is an incompetent idiot or a deep state hack, or both.

Go watch any of his appearances before congress over the years.

Is that your idea of competence?  He is more evasive about any questions than Hillary Clinton. ",ozric101,e9kj0hu,conservative
I’d like a discussion. But I can’t participate further without knowing your argument. ,Mamposteao,e9ontcn,conservative
"Ok. In the first place, I didn’t claim that statute was unconstitutional, I made the claim that the legislative branch prohibiting the executive branch from firing the special counsel would be unconstitutional because it would violate separation of powers.

There is nothing in the statute you cited that prohibits the executive branch from firing the special counsel, as the AG (and the DOJ) is in the executive branch, which is headed by the president. That is what my questions were meant to illustrate. There is nothing that prevents the president from ordering the AG, who is under his authority as he is in the executive branch, from firing a special counsel except for the political consequences that he would suffer up to and including impeachment or if the AG chose to resign instead of carrying out his order.",hello_japan,e9oox7r,conservative
I just wished we didn’t solely focus on Florida. Sinema has over 32k votes over McSally. And 130k more votes than when Clinton ran for office in 2016. And now the democrat running for Arizona Sec of State is now up 150 votes. ,xPineappless,e9j7vpe,conservative
I hope this woman is our next US Attorney General over Christi. She strike fear in the hearts of wrongdoers in our state by just the potential utterance of her name.,SendixBunny,e9ixbdd,conservative
Based and hot.,Red-Lantern,e9j6ivn,conservative
A little late to the party but very pleased to see her.,StephenScherer1,e9jbypc,conservative
Urging?!?!? How about ordering. ,BIG_HUB,e9ja5oh,conservative
"Police union: ""No thanks, we're gonna pass on that.""",user1492,e9js5mk,conservative
"Urging? WTF, what ever happened to ""I order you""?",BaronFalcon,e9jsef3,conservative
Doesn’t she have the power to launch that investigation?,punishedpat76,e9kfgou,conservative
"""Urging police to investigate""?

How about ordering the police to investigate?

Put your f**king pants on and get this started now!",caferrell,e9kraq4,conservative
Wtf 130k more than Clinton? That’s an insane jump. Was voter turnout in AZ significantly higher usual? Do you know if McSally has gotten more votes than Trump did in 2016?,Tau23481992,e9j801z,conservative
"Ewww...look, I have a confession to make, I used to be super lefty, back when I was young and impressionable. I was an obnoxious liberal teenager arguing politics on TOTSE, and in my early 20s, back when I had the first reddit account I ever made, I may have possibly, allegedly, purportedly been a part of SRS. It was a long time ago, I don't recall and I plead the 5th. 

I've done a complete 180 and come a long way down the line since then, but two beliefs have carried over from my sordid left-wing past: Fuck Rick Scott, and Fuck Pam Bondi. Scott was a terrible governor, a glad-handing literal dickhead who lied about expanding Medicaid and gloated about the lie, rather than making an argument in the first place that the expansion was a bad idea and holding his ground. He waltzed in after hurricanes for photo ops and never did shit that was tangible for the victims affected. And Pam Bondi, how many times has she been accused of corruption and beat the rap by just waiting it out until everyone stopped caring? She's like a right-wing, WASP, qt 3.14 version of Brenda goddamn Snipes on that score. And how much utterly stupid shit is she on the record saying? It's like there's an ever looping record of asinine bullshit playing in her head and she just randomly opens her mouth and quotes whatever the needle's just stopped on. She sucks. Scott sucks. They both SUCK. 

Now, I held my nose and cast my vote for Rick Scott for senator, because the Senate must remain Red god damn it, and Bill Nelson had to fall. But Bondi is just too much. I pray to God the job doesn't fall to her, just because she's an admittedly tempting MILF, which would carry on a pattern in appointments that's quite frankly started to worry me. Please, give the job to literally any other candidate. Kris Kobach. Trey Gowdy. Hell, give to the Kyle ""Based Stickman"" Chapman, let him carry a shillelagh dubbed 'the Gavel' and cudgel motherfuckers when they don't act right. But please, please, do not make Pam Bondi the US Attorney General. That's a horrible damn idea. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9jafzf,conservative
She’s fucking smokin’ got for someone who is 53. I thought she was much younger than she is. ,Tau23481992,e9j84uz,conservative
"Now, now, you wouldn't actually want your elected GOP officials to actually *do anything* when they in power, would you?",nited_states,e9jei1h,conservative
Maricopa county came in significantly bluer than usual.,BeowulfShaeffer,e9j8j34,conservative
"Also she took a $25k campaign donation from Trump just before not having Florida join in on the multi-state lawsuit against his university. He probably won't bring her into the spotlight too much on purpose, what with the appearance of a bribe and all.",flavorraven,e9jczdi,conservative
Can't believe Gowdy isn't getting more love.,nited_states,e9jeirk,conservative
"> TOTSE

Damn, that brought back some memories!",Silicon_Avatar,e9jajj7,conservative
"Late response, but I 100% disagree with your assessments of both of them, especially Rick Scott. It was what he did *before* three major hurricanes that hit all three coastlines of this state. He had the state mobilized. He had everyone taking it seriously. He got gas into the state when it was incredibly scarce.

Also, he protected Visit Florida from getting gutted from the legislature. There's more to this state than being ""The Disney World State.""",SendixBunny,e9mqync,conservative
"Neck and neck all election.  Sinema +3 on election day.

However, they start going through this giant stack of uncounted ballots (conveniently mailed in without the actual voter needing to be present at a polling station) and suddenly it's Sinema +15 on just this batch.  Give me a break.",nited_states,e9jef96,conservative
"Gowdy is all bark.  I'll hand it to him, he sounds impressive in soundbites, but he is not going to actually do anything more then Sessions.",Random57473838,e9jkfdy,conservative
"Yeah, because we really need to lose that seat in a special election.",SendixBunny,e9ji3nb,conservative
"Not everything is a conspiracy, this is how AZ votes. Sinema squeaking out a win would be [consistent with polls leading up to the election](https://projects.fivethirtyeight.com/2018-midterm-election-forecast/senate/arizona/undefined/).  I think the Sinema +15 was Pima county. I lived there, it is very blue.
  
There is a good chance McSally replaces Kyl in 2019 though (in McCain’s old seat).",BeowulfShaeffer,e9jemvn,conservative
"I thought he already retired from Congress.

EDIT: He did. And a Republican just won his seat 60/40.
",nited_states,e9ji5ju,conservative
"Oh wait, I was thinking of Devin Nunes.",SendixBunny,e9jjhen,conservative
"I mean who wants to work in that liberal utopian shit hole.  Elected officials constantly undermine police. Don't worry the brave city council will vote against these racist bigot police officers. They probably could easily afford to pay their officers far better if they didn't pay a ton of city workers to clean needles off their streets everymorning. Shit pay, free roam of druggies and Antifa along with crap virtue signaling politicians who would want to work there.",glockedup1,e9kq699,conservative
Cops are treated like shit.  Not sure why anyone would want to join these days.  ,hipsterdufus84,e9knuo2,conservative
"I would love to see that slimeball run for president, imagine him on a stage debating O'Rourke",Iamabioticgod,e9j8a32,conservative
"ASSAULT is gettind in someone's face in a threatening manner. 

This was ASSAULT.",StephenScherer1,e9jha3v,conservative
"Don’t you know that the left can’t commit assault/rape, be racist, or anything else illegal? Only republicans can break the law of be morally corrupt. Duhhh",Dmfconrad,e9jxakk,conservative
"To be fair, he works with a lot of them. He must see whores everywhere now. Poor thing (this is meant to be an /s comment by the way! I’m not serious)",azngirl7689,e9jufdo,conservative
Do you mean Beta O'Rourke?,tehForce,e9jhq0p,conservative
19 years old is not a child. ,MrFizzardsWizard,e9jxn4l,conservative
It’s kinda amazing how often conservatives start advocating that speech is violence ,slinkymaster,e9k470p,conservative
"Beta would destroy him, then Trump would do the same to Beta",LilUziHertz,e9jmpcf,conservative
"Thanks for the correction. Tucker looks younger than his years. Didn't expect his daughter to be 19.

Getting in her face is ASSAULT and the queer piece of human sewage should be sent to prison. ",StephenScherer1,e9k4rq1,conservative
"When you get in the face of a 19 year old young Lady that is NOT Free Speech that is ASSAULT, if additionally you block her path of travel it is FALSE IMPRISONMENT. I caution you that a jury will consider you less than a gentleman (as do I).",StephenScherer1,e9k5g0z,conservative
Words have meanings. Assault has a specific meaning.,orangeeyedunicorn,e9kcc8g,conservative
Except that conservatives don't show up at peoples houses to scare the women and children.,SilverHerfer,e9izhdr,conservative
Two wrongs don't make a right; let's not lower ourselves to their level.,MarioFanaticXV,e9j7t1r,conservative
"Incel is another word rendered meaningless by its misuse by the left. Shame, it was an interesting word. ",fcuk_the_king,e9jb3u7,conservative
sacrifice him to the lizards!!! /s,SmokeGoodEatGood,e9jpjrk,conservative
"Turnabout is fair play, bitch.  You deserve what you get.",anuser999,e9j98af,conservative
What's a Doxx?,Falkamper,e9j7xbt,conservative
Tough shit.,chabanais,e9jim5o,conservative
"For every action, there is an equal, yet opposite, reaction.",TruthfulTrolling,e9k5dhu,conservative
This is why people say fake news ,Emperor_Aurelian,e9kcytw,conservative
White pages.....m doxx means uncover an annon ID,krepogregg,e9jlym3,conservative
"Right or wrong aside. This guy is *begging* to get messed with. This guy should keep his mouth shut. Even if you hate Carlson and want to see him harassed. Just take the ""win"" and shut up. This type of smug overconfidence is their undoing.",Glochidiate,e9jmegu,conservative
"This is just how it's gonna go now. Sooner or later enough people will be hurt and killed that it will be enough. The news won't stop whipping these REEEEeistsnce idiots into a frenzy about how the world is gonna end tomorrow because orange man. Now they're trying to break down people's doors. The response will be people retaliating in kind. This is what the news wants. This is what Maxine Waters, Hillary Clinton and Eric Holder all called for. People are going to end up dead for TV news ratings and ad clicks. ",FreeSpeechRocks,e9juwc4,conservative
"The only actual hate crimes trump could’ve incited are those against Muslims and illegal immigrants. A religion that is constantly a threat to freedom and people who want free entry into the greatest country. While neither deserved to be attacked, comparing this vile harassment against an innocent family to the possible harassment incited by someone that isn’t tucker, makes no sense. ",ELMTAvalanche,e9jqcxp,conservative
[removed],,e9ipixn,conservative
We are not them.,fdubzou,e9jidte,conservative
What a cowardly piece of human sewage ,StephenScherer1,e9jd7aa,conservative
[deleted],,e9j03co,conservative
We didn't do it.  Someone from 4chan did.,StraightNewt,e9jdwkn,conservative
Remember who and what they are. They behave like queer Bolsheviks. It's just a matter of time intil they force us to use deadly force. No need to feel bad afterwards.,StephenScherer1,e9jddaj,conservative
Exactly. We want to be the party of morality. This is how we do it. We can condemn both things.,CouLesKy,e9k4yq4,conservative
"Fuck that, taking the high road when they won't just means that we end up getting the shit end of the stick every damned time.  It's time to stop pretending this is just a civil disagreement.",anuser999,e9j9b39,conservative
"I thought it was hilarious how fast the whole ""Incel"" movement got thrown under the bus by the left. There was no #NotAllIncels coming from the progressives. They're all just violent misogynists. Also, the lumping in of MGTOW and Incels was also pretty eyebrow raising. Really shows the biases when certain groups do certain violence and they either smear all of them as their worst or not.",Glochidiate,e9jmckc,conservative
"No, we dont want this. We want to be better than them and not go to their level. We should be better than that and can be. We dont want this to happen because someone lashed out. We should rally against it and be better than this happening regardless who it's against.",Raqriz,e9j9suu,conservative
"He's another hacker, like 4chan",DanReach,e9j8d5x,conservative
"Personal info made public, like address, phone number, etc. in an attempt to harass or embarrass someone. ",Nats_Enough,e9jafu1,conservative
Doxx is when they release your person info on the internet. ,Idiocrazy,e9jicqm,conservative
Publishing private or identifying information (eg home address) on the internet with malicious intent.,StephenScherer1,e9jdklp,conservative
"This was what I wanted to bring up.  My entire childhood you could have found just about anybody's address given a name and general metro area.  Very few people were ""unlisted"".

Even though nobody has a phonebook anymore, all this is available if they own property, usually online.

The word ""doxx"" no longer has any meaning.

Also, even though we could find all public officials there was always an unspoken rule in our society that you don't disturb the peace in their neighborhood.  Just common decency type of stuff...",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9jslv6,conservative
"Please, no. Let’s not stoop to their level.",M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9iyagy,conservative
That guy wasn't a conservative. He was a crazy person.,Argonut32,e9j0p97,conservative
"IIRC, his dox was out there from the last time he tried to be a craven asshole along these lines... may have been when that mob showed up at a house of a CEO for some company in a maryland suburb of DC",Cinnadillo,e9jo6is,conservative
Carlson and his family were completely justified in using deadly force at the time of the attack. That's very different from instigating such attacks ourselves.,MarioFanaticXV,e9jdl2n,conservative
What the hell?,AgentSkidMarks,e9jjv8i,conservative
"Violence against violence does nothing besides hurt those around us. We do need to take the high road and let the violent people suffer through legal justice. We, as centralist or conservatives, should not lower ourselves to violence or to their level. Yes, we get angry and want to lash out, but we are adults and should be able to control our emotions and our actions. Dont be like them, be an adult and responsible person.",Raqriz,e9j9p6g,conservative
"Feminists want men to express their feelings, except when those feelings don't align with feminist dogma.",0110110101100010,e9jxvq2,conservative
"> No, we dont want this.

Agreed.  But if they're going to choose this path, well, we can't just let ourselves get beat on.

> We should be better than that and can be.

Why?  What benefit do we get?  We can be as ""upstanding"" as we want, they'll turn around and demonize us regardless.  Tucker was one of the least offensive and most milquetoast conservative pundits around and he *still* got demonized and targeted.  At what point do we open our eyes to the fact that they *hate* us and no amount of ""being better"" will change that?

> We should rally against it and be better than this happening regardless who it's against.

They escalated it to this, *they* have to be the ones to rally against it and stop it.  Until they do the only thing that refusing to fight back does is give them an unopposed path to victory.  Remember: the media will lie and cover for them so any hopes of the middle seeing this and recoiling simply won't happen.",anuser999,e9ja05t,conservative
"look, we’re conservatives. we play hard and we win. we win because we play hard. liberals lose because they dont play hard. they play like cowards, which is what that attack was

now I’m definitely not condoning people go over there and split his wig or something. but that guy doesn’t know that. lets assume he is afraid right now. and that is a satisfying thought",SmokeGoodEatGood,e9jpi9i,conservative
">No, we dont want this. We want to be better than them and not go to their level. 

This is a good way to lose.",lost_snake,e9js8wv,conservative
Who is this four channn?,skarface6,e9ja25t,conservative
"That's not okay.  Sounds like a crime, is it?  I dont know how it works for public figures.",Falkamper,e9jd6xs,conservative
Also that was original reason they were paid higher wages,krepogregg,e9juaqt,conservative
"Right? 

An *organized* group of leftist activists stalk, harrass, and openly threaten a journalist's family with the blessing of the MSM: *It was just a bunch of rowdy kids! Calm down, old man!*

A socially isolated, mentally unstable indovidual with no bearing on mainstream society whatsoever tries to intimidate politicians: *THE WHITE REPUBLICAN PATRIARCHY IS COMPLICIT IN TERRORISM!*",Hohenschweinen,e9j1hnx,conservative
Aka A lefty ,JobieWanKenobi,e9j0s78,conservative
[deleted],,e9j1pxi,conservative
Deadly force probably not; physical force and citizens arrest Probably.,StephenScherer1,e9jhiyp,conservative
"A little honesty please.

STALKING & ASSAULT

ASSAULT is getting on someone's face in an aggressive manner.

PROSECUTE STALKING
PROSECUTE ASSAULT",StephenScherer1,e9k2d1a,conservative
"> We do need to take the high road and let the violent people suffer through legal justice.

Great, and while we do that our people are repeatedly harmed.  And of course this all hinges on appealing to an authority system that may well be compromised by the same people as the ones harming us.  What then?

> We, as centralist or conservatives, should not lower ourselves to violence or to their level.

We've been ""holding ourselves high"" for how long now and things just keep getting worse?  They attack us, they cheat elections, and through all that we just let it happen in pursuit of some unknown benefit?

""Being an adult"" only works when dealing with other adults *or* when in a position of total power over the other side (i.e. raising children).  We are not fortunate enough to be in either of those situations and thus trying to use the tactics suited for them simply guarantees failure and loss.",anuser999,e9ja7ew,conservative
">Violence against violence does nothing besides hurt those around us. 

...the second world war would seem to disprove your feel-good mantras.

> We do need to take the high road and let the violent people suffer through legal justice.

Which includes ""castle doctrine"" in some states, and should absolutely be used. 

",soylent_absinthe,e9jamyp,conservative
Violence on my doorstep at night when I’m home alone equals shots fired,Idiocrazy,e9jibwi,conservative
Sort of like Eric Clanton? (Bike lock dude),BobbyT486,e9jsnu7,conservative
We can still stand up for ourselves without stooping to their level. We can still decry bad behavior and criticize those who engage in it while not doing it ourselves. ,MallNinja45,e9jkxwa,conservative
"Once we do what they do, there is no longer anyone doing the right thing. This will firstly make us hypocrites and secondly give the radicals no reason to stop, and in fact more reason to continue. And if you say “they won’t stop anyway”, just know that the likelihood is higher when they don’t have specific attacks to point to. This kind of stuff won’t go away, but it might get smaller... or bigger.",Infinity_Over_Zero,e9jbr4c,conservative
"> Why? What benefit do we get? We can be as ""upstanding"" as we want, they'll turn around and demonize us regardless.

Moral action or rather lack of immoral action in this case is not really meant to provide you with a benefit. It is just the baseline behavior for living in a civilized society. When you throw that out the window, you become equally guilty for escalating things. This isn't the Hatfields vs the Mccoys. We can only control our own behavior.",greatatdrinking,e9jtdmz,conservative
They say he's a defector from the 9gag army. Made off with a top secret Rageface schematic after crippling their meme production apparatus. Been on the run ever since. ,Armageddon_It,e9jgbx9,conservative
A phantom in the shadows fighting wars that we've never heard of,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9k83lu,conservative
The one true creator of the great tribes of KEKistan.,for_the_meme_watch,e9jjvt5,conservative
"Depends how the information was collected. If I were to post a photo of my home, and you correctly identified the location of that home and told everyone... that's not illegal yet.",DogBirdLizard,e9jjbbw,conservative
"Most doxxing is perfectly legal. It's the threats or harassment that'd go along with it that is illegal. Also, a lot of the information people use when doxxing is publicly available if you look in the right spots. 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Doxing",hockeyfan1133,e9k0vxe,conservative
A mob can consist of typically sane people who are overwhelmed by emotion.  ,8K12,e9j2ed3,conservative
Liberal in the sense of classically liberal,Dranosh,e9j2uvd,conservative
"In Texas hell yeah, at least a warning shot.  We defend our property out here.",Idiocrazy,e9jiaxc,conservative
If they had breeched the door completely they would have been in their legal rights ,Cinnadillo,e9jo7l3,conservative
"Comments like your first are why people think we’re crazy. You do realize that, right?",AgentSkidMarks,e9kreyf,conservative
"Well for starters I'm a Vet, and while I'm not  WW2 vet, I did my time in combat. All of the vets I've met had strong hand shakes and approval of passing the mantel on to us that fight and want to be honorable. 

Castle is invading a home or a ""castle"" which is a home, some states its extended to a vehicle, but not many. It's also home defense only. If someone breaks in you can take action, if not then you cannot. ",Raqriz,e9jjb69,conservative
"They're not going to stop just because you want to play ""fair"" or ""nice."" Demographically, culturally, and morally this country is headed for a very rough century.",DogBirdLizard,e9jjegb,conservative
">Once we do what they do, there is no longer anyone doing the right thing.

Being principled about a standard a hostile competitor has abandoned ensures your defeat.

Allowing the left more ground to enforce their vision is ultimately less moral.",lost_snake,e9jsbc5,conservative
"The radicals have shown no signs of stopping despite our ""doing the right thing"" thus far.  At some point we have to accept the fact that we are not dealing with rational people or people who share our values - the values that make your desired path in any way viable.",anuser999,e9jd2sl,conservative
So your solution is to appease radicals in the hope they might eventually stop being radical?,farbenreichwulf,e9jl3d9,conservative
">If there is an evil too great to be destroyed by moral means, what do you do? Do you stain your hands with evil in order to destroy the greater evil, or do you remain steadfast in your morality and lose to evil?

Forgot where I heard that quote, but I know which option I've chosen.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9k6qyi,conservative
"Many Shuvs and Zuuls knew what it was to be roasted in the depths of the Slor that day, I can tell you!",J-Vito,e9jiofc,conservative
"I just took my handgun carry class here in TN and our law actually says we cannot use deadly force to defend property, which I did not know. However, once your residence is breached, you're free and clear to use deadly force.",sceleris927,e9jka6n,conservative
"I was in VA for a few years and you cannot shoot at a home invader unless you have proven that you had no other options for a safe escape.

Now I'm back in TX and I can not even tell you how much happier I am to have stand-your-ground laws back. Nothing is more nerve wracking than having your husband working nights and you might not be legally allowed to even defend yourself in your own home. I pray I'll never need to use my firearm for it, but lord knows that there's nothing else out there that can equalize a dangerous situation for a woman quite like having a gun.",Mewster1818,e9kkqoq,conservative
If they are on your property and you have asked them to leave and they refuse they are trespassing and then the attempt to break in his door is a clear threat.    BOOM goes the hipster asshole’s skull.,booblitchutz,e9jud94,conservative
Oh YES. Had the pounding on the door OPENED the door they could have been met with a shotgun blast ,StephenScherer1,e9k3q24,conservative
"Really? When you commit felony Assault any citizen can hold you for the police. It's actually their duty as a citizen. 

 Admittedly there are those amoung us who take our duty more seriously we call these people Patriots or just Americans. There are those amoung us who fear to protect others (like 19 year old girls) they may call the police or they may just urinate in their pants, we call them wusses or cowards. I personally fit very solidly into one of those two groups. He who commits felony assault on a girl in my presence will immediately find out if I am a Southern Gentleman or a coward. (PS The last one was happier than a 5 year old on Christmas morning ---- when the deputy took him away from me. The woman was also grateful.)

",StephenScherer1,e9kx2l7,conservative
"> Well for starters I'm a Vet, and while I'm not WW2 vet, I did my time in combat. All of the vets I've met had strong hand shakes and approval of passing the mantel on to us that fight and want to be honorable.

Your response makes me think that you may have missed the point - being that violence *is* sometimes the answer, contrary to your platitude that it ""does nothing besides hurt those around us."" 

",soylent_absinthe,e9k46ps,conservative
"This is what really matters- the outcome.

Allowing the left to continue as they are and escalate their attacks until they've gotten their destructive agenda pushed through via force and intimidation is the greater evil.

When it comes to allowing them to run rampant and take America down the path of ruin *or* using immoral means in order to push back against them and save this country- well- there's simply no comparison.

If the left's vision of America ever comes to fruition millions will suffer. If I have to roll around in the gutter in order to prevent that happening then so be it.

If some of the users here want to steadfastly cling to their principles as they watch the country they love burn then they can go ahead and do so, but I refuse to do so. I have no problem getting my hands dirty.

To use a reference that any lurking leftists here will understand: Murder is evil. Yet Harry Potter murdered Voldemort. Harry committed an evil act to destroy the greater evil.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9k7841,conservative
I don’t see how doxxing or being violent against someone who justifies their violence by calling us “evil” is gonna get them to stop. Seems more a reaction out of anger and revenge than anything attempting a victory.,Infinity_Over_Zero,e9jtba4,conservative
"As opposed to doing what they do in hopes they stop being radical? I mean if they think we’re evil now, actually doing something evil will only empower them.  
  
My solution would be to punish radicals who do violent or illegal things through a justice system we invented for just that purpose.",Infinity_Over_Zero,e9jt47z,conservative
"Uh, I don’t think political harassment is “an evil too great to be destroyed by moral means”. That sounds like it’d describe, say, Adolf Hitler, not whiny little punks playing activism. ",Infinity_Over_Zero,e9k845l,conservative
Sucks for Tennessee ,Idiocrazy,e9jwv1u,conservative
"Who says I'm calling for anyone to be doxxed or calling for violence? 


I just think the appropriate response to Yglesias whinimg about this is to say 'I can't sympathize with you on any level' as he did and carry on with my day.

Turnabout is fair play.

",lost_snake,e9jud1h,conservative
I suppose I'm looking at the long term.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9lsax1,conservative
"Oh. Hm. I suppose that’s a fair enough response.  
I don’t agree with what was done to him but I don’t really think I’ll lose sleep over it. Good enough then. We shouldn’t stoop to that level,  and it is wrong, but I guess bad things happen to bad people.",Infinity_Over_Zero,e9jxusr,conservative
Chronic anything isn’t good for you. Are we still the party of less government? ,CASunDevil24,e9ksujt,conservative
"We could change this to Alcohol has serious effects on the brain, experts say. Yet alcohol is legal. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9ksvi2,conservative
"The fact that pot is listed as a Class 1 drug is ridiculous, if I’m in chronic pain (no pun intended) I’d much rather light up a joint than take some prescribed opioids.",Rabidraccoon76,e9l6p4z,conservative
"Alcohol, benzos, sugar, what else is new?",memberCP,e9l5l4l,conservative
Chronic user... traded in my Norco. Reading this story reminded me of how fragile some people are. They were effed up to begin with. Suffering from PTSD? LOL,lax714,e9krd5l,conservative
"TLDR: anti-marijuana doc publishes article making broad claims about marijuana addictiveness without much data. 

I am not a strong proponent of legalizing for recreational use except on libertarian grounds, but this article has some tension between the title and the content of the article. The subtitle of the article contradicts the title when it says that more research needs to be done regarding the impact on the brain. They also go into some detail about how there exists no standard definition of what a chronic user is, which means any data aggregated on the topic is going to be difficult to draw general conclusions from; without consistent definitions to form benchmarks, it’s very hard to make inferences.

There is strong evidence to suggest that the higher THC contents in modern cannabis strains can have detrimental effects on the brain - especially on the brains of adolescents and those who are predisposed to psychological disorders like schizophrenia. There’s even some evidence to suggest that altering the ratio between THC and CBD’s in cannabis can have detrimental effects on the brain. 

I have no doubt that marijuana is both addictive and has negative side effects for many users, but 
this reads more like a tabloid hit piece than an informative analysis on emerging scholarship. The anecdotal evidence they have for the addictiveness and negative side-effects of “chronic” use seems to be based on individuals who are already in an increased risk group for addiction to any substance. No less, almost all of the studies linked to in this article are focused on the impact of marijuana on the juvenile or adolescent brain, not the adult brain.

Finally, the author - Dr Shamard Charles - is an anti-cannabis advocate who is broadly published in the news media on exclusively this issue. Although he has been featured in some YouTube videos, searching his name on Google reveals a flurry of anti-cannabis articles in the last six months. His claims range from, “marijuana is worse for the brain than alcohol”, to “marijuana ages the brain by three years”. None of these claims are backed up with better data than the article linked above. ",leonkennedy74,e9kubfn,conservative
"NBC news eh....



Trump might be getting close to legalizing. Gotta taint the well now.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9kuw9q,conservative
"Chronic leftism can have serious effects on the brain, too.",superdude411,e9m2ng2,conservative
"Oh, look, more propaganda.",Odoacer476CE,e9m95mk,conservative
"Sessions was trying to save us, but we just wouldn't listen.

I expect the ""dude weed lmao"" downvoting, lucky for me, chronic marijuana use harms short-term memory, so they probably won't remember my offense to their sacred leaf.",Silicon_Avatar,e9krj6v,conservative
I am not a fan of 'victimless crime' at all.  Kind of hard to face your accuser. ,ozric101,e9kwl33,conservative
Or maybe where does the government get off telling me what I can and cant do in my free time? ,dayman35,e9ktucl,conservative
Booze and tobacco are infinitely worse and I don’t see anyone scrambling to ban those. Sessions absurd focus on civil asset forfeitures and weed was beyond out of touch and no longer aligns with the vast majority of the Conservatives.,SirRollsaSpliff,e9kxkie,conservative
"Well jeez, as an adult I thought it was up to me to make my own decisions. Are you sure you're not a liberal?  I thought they were the ones that wanted the government to save everyone.  ",teardrop36,e9lbwyk,conservative
Any health care reform that gets through now Dems will get credit for. Republicans absolutely blew this and it could hurt them in 2020.,the-divine-comedy,e9jxjkt,conservative
"I'm not entirely against a baseline health coverage, akin to Medicaid level of care for everyone, with the option to purchase higher forms of insurance. I'm thinking it would cover things such as a primary care physician, basic health screenings, maybe even one eye exam or dental checkup/cleaning. Anything beyond that would require private coverage.

People can't get healthy if they can't get to the doctor on semi regular basis. If they can't get to the doctor, problems just get worse.

We also need to curb excess spending in the private sector, while also mandating open and clear pricing models, and do away with penalties for ""doctor shopping.""",Sideswipe0009,e9kcj9l,conservative
"The biggest single factor to reduce healthcare costs in america would be to financially penalize people who eat too much and are overweight.

Either the foods they eat like sugar which cause the problems could be taxed  to change behavior and correctly allocate cost to cause or the individuals themselves must be charged more if they are overweight for healthcare which is now legally prohibited.

",Aszaszasz,e9jyeoy,conservative
"True.

No competition anda giant government run system would raise prices and stop choice and innovation.

However healthcare will be the giant issue in 2020 as growth and jobs will be mostly solved and tax cuts have taken place. It already had a hand in 2018.

So conservwtives and republicans must be successful with programs to drastifally lower prices by increasing competition, lowering barriers to entryto competitors such as eliminating CON laws which prohibit the construcction of new healthcare facilties nationwide,  stopping drug price manipulation by companoes, stopping drug anti competitive fda issuances like happened with red yeast rice and now fish oil as prescriptions stopping supplement competition...yes now they did it to fish oil,   the defeat of the AMA as a restrictor of competition to tue old failed doctor training program, the allowance of AI diagnosis on the internet WITHOUT HUMAN DOCOTR APPROVAL (AI now proven BETTER than doctors so why should they be paid to approve it?) 


Conservwtives and Republicans need to show they drastically reduce healthcare costs or they will lose in 2020. Everyone is tired of getting raped in this country by our current healthcare system which is designed only to maintain us  citizens as sheep for the fleecing..

It can be done but it cant be done without drastically overthrowing the hospital, drug and doctor control lobbies and models.

This will mean drastic job losses and wage reversals in healthcare like happened in the airline industry when it was deregulated. And the healthcare inefficiencies and high costs have grown so much and become so wasteful that it is a staggering part of our gnp.  So fixing healthcare buy lowering costs could actually cause a technical DROP in GNP. . It is why Obama didnt do it with Obamacare. But there is no other way.

The the only other part of the economy as distorted and screwed up by dislocations and anti competitive behavior is the college and university education system which also needs a complete teardown reboot.


Like with subsidized university loans, if conservatices cant actual make something drastic happen in healthcarecost reduction by factors of 5 or 10 then the public will simply prefer the government subsidized health insurance option which will continue to pump more government money into a broken system just like student loans did.

Healthcare needs DRASTIC CHANGE. And it all starts with the acceptance of the fact that doctors and big pharma and big hospitals fhains are the roadblock to cost reduction and they cannot remain in control of healthcare.",Aszaszasz,e9jx3y4,conservative
">Either the foods they eat like sugar which cause the problems could be taxed to change behavior

I disagree here. Excise taxes on vices such as smokes and liquor hasn't exactly changed peoples habits, they just make sacrifices elsewhere.

One place to start could be limiting the amount of sugary snacks and drinks that can be purchased with food stamps. Last I heard, these items accounted for close 10-20% of total food stamp costs.

But ""get healthy"" ads, akin to the ""stop smoking"" ads,  would also help.

Better health education in schools would also help.

This is a change that will take generations to correct, so we need tactics that reflect this.",Sideswipe0009,e9kb7ia,conservative
Instead of socialized health insurance we should have government approved meal plans and fitness requirements. I can taste the liberty. ,slinkymaster,e9k4rdz,conservative
">Either the foods they eat like sugar which cause the problems could be taxed to change behavior and correctly allocate cost to cause or the individuals themselves must be charged more if they are overweight for healthcare which is now legally prohibited.

But the tax would punish everybody, including non-overweight people. Your second point is what it should be based of off, but the factor should be body fat percentage (definitely not BMI). BMI puts muscular people in the same category as overweight people, and it's the athletic people that are much less likely to go to a doctor for a preventable illness. If excess body fat percentage is the criteria though, that will make sure to only affect the people who are at the highest risk for those problems. We need to give the insurance companies back the power to control who they will cover with their own resources and put some responsibility back into the hand of the people of this country instead of trying to babysit everyone. ",AManHasNoFear,e9k6v0n,conservative
"Hitleresque.  If you cannot win the election, force yourself into office by other means.

Absolutely disgraceful.",BrighamYoung,e9k8cmq,conservative
"The headline in not even close to reality...          

This was about impounding what should be idle voting equipment and any extra ballots. ",ozric101,e9khrvv,conservative
"Trump should have seized the opportunity and offered her asylum in the US. Then when the MSM bashes him for stopping the caravan, he can throw this in their faces.

But I think Justin Trudeau beat him to it. Oh well.",mikecx79,e9kklmn,conservative
"We should offer her asylum. This is an example of a real asylum case, not just an economic refugee.",hello_japan,e9kkvvy,conservative
"It's very important to believe and protect all women. 

Unless they're brown. 

*Or worse, they make Islam look bad*",DingalingOfDestiny,e9kfe2z,conservative
Meanwhile Reddit’s clowning trump for not doing exactly what he’s doing in this picture ,OprahSwagfrey,e9ihx1c,conservative
"I’m on a few other subreddits which also include more liberal ones to see what they’re thinking. I noticed yesterday that a lot of those subs were criticizing trump for not doing this exact thing and praising truedo (my spelling is bad) and ole George. This post is a surprise to be sure, but a welcome one.",TheErbinator,e9jhb4q,conservative
"Of course the part about the travel logistics doesn't make it to their story, they have the soundbite they needed and thats all that matters to them, it's part of why the media sucks ",chugonthis,e9jnq7w,conservative
"It's almost like the outrage over his non-attendance to that other event was completely manufactured to overshadow some other story. Probably the Florida vote debacle, I'd guess. ",Maswasnos,e9izza0,conservative
"Which further proves that either travel to the event yesterday was too hard IE helicopter grounded and too late for route secure, or they knew about the attempt plot on Marcon",Enzo_SAWFT,e9ibv04,conservative
"This author makes the point that the decision was not Trump's to make.

http://www.thedrive.com/the-war-zone/24839/dont-be-so-quick-to-blame-trumps-no-show-at-cemetery-on-the-president-himself

Also: 

""Some will quickly point out that President Macron and Chancellor Merkel attended the ceremony, but Trump didn't. *Moving either of those dignitaries is not the same as moving the President of The United States.* Neither is moving White House Chief Of Staff John Kelly or Chairman Joint Chief's Of Staff General Joseph Dunford, both of which attended the ceremony. The massive footprint of the security and administrative apparatus that follows the American President around dwarfs anything else like it on the planet, much of which isn't even visible to the casual onlooker.""",el_conando,e9izf4b,conservative
Same could not be said about Putin in the 2018 World Cup,Soolpool,e9joudq,conservative
but but but orange man bad ,skarface6,e9ja78a,conservative
Damage Control. ,mrjowei,e9jrvn1,conservative
Wheres the left on this one?  Silent,FranchiseVC,e9k03fs,conservative
"Doesn’t fit the narrative.

",xwhy,e9k07b7,conservative
Well this will surely make the front page given the last 3 days.. right? /s,Jstink101,e9kcu6r,conservative
"This whole ""story"" regarding rain soaked speakers is petty.",CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9k2zqz,conservative
I know. Reddit is full of anger at Trump for going to a different event on Sat than the one he had planned to go to for security reasons. Why am I supposed to care what liberals think again? ,VirginWizard69,e9j4tf6,conservative
That article didn't actually show him in the rain though did it? ,Sataz,e9jmpiw,conservative
"We live in two Americas: the real one and the alternative reality created by the left and their propaganda wing.
",nited_states,e9iinl1,conservative
The mindless cattle also refuse to realize the only reason he didn't go the day before was due to safety concerns caused by reduced visibility for a helicopter ride. It's ridiculous how they stick so hard to such an easily unraveled narrative.,OKResident93,e9k0lwa,conservative
"Bingo. Keep your eye on the ball, folks.",Armageddon_It,e9jezz3,conservative
"The left loves to accuse their opponents of what they are guilty of. Classic Alinsky tactic. The left has a long history of disrespect for the military and for veterans. From spitting on soldiers, to burning flags, to insulting veterans, to kneeling for the anthem, to attempting to disenfranchise servicemen's absentee ballots, to endless attempts to defund the military, to accusations of war crimes, etc, etc. They saw a chance to hit back and hope we forget their decades of shameful and disrespectful treatment of our military.",PhilosoGuido,e9j9cr9,conservative
I guess I haven't checked the news much this weekend.  There was an attempt on Macron? I was thinking of they called it off because of a threat.  ,Nats_Enough,e9j9eg8,conservative
[removed],,e9im73u,conservative
[removed],,e9ilior,conservative
Wasn’t it like an hour drive from his hotel though.,Akosa117,e9jaqo2,conservative
I just assumed someone else running the event cancelled. ,RedHerringProspectus,e9issdx,conservative
"What's worse, is the left seeks to destroy ours and make theirs reality.

A house divided cannot stand. I seriously wonder how much longer we can pretend both sides can inhabit the same territory at the same time. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9imq86,conservative
"Spot on.

The left's outrage over ""disrespect for veterans"" would be hilarious if it wasn't so disgusting. People who gave their life for their country are just a convenient prop to them.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9jm054,conservative
[removed],,e9jdiov,conservative
"Yeah whatever, keep spreading that leftist and useful idiot Nevertrump narrative. Don't be like them. ",Rightquercusalba,e9inyc1,conservative
Were they taking off from the same place?,Telineye,e9ipoh8,conservative
"That's the new programmed response? Pretty weak, they need to update the NPC agenda database.  
  
Edit: NPC brigade is angry tonight",diehardgiraffe,e9isr1b,conservative
He's doing damage control after 8 years of that clown Obama being in control of the military. ,Rightquercusalba,e9intr9,conservative
It was a security issue.  SS hadn't prepped for a drive there and France has more than a minor problem with terrorism.,StraightNewt,e9jdvcq,conservative
"Don’t worry, man 

Once the democrats finish their program of importing fertile latino families with 5-7 children a pop, we’ll never win at the federal level again! 

Last week the Democrats ran a professed gungrabber in Texas and they lost by 2%...

I give it until 2024",Al_Gayda,e9jh1v2,conservative
"I think that the current uneasy equilibrium will continue until the Left gets all of Congress and POTUS at the same time. At that point, if they let crazy take the wheel... all bets are off. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9iwbwc,conservative
"Awkshually, we use Kaepernick’s own words to explain what that movement, at least initially, is all about. Which is that it’s aimed at the nation and our unifying symbols.",skarface6,e9jdrdx,conservative
[removed],,e9iphgd,conservative
[removed],,e9ixtfi,conservative
[removed],,e9ipk4g,conservative
"The fact that Beto got >48% in Texas should scare you all. Without Texas the only thing that conservatives might win is the senate. They will lose the presidency, the house, the supreme court. Affluent Americans will start fleeing leading to the collapse of the economy.",sjwking,e9jloa8,conservative
I agree. Our only hope is to get one more SCOTUS seat and shut their shit down when they come for our guns. Everyone knows that’s their goal next time they have power. ,Tau23481992,e9j24ka,conservative
"The POTUS has security requirements that far exceed that of other dignitaries, officials or even foreign heads of state, especially in a nation of extreme leftists that hate this President. If a contingency plan for a motorcade was not in place already, it is impossible that a proper one could be developed immediately on the fly. The Secret Service made the call to cancel. Stop spreading your deranged leftist talking points. ",PhilosoGuido,e9j8lph,conservative
"No, they weren't there. On November 10th, the world leaders attended various different ceremonies at memorials. Merkel and Macron did not attend the location that Trump was scheduled to be at. So ""two other leaders were there"" is not an accurate premise to build towards your conclusion of ""Trump did a bad thing"".",-Kerosun-,e9iv2ln,conservative
This sub is for conservatives. Your leftist BS is not welcome here.,ardee2124,e9irwbm,conservative
"Ah, another Fellow Conservative ™ to tell me how wrong I am.",diehardgiraffe,e9j0epf,conservative
"Not if it's a bullshit claim, which it is. Sorry the bad orange man offended you. ",Rightquercusalba,e9j66u0,conservative
It’s scary to think that Hillary almost had the chance to have the same amount of scotus picks as Trump. Imagine how screwed we’d be..,Hello_34,e9jo802,conservative
[removed],,e9iww9e,conservative
"Please see my other comments, its okay to be self critical at times, and criticizing Trump when he does something wrong is OKAY.",Falkamper,e9ix8fr,conservative
[removed],,e9iul4x,conservative
[removed],,e9j2son,conservative
How absolutely dare you?!? Orange man VERY bad,OldHickoryNTLSM,e9j9xy7,conservative
"Sigh: John Kelly made it to the NOV TENTH ceremony. Trump attended the NOV ELEVENTH ceremony which is being referenced today.

There are TWO different events. Don't conflate the two. The one that Merkel and Marcon attended was NOT the one that John Kelly was at.

The person that was responded to earlier in this thread tried to make it sound like Merkel and Marcon attended the same event/location by helicopter that Trump did not attend. This is FALSE information.

In order for you to say that Trump goofed and should apologize, you have to assume that it was his call to ground Marine One and that there were other ways for him to attend the event. You don't know whose call it was to ground Marine One, you don't know why Marine One was grounded and we don't know if there was other options available.

It takes assumptions to get to a place where you can say that Trump goofed up. Personally, I don't like to make assumptions. Does it look bad that he wasn't there? Sure. But there could be perfectly acceptable reasons why he wasn't there.

And to hold that position, is not sticking my head in the sand.",-Kerosun-,e9izt0g,conservative
"And I totally agree with that... However, I'm having a hard time seeing what he did wrong here. Maybe he should've just said because of security matters instead of rain held him back from attending the event. Honestly, do you really believe the media and social media would've responded to it any different? 

No matter what the reason, we would still be here assuming and the left will be painting every step the guy takes in a bad light. No dude, I'm willing to call balls and stirkes but not off some silly assumption Trump all of sudden doesn't give a shit about the veterans. This article here proves that.",abuigues,e9jbh1l,conservative
"If we weren't basically in a civil war it would be ok. But we are, and we need to have an absolutely united front. Take up your issues with Trump after we've won.",ardee2124,e9jumnz,conservative
Of course.  Circle jerking around lies is what /r/politics is for.,weeglos,e9iw14e,conservative
"So you're a free and independent thinker which is why you are steeped in the left's talking points. You attack Trump for missing the one event with no evidence that it was intentional, and since you don't attack him for showing up at the other, we're supposed to believe you are unbiased. 

Well let's consider some counter-points and see:

1. The President has been arguably the strongest supporter of veterans issues in the office since Reagan. Is it more likely that he doesn't care and ditched the event purposely or that this was, in fact, a logistical error in the Secret Service planning for a viable alternate transportation method?

2. The President has security requirements that far exceed that of other dignitaries, officials or even foreign heads of state, especially in a nation of extreme leftists that hate this President. If a contingency plan for a motorcade was not in place already, it is impossible that a proper one could be developed immediately on the fly. 

3. The Secret Service is not perfect and has suffered a [number of recent high profile scandals](https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2015/03/secret-service-disaster-timeline/387643/) (drunk-driving, prostitution, sloppy investigations and advance work, multiple cases of unauthorized persons breaching barriers). These occurred under Obama, and strangely the leftist media never had personal criticism for Obama over their failures. This, however, is all Trump's fault. In fact, we're supposed to believe that he just didn't want to go and this is a coverup.

4. The President supposedly didn't plan on attending, so he made the trip over there in the first place to just sit in his hotel.",PhilosoGuido,e9j9wb6,conservative
"https://www.foxnews.com/politics/trump-takes-heat-over-scrapped-trip-to-cemetery-in-france

Will the Fox News article proving you incorrect since suffice? Let's move along and hope he just says sorry and moves past this. Honoring veterans is something he should be doing rain or shine, and it's OKAY to say it's not acceptable for Trump to not be present for this. Why are you fighting so hard on this?  Veterans deserve respect, be better than the left thinks you are and we as a community should expect better of all American leadership. ",Falkamper,e9jcew9,conservative
That is so tragic...I can not bring myself to just let things slide without at least a minor rebuke...but the extremism makes my nerves jangle when I think about it.  Both sides' extremists make me sick to my stomach.,Falkamper,e9l4ux4,conservative
">Will the Fox News article proving you incorrect since suffice?

This post does NOT refute anything I said. Lets go through what I said:

>John Kelly made it to the NOV TENTH ceremony. Trump attended the NOV ELEVENTH ceremony which is being referenced today. [""today"" meaning ""Sunday"" when this comment was made]

Refuted by this link? No.

>There are TWO different events... The one that Merkel and Marcon attended was NOT the one that John Kelly was at.

Refuted by this link? No.

> In order for you to say that Trump goofed and should apologize, you have to assume that it was his call to ground Marine One and that there were other ways for him to attend the event. You don't know whose call it was to ground Marine One, you don't know why Marine One was grounded and we don't know if there was other options available.

Refuted by this link? No.

The link has people from prior administrations (no bias from them, right?) make comments and tweets about various aspects that they have professional familiarity with. Does that make them right? No. You have to make assumptions that Trump was calling the shots and decided not to go. You have to assume that Trump made the call on grounding Marine One. Or, you have to assume that Trump made the call on declining to travel to the event by motorcade, which you would also have to assume that the motorcade was a possibility. See how many assumptions you have to make in order to paint this as Trump's fault?

>Honoring veterans is something he should be doing rain or shine, and it's OKAY to say it's not acceptable for Trump to not be present for this.

100% agree. And If you recall, I said ""Does it look bad that he wasn't there? Sure."" Which implies that I agree with the latter part. But, I am not going to stand here and say that Trump was the one who called it off because that requires me to make a few assumptions with no factual basis to support them.

>Why are you fighting so hard on this?

Why are you hurdling over assumptions in order to reach a conclusion of ""orange man bad""?

>Veterans deserve respect

100% agree. No one in here would disagree.

>be better than the left thinks you are

I find it amusing that you are exhibiting a few general characteristics of ""the left"" in your responses to me, as you plead for me to be better than the left thinks I am. Since you are building your conclusion on a stack of assumptions and I am not, then I find it more fitting that I challenge you to stop acting like the left.",-Kerosun-,e9k2v61,conservative
Do you want to live in a civilized country or not? Sadly there's a price to pay for that. And that price is to stand behind Trump whatever happens because he's our last hope. This country was on its way out after 8 years of Obama and we were given a lifeline. You don't complain that the rope is frayed. You be happy that you're being slowly guided through the roughest seas imaginable to safety.,ardee2124,e9lyawl,conservative
"Stand behind a public figure no matter what happens?  That doesn't strike you as an incredibly dangerous mindset?  

When you say that, do you mean he should be free from critique or admitted wrongs? What is the scope of expected devotion?  

There's a great quote from A Man for All Seasons regarding bending the law around beloved leaders ""Oh? And when the last law was down, and the Devil turned 'round on you, where would you hide, Roper, the laws all being flat? This country is planted thick with laws, from coast to coast, Man's laws, not God's! And if you cut them down, and you're just the man to do it, do you really think you could stand upright in the winds that would blow then? Yes, I'd give the Devil benefit of law, for my own safety's sake!""

Of course it's not directly applicable but I've always interpreted it as a reinforcement of the need to hold people in positions of power accountable to all laws no matter the alternative. ",Falkamper,e9m2cw2,conservative
Is it disgusting? Yes. Is it surprising? No.,burtmaklin1,e9k6etn,conservative
I don't understand the need for dress-up while protesting serious issues.,Upnsmoque,e9n0sib,conservative
Sons of bitches,PurpleAngel23,e9knnid,conservative
And the UN continues to not give a fuck,soxfan90,e9lgi21,conservative
"That we dont have 85 senators and 400 Representatives proves this. The Dems are extremely left and somehow making inroads into red states when they should be losing their own states
",YankeeBlues21,e9iw3ek,conservative
It just proves how weak-minded some people really are.,BeauRyker,e9jnxsl,conservative
[removed],,e9jnfht,conservative
"It’s because of the media. We are constantly fighting an uphill battle. 90% of the media constantly plays defense for Democrats  and goes on offense against Republicans. It effects the middle 20% of the electorate and that’s more than enough. Without the media, the Democrats would be irrelevant as a national party. Just think about putting a dollar value on the advantage that this gives Democrats. You couldn’t even buy that kind of benefit if you tried, but if you could it would probably be valued in the hundreds of billions of dollars. In comparison, Hillary spent 1.2 billion in 2016 and that was the most money ever spent on a presidential campaign. The value of every major media network except Fox shilling for you along with almost every major newspaper has to be at least 100 billion.",hello_japan,e9j29ob,conservative
"They target your kids through Media usage, and propaganda campaigns. I'm willing to guarantee you. If you've got kids, they spend more time hypnotized by cell phone and TV screens than actually learning from inside the family house hold. We all know MTV put out anti-white pro-hate propaganda before trump's election calling all white men racist. ",MinimumMonitor7,e9j9u7u,conservative
"Media is part of the problem. It's a trifecta, and not the one you are thinking of. Media + Academia + Immigration (combined with low native birthrates).

This is how it works out:

- Birthrates are way down due to cultural shifts and mass abortion. 3rd generation + immigrants (people who can trace their families back 3 or more generations here in the United States) have birthrates around 1.4. You need 2.1 in order to *maintain* your population size. Which means without immigration our total population would be in decline like Russia and many other countries around the world.

- An entitlement state that demands a large work force and a massive business structure that needs a work force import 1 million+ immigrants every year (just so happens a very similar number of babies are aborted every year). These immigrants come from all over the world, but from the most part cultures very different from ours. The United States is a great experiment, and our perception of rights and limited government is not shared by many. These people come in inclined to support left wing positions, even though they may have moved here due to the business atmosphere.

- By and large the immigrants vote left leaning or Democratic. This is the first time where the media comes into play. They assault people who have no cultural roots in the United States with propaganda about our society and the evils that need to be fixed. They are already left leaning individuals in a lot of ways with no roots in the US. The media moves a large group of people who might be moderate towards the left.

- First generation immigrants are where all our ""births"" are coming from. Few cultures adore butchering their own children, even leftists ones across the globe (except for our Fascists version here in the United States). The US has a larger than 2.1 birthrate (just barely) due to these first generation immigrants and 2nd generation immigrants have mass amounts of children (in comparison to 3rd generation+ immigrants).

- These new children are raised in families which are not culturally rooted in the United States, still speaking their native tongue to an extent, and go to schools set to indoctrinate them. Media again comes into play, though less so via the news, and more so through pop culture. Comedians, movies, music, etc. They have no reason to reject this obvious and blatant attack on American culture, since they have no yet shared in it. So not only are the parents left leaning, their children are radical left.

- Throw in multiculturalism which is what the left has been pushing for the last half century, and you ensure these groups do no have a shred of American identity much less rooted in the culture Americans typically have. Thus ban speech, guns, republicans, etc.

----

An example of this is California. The all American state, was moderate but had great Republicans and Democrats alike. California in the last 2 decades had a net loss of Americans leaving the state to the tune of nearly 4 million people. Yet the state's population has continued to grow, and the state has ""magically"" shifted further and further to the left. Many of the 1 million immigrants that come to the United States end up in the coastal states as that is where the jobs are. California has literally replaced its native population with immigrants (at the active behest of Democrats, who understood this starting in the late 90's).

It is currently totaled that 1/4th of the citizens of California are people who were **not** born in the United States. There are 40 million people here, that means 10 million people. Even more of the 40 million are the children of said 10 million people (remember they have higher birthrates). Even more people are illegal immigrants. 

I would recommend watching/reading Victor Davis Hanson as he covers many of the problems of California.

----

What can we do about this? Not really anything. We can't stop immigration as our economy and entitlement state would collapse. We have no access to the media nor academia. All we can do is hope that those people who are not culturally rooted in American values realize the evil of progressiveness before it is too late. But say there are 500,000 former democrats willing to ""walk away"" due to this understand. There are 1 million new democrats arriving every year, and children coming to age who have been brainwashed into voting for this far left movement.",ultimis,e9jhfb6,conservative
Very true,XxtexasxX,e9kgd29,conservative
"The American media looks more like the media in any banana republic with every passing year; a 24/7 campaign ad for one party and one party only. The only positive to this kind of media monoculture is that it gives conservatism a counter-cultural appeal. Unfortunately, that's not going to win elections in the long-run as the media continues to market the Democrats as a feel-good impulse buy.",jd_porter,e9j5r33,conservative
It would pretty hilarious if we could get Donald Trump or Fox news to buy out CNN.,MinimumMonitor7,e9j9yq1,conservative
"It's because they, with the full cooperation of neoliberal globalist Republicans, have replaced the American voter with a more, er, *reliable* version.

It's demographics.  It has always been demographics.  It will always be demographics.

The media is just the cheerleading wing. Though, to be clear, they are complete enemies of truth.
",nited_states,e9jfix8,conservative
"You missed one very important thing: interstate migration. Leftism is a virus, and once a host state has been sucked dry of resources and energy and becomes oppressive to live in (like California), the former (and often leftist) citizens of that state will migrate to another red state where freedoms are many and taxes are low, miss the reasons why that state was good in the first place, and tip it over into leftism and failure. ",komstock,e9jibzg,conservative
"So we can sum up the root cause of all the problems :

1) Reagan's Amnesty

2) Abortion

3) Destruction of nuclear family

4) Degeneracy in the society 

5) USSR's success in finding usuful idiot professors in the 80's and infiltrate the Academia.

In every issue the GOP has completely failed to fight back. The just let the society ""progress"". Progress into its own demise.",sjwking,e9jm2v0,conservative
"It has always been totally ridiculous. I was watching CNN during the early 2000s. The media and the elite took advantage of the grief of Americans and launched a massive war campaign that had little effect in protecting the average American from terrorist attacks. While at the same time US's borders still remain open to cartels, drug lords, traffickers, murderers and of course terrorists.",sjwking,e9jltmo,conservative
"And that's why they are trying so desperately to take the guns. Because with guns, conservatives still have a chance to fight back. Otherwise it will be assimilate in the ""new socialist America"" or die.",sjwking,e9jlv6s,conservative
"> In every issue the GOP has completely failed to fight back

While I'd disagree some, in that it's still in uphill battle, anti-immigrant and xenophobic/racist if you bring up straight facts as to why demographics shift, anti-women rights if you bring up abortion being a serious problem (the number has been trending down, but you could argue that's a result of the increased access to birth control and the shift away from the nuclear family, marriage and long term relationships in general), etc. There really isn't a strong avenue to educate people, or shit even present your views to them in an open forum. Look at social media, over half of all content is disseminated through two companies, Facebook and google. Look at their company policies in regards to right leaning content. 

So while there is this uphill battle that simply can't be overlooked, you are correct in how weak the GOP has come off, specifically in the last decade. Look at what the left political machine did to Romney, a devout religious father of five, married to the same woman for nearly 50 years, and say what you want about his politics or business history, from a personal morality point of view he should be the kind of person you look up to. Yet the left turned him into a sexist racist who wanted to ""put y'all back in chains"". GOP largely sat around and took it, too scared to hit back. Yes I know any attack towards Obama was met with the coordinated ""you're a racist"" response from the media, but you're absolutely right in the GOP had little to no backbone. 

Then comes trump, the one guy who says ""I am who I am"" and pulls no punches. While I don't think it was the only reason he won, it was surely a part of it. the GOP was tired of the immoral, hate filled, often constitutional and illegal actions of the Obama administration over the past 8 years, tired of the GOP sitting around and seemingly letting it happen, and finally said that if the left is going to play that dirty all the time and sleep like a baby, then why can't we. ",ed_merckx,e9k0bqk,conservative
"One thing that the left used to understand was exactly how beholden the press is to unelected forces within the government and the part it plays in the promotion and crafting of government policy. Leaks to the NYT being used to justify military force, FISA warrants, etc. etc.. That well justified concern on the left went right out the window when the press decided (no doubt out of the goodness of their hearts) to become hyperpartisan, pro-Dem hacks. Now we're left to cope with half of the country propagandized into a state of craven hysteria and ready to support *anything* the Democrats want. What a way to turn your average do-no-harm hippie liberal into a full-throated supporter of deep state policies.",jd_porter,e9jmddo,conservative
I almost wish news stories were written like this. I'm glad his house is safe. Prayers for those who have lost so much out there. ,triggernaut,e9kthuh,conservative
The left needs to get over it...,lax714,e9k3ns1,conservative
The left’s war on Western culture and heritage will never stop. It ‘s insane.,Kutepov,e9k9ds3,conservative
"To give an idea of where the article is going...

""Y’know what? ***He and they didn’t***. ***Never happened.*** Rather, it all is a hoax and fallacy stemming from people who *themselves* are election cheaters and thieves, Putin colluders and outright crooks, projecting their own moral infirmities onto others: “If *we* do it, then probably everyone else does, too.”""",TMA2day,e9knkvx,conservative
"It's like the War on Drugs. 

A, you can't effectively combat it. You just can't. It's impossible. 100% of resources spent on it are resources wasted. If people, including teens or younger, want porn, they're going to get it. If you thought it was hard to stop the spread of porn in the 80s and 90s, welcome to the world of smartphones, the internet, and VPNs. You will never, not *ever*, make even the slightest dent in actually keeping porn from being out there.

B, perhaps more people are realizing that it's not the government's job to tell people how to be moral or not. That can be and should be a role of *society*, but not government. If you want to increase social pressure towards positive actions and away from bad ones, great. But the minute you bring the government in with their laws, jails, fines, and guns, you've gone too far. The Constitution spells out what things the federal government can and cannot do. As conservatives and Republicans, we're *supposed* to want the federal government to stick to that list and keep their damn power hungry noses out of **everything** else. Too many people on both sides (though it is a much bigger problem on the left) honestly cannot for the life of them tell the different between a good idea, and a good idea the government should enforce. They think they're the same thing. If an idea is good, then the government should be the one to make everyone do it, at the point of a gun if necessary. And that's a leftist point of view, not ours. We don't use the hammer of government to beat the world into fitting into our mold.

C, quite frankly we've got *much* bigger problems. The Left is, at this very moment, seeking to unmake the United States. Sure the fight against sexual immorality might be part of our fight against the left, but it is a far fringe skirmish. The Left is at the gates right now trying to undermine elections, remove the First and Second Amendments, (hell *our own side* is fine with ignoring the Fourth Amendment with civil asset forfeiture). I could list several dozen other ways the Left is trying to destroy the fabric of America so they can remake it in their image and straight up *wipe us out forever*, but that would take all day and most of you are familiar with all of the pressing issues. But the point is, whether you think it's a bad thing or not, whether a 15yo boy can get PornHub on his phone (he can, and no, you can't stop him), is really just not a big enough issue for us to waste any time or attention on it.",ConsistentlyRight,e9kwsag,conservative
"
*Liberal feminists and conservative evangelicals found themselves unexpectedly allied in vilifying the adult entertainment industry.*

Yet, years later, feminists decided porn wasn't harmful to women, didn't cause rape, and was empowering to women. This article would have been a much more interesting read had the author pursued this evolution, instead.






",DBG1998,e9ky004,conservative
"> I liked porn, I still like porn",IvankasFutureHusband,e9kzl8f,conservative
">Over a decade spent covering Republican politics, I struggle to recall instances of politicians calling attention to pornography. The lone exception: Diane Black, a congresswoman running this year for governor of Tennessee, blamed the rise in school shootings on adolescent porn habits. She was widely ridiculed and ultimately lost the GOP primary. Her comment was a cautionary tale. Black had attacked a multibillion-dollar industry—one trafficked by many of her constituents—and the only dent made was to her own reputation.  
  
Well that's fucking stupid, so.",FelixFuckfurter,e9kymn1,conservative
I remember when some fucking idiot delegates changed the party's platform at the 2016 convention to say that porn was a public health crisis.  ,tja_1478,e9kzv46,conservative
"Not much more to say than this, and the war on drugs analogy is spot on.

Is porn bad for people? There's enough research to suggest that yes, it probably is. And yet that doesn't make it the role of the federal government to control. 

If you don't want people to watch porn, take it upon yourself to either offer an alternative or convince people they shouldn't watch it. *That* would be a free-market, conservative solution. Handing the problem off to the government, in my opinion, would not be, even if it sometimes has been historically.",Douglas-MacArthur,e9kzjug,conservative
"The *only* type of porn that the government should be concerned about is *child porn*, and for what should be obvious reasons. 

I’d like the Left to actually care about that for a change.",PurpleAngel23,e9l5ikb,conservative
"The fact that most pornstars are feminists should be a dead giveaway. 

Personally, I think that goes back to switching sexual power (“You can’t hurt me if I hurt myself first”). It also aligns with the new ideals that being sexually manipulative and provocative is a show of confidence. 

I got that vibe a lot when I was in college. Women would sleep around thinking that somehow showed control over their sexuality and bodies. Ironically, I’ve always felt the opposite was true.",PurpleAngel23,e9l5vt3,conservative
I like beer and porn ,Rabidraccoon76,e9l6enm,conservative
Did they use the argument that pornography rewires your brain?,PurpleAngel23,e9l5zr1,conservative
"> offer an alternative

That's why I got a wife.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9kzusx,conservative
My thoughts exactly! That’s why I make vids for my husband.,PurpleAngel23,e9l5fth,conservative
Lol rip your inbox.,IvankasFutureHusband,e9l9og7,conservative
I don’t get how voter ID is racist. I think it’s racist to think that minorities can’t get an ID. In many cases you can simply request one through the internet.,Jabronies96,e9hxph1,conservative
"But this was by *Nelson Mandela!* Don’t you know he fought for non-whites in South Africa to have equal rights to whites? He would *never* stand for something as evil and racist as **voter ID!!!** Oh, wait...",MatthewT1205,e9hg0kd,conservative
It is not. And it's essential and should be enacted ASAP on a Federal level tied to a proof of citizenship.,Terra_green2,e9i1yut,conservative
"Why does this issue always come down to race, and specifically black people, when in reality it doesn't have anything to do with either.

The leftists don't want voter id laws for the simple reason that it would suppress the votes of illegals and dead people.  

There's no greater hypocrisy than crying about Russians tampering with elections, while at the same trying trying to hamper efforts to ensure that people are qualified to vote.",mlmack,e9hrnjy,conservative
The Dems hate it because the idea of everyone requiring an ID would cost them votes.  Simple as that. ,navigator75,e9hnpzu,conservative
"Voter ID would not only not allow non-citizens to vote, but it till also turn into a ID that will be required for welfare, social programs. Similar to how our SSN was never meant to be our main identifier but now is.

They know not only will they lose votes, but representative house numbers when illegal aliens cannot collect benefits as they will leave.   

Consider all the skimming that goes on with these programs and the sheer dollar amounts they will lose when they cannot use illegal aliens for their ""budgets"". ",NoMoCommies,e9hv0iu,conservative
I feel like Morgan Freeman should explain why voter id is not racist that way he can gain another freckle. ,giobbistar21,e9im0my,conservative
"TIL that Nelson Mandela is a white supremacist. He must have known that People of Color are put a disadvantage by this. White people just have a natural ability to obtain government-issued IDs that People of Color don't have. Terrible, this is going to be a stain on his legacy. ",BudrickBundy,e9igbvb,conservative
"It's not inherently racist, but progressives believe the principal reason the GOP favors voter ID laws is a view that on net it will improve the chances of GOP politicians by blocking a certain population of voters that the progressives believe will be disproportionately poor, minority and therefore (it is presumed) supportive of the Democratic Party.  I understand their concern, even if I am not terribly moved by it.  On the other hand, progressives won't acknowledge that many GOP voters have good faith doubts about the legitimacy of elections in some part due to the fact that the Democratic Party engages in aggressive vote turnout operations that call into question whether they're collecting votes from people who can't vote or people who are not informed or interested in voting (and therefore easy to coax not-well-thought votes out of).  Those doubts are at the center of GOP calls for voter ID laws.

",spir0gyra,e9ih8wv,conservative
"Liberalism is based on feelings, they feel they need to help so by saying an id is racist they feel they are helping minorities.",SuperFunMonkey,e9j590u,conservative
So the lefts argument is basically that it's racist to ask for ID because black people have a hard time getting ID? That sounds retarded. Call me old fashioned but I think black people are more than capable of obtaining ID.,Jigsawbilly,e9hj4cp,conservative
"If a sufficiently motivated illegal alien can get a Social Security number for a job, what makes you think they can't just as easily get a state ID? 

But I agree, the GOP should've passed a law federally mandating voter ID while they had control. ",tidercekatdnatsoperi,e9iw3en,conservative
"Because the Left only cares about blacks insofar as getting their votes.
",chabanais,e9hsl0f,conservative
"> many GOP voters have good faith doubts about the legitimacy of elections 

If the DNC would only make a fuss on the voter ID laws, or more restrictive rules for polling places and stuff then maybe I'd give their ideals some more credence on this issue. That said, they cry foul on any change in voting systems. Take audits on voter scrolls for example, outrage on the left about trying to remove votes from the system. When reports of thousands of dead people somehow casting a vote in a recent election are brought up, the immediate response from the left is how you're a crazy conspiracy nut and there's no proof that illegal votes shifts elections. 

Look at the shit in Boward county, which is nothing new, the total ineptness and probable corruption. It's just glossed over by most of the media and even the narrative is now the GOP wanting to not have all the votes counted. Now, I still don't think it rises to a massive overall conspiracy to steal say a presidential election, but holy fuck. As someone that has a background in statistics, looking at whats specifically going on in Boward county, and this being like the third time this exact same thing has happened, comparing things like the undervoting total. Stories like the poll worker in 2016 who signed an affidavit claiming she saw poll workers filling out blank ballots in a room, who did her legal duty and reported it to the proper supervisors and was then fired the next day with no explanation. Stories of random people in other counties outside of not only boward county, but the state of Florida receiving ballots in the mail. All the anecdotal stories that seem to show up more and more of random boxes of ballots being found in fucking rental cars. This is all on top of the clear violation of law, Snipe's past violation of court orders where she destroyed ballots after a judge ordered her not to, when she opened mail in ballots in private in clear violation of the rules, failure to report voter numbers as the law states, etc. 

This doesn't even get into the circumstantial ""conspiratorial"" facts if you will that is this is a heavy left leaning county, that as soon as it got some media scrutiny the new votes coming in magically stopped. The fact that every time there's a recount it seems to always favor democrats. Yet the reaction from the left is the same, that we are all crazy and unable to accept that we lost, how dare we question anything.   It's getting ridiculous. 
",ed_merckx,e9k169c,conservative
[removed],,e9hjjn6,conservative
"Disparate outcome, but only when it hurts nonwhites

Thats why affirmative action is still allowed",lipidsly,e9hjfen,conservative
"Note: Not a conservative ^(Please don't downvote I'm just trying to answer your question.)

The arguement is more that there have been so few cases of voter fraud, 31 since 2000 (Source: [Wikipedia](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Voter_impersonation_(United_States))), (Edit: Commenter has a source that suggests differently. I misread the article.) that not having voter ID would not alter any elections. According to many studies, there hasn't been an incident where voter fraud has impacted an election. ^(Tell me if I'm wrong on that because it would change my view.) Since it doesn't make a difference whether there is or isn't voter ID, I think we should do what is easiest for everyone and not have it. Of course, if voter fraud ever became a problem in the future, I would definitely be in favor of voter ID laws.

Edit: The post says conservatives only. I don't know if it was like that before and I just missed it or if they changed it. Therefore I'm just going to edit this comment from now on if I need to reply to anything.

Edit 2: Ignore previous edit, it seems there is no enforcement of the conservatives only rule.",JoahTheProtozoa,e9hl0l8,conservative
"Reminds me of this: 

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=odB1wWPqSlE

Watch to the end. ",lastbastion,e9hxxep,conservative
"I live in NC, registered Dem, they think it's a poll tax because it'll cost money. It should be free and since we have a Dem governor and elected some other Dems they will probably try to make it free or close to it. I voted for it because I'm pretty uncomfortable that I have been able to vote with just giving my name and address without showing identification and verifying who I am. I see how it could be problematic so it makes sense to present some form of ID. ",zamm1,e9ju6d0,conservative
"You need an ID to function in society.  Maybe that should be a bigger worry.  I don't accept that someone cannot obtain a state issued ID.
",chabanais,e9hjvdg,conservative
"That article is about voter impersonation, of which there have been 31 ""documented"" cases since 2000.  It also said that hundreds of dead people voted in New York in 2013.

I would imagine that voter fraud is more prevalent than people are led to believe.  Cleaning up voter rolls and voter ID will go along way to really cleaning things up.",mlmack,e9icgz2,conservative
Props for trying to have a conversation my friend. I'm curious what you think about the nonsense happening in Florida with ballots and counting.,Valterak1,e9hllk9,conservative
"https://www.heritage.org/voterfraud/search

Actual cases and their outcomes. The ability to sort by state.

Commentary about the cases. 

https://www.heritage.org/election-integrity/commentary/brennan-centers-attacks-heritage-voter-fraud-database-are-baseless",NoMoCommies,e9hv1xq,conservative
"It's a combination of willful ignorance from the media to cover it and deliberate indifference from the Democrats to stop it.

http://www.ktre.com/2018/11/08/people-arrested-alleged-voter-fraud-hidalgo-county/

https://empowertexans.com/local/voter-fraud-arrests-south-texas

There's what, 12? I just increased the voter fraud count by 25% since 2000 in one year? 

It's too easy to commit voter fraud. That's the problem. You don't need shit in MN to register to vote. Utility bill with address. Or ""someone to vouch for you"" from your district. 

Really? Totally not abusable.....

Voter ID makes sense to maintain integrity of elections, but one side doesn't want to institute it.... probably because they get most of the non-citizens voting to vote party line for them. ",Moonthrower,e9hq4s0,conservative
"See here: https://www.judicialwatch.org/blog/2014/10/obama-may-elected-illegal-votes/

Edit:  Also, rules are enforced often here, however your comment is civil in nature, so I doubt the mods will delete it.",PerceivedShift,e9i9768,conservative
Democrats don't want to study it.,chabanais,e9hlu78,conservative
[removed],,e9hkh99,conservative
"I mean if someone is a single mom, working full time, with a couple of kids... considering how notoriously slow it is getting an ID would anyone want to spend their time doing that? ",fluffstravels,e9hk6mo,conservative
[deleted],,e9hlpa8,conservative
"Florida honestly needs to get their crap together. I think it's a bit to wide of a margin to be concerned about all the mistakes tipping the close elections, but if it were closer with the republicans still slightly in the lead, I would want the democrats to just give the election to the republicans and then work on a bipartisan agreement to just fix the voting errors. I feel like it shouldn't be that hard to not mess it up again, but somehow they did.",JoahTheProtozoa,e9hmhn0,conservative
"I agree with you that the system is definently abusable. I just think people don't take advantage of that abusabilty on a large scale. 12 people, I feel, is just not a huge cause for concern. If you value the *principles* of stopping unfair voting, and that's the reason you support voter ID laws, then that's fine, but if you just care about the actual *results*, I think 12+31 cases doesn't merit the hassle over voter IDs.

Sure the Democrats are being deliberately indifferent, but I feel like we kind of have a justification for doing so...

Edit: Didn't understand what he was saying, will leave comment unchanged anyways",JoahTheProtozoa,e9hqz9m,conservative
"What do you mean? I am a democrat.

^(I know it says conservatives only but as I already started a conversation before the flair went up, I feel obliged to finish it.)",JoahTheProtozoa,e9hp021,conservative
"In texas the Election Identification Certificate (EIC) is free.  But, the point they might need to travel or miss work is valid.",jaasx,e9hnf8a,conservative
"It's valid for 6 years.  If you can't afford $10 or $15 for something you'll need to buy liquor, a gun, open a bank account, etc... then you have bigger problems than voting.",chabanais,e9hlix3,conservative
"How did single mom fill out her I-9 without a valid ID?
",tehForce,e9ianx7,conservative
So they'd be working full time and raising kids without an ID?  Hiw does that work?  Isn't that a bigger issue to have children and no way to legally identify yourself?,chabanais,e9hlmb5,conservative
If she is working full time she should already have an ID since it is required to get a job. ,CS_McFisticuffs_III,e9hpkue,conservative
lets say you are a 40 year old single mother. you cant be expected to have gotten an id at some point between 18 and 40? in 22 years?,redrisingg,e9hkuib,conservative
Well then you can't vote.  I'm sorry but I would rather not have people voting more than once and having illegals casting a vote on who runs my government because someone cant find the time once every 5 years to get an ID.  If they don't have the time to get an ID I'm guessing they don't have the time to vote either.,flippy76,e9hqes6,conservative
There are a few minimums an adult needs to have. An ID is one of them.,chabanais,e9hm8ct,conservative
"12 people, 9 in one county alone and 3 in the other.

It's not isolated. It's everywhere. It's hard to find stories about it, though, because the media wants to ignore it whenever possible.

You're being indifferent because it gets you 90%+ of the voter fraud.",Moonthrower,e9hrzv0,conservative
"Democrats care about winning elections no matter the means.
",chabanais,e9hrd0w,conservative
"Somehow they manage to get to the polls every election, though...

Rides to the polls but not the DMV? More proof the Democrats only care about the black vote, not black people. ",Moonthrower,e9hoqh3,conservative
To sign up for unemployment or welfare.,tehForce,e9iajdp,conservative
"Yes you are correct bigger problems, but not at the expense of having a right revoked. ",bluntman214,e9hlrzc,conservative
The soft bigotry of low expectations. ,chabanais,e9hlpx9,conservative
To fill out your I-9 for said job ,tehForce,e9iar68,conservative
You’d be surprised. I’ve worked in poor areas- you take public transport to work so there’s no need to get a driver’s license. You’re actually able to build a life without one. ,fluffstravels,e9hlb5q,conservative
[deleted],,e9hrice,conservative
"Next election they could have stands set up at various voting stations (in areas where people are less likely to have ID) where people can fill out the necessary forms, present the necessary papers, and have their photo taken. Then they can have their ID sent to them in the mail and use it next time.",MisterMouser,e9i3uty,conservative
"As the people promoting voter ID, shouldn’t conservatives be the ones offering rides to the DMV? It would be a concession to Voter ID laws for the dems to do that. Maybe neither party cares about black people? ",neverlearnnottolove,e9hpyf7,conservative
"The Supreme Court has ruled that requiring an ID is not revoking a right, that it must be weighed with ensuring voter integrity.  I agree.
",chabanais,e9hmb1k,conservative
"You could but it would be extremely hard.

Couldn't use a credit card, couldn't cash a check, couldn't open a bank account, couldn't wire money, couldn't pick up a prescription, couldn't get a hotel room, couldn't buy beer, couldn't buy cigarettes, couldn't buy lotto tickets, can't apply for food stamps, couldn't apply for Medicaid/Social Security, couldn't apply for unemployment or a job or complete an I9, couldn't rent/buy a house, apply for a mortgage, couldn't drive/buy/rent a car, couldn't get on an airplane, couldn't get married, couldn't adopt a pet, can't get a a fishing or hunting license, couldn't get a cell phone, couldn't donate blood, couldn't buy an 'M' rated video game, couldn't purchase certain cold medicines at CVS!

Pretending like requiring an ID to vote is some kind of barrier is bigoted.  ",lastbastion,e9hycbd,conservative
"Life is hard.  
",chabanais,e9hsh2c,conservative
Disproportionate effects alone do not make a policy discriminatory. Murder laws disproportionately affect men. Are murder laws sexist?,LegionBaby,e9i55vr,conservative
"Or... they could use the 364 OTHER days of the year to get to the DMV...

Gotta go there for vehicle registration anyway...",Moonthrower,e9ilc3h,conservative
Conservatives promote independence. ,Moonthrower,e9hruz2,conservative
"Explain how requiring I'd only pertains to blacks?  
",tehForce,e9iabwq,conservative
"Conservatives donate more of their time and money to charity than do Democrats so they're already doing that.
",chabanais,e9hramr,conservative
Do you know the name of this ruling?  Interested in reading about it.,PerceivedShift,e9i8jr8,conservative
"Yes but what about the single mother of four that doesn't use credit, banks, medication, hotels, alcohol, lottery tickets, welfare, unemployment benefits, employment, cars, airplanes, or cell phones? Why do you hate minorities so much? You must be bigoted or something.

/s",Skalforus,e9i1s18,conservative
I think it was this one: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Crawford_v._Marion_County_Election_Board,chabanais,e9iacku,conservative
"This article is from 2012, it's about the obama/mitt romney race.",ThePersonInYourSeat,e9jb6ch,conservative
And who wants to guess what party they voted for?,still_frizzell,e9id1lb,conservative
Coming from someone who lives in California: Those are rookie numbers.,Sand_Sandwich_,e9iime7,conservative
This is from 2012,hipsterdufus84,e9idlte,conservative
"Guys, this is an article from 6 years. Why post it now?",electricspook,e9jizr3,conservative
"This article is from 2011. Since then it has been discovered that it has been in the [hundreds who have voted](https://ballotpedia.org/Fact_check/Have_non-citizens_voted_in_recent_Florida_elections%3F) which is a problem, but not quite 200,000. It is terrible that after every election every side of everything complains about how America isn't prepared for elections, yet no one in office fixes it",rounder55,e9imc4q,conservative
but there's no voter fraud according to the left... ,Delta_25,e9idhc3,conservative
2 years of control of all 3 federal branches and have done next to nothing about voter fraud. GOP is am much to blame for doing nothing.,Nonsenseism,e9jzblg,conservative
Foreign nationals changing election results. ,clevername1111111,e9knz6s,conservative
"I'll take D for $500, Alex.",heartless_13,e9ihowb,conservative
"250,000 straight D",RKfan,e9irf7l,conservative
"This is from 2012. And the number of votes are, at most, in the hundreds (000) rather than hundreds of thousands (000,000).

Living in a society where all votes are counted separates us from all other banana republics. Regardless of the outcome.",Beesenitch,e9jepz7,conservative
Do you think things have gotten better or worse since 2012?,PrawnsAreOk,e9ie1o9,conservative
Do you think anything has changed?,papatim,e9k845x,conservative
"AL Franken's seat was decided by hundreds of votes, and this is a problem everywhere.

Those who are ineligible to vote have decided elections before and they will again. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9imyfs,conservative
To them this isn’t fraud. They believe they should be able to vote.,the-divine-comedy,e9iip00,conservative
"It's not fraud, at least not if you use their redefinition of ""eligible voter"".  That's the problem with dealing with the left, when a word doesn't suit their needs they redefine it but don't tell anyone so they can lie to us with a clean conscience.",anuser999,e9j9f6x,conservative
Sure there is. They claim it is Trump supporters and they cite the couple people who got arrested for it in 2016.,Nonsenseism,e9jz8v4,conservative
"Because the feds cant really get involved with how the states run elections. Look at the voter fraud investagation trump tried to do in his first year. Almost every state, red and blue, stonewalled it.",papatim,e9k8c1o,conservative
Just $500? I'd have held out for a million at least.,DMooseJ,e9j95ab,conservative
You can have it for free. 😉 ,VirulentVoid,e9jbqix,conservative
"yeah you will

tbf so will /u/chabanais",skarface6,e9j9seb,conservative
It sound like florida purges these rolls pretty well. ,hipsterdufus84,e9ie32c,conservative
[removed],,e9iygx2,conservative
Oh baby! 😘,heartless_13,e9jbsuf,conservative
😘,heartless_13,e9jafgp,conservative
They haven't purged Brenda Snipes.,PrawnsAreOk,e9iehnr,conservative
"Well yes, she needs to be fired.  ",hipsterdufus84,e9ieipv,conservative
Who votes for people who verbally abuse and assault them?,the-divine-comedy,e9iqplq,conservative
Pot calling the kettle black?,ShadowTH277,e9inl60,conservative
"Sad that the only conclusion they can reach is to blame racism.  With that mentality they will never grow, just keep doing the same thing and when you lose blame it on racism.  ",jap411,e9j9be6,conservative
"Democrats are bad for family values, America and the economy... ",EDTechSpyMan,e9jtufw,conservative
I don't recall any Republicans who lost last week acting like petulant children.,dixonmason,e9jsn95,conservative
Thus alienating most of America.....,CroutonusFibrosis,e9jb81c,conservative
So be it.,BeauRyker,e9jo59z,conservative
"Arizona, Nevada, and thousands of people in the Midwestern suburbs last week who flipped back to the Dems",YankeeBlues21,e9ir0yq,conservative
White male Democrats.,soracrowe,e9j63ab,conservative
That's racist.  I think.,mlmack,e9jbf0d,conservative
So your saying both sides are racist? Lol,MCpothead567,e9jisz3,conservative
I vote Republican. But boy are there times they frustrate me. Gov. Ducey (R) signed off on a multi million dollar contract to extend the trolley; this shuts down and hurt more businesses and jobs. What's the alternative? A looney professor from ASU?,ShadowTH277,e9k7dop,conservative
Trump is far too preoccupied with the economy. The rule of law is going to shit while he is tweeting about the economy,Isredditreal2009,e9k6n5a,conservative
WSJ: Hillary Loses Again ,Chapka69,e9im3e5,conservative
"Get ready for Hillary Clinton 4.0. More than 30 years in the making, this new version of Mrs. Clinton, when she runs for president in 2020, will come full circle—back to the universal-health-care-promoting progressive firebrand of 1994. True to her name, Mrs. Clinton will fight this out until the last dog dies. She won’t let a little thing like two stunning defeats stand in the way of her claim to the White House.                     

It’s been quite a journey. In July 1999, Mrs. Clinton began her independent political career on retiring Sen. Daniel Patrick Moynihan’s farm in upstate New York. Her Senate platform included support for a balanced budget, the death penalty and incremental health-care reform. It was a decisive break from her early-1990s self. Hillary Clinton 2.0 was a moderate, building on the success of her communitarian “It Takes a Village” appeals and pledging to bring home the bacon for New York. She emphasized her religious background, voiced strong support for Israel, voted for the Iraq war, and took a hard line against Iran.

This was arguably the most successful version of Hillary Clinton. She captured the hearts and minds of New York’s voters and soared to an easy re-election in 2006, leaving Bill and all his controversies behind.                   

But Hillary 2.0 could not overcome Barack Obama, the instant press sensation. During the 2008 presidential campaign, Mrs. Clinton held fast to centrist positions that would have assured her victory in the general election. But progressive leaders and donors abandoned her for the antiwar Mr. Obama. Black voters who had been strong Clinton supporters in New York and Arkansas left her column to elect the first African-American president. History was made, but not by Mrs. Clinton. Though she won more delegates from Democratic primaries, activists in caucus states gave Mr. Obama, who had called her “likable enough,” the heartbreaking win.             

Licking her wounds, Mrs. Clinton served as secretary of state while she planned her comeback. It was during this time that the more liberal Hillary 3.0 emerged. She believed she could never win a primary as a moderate, so she entered the 2016 primary as a progressive like Mr. Obama. Then she moved further left as Sen. Bernie Sanders came closer to derailing her nomination. This time she was able to contain her opponent’s support, crucially by bringing African-American voters into her camp.            

But Mrs. Clinton’s transformation during the primaries, especially on social and cultural issues, cost her an easy win against Donald Trump. As Hillary 3.0 catered to the coastal elites who had eluded her in 2008, Mr. Trump stole many of the white working-class voters who might have been amenable to the previous version. Finally she had the full support of the New York Times and the other groups that had shunned her for Mr. Obama—but only at the cost of an unforeseen collapse in support in the Midwest.            

Claims of a Russian conspiracy and the unfairness of the Electoral College shielded Mrs. Clinton from ever truly conceding she had lost. She was robbed, she told herself, yet again. But after two years of brooding—including at book length—Mrs. Clinton has come unbound. She will not allow this humiliating loss at the hands of an amateur to end the story of her career. You can expect her to run for president once again. Maybe not at first, when the legions of Senate Democrats make their announcements, but definitely by the time the primaries are in full swing.            

Mrs. Clinton has a 75% approval rating among Democrats, an unfinished mission to be the first female president, and a personal grievance against Mr. Trump, whose supporters pilloried her with chants of “Lock her up!” This must be avenged.            

Expect Hillary 4.0 to come out swinging. She has decisively to win those Iowa caucus-goers who have never warmed up to her. They will see her now as strong, partisan, left-leaning and all-Democrat—the one with the guts, experience and steely-eyed determination to defeat Mr. Trump. She has had two years to go over what she did wrong and how to take him on again.                    

Richard Nixon came back from his loss to John F. Kennedy in 1960 and won the presidency in 1968. He will be the model for winning again. Mrs. Clinton won’t travel the country in a van with Huma Abedin this time, doing small events and retail politics. Instead she will enter through the front door, mobilizing the army of professional women behind her, leveraging her social networks, and raking in donations. She will hope to emerge as an unstoppable force to undo Mr. Trump, running on the #MeToo movement, universal health care and gun control. Proud and independent, this time she will sideline Bill and Mr. Obama, limiting their role to fundraising.                               

The generation of Democrats who have been waiting to take over the party from the Clintons will be fuming that she is back and stealing their show. But they revealed themselves to be bungling amateurs in the Brett Kavanaugh nomination fight, with their laughable Spartacus moments. She will trounce them. Just as Mr. Trump cleared the field, Mrs. Clinton will take down rising Democratic stars like bowling pins. Mike Bloomberg will support her rather than run, and Joe Biden will never be able to take her on.          

Don’t pay much attention to the “I won’t run” declarations. Mrs. Clinton knows both Mr. Clinton and Mr. Obama declared they weren’t running, until they ran. She may even skip Iowa and enter the race later, but rest assured that, one way or another, Hillary 4.0 is on the way.                                    

Mr. Penn was a pollster and senior adviser to Bill and Hillary Clinton from 1995-2008. Mr. Stein is a former Democratic Manhattan borough president and president of the New York City Council.",tau_decay,e9is2xp,conservative
*jack nicholson nodding gif*,rollingstone76,e9ilw65,conservative
"Gonna be fun to see her lose in the primaries again, because the DNC can't possibly be stupid enough to rig them for her two elections in a row. Right? Right?",giobbistar21,e9ilxby,conservative
This is an opinion/commentary piece. There's a difference between news and opinions. ,phdaemon,e9izltr,conservative
Ugh.,McKnight36,e9ilrnt,conservative
"Liberals have no one else. 

2020 is gunna be good. 

It is going to make Smokey the Bear look at the California wild fires wistfully. 

Riots and riots. Assaults. Who knows what else when Hillary loses.",VirginWizard69,e9iooe9,conservative
"Joe Biden, Hillary, CPL, Beto, Warren, Harris...

It's going to be fun.",mlmack,e9iu8ds,conservative
"What a way to admit that they have *nothing* for 2020. If I were still a Dem, I'd be putting my fist through a wall over this news.",jd_porter,e9itcpt,conservative
\*Doubt*,Luke15g,e9iw39l,conservative
No way the DNC let's her fail a 3rd time,PigsAndCats,e9j47cn,conservative
"The worst democrat presidential nominee in history wants to run again.  

You go girl.  I will support you (in the primaries) because your nomination will guarantee a GOP presidency.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9iqi63,conservative
[Hillary 4.0](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nauLgZISozs&t=4) in a nutshell.,nmj95123,e9j4f0b,conservative
DUDE NO ONE LIKES YOU,top-perro,e9j10wc,conservative
She’ll join Adlai Stevenson and William Jennings Bryan as the most failed presidential candidates in history ,MattMeduri,e9jaq8a,conservative
We need the most progressive democrat to run like O'Rourke or Sanders. That way 2020 would be the biggest GOP win in decades. ,JKfreebitch,e9jgd4t,conservative
"She wants revenge, and that crown she should deservedly have got. But first, revenge.

The past two years and the next two years are her effort to weaken the country and divide the people to meet her goal. She built up a base of NPCs against Trump and she will be using these NPCs to reach that crown.",r-magnificient,e9j0cmx,conservative
Here’s what scares me... they’ve learned that they can rig elections and no one will call them out on it. What’s stopping them from doing it again? ,the_vinster,e9j39mu,conservative
If there’s a Hillary v trump part 2 that would be hysterical and if trump beats her again that’ll be the greatest own in human history ,jgthedudeman,e9j6ks9,conservative
"It would be the death knell for the Democratic party at the presidential level.  She has no charisma, she has skeletons I her closet, and to be honest I am extremely uncomfortable with the family political dynasties that have been cropping up the past decade.   I know we cant restrict it, they have the right to self determination, but seeing the same families is deeply deeply concerning.",Falkamper,e9j756a,conservative
Did I ever tell you the definition of insanity...,SCPendolino,e9jiu7d,conservative
Do it. I want to see her lose for a 3rd and and final time. The meltdown will be glorious to watch.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9j4vnb,conservative
Please do,Jabronies96,e9jaw4b,conservative
Big mistake.  ,petitereddit,e9jawau,conservative
"If she does, it will be a fucking shit show no matter who wins. I'll start the popcorn. ",kshebdhdbr,e9jfdal,conservative
Idk is it just me but I can't wait for 2020 elections. ,TwoWiseFools,e9jvsz5,conservative
"No way.  She's not that stupid.  She's that arrogant, but not that stupid.  

If  anything, she'll run to influence the primaries.  Especially since the superdelegates have less power in the DNC now, if she can spoil a few states so there's no clear nominee after the first round, she can drop out and endorse whomever she wants, and the superdelegates will pick that person.",serial_crusher,e9k2f7r,conservative
TIL Hillary is a Trump supporter,just_some_moron,e9lq5gr,conservative
"Bernie is running again.  Biden is running this time.  So is Cameltoe Harris.  And probably Spartacus too.

You're drunk, Hillary.  Go home.",BrighamYoung,e9j7u22,conservative
"Please do, Hillary!",from_gondolin,e9j19ln,conservative
She desperately wants that hilarious tweet to come true. ,skarface6,e9j9yyw,conservative
"Wait, isn't she considered disqualified because of a national security breach?",TheRealRaptor_BYOND,e9jc284,conservative
"I knew she was gonna run again when she boarded a flight via a commercial plane with her husband and it was all over the news and social media.  

",Anthropologie07,e9jcknw,conservative
"How many times do we have to teach you this lesson, old man!",Richerlie,e9jdsma,conservative
"Say what you will about how truthful this whole Russia ""collusion"" thing is. It's pretty clear they used social media to try to cause some form of chaos in the US. It's why the same accounts did black lives matter ads in Ferguson. The problem many Democrats have not realized is in pounding the Russia narrative they have given old Hill a great talking point to run on in the primaries in 2020.",Snicsnipe,e9jf78e,conservative
Damn slow news day in the Opinions section ,SnowBeast90,e9jjt7n,conservative
Is this WSJ trolling?  This would be a hilarious disaster.,timbowen,e9iy7do,conservative
"Good God, why?",cuttysark9712,e9j3z6v,conservative
"Can't be true, she's not stupid nor is the dnc.  Everyone hates her, even Bill !!!",SuperFunMonkey,e9j60i7,conservative
It's an opinion article. Party lines aside I don't think any political party wants to run a candidate who already lost against the same person who is now the incumbent. It makes no sense unless they actually want to lose.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9jff79,conservative
"No shit, we knew this a while ago, shes still bitter. ",chugonthis,e9jofdj,conservative
"Well she is all ready the most failed presidential candidate in history I think, so the odds have to change at some point...  LOL ",ozric101,e9imbh9,conservative
The democrats would really be quite dumb if they force her down America’s throats again. It would make you wonder how much leverage she must have on the entire party.,snow_ninja,e9jseyi,conservative
"Unmentioned is the inevitable framing of Hillary 2020 as a referendum on ""Russian Election Interference"". The GOP, and conservatism as a whole, will be targeted from that angle. It needs no evidence to appeal to the giddily enraged Dem base and will inspire extreme acts of violence intended to ""save"" the country from the Russian scourge. Win or lose, 2020 is going to prove the breaking point on a number of fronts.",jd_porter,e9j6rp0,conservative
this was quite the read.,redditor99880,e9j50ka,conservative
[trump's reaction when](https://media.giphy.com/media/7Fu9qrV6CVXXO/giphy.gif),GeoStarRunner,e9jckm6,conservative
I was under the impression that she basically owns the DNC at this point.,AntifaArePathetic,e9im391,conservative
"""Hold my autumnal ale""

DNC voters",fifaislife206,e9k15ed,conservative
"I wouldn’t put it past them, each time you think the democrats will take their foot out of their mouth, or couldn’t get any more retarded, they out do themselves again and again.",BeanerShnitzel,e9iy20y,conservative
"They do have Orourke to fall back on. Quite frankly, I welcome both challengers. ",I_dont_study,e9it1wr,conservative
Spartacus?,8K12,e9j24mq,conservative
"Harris will probably run and win, both the primary and general.",mkgandkembafan,e9jmgqj,conservative
This. Hillary 2020 campaign run virtually guarantees a Republican win. ,brubeck5,e9l5twv,conservative
"> She built up a base of NPCs against Trump and she will be using these NPCs to reach that crown.

She built up nothing. Voters in the Rust Belt took a chance when they bet on Trump in 2016- and they won. Great job growth, low unemployment.

If anything, it has become increasingly clear that the country dodged a bullet with Hillary ""3rd Obama term"" Clinton.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9jkxa9,conservative
'republican' DAs and AGs have ignored this completely. ,superfakesuperfake,e9jx88z,conservative
Lol I knew she was gonna run again when Trump won Florida.,severeneckpain,e9jhf5n,conservative
">It's an opinion article.

Written by a man who

>was a pollster and senior adviser to Bill and Hillary Clinton from 1995-2008.

And really it doesn't matter what the DNC wants. They can't really stop her from running again.",severeneckpain,e9jhi75,conservative
Biden wants in on the title,ReaganTroll,e9imhat,conservative
She might be going for the record of most presidential run loses ,Chapka69,e9in09n,conservative
"Only has one last chance before being barred for life. Doubt she wants to take that risk and to be remembered as the only person, in history, that is barred from president due to failure lol.",Raqriz,e9jb2p0,conservative
"William Jennings Bryan has her beat.  

Also as a Democrat.  But he has the distinction of losing 3x in the general election.",a_bearded_man,e9jhy0s,conservative
"Almost, but not quite....

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/William_Jennings_Bryan",joozian_,e9jtweu,conservative
"I would be mind blown if they think she can run again. 

The best analogy is,  maybe if I run fast I can bust thru this brick wall. The few times didn’t work, 
But I’m certain this time will work. 

I don’t think she’ll run again. How much more effort can you really put behind a losing horse. 

Since trumps been president I like to think what would Hillary do when trump has situations. Like North Korea, here you go have more nukes, we’ll pay for it.  Border, wide the fuck open. Taxes, thru the roof! I’m happy she’s not president, and I hope she never gets there ",Chapka69,e9jtmrl,conservative
"She did. But this time she won’t be able to stop every other Democrat from running like she did in 2016. Kamala Harris will run, Corey Booker will run, Chief Warren will run, maybe Beto will run, and others will too. She will have actual competition other than the one hand picked “competition” that was always going to drop early and a crazy old socialist who wouldn’t take the Dem party’s demands. ",Bronc27,e9iwhzj,conservative
"His resume consists of:

1. Losing to Cruz despite tons of California money and media fawning.

2. Wanting and trying to ban guns.

3. Being Transspanic. 

I know he's going to try, but I don't see why anyone would vote for him.",HohlraumHe3,e9izc5f,conservative
"> Orourke

He is a worse choice than Pocahontas. ",VirginWizard69,e9it9vr,conservative
"> Spartacus?

Please Lawd. Let it happen. 

He ain't Obama. ",VirginWizard69,e9j28ws,conservative
Lol,VirginWizard69,e9jxkl3,conservative
">And really it doesn't matter what the DNC wants. They can't really stop her from running again.

Let's not kid ourselves. A candidate isn't going anywhere without the DNC's blessing- just look at Bernie.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9jl16z,conservative
He makes me wannA run out and shoot my 12 gauge into the air ,Chapka69,e9iu9u1,conservative
"Losing in a General Election isn't like losing in a primary, it's generally not considered strange if someone who lost previously in a primary decides to run again, but it is if someone who lost in a general does, most recent was Nixon I believe. Prior to that was that guy who ran against Eisenhower twice. Now, Clinton won the popular vote, so she may be able to say something like ""I never lost"", but Biden running would be considered far less out of the norm than Clinton running again, in fact it would not be considered abnormal at all in my perception.",Thumbhat,e9j7w4x,conservative
Creepy Joe is creeping again!!! /s ,ozric101,e9imq7b,conservative
Romney at least got the message...,ReaganTroll,e9in4uu,conservative
Anyone who runs against Trump in 2020 is going to lose and be humiliated in the process.  They will have a hard time moving their career past the loss.  I think they will let Hillary take another shot.   She's done anyway. ,Hillary_For_Prison,e9iy84p,conservative
I won’t be surprised if Sanders runs again in 2020.,MyCustomUsername,e9j2lst,conservative
"Well, he's got the Obama advantage - he's never done anything that required results.",Pontius23,e9jdnme,conservative
Don't forget wanting to shut down I.C.E. ,spanishgalacian,e9j3iuk,conservative
He also ran on raising teachers wages. But this won't be enough to gain national support.,Sideswipe0009,e9j756j,conservative
Trump would bring up Bobby Francis' drunken crash and fleeing attempt at every single turn.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9jko5o,conservative
Lol,8K12,e9j334w,conservative
"> Clinton won the popular vote

She also hilariously won the popular vote in the 2008 primary that she lost to Obama.",nagurski03,e9jk6nv,conservative
"> Now, Clinton won the popular vote, so she may be able to say something like ""I never lost""

Gore would've had a better shot if he ran again in 2004.

Hillary as a candidate has just so many issues: her health, the fact that people neither trust nor like her, the email scandal that would've sent any other person to prison...

Just way too many flaws.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9jkd0c,conservative
"Pretty much. She just doesn’t get it. 

Because it’s “owed” to her",Chapka69,e9iu6fz,conservative
Oh I’m sure he ran for Senate in Utah because he no longer had ambitions for higher office. 🙄 lol,etherealsmog,e9j7hbi,conservative
"Man you gotta be careful with that kind of thinking. And remember that ""winning"" an election is a function of WHO counts the votes in every state -- if that process isn't cleaned up before 2020, the Democrats WILL win.",AntifaArePathetic,e9j1uon,conservative
"They don't see it that way, Hillary won the popular vote despite the fact that everyone hates her including Bill.  Someone more likable could do better.  Plus, Harris is not going to want to wait 4 more years and have to go up against Cortez.  Bernie and Biden don't easily have 4 years to wait on account of age.  Biden is 5 years older than Hillary.",BrighamYoung,e9j88th,conservative
"They'll be John Kerry 2.0, no Democrat wants to be John Kerry. Not even John Kerry.",Javalavadava,e9j9e63,conservative
"You know that despite those, people will still vote for her because she's not Trump and because she's a ""strong woman.""",14thAndVine,e9jvugm,conservative
Its her turn!,sudomakesandwich,e9l23w2,conservative
"I could see him going for Senate majority/minority leader in the future, but I doubt he'd run for president again.",Chao-Z,e9jg4gm,conservative
Fair points. ,Hillary_For_Prison,e9j21v6,conservative
">Plus, Harris is not going to want to wait 4 more years and have to go up against Cortez.

Does anyone consider Cortez a serious contender for POTUS? The girl is dumb as a rock. Her numbers would tank after a debate with tough opponents- she can't even answer softball questions from interviewers without embarrassing herself.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9jkj52,conservative
Fair points.  We will just have to see what happens.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9jncrn,conservative
"Future articles for candidate Cortez:

>*The Girl is Dumb as a Rock - And that's a Good Thing*

>With the nomination of Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez the democrats have nominated the first developmentally impaired candidate for president and given hope to the historically marginalized nuerodiverse. Despite her cognitive impairments she has demonstrated sound policy judgement and her push for further economic reforms...",ElbowWhisper,e9jpsiv,conservative
"If someone called my daughter a whore or cunt, his head will be on a spike.",rugby_shirt,e9izu4q,conservative
What is wrong with Avenatti. This is ambulance chasing. He is desperate for attention,KaiserGrant,e9j1i6m,conservative
"A rabid dog will bite at anything, without realizing the cost.",AM_Kylearan,e9k4cmr,conservative
"Well he has a 4 million dollar settlement to pay off, he has to hustle and scam to get it.",ozric101,e9j5ykj,conservative
Levin calls him “the slip and fall lawyer”. It’s a hilarious nickname but it’s also very fitting. ,Knollsit,e9jcfaw,conservative
"I've made a petition to have a public enquiry into this. The text is below but it's not viewable on the petition site yet because I need to get 5 signatures first. You need to be a British citizen or resident to sign it:

>**Inquest: Why did government tell police in 2008 to ignore Asian grooming gangs?**

>Former Chief Prosecutor for NW England Nazir Afzal was interviewed on BBC Radio 4 on 19/10/2018. He claimed that in 2008 the Home Office contacted all police forces instructing them not to investigate grooming gangs. We need a public enquiry to establish if that's true and who made the decision.

>Mr Afzal, who successfully prosecuted the Rochdale grooming gang, told the BBC: “back in 2008 the Home Office sent a circular to all police forces in the country saying 'as far as these young girls who are being exploited in towns and cities, we believe they have made an informed choice about their sexual behaviour and therefore it is not for you police officers to get involved in.'” If that order was sent from the Home Office, then there will be a record of it and it needs to be investigated.

>https://petition.parliament.uk/petitions/232752/sponsors/new?token=xNhY28BUcyap6nOvNDUs",BanksysBro,e9lwbxz,conservative
"I'm Japanese and I'm offended by your use of the word ""Asian""

They're pakistani moslems",ProfStorm,e9m5b9h,conservative
If it wasn't $40 I'd buy it for the laughs.,Silicon_Avatar,e9l0ng3,conservative
How have I not seen this before?,Marko_Ramius1,e9l1o7n,conservative
"This just in, company tries to sell a product to make a profit. Story at 11.

Also this product is made in China. Sad.",Rabidraccoon76,e9l62d7,conservative
Its real. I saw a commercial for it on tv last fall. ,hipsterdufus84,e9l1a4p,conservative
Dear God help us.,Humptythe21st,e9kyu1w,conservative
"I've never seen this, either. Forty bucks is a lot a for a plush, and I collect them. Seth MacFarlane's Ted is only 20 bucks, and 15"" tall and well made.",Upnsmoque,e9mv7r8,conservative
"So is Hilary, he better watch his 6.",Willie1Eye,e9jph88,conservative
He lost by \~13 points to Carol *MAGA* Miller on Tuesday.,ReaganTroll,e9jp13n,conservative
"I first heard about this guy when he was running for senate in WV. He's a great guy, a rare mold in politics. This dude embodies the populist message that Trump ran on. I truly hope he does well.

&#x200B;

He's not a typical Democrat, not even **remotely.** He's a military vet with a fierce opposition to greed in both business and politics alike, supports our borders and our right to bear arms, and Trump is a numbskull if he thinks it's a good idea to attack him rather than reach out to him.",FullConservative,e9lbqjj,conservative
"Dude looks like he goes to the gym, he better stop ASAP ",hello_japan,e9juvhi,conservative
Tucker talks common sense...dangerous talk.,GlenGanges,e9j1osb,conservative
"I find it all very amusing because I've always considered Tucker Carlson to be anything but  tough. Nothing like Buchanan or O'Reilly, who he replaced on a couple of shows. Mild mannered. If you told me he was a never Trumper I wouldn't be surprised. 

Don't even watch his show.",SickofInternetProgs,e9ijooz,conservative
Cnn news by criminals for criminals,krepogregg,e9jn75n,conservative
We don't take too kindly to that there common sense talk in these parts. ,WooPig45,e9kavff,conservative
">  If you told me he was a never Trumper I wouldn't be surprised.
> 
> Don't even watch his show.

You might want to watch, it's quite good, and your opinion of him is more than a bit off.",Silicon_Avatar,e9j23lr,conservative
"Dude, just shut up. ",soxfan90,e9kn720,conservative
I do not think Rick Sanatorium knows a thing about the subject. ,ozric101,e9kimhx,conservative
Black women just adored Mitt Romney right? Spare me,YankeeBlues21,e9kldr0,conservative
Oh no. We're gonna lose black women too!,ReaganTroll,e9kj24k,conservative
So basically this means Trump treats everyone the same? Then how can he be racist at the same time? And shouldn't reporters of any race be ready for tough interviews? Come on. ,triggernaut,e9ksyzs,conservative
What the hell?,PurpleAngel23,e9l6fr8,conservative
"> Former Sen. Rick Santorum (R-PA) on Sunday claimed President Donald Trump should be aware that, though he employs the same “combative” style with all “incendiary” questioners, it becomes “a problem” for him when targeted at **black women in the press.**

So we just need Affirmative Action for black women in the media? When is the ACLU going to file suit?",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9kogqr,conservative
Women in general. ,hipsterdufus84,e9kk9ri,conservative
Who cares? They are just a tiny percentage of the Electorate. It’s not worth trying to win them over. Just continue to consolidate White Support.,SnickersReese,e9kme7q,conservative
My sister and I think he’s hilarious. I know many women who support the President.,jina100,e9l4uo6,conservative
Me included,PurpleAngel23,e9l6f84,conservative
Because it’s the desert and dry stuff catches fire. ,CASunDevil24,e9kskws,conservative
"The piece is from April of 2016.

I’m not saying they still don’t do this, but that was under the Barry O regime where the IRS was very corrupt. ",mikeygio,e9iicci,conservative
"The more that pay, the merrier.  (I think that's their mission statement)",undue-influence,e9ilz5m,conservative
No shit? Wait until your SSN gets stolen by an illegal. Good luck with that shit. ,Lurking-My-Life-Away,e9jgfdv,conservative
"Seriously, what's up with the recent flood of news articles from years ago on this sub?",oren0,e9im25t,conservative
Most are a net negative benefits vs. payments.,ngoni,e9iux0v,conservative
have a ssn guess how easy it is to register to vote afterwards..,Delta_25,e9imiwt,conservative
Most of them are from the faultless Obama years.. it seems.  /s ,ozric101,e9imhq9,conservative
Establishing a pattern of corrupt activity perpetrated and condoned by the leftists.,mlmack,e9ja9m1,conservative
"Didn't you know. Nothing bad happened 8 years prior to 11, 2016. Liberals don't think enough to check dates.",DozerM,e9imyw5,conservative
I would love to see them try. It would be like a heroin addict going cold turkey.,hello_japan,e9jv4o8,conservative
"Do it, please, do it. ",iwasthebeaver,e9jvjbs,conservative
Tf are they going to do? Not give him positive coverage?,xTheHeroWeNeedx,e9jxtdi,conservative
"Lol yeah not a fuckin chance they’d succeed. Just like the others are saying, it’s like heroin for these people. They thrive on hating and following Trump. I would LOVE to see them try though and see how long they last. No Trump November.",RichardStillhard,e9kc2wg,conservative
"By all means, ignore Trump and report on other stuff. When people see that things in this country are, for the most part, doing pretty well, TDS may see dwindling numbers and the people may look at the left be like "" wtf on these people on about?""",Sideswipe0009,e9kgg2e,conservative
Aaaaaaaaaaaaaand nothing will happen.,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e9j6nfq,conservative
"Wow, Comey should have recused himself from the Clinton emails investigation.  ",StraightNewt,e9je1pw,conservative
Reopen that investigation.,Terra_green2,e9jfnaq,conservative
Yup. ,dan4daniel,e9j8aom,conservative
I like that flair. ,peeves91,e9ja1t2,conservative
Props to SNL for this. ,GoHuskies1984,e9hlv8a,conservative
This was a nice touch by SNL to invite him on and his response was perfect as well. ,jamesmir89,e9hlmw7,conservative
"Honestly, Crenshaw was a total pro. Even if the whole ""Ariana Grande is his ringtone"" thing was scripted, he did a heck of a job and played the whole thing well. Good on him. ",giobbistar21,e9im8go,conservative
"Make no mistake- Dan Crenshaw's initial response where he brushed the whole thing off is what allowed this to happen. 
If Crenshaw had stooped to their level SNL and Pete Davidson may have felt justified. 

Having said that, my impression of the initial dig was that it was never meant to be really nasty. It was just thoughtless. 

Pete Davidson is probably never going to be one of my favourite entertainers but at least he was man enough to do this. So good on him and SNL. ",Javatex,e9j0bjz,conservative
"I doubt Crenshaw was upset at all, but he played along like a champ. Good on snl and Pete Davidson for walking it back",CanIShowYouMyDick,e9iebt3,conservative
Class act. ,Armageddon_It,e9jgvjm,conservative
I can see Creenshaw running for POTUS one day. ,spanishgalacian,e9j40pf,conservative
"Message to the left, in case you missed it- that is called ""class"".  Please make a note of it.",Saltydogusn,e9hm18f,conservative
Pete Davidson looked like a kid in History 1301 who wasn’t even paying attention. ,RoosterKCogburn,e9hxzf3,conservative
I mean let's be honest. The dude took shrapnel to the face I'm sure he can take a skinny blue haired soyboy making a joke about him. Never forget.,bitERRORrate,e9j7q00,conservative
Crenshaw proves that he is the bigger man. Props to him.,Kalashnicam,e9imaq3,conservative
"While his response was sincere, powerful and heartfelt, it won't have any effect on the left.",ADMNimitz,e9hou8w,conservative
Lool it was all just a publicity stunt. ,fphoon,e9k0maq,conservative
What a joke,freekaratelesson,e9j0jhi,conservative
The irony is not lost on me.,niuguy,e9i52t8,conservative
no time for class because orange man bad. gotta take back our pure democracy! /s,AntifaArePathetic,e9il3uh,conservative
That was my opinion too. Seems more like he did it to save face/career. Maybe not though.,JdPat04,e9jfbgp,conservative
He paid attention once during the Nazi lecture and now sees them everywhere. ,-momoyome-,e9ih0wh,conservative
"Maybe not as a whole, but reaching a few here and there makes a difference.",JaneTheThird,e9i27h5,conservative
"I'm on the left, and I've been absolutely moved by Crenshaw's handling of this. Not only is he not getting in the gutter, his poise is calling the other side to be better—and it's working. I don't agree with him on all his issues but I wish was in a district where I could vote for this man.

I'm astonished and humbled that men like him are still out there in this political landscape. It's true dignity like his that will let America move past the environment that allowed the buffoonish rhetoric of Trump and the current Dem leadership to flourish.

We need more Crenshaws.",migmatitic,e9jizty,conservative
Not even a little. ,skarface6,e9huep5,conservative
"I believe many of her dreams and pie in the sky ideas will be squashed when she realizes she has to work with over 400 people. 

She won a primary, which then guaranteed her election. Good for her. I couldn’t have done that and have no desire too. 

But actually being a congress person is waaaaaay different then winning a primary. She’ll continue to get an outsized media presence. But that only helps conservatives I think. ",KhabibHeelTurn,e9iekrd,conservative
Call me mean-spirited but she just comes across as  stupid.  Dumb as a bag of rocks.  I could care less what educational systems passed her she simply isn't smart.  ,GMU1993,e9hfcmh,conservative
"My first, and most important, question is this: How the hell can you be a democrat if your family escaped the evils of socialism? ",Odoacer476CE,e9hixsa,conservative
Why would ANYBODY who had ANY concern about socialism vote for the party of socialism for anything?  Is there really anybody still alive who believes that there’s any agenda in the Democratic Party besides worldwide wealth redistribution?,bastardstepchild,e9hjvkz,conservative
"For everyone asking, how could you be a democrat at all? I think it’s pretty simple. I’ve been what I consider to be conservative my whole life. I’ve spent more hours listening to Rush and Mark Levin than probably all other forms of news media combined. 

But, I know a lot of Dems. And what’d they say is they care about 
1) Rights - mostly this has focused on Homosexuals and minorities. And look, as far as I’m concerned. The Dems were right about gay Rights. 
2) abortion. I don’t like it, but there it is
3) prison reform. They don’t think locking hundreds of thousands up for selling Weed makes sense. 
4) and yes, government redistribution. But government redistribution to pay for services is waaaaay different then Government Controlled economies, socialism. 

",KhabibHeelTurn,e9ifj3p,conservative
"Honestly, I wonder how she made it through Boston College with a BA in economics. Unless it's the normal school of thought from that university, it seems to me like she doesn't believe in status-quo economic thought at all.

My school really pushes Keynsian economics, and that's a bunch of BS, yet I've never seen anything resembling her stances in any serious business-related course. Maybe that's why she has so much pull, people want something different.

That being said, I feel like we've failed to adequately market our economic system to my generation. I learned a whole lot more about socialism in high school than I did about capitalism. Usually, the things we were taught have ended up being overgeneralizations. Meanwhile, we spent a solid half of a year about the communist takeover in Russia.

Edit:
I did go to school in Oregon (but in a conservative suburb), so maybe it was just where I lived.",cowboyfan08,e9i4ymx,conservative
How in the world can someone whose family escaped socialism be a Democrat? Makes absolutely no sense,Mr_0pportunity,e9hgjuk,conservative
The democrat party needs to treat its cancer,BeachCruisin22,e9hewbj,conservative
The fact that this person is still a Democrat makes me conclude that this person deserves exactly what socialism brings to them. ,ravenswin,e9hkpsg,conservative
At least you know what's comming.,StephenScherer1,e9jg3c0,conservative
"That wasnt true socialism!!!

Christ those people are annoying, I have one right now being annoying PMs, never asked them to message shit to me. ",chugonthis,e9jpkvd,conservative
"As a literate American Citizen, Ocasio-Cortez worries me. ",tidercekatdnatsoperi,e9iwc59,conservative
That dumb shit should be worried. Commissar Cortez will have him sweeping streets for three slices of cheese a day. Maybe the lefty moron should stop voting for the party that thinks money is free and infinitely redistributable. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9hivd1,conservative
I feel for the morons who voted for her. They obviously don't have a clue and I have a bridge to sell each and every one of them.,Wiseguy2013,e9ilggp,conservative
Can't worry 'em too much or they'd have left the party and stood against them.  I'm gonna' go ahead and say this is all talk and that the Democrats could become open socialists and they'd *still* never even *think* of going to the Right.,anuser999,e9i1rsh,conservative
She’s delusional. But watch her tone it down and become moderate lib to ensure her place in Congress for years to come.,mrjowei,e9js3vp,conservative
Cuba is more of a dictatorship right?,Federalist71,e9icnro,conservative
i cant stand looking at that dumb dumb,donjohn1986,e9hfnyh,conservative
Her stupid face,Just_a_Drunk_Gambler,e9iatj1,conservative
"If she hacks off her hair or dyes it blue, then shits about to get serious. ",Ruberis,e9hu4bd,conservative
She’s too dumb to get re-elected.  I’m still mad she will receive government benefits but I don’t see her as a threat.,bmack083,e9j4s6z,conservative
"The primary was a small district in NY. She literally got less than 16,000 votes, and the one running against her was a career DNC dude who hadn't done anything in years. Basically, they would have voted for Caligula's horse over that guy.",Juxen,e9jwfkp,conservative
"She's extremely stupid. Stupid people voting for stupid people. I bet she has a support team that does everything for her, tells her what to say and do. Once in a while she slips up when she gets into un-rehearsed situations and questions she didn't get an answer for.",geekwithout,e9htwnp,conservative
She's clearly retarded,BeachCruisin22,e9hfz1c,conservative
"She's the leftwing version of Sarah Palin.   Same dead look in her eyes, the lights are on but nobody is home.    No matter how smart she tries to sound she comes off like a freshman poli-sci major just spitting out random words and hoping nobody catches on that she's well out of her depth.    She's up there because she looks good and can sometimes put whole sentences together, just like Palin.    ",JessumB,e9im2up,conservative
I want to believe that she's several cards short of a full deck but I genuinely believe that she actually knows exactly what she's doing and is just pandering to her base.,HonorMyBeetus,e9i1a5m,conservative
"and ugly, i do not know how Americans see her as attractive.",n-esimacuenta,e9hzm3z,conservative
"If you've lived your entire live in a cage, being in a cage aint so bad",BeachCruisin22,e9hj868,conservative
"I live in an ex-communist country (Czech Republic) and this question doesn't make any sense. In the big picture, Republicans and Democrats disagree about some parameters of the capitalist economy, but socialism is a fundamentally different system.

I've always supported center or center-right parties in my country, but in the US, Democrats would be an easy choice, even if we take Trump out of the picture. By the way, it's fascinating that the demographic of people who elected Trump is very similar to the left-voting demographic here - non-urban areas, older, blue-collar.",falconberger,e9j0azb,conservative
Same category as liberal gun-owners who claim to support 2a.... STUPIDITY,geekwithout,e9hubxe,conservative
"to be fair, most countries with socialist leaning societies are not Venezuela. Many Scandinavian countries implement elements of socialism heavily. 

Perhaps someone with a pre-existing condition who fears having to depend on donations from a bar AOC used to work at to pay for their medical costs instead of having affordable healthcare would have those leanings",rounder55,e9iltav,conservative
"Because many Democrats are indoctrinated into their beliefs from a young age, tought that any doubt about liberalism is bigotry, and some dems were members of the party back when it was more moderate and are reluctant to leave now. ",ItsReasonOrTreason,e9hzwq4,conservative
"Both Democrats and Republicans support a capitalist mixed economy system, what they disagree about are parameters such as taxes or the level of social expenditures. Socialism is a fundamentally different system.",falconberger,e9j17z5,conservative
[removed],,e9in6xs,conservative
We should've killed social security yesterday.,JHenry313,e9j68yb,conservative
"The same reason people flee New York's taxes and then vote for higher taxes in North Carolina, etc.

It's all they know, and they're stupid.",BeachCruisin22,e9hgnji,conservative
A steady diet of lead paint chips.,nmj95123,e9iiy1i,conservative
The cancer is the new Democrat party. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9hf31z,conservative
"It looks like Democratic politicians these days are either old establishment players like Pelosi or far left upstarts. Would a little moderation be too much to ask? The GOP still has a lot of moderates, even though a lot of them are more supporting Trump. ",TrueBirch,e9ifu7n,conservative
Socialism always seems to create dictatorships,TrueBirch,e9ifx6e,conservative
I don't mind *looking* at her,BeachCruisin22,e9hfykn,conservative
Thank you for cutting straight to the chase.,GMU1993,e9hkkp2,conservative
Not too retarded if she got elected.  And I strongly oppose everything she stands for but I applaud how she played the system ,steelallz,e9i8g93,conservative
"Sort of like Sarah Palin, no?

EDIT: Downvoted because I think BOTH of these candidates had problems?  Wow.  ",MisanthropeNotAutist,e9ier96,conservative
Considering the Dems have Maxine Waters and Debbie Wasserwhatever as their leading ladies this chick ain't half bad.,GMU1993,e9i1zvu,conservative
"This guy's been lying to himself his whole life. It's only now that they've decided to call themselves socialists that he's got a problem? The intellectual dishonesty is dripping off him. 
",Odoacer476CE,e9hjog4,conservative
"That’s absolutely not what the DSA is, read the article. ",ZardokAllen,e9ixcyi,conservative
Here. Watch [this](https://youtu.be/zhE_68GMJIk). It's short.,Odoacer476CE,e9imxes,conservative
"Normally I let this go, but I can't today.

The health care that will be available in the U.S. in 10 years in nothing like what you expect today.  It will be significantly less than Medicare, probably more like Medicaid.  All those neat  biologics for things like RA and psoriasis?  Nope.  Too expensive.  Few total joint replacements.  Limited cardiac stents.  No renal dialysis after a certain age.

Some people will get a great deal more healthcare.  Most will get less, some will get far less.  Stop thinking the coming system will be utopia.  It won't be.",WIlf_Brim,e9j2zya,conservative
What do you mean ‘your’ president? Are you Canadian?,Colonize_The_Moon,e9io6rc,conservative
"Ah that's hitting home. I need to check if the income tax amendment passed.

Edit: it passed - 7% cap on income taxes (currently 5.45%).",JustAnotherJon,e9hikl2,conservative
"I don't know how you can, every time I look at her or see those pictures where she is laughing all I can think of is a braying mule or a horse. Those teeth a fucking massive.",PrecookedDonkey,e9hmwlj,conservative
I'm sure a cute dumb dumb is alright to look at. She gets to represent people in the government now though. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9hj15g,conservative
"She played the transplant hipsters in NYC, to be clear.  She’s hung out with the man bun crowd long enough to speak their lingo.  Don’t be fooled that she’s anything but an opportunist.",booblitchutz,e9i984x,conservative
Her campaign ad on Youtube was brilliantly designed to appeal perfectly to the Democratic primary voter base. I give all credit for her election to whoever came up with her marketing material.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9igjac,conservative
What a retarded thing to say.,TheComedianGLP,e9ij4fd,conservative
Even Illinois is like “thank god that’s not us”,zwiebelsaft,e9ilrbq,conservative
Not to mention those psycho eyes,J-Vito,e9j6nc2,conservative
Oh I fully agree with you. But one must be smart enough to read the writing on the wall to take advantage of an opportunity ,steelallz,e9i9dsb,conservative
"In no way is that her demographic, the 14th congressional district
is primarily Hispanic and working class.",Sunn_SSBM,e9i9wgs,conservative
Disprove my point.  ,MisanthropeNotAutist,e9imo7c,conservative
More like she caught em napping ,SpineEater,e9iqekw,conservative
"Her district is the Bronx and part of Queens.  The movement that elected her was driven by white hipsters that have moved there.  Don’t be fooled by the populista rhetoric, she knows where her craft toast is buttered with non dairy vegan butter.  The people who are FROM her district aren’t the force here.",booblitchutz,e9ib054,conservative
"You don't have a point.

You have a problem, much like Occasional-Collapse voters:

You're stupid.",TheComedianGLP,e9kg92f,conservative
"Do you have any way to actually substantiate your claim here? Otherwise the demographic information for the 14th seems much more trustworthy

Btw only a minority of the neighborhoods in the 14th like Astoria in Queen's have substantial white transplant populations, the Bronx is nearly untouched by gentrification",Sunn_SSBM,e9ids54,conservative
"Turnout for congressional primaries in NYC is extremely low and it is very easy for a motivated constituency (i.e., the ""man bun crowd"") to propel an insurgent to victory.  Less than 30,000 votes were cast in total between Ocasio-Cortez and Crowley.  These are the results according to Ballotpedia:
AOC-16,898
Crowley-12,880

And its not just Astoria. In Queens, Woodside, Sunnyside and part of Long Island City are in CD 14.  These are all previously ""white ethnic"" neighborhoods that would have supported a bog standard Democrat like Crowley in the past but have become very gentrified over the past 20 years thanks to the epidemic of hipster transplant that has spread throughout the city.  ",WrecksRyan,e9ihzbg,conservative
Spoken like someone who has not been to the Bronx lately (or at all).,booblitchutz,e9jt8o9,conservative
"Woodside and Sunnyside are changing neighborhoods but I would hesitant to call them gentrified, still solidly majority-minority. 

I just don't get why it's that hard to accept that AOC actually won her native constituency, a big part of her platform appeals heavily to Hispanic voters like abolishing ICE, ending the war on drugs and greater funding for entitlements. Guess it's easier to discredit a faceless army of manbun wearing socialists than a diverse constituency drawn to far left policy as a general rule",Sunn_SSBM,e9im7tm,conservative
I live in Mott Haven try again,Sunn_SSBM,e9jv9gw,conservative
"I’m not calling them “gentrified”. Young white hipsters invade neighborhoods like this out of necessity.  Stop blue pilling here, it’s just sad.",booblitchutz,e9jtd33,conservative
"Why bother?  You won’t admit you’re wrong.  White hipsters are often the most contrary bunch of twits.  “Oh you like that movie, I think it’s the worst movie ever made.  I think Led Zepplin is the worst band ever..” etc.",booblitchutz,e9jvo2f,conservative
Either prove that these people are a sizeable constituency with some real facts or shut up,Sunn_SSBM,e9jvk9s,conservative
Haha nice insults sure got me,Sunn_SSBM,e9jwj37,conservative
"Am I cutting too close to the man bun here?  Go on, brag about how “authentic” your neighborhood is as you smack your way through your craft vegan brioche.  Can’t wait.",booblitchutz,e9jzkmb,conservative
"I'm still waiting for you to substantiate your claims with something other than your feelings, dgaf what you call me

If you can prove what you claim I'll believe you ",Sunn_SSBM,e9k5olf,conservative
"Google “craft vegan Bronx” the results go on and on. You’ll just say “yOu dInT prOVe nOtHIn” but you clearly don’t know what you’re talking about, OR you DO know and don’t want to admit being wrong, OR you think admitting that Cortez was elected by white people delegitimizes her victory.",booblitchutz,e9lipeo,conservative
Facts plz,Sunn_SSBM,e9llgtd,conservative
"Treason, fraud, criminal negligence. What's in a name?",AddictedToGlue,e9jn92a,conservative
See? Fraud doesn’t happen when you define everything that is fraud as “not fraud”.,justhere2havefun,e9ipdq0,conservative
Yeah I watched that conversation live. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9iinol,conservative
"Funny, I remember how, 6 days ago, Jake Tapper and Wolf Blitzer were on air saying ""this isn't a wave election."" ",psstein,e9l18cy,conservative
They aren't wrong. They got way more gains then they should have.,Silicon_Avatar,e9l0reh,conservative
 Most of the blue wave happened after the election when they suddenly started finding lost votes and flipping every Republican win. ,the-divine-comedy,e9l1c10,conservative
I've seen bigger waves in my bathtub.,XYZ-Wing,e9l0pau,conservative
"Basically,

""Something we expected to happen, happened, and we're all now shocked""",Scozzar,e9l39iu,conservative
Fake news,theheaviestblanket,e9l0vfx,conservative
"I'm glad they are happy with this, because I was beyond scared of a far bigger wave just two months ago.  Thank god for the Kavanaugh debacle. 

Did they gain seats in the House? Sure.  But they were on pace for the biggest wave in history.  It's like going to the casino and being up $1,000 and then continuing to play and ending up at +$200.  I mean, you made money, but you should have been walking away with so much more.  I mean did you see those generic polls, and specific polls from January to September?  They were scary for Republicans.",r777m,e9l85z7,conservative
Brian Round-Head Wideload. He’s so woke.,rojindahar,e9l22uc,conservative
"They were literally hoping for more than they got before the elections.  They're closer to their projections now than they were immediately after election day (due to all of those ""found"" ballots), but it's not like they projected to pick up 45 and got 65.",Telineye,e9lid7b,conservative
That was before CNN updated their programming.,tenshon,e9l1eq6,conservative
"Yeah, well, that was before the Democrats got an extra week to have ballots just miraculously form from the aether. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9lmheo,conservative
Is that being investigated?,PurpleAngel23,e9l58sx,conservative
I've seen bigger waves in my *coffee*...,tenshon,e9l1az7,conservative
"I’m not joking when I tell you that the “suspicious package” turned out to be a box of, you guessed it, provisional ballots at Avis Rental Cars. They were returned unnoticed by an elections department employee who’d rented a vehicle. 

I’ll keep you guys updated as I learn more down here. ",YankeeBlues21,e9jcp2e,conservative
are you fucking kidding me? i was going to joke about that.,SKWM3000,e9jdv6h,conservative
The Democrats beat you to the punchline,YankeeBlues21,e9je4bh,conservative
"An LA City Councilman is a top Democrat?

The headline states massive corruption was found, but all the article says is that an office and home were searched. Saying massive corruption was found is just speculative at this point. 

Fake news. ",cetamega,e9kh7in,conservative
"If this happened during a school event, it seems like suspensions would be warranted. Not sure what kind of legal action the school thinks they could take, though.",PubliusVA,e9k6i6n,conservative
"Imagine being so authoritarian you want legal sanctions against students for a photo taken off school property and not at a school event.


What is there to investigate? They didn't break any laws. This police department needs to stop virtue signaling and go find actual crimes to solve.
They are assisting an Antifa-led witch hunt into a high school prank. I didn't realize that high school pranks, totally protected under the first amendment, were a police matter worthy of investigation.

What crime did they commit? This is America, not Europe- we have free speech here. It's not the police's job to monitor free speech. We live in a free country.

If anybody can tell me why VICE is trying to dox 17 year old high school kids that would be great.",Silicon_Avatar,e9krw6b,conservative
"It seems to me that more information is needed before judgement is rendered. The people calling for expulsion (not suspension) of everyone in the photo are probably overreacting.

But the outrage machine must be fed.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9k7x0j,conservative
"So I’m supposed to just accept this as fact, seeing as this snowflake has her page private and we can’t even see the photo? Also, they’re fucking kids and it’s obviously a joke.  Move on.",HolsterOfNuts,e9k9yek,conservative
My suspension is thu are just saying they would look into that so parents won’t start saying they aren’t doing anything ,PuzzledAnalyst,e9k6tq6,conservative
"> It seems to me that more information is needed before judgement is rendered.

It's just a photo, there are no other allegations, so what crime did they commit? 

They didn't break any laws. It's not the police's job to monitor free speech.",Silicon_Avatar,e9kz857,conservative
How would handle this? I would just say they are using their first amendment rights and they aren’t hurting anyone with their little pic,PuzzledAnalyst,e9k86lu,conservative
"[this is the photo in question](https://i.imgur.com/KO3uMfS.jpg)

I personally don’t see anything wrong with expressing your first amendment rights so I’m hoping the students don’t face any consequences ",PuzzledAnalyst,e9ka9oc,conservative
"I still don't have enough information to speak intelligibly about it. I wouldn't consider this harpy screeching on twitter a reliable source, and the article isn't any help either. The school district is in full CYA mode and will definitely not be shedding any light on the situation.

AFAIK it's an attempt to get pageviews and not much more. Which is why I have such contempt for the ""press"" and ""journalists.""",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9k8tmn,conservative
"I mean, honestly they probably won’t be suspended or expelled. Look at how many there are. It would ruin that school.",HolsterOfNuts,e9kahgm,conservative
"Exactly, people need to get over things like this and stop being so damn sensitive. People have every right to do and this and shouldn’t be prosecuted for their beliefs and free speech",PuzzledAnalyst,e9kakac,conservative
The Dem convention is going to be an absolute shit show at this rate,Dank_Cartographer,e9k63pn,conservative
The party is so fractured at this point they are just throwing names out to see if any gain traction. ,glockedup1,e9k91rn,conservative
I can’t wait. It’s gonna be some good drama. They are gonna have like 22 people in the primary. ,Zac1245,e9k9e5z,conservative
I’m guessing it’s going to be very similar to the 1924 convention. Severe infighting until the 120th ballot.,Dank_Cartographer,e9k9rhd,conservative
Crenshaw's responses to this entire thing were very classy.  ,Zylo_001,e9hdh3i,conservative
Them sitting together reminds me of GI Bill vets in undergrad classes ,ricolahh,e9hftto,conservative
"I don't know much about Crenshaw but he checks a lot of boxes for what I like in a politician. He served, he isn't a career politician, he can be funny instead of serious 24/7, he will fight back, he isn't super old and he has a beard.  
  
Also that SNL guys looks like The Joker in Suicide Squad. ",AgrosLastRide,e9hebj9,conservative
That was really good. Big fan of Crenshaw after this whole thing. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9he8mc,conservative
Good on him. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9hbkjo,conservative
Dan showed a lot of class.,chabanais,e9hs3rr,conservative
"I gained a ton of respect for both of these guys. It takes guts to admit you’re wrong, good on Pete for that. ",the_vinster,e9idyj5,conservative
"Video in article didn’t work for me. Here is [direct video link](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GKaakjMVtyE)

Why is an apology from the left enough to move on but an apology from the right is never enough?

Edit:
[Episode before](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GKaakjMVtyE)",justsomefatwhiteguy,e9h7o2w,conservative
Pete Davidson looks like an elf with a meth addiction,CLxJames,e9hi7uf,conservative
Solid all around,gaelorian,e9hrdtj,conservative
This was a really nice segment. ,oceanplum,e9hrp9z,conservative
"That's good and all but someone needs to buy that guy some mucinex or a throat lozenge or something. He looks and sounds really sick. Anyways, good on him for the apology. ",cajungator3,e9hjqja,conservative
Pete was scared of getting his ass kicked.,Mr_Hyde_,e9hjiow,conservative
"would have been better if he kicked his ass first, then forgave him, it's the American way ;)",YouLearnedNothing,e9ireti,conservative
"""Thanks for making Republicans look good for once.""

Fuck. That.  That joke wasn't funny and its completely unnecessary for the bit.  All it does is reinforce these liberal minds watching that Republicans bad orange man bad.",TheKillector,e9hfm46,conservative
[deleted],,e9hdpvk,conservative
[deleted],,e9hi7eu,conservative
Ha. Guilty.,zitro_joe,e9hrj1r,conservative
LOL at the beard comment.,LazyGoron,e9hgtu2,conservative
"Which is hilarious because Crenshaw looks like comic deadshot, the original one, not quirky Will Smith style.",TwelfthCycle,e9hooyh,conservative
"Crenshaw for President in 2024! 

Face it, a President with an eyepatch would be cool. ",psstein,e9htj2p,conservative
"He's a solid conservative; pro gun, pro life, pro domestic energy production, pro tax relief etc...  A great addition to Congress. ",smokejaguar,e9hp2yv,conservative
"I've been following him since the primaries. He beat out an establishment-type candidate and a GOP donor who tried to buy her seat.

It was hilarious when she spent millions on the election only to finish 3rd and Crenshaw won the runoff.

This guy very much has a promising future.",nealski77,e9htjh7,conservative
Also bonus: is actually attractive,zwiebelsaft,e9im05s,conservative
SNL guy looks like a more feminine Ellen Degeneres to me.,Okchud,e9il02p,conservative
tru dat,Trumpthulhu-Fhtagn,e9hgpm9,conservative
"I don't know how you came up with that, but it works",peeves91,e9imdw6,conservative
"I think he was referring to SNL in that joke, not as a whole. ",TexasJaeger,e9hid5o,conservative
"I think he was joking that snl leans so left that his fuckup finally made the right look good on the show.

Could be wrong ",bucksandbeer,e9hikbp,conservative
"Yeah seriously.  That was a series of lame jokes obviously written by Davidson.  The mea culpa was fine but the “finally making republicans look good” is a backhanded comment that republicans make themselves look bad by being evil and cruel, which is exactly what liberals think.  He could have said “thanks for once not being a complete asshole to a republican”",booblitchutz,e9hhmdn,conservative
"Hey man he apologized and got his nose rubbed in it. Lt. Commander Crenshaw was magnanimous in his vindication, if we are to move on as a country and become better people it starts with all of us. Comments like that just inflame the argument and divide more. I agree that the guy was acting like a punk, but he got his punishment and manned up to it, he apologized and made amends, let’s leave it at that. ",TexasJaeger,e9hib8i,conservative
The line about America being mad at his mom's son and roommate was pretty funny....?,Midnight_Cowboy_DC,e9ic9ye,conservative
TYFYS,skarface6,e9hslaf,conservative
[deleted],,e9hiiup,conservative
"#makepoliticianshavefacialhairagain

MPHFHA",lion27,e9hn7ht,conservative
That's a good point. I think you may be right. ,TheKillector,e9hoyab,conservative
"How many bearded women do you know?

Be honest...",chabanais,e9hro0s,conservative
"I trust them. Might not be attracted to them, but I trust them.",LazyGoron,e9hsj3i,conservative
Last Pres with a beard was Lincoln. ,ricolahh,e9hu13g,conservative
well your mother for starters,curlbaumann,e9hu3a7,conservative
"Woman goes out in public with a beard, you know she's not afraid of anything. I'd trust them.",danjvelker,e9ht8gu,conservative
"A bunch of the reconstruction era presidents had beards. Grant, Hayes, and Harrison off the top of my head",YankeeBlues21,e9ihnl4,conservative
Who was the last president with any facial hair? Was it Teddy Roosevelt?,lion27,e9hwrib,conservative
"It's not called a ""beard"" when it's around your cunt.   You should know that, being as though you have one and all.
",chabanais,e9huk8q,conservative
She could log a tree with her bare hands,LazyGoron,e9hvbqs,conservative
"Taft. And Thomas Dewey was the last to win a major party nomination with facial hair, in 1948 (with his pencil mustache)",YankeeBlues21,e9ihph7,conservative
my cunt beard is no ones business but me and my dog,curlbaumann,e9huvmu,conservative
V v v interesting. I might just have to become a single-issue voter if some dude comes along with a stache or beard.,lion27,e9ihs7l,conservative
LOL!,chabanais,e9hvfss,conservative
Don’t you “just pay for it” or something. I thought she has this all figured out. ,Zac1245,e9h8uqa,conservative
I was really hoping this was the Bee.,unibuckeye,e9haiqg,conservative
She thought she could just live in a dorm room at the Electoral College.,NDMagoo,e9hi10i,conservative
"She will go down just like Bernie...get nothing accomplished in congress except naming a few post offices...but will continue to get voted in because she is ""brave"".",FuneralHello,e9hfcfw,conservative
"I don’t understand her thought process. She essentially applied for a job and was given the job with a start date in January.

That’s like being mad at your new employer because it takes 2-4 weeks before you get your first paycheck. She’s either very unintelligent or genuinely believes that government officials should automatically be a part of the 1% she rails against to her constituents.",WebSliceGallery123,e9hdwzc,conservative
I still can't believe they elected her. What in the fuck?,Palmettobound,e9hf6w5,conservative
[deleted],,e9hhnyo,conservative
She says it’s another way that politics “discriminates” against working people. I’m sure the Founding Fathers intended for Congress to have an equal proportion of successful lawyers and businessmen to homeless bums.,1wjl1,e9hhpj4,conservative
Think of the morons who wanted this to represent them in Congress.,TomahawkSuppository,e9hfyss,conservative
She is dim. A very stupid person.,rugby_shirt,e9h79zy,conservative
Cue the gofundme in 3..2..1...,booblitchutz,e9hhw93,conservative
"The one thing that irks me the most is her being labeled the youngest Latina voted into Congress. Yeah, this is a milestone but damn, history will not be kind to her.

She is just making Latinos look stupid..........and young people as well.",I_dont_study,e9hfxb7,conservative
Doesn't understand supply and demand. More people in cities = less living spaces = increase in rent prices,MadLordPunt,e9hedh7,conservative
"""Hey, Alexa! What's a 'personal loan'?""",Moonthrower,e9hqizn,conservative
This is what happens when your last name gets you elected,BeachCruisin22,e9hg17k,conservative
I'm really loving Cortez so far.  She is a perfect liberal and its entertaining to witness someone telling the complete truth about how they think.  ,anytownusa11,e9hipie,conservative
"This is why you don't defend her. How many people said ""guys we can't blame her for not being able to afford rent."" Yes we can, she's a certified moron and a socialist, redundant I know. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hd3eq,conservative
"If she can’t figure out how to pay for an apartment, how do those that voted for her think she can figure out how to pay for Medicare for all?

Spoiler Alert: She can’t.",djbuu,e9hq6af,conservative
"It’s easy to make jokes. Although what concerns me is that a congressman without the money to afford rent could easily be bought and sold.

",x_R_x,e9hhwe3,conservative
"There's at least a dozen first termers who camp out in their offices on the hill.  Mostly Republicans, but a few Democrats too.",lowrads,e9hro0w,conservative
"I’ve said before, will keep saying, she is why we must always keep the electoral college!  NY by electing her showed how incompetent they are towards leaders.  I wouldn’t want them deciding President or other important items for me in the Midwest.  It is blatant that they don’t care about facts or financial literacy, I do, therefore I would never want their vote to over ride others who are more intelligent then NY.",mattmcd20,e9hsjki,conservative
"She spent the last 2 years working for the Sanders campaign, traveling around the US, and running for office. She hasn’t really done much work that would build income for two years clearly hadn’t built up her resources beforehand, so it’s not particularly surprising she can’t afford a high income area.",MyCustomUsername,e9huvlr,conservative
just waiting for the thicc ass amount of GoFundMe donations she's gonna get,top-perro,e9hvqjn,conservative
Where the hell is she living now?,mlmack,e9hrw0l,conservative
She really is a straight up dumbass isn’t she?,rock61,e9hvfym,conservative
The ignorance is strong with this one.,StephenScherer1,e9iczgo,conservative
There are people out there who wants this bafoon representing them. The fact she was elected shows how low the bar has been set.,Dogfacedgod88,e9hyobt,conservative
"Let's assume she just can't afford it at all and can't figure anything out. There is absolutely no one in DC, no kind soul who wants to see her in office, who would host her until she gets her paycheck? 
",MisterMouser,e9hsgq9,conservative
"Remind me again, who exactly is she representing?",giobbistar21,e9im40k,conservative
She can't even figure out rent.  The dim leadership is probably laughing at how easy she will be to control.  ,EnragedPorcupine,e9iw0f7,conservative
"She can afford an apartment.  Not just one that she wants.

Also, she is too stupid to realize that any landlord in town would work out a deal to defer her until her first check.",cchris_39,e9j0t1r,conservative
"The thing that comes to mind when reading this is how easy it is for lobbyists to take advantage of this situation and get her on their side.  One group gets her a ""modest"" apartment, couple others furnish it.  Helping someone out when they don't have a place has lasting impressions. ",Nats_Enough,e9jcdwe,conservative
Why doesn't she just share a room with some fine folks in a diverse neighborhood in DC to save money? Doesn't she want to be culturally enriched?,Crispin_n_Crispianus,e9jhv9y,conservative
Dumb as a bag a dirt.,BeauRyker,e9joump,conservative
The only people dumber than her are the ones who elected her ,rharravs,e9ipbhm,conservative
"1. Electoral system is not equivalent with electoral college
2. She's saying that the transition period is difficult for people with lower incomes. Before she actually starts and gets paid they have orientation and other things that she has to be there for. Many jobs, if they require you to move, give you some sort of stipend to help set yourself up. For some reason, this one doesn't. 

On her clothes during the campaign, she likely didn't pay for those herself, and didn't get to keep them. Often designers will lease them to candidates for free as a form of free advertisement for the designer. (This also happens with models. They're given fancy clothes during the photoshoot, and then the clothes are taken back.)",ThePersonInYourSeat,e9iwwky,conservative
I'm sure this has been said before but..what a dumbass!!,heartless_13,e9igvml,conservative
"She's gone full retard.

Never go full retard.",TheComedianGLP,e9ijang,conservative
"it's funny cuz she's just pushing the narrative talking points against the Electoral College for the Democrats. She doesn't have to make sense because he supporters are idiots

the Democrats want to do away with the Electoral College in the Constitution so say anything anything",ExpensiveMention,e9hfnm2,conservative
"The marxist narrative has changed drastically since it came to the West in the 60's. 

One of the reasons Marxism took hold in Eastern Europe was the communist campaign was actually quite simple. In 1916 Russia, the communists promised the people *housing and food.*  They never brought up gulags, common land confiscation, or high-minded philosophical mumbo jumbo.... Early Marxists were quite practical 

The modern, Western social justice movement states everyone could *easily* have the lifestyle of someone who makes 120k a year; it's just those old White Republican men who are hoarding all money 

The latter is beginning to scare me more and more... How much more radical could someone get if they felt entitled to life of wealthy leisure rather than just a regular ol' house with a full icebox?",Al_Gayda,e9ini5i,conservative
[removed],,e9hsfpi,conservative
The left is trying to now say she was “joking”.,justhere2havefun,e9hb8nc,conservative
"Yea I mean free college is cheaper, so let's just pay for it ",JesusCriiiiiist,e9hkbg6,conservative
lol! Have my upvote.,Terra_green2,e9i4wl5,conservative
This is one of the funniest comments I’ve ever seen. I bet it’s true! I’m dying over here. All the upvotes!,fliplovin,e9j69s7,conservative
"> She’s either very unintelligent or genuinely believes that government officials should automatically be a part of the 1% she rails against to her constituents.

So... Just like every other socialist dictator in history.",MarioFanaticXV,e9hfj67,conservative
She has a D next to her name and was promising more free shit than the next one with a D next to their name.,Jigsawbilly,e9hitlc,conservative
Being low income is a virtue for progressives.,MyCustomUsername,e9hvgll,conservative
"Her district is 50% Hispanic. That's how she beat Joe Crowley, they saw a Hispanic name and voted, it's not that her district became all socialists overnight. ",teddyrooseveltsfist,e9ii3vg,conservative
I'm still really mad that we have a politician in US Congress whose only prior experience is as a bartender.,1wjl1,e9ike7q,conservative
"> Everything about her shouts, “I don’t know anything about money!”

That's why she's a socialist. ",psstein,e9htakf,conservative
"My first couch was $20 used. That thing was the opposite of comfortable but it did its job.

Also was poor as shit, but I worked my ass off instead of crying to the government to take care of me.",caffienatedjedi,e9hl0ke,conservative
It almost sounds like she’s....not good with money?! And that maybe we shouldn’t....elect her to a position of power?!,sharks_have_knees,e9hlajy,conservative
I guess she thinks she's too good to buy things second-hand.,ZarahCobalt,e9j38cf,conservative
Why do you think we vote on Tuesday?,International_Way,e9hmbmr,conservative
\#bluewave,cybaritic,e9hkawf,conservative
Not to beat a dead horse but she's also a socialist. ,Rightquercusalba,e9hd8nc,conservative
I'm just wondering if we could put her in a special ed classroom and tell her it's Congress and call it a day.,soylent_absinthe,e9j02lk,conservative
She is a literal caricature of a leftist.,Racheakt,e9ic0wv,conservative
She’s a politician so it goes without saying. ,SpineEater,e9hhyx3,conservative
"Whenever someone says to me ""We should vote for \[person\] because they'll be the youngest person elected to that position.""  I answer with ""Shouldn't I vote for someone with some experience?""

&#x200B;

This dumbass is going to be viewed very soon as another out of touch Congress elitist who's never done a day of work in her life but has no problem telling everyone else how to live their lives.  But the very sad part is, I honestly think the Left wants a class system.  I honestly think they want a class of American Lords and Ladies who don't have to be common people, who shouldn't have to work.  Just be apart of one of a few families, like the Clintons or the Kennedys, and just rule over the common people.  Hell, it's hard for me to hear someone like Pelosi or Warren speak and not hear wannabe royalty spewing from their mouths.",GreatJanitor,e9hydwn,conservative
"That's why the government should control all housing! Of course the people that run the government should have nicer houses because they are selfless public servants, though.",cybaritic,e9hk8i5,conservative
[She thinks money grows on trees.](https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.cnn.com/cnn/2018/09/16/politics/alexandria-ocasio-cortez-40-trillion-cnntv/index.html),MyCustomUsername,e9hv3gk,conservative
Wait till she is running for president with media gushing all over her :-),xxx_asdf,e9hjtqf,conservative
I mean you’re not wrong. But hopefully it’ll make the rest of the sensical folks see how dangerous the fringe is ,steelallz,e9hk0ju,conservative
DC rent costs are through the roof though. And it's a majority blue area. So it's not surprising that liberal policies have made rent Skyrocket Skyrocket,ExpensiveMention,e9hfqup,conservative
She said she can't afford rent for the next 3 months.  She could probably get a loan and pay it back when she gets paid.,mlmack,e9i91is,conservative
She gets to use other people’s money for that and lucky for her that’s her favorite kind. ,Ravens1112003,e9id0n3,conservative
Good point but she’s already a puppet narrative repeater. ,steelallz,e9hjz5l,conservative
I won’t be volunteering. Let her commute from NY everyday. ,Ravens1112003,e9idjlk,conservative
"Heh, I follow on Twitter a lot of game devs and other gaming related personalities.  Every now and then one of her really inept tweets will pop up and it's loaded with likes from these people.  This one in particular had Scott Hartsman on it, who is CEO of TrionWorlds.  

It's all straight narrative.  I get everyone has subjective takes.  We're not talking about that.  She's factually off base about basic civics facts, economic stuff, constantly.   ",Roez,e9hig43,conservative
I can actually sympathize with people in 1917 Russia who turned to the Communists - the Tsarist government clearly wasn’t meeting their basic needs. I can’t sympathize with people who side with far leftists in 2018 America. ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e9jcjpf,conservative
">She is poor.

Lol, She is ***not*** poor.",Silicon_Avatar,e9ih3as,conservative
"but i thought you can ""just pay for it"". Do you mean there's an actual cost for stuff?",ItsReasonOrTreason,e9i09st,conservative
"The fact she did a photoshoot in an *over $3000 outfit* makes me call ""bullshit"" on the idea that she is poor.",anuser999,e9iffn6,conservative
"If she stopped saying dumb shit other times then sure, but she just isnt that smart. ",Zac1245,e9i5lne,conservative
Me too thanks ,TheGreatPJDJ,e9hca6h,conservative
which is bullshit,Delta_25,e9i32j4,conservative
i hope they get rid of her in the next election,donjohn1986,e9hgwue,conservative
Joe Crowley was useless too. ,mrjowei,e9jsnfj,conservative
Might be a handy to skill to have.,mlmack,e9ito2d,conservative
Somebody has to mix the drinks on Capitol Hill.,fliplovin,e9j6kh1,conservative
"My first couch was free, it was next to a dumpster. The guy who it belonged to, got kicked out of his dorm for hotboxing it so the school put the stuff he left behind on the curb. ",teddyrooseveltsfist,e9ihve3,conservative
It's even scarier considering she has a degree in economics.,mlmack,e9hs5s8,conservative
Stupidity and socialism go hand in hand. ,Murican_Freedom1776,e9jd2b7,conservative
Check out the video where she says.... you just pay for it.,rugby_shirt,e9iexrh,conservative
"Politicians are dishonest, not nincompoop dumb.",rugby_shirt,e9iezwm,conservative
"""You have heard then, comrades,"" he said, ""that we pigs now sleep in the beds of the farmhouse? And why not? You did not suppose, surely, that there was ever a ruling against beds? A bed merely means a place to sleep in. A pile of straw in a stall is a bed, properly regarded. The rule was against sheets, which are a human invention. We have removed the sheets from the farmhouse beds, and sleep between blankets. And very comfortable beds they are too! But not more comfortable than we need, I can tell you, comrades, with all the brainwork we have to do nowadays. You would not rob us of our repose, would you, comrades? You would not have us too tired to carry out our duties? Surely none of you wishes to see Jones back?""",cragnathor,e9ihg7b,conservative
True.  I'm just trying to find a silver lining here.,anytownusa11,e9hryl2,conservative
"People who work within the DC establishment burn cash for fun, she has multiple wealthy connections that can cover her socialist ass. So when she complains about 3 months rent, I say, go move Into a Democrat shithole inner city neighborhood and rent a apartment with the common folk you claim to represent. Get a roommate, shut up. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hgw6w,conservative
I thought it was Bush’s fault. /s,Colonize_The_Moon,e9hgff0,conservative
"They’re through the roof if you won’t settle or commute, sure. But she did have months to prepare and still isn’t going into office for months.",skarface6,e9hgqtk,conservative
"The whole thing is probably a ploy to explain why she will never be in DC for any votes, or get anything done. ",teddyrooseveltsfist,e9ii7w1,conservative
Double skyrocket!,fliplovin,e9j6qnf,conservative
Or she could sell one of those outfits she has in her closet that are worth more than most people make in a year.,SideTraKd,e9iawbj,conservative
"Yup, she's even dumber than I thought. ",Rightquercusalba,e9in5n9,conservative
Now the comment makes sense! “**You** just pay for it!” Emphasis on *you*. She pays nothing.,djbuu,e9ideu8,conservative
I mean some democrat in the area who supports her. You'd think they'd be happy to host her.,MisterMouser,e9idp5u,conservative
"I wholeheartedly agree

It’s one thing for an illiterate peasant who’s never seen a doctor to be taken advantage of by socialists...

But to have received a historical education in the land of freedom & opportunity and *then* promote Marxism boils my blood. 

Western SJWs don’t love the poor, they hate the rich out of envy.  ",Al_Gayda,e9jcw16,conservative
Because no one ever loans or donates clothes for photoshoots ,myniceaccount89,e9ioaxg,conservative
It was loaned to her. Clothes and makeup are provided for most photo shoots.,SweatyVeganMeat,e9j1wkl,conservative
I don't. She's a great example of how destructive people on the extreme left can be. It's going to force other Dems to draw a line and distance themselves.,cybaritic,e9hjxeh,conservative
"Has this been proven? Cause I kinda suspect that she, you know, doesn't have a degree in economics.",tekende,e9is61i,conservative
"I haven't personally searched Boston University records, but if it were untrue, I'm sure it would have come up by now.
",mlmack,e9itbcy,conservative
All these cities with these sanctuary policies need to hold their mayors as well as their city council as accessories to murder.,cuckler-meeseeks,e9jbqe5,conservative
"ICE is lying obviously no illegal immigrant would do harm to Americans, they just want a better life. ",CassieJK,e9j9nft,conservative
Why? Clinton lied under oath and was caught. ,molon-labe7,e9judfp,conservative
"Not trolling here but what exactly are they trying to him impeach over, being rude to the media? Seriously, the Meuller probe is not going to divulge anything on him. It seems more like the continued tantrum.",Faking_Encopresis,e9jva19,conservative
"I don't think a reason is needed for impeachment, just votes. It would never pass the Senate since it needs 67 there, but the process could theoretically be kicked off at any time. ",GorathThorgath,e9jzcsg,conservative
"Their best bet is to get him to lie under oath, same thing that happened to Clinton.  And Trump would do it too.",bassjam1,e9jx6e6,conservative
It’s not a lie if he believes it!,Faking_Encopresis,e9jxk9z,conservative
Avenatti should be disbarred. He's engaged in enough questionably moral adventures and outright fabrications that he's a danger to the law profession. ,psstein,e9ht7hw,conservative
Tucker needs to CCW. These people are going to kill his family eventually. Being a Latino that sucks some dongs doesn't make this asshole special. Tucker should be swinging at these people screwing with his family.,FreeSpeechRocks,e9hjhg0,conservative
"OF COURSE the creepy porn lawyer shows up here. Also props to Tucker and his son for their restraint here, I doubt I'd have the same reaction",Marko_Ramius1,e9hhsno,conservative
That gay Latino immigrant is doing well for himself to afford membership to a country club. Looks like capitalism working as intended. ,longroadtohappyness,e9ho8l3,conservative
4chan is plotting to give him fake info again,top-perro,e9hcixi,conservative
"a gay latino immigrant! what a description!
",foodVSfood,e9hde8v,conservative
"“Likely included underage drinking”

What a snake, this guy. Tucker has his family with him at a fancy members-only place but Avenatti phrases it as if Tucker had taken the kids for drinks at a local club.",MyCustomUsername,e9i0ny4,conservative
I've had it with this guy,BeachCruisin22,e9hdzsz,conservative
"It's getting a little ridiculous at this point.  He shouldn't be harassed like this, and I'm so disappointed its come to this.  Can they be charged?",Falkamper,e9iyb34,conservative
"STALKING and ASSAULT. 

If these people are not prosecuted the violence they create will get out of hand.",StephenScherer1,e9k212p,conservative
The 2020 field of democrat presidential hopefuls is going to be awesome.,mlmack,e9hxtsh,conservative
"I agree with you. He has gone so far outside the ethics required of an attorney.

(Edited a word.)",TrueBirch,e9ig7e1,conservative
I am not sure why this comment confuses me.,devilsadvocate09,e9hm6gv,conservative
"Your comment got me to read the article. Holy shit, that's even more fucked up than I thought. I'm guessing that Carlson's account is more verifiable, since management actually ended up revoking the other guy's membership. Once again, creepy porn lawyer is left without a leg to stand on.",danjvelker,e9htrgb,conservative
"> gay Latino immigrant 

I like how this is included in the story even though it has nothing to do with the story",Zac1245,e9i47os,conservative
Obviously he’s beyond reproach then.,pfthrowaway21315,e9houqp,conservative
">I am not sure why this comment confuses me.

Broken down:

> Tucker needs to CCW. 

Tucker needs to start carrying a gun.

>These people are going to kill his family eventually. 

Antifa's goal is to see Tucker dead.

>Being a Latino that sucks some dongs doesn't make this asshole special. 

The man who verbally harassed Tucker's daughter is a gay latino, but that doesn't make him special. It doesn't matter what kind of race or sexuality this asshole is, he's still an asshole. 

>Tucker should be swinging at these people screwing with his family.

Tucker needs to fight back.",Silicon_Avatar,e9ij4ux,conservative
Considering the amount of money around these clubs I doubt they take revoking a membership lightly. That suggests to me the guy was in the wrong. ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e9jcvip,conservative
"Sure it does. Avenatti is trying to make this look like a hate crime. If he can make Tucker look like a bigot, he believes the media will run with this and he'll win in the court of public opinion, and even if Tucker wins the lawsuit he's been denigrated in public. He's correct, although I don't know if Avenatti has used up his good will with the media yet or not. ",frasierfonzie,e9irkck,conservative
"It sure does.

3 strikes.",TheComedianGLP,e9ijqxp,conservative
Thanks for the translation.,Sideswipe0009,e9iyhnm,conservative
"I can think of at least one network, NBC, that I don’t think will work with him again. ",FreedomFromIgnorance,e9jcxln,conservative
"Will this info reach front page?

Lol hell no",xTheHeroWeNeedx,e9i9pqh,conservative
"so contrary to everyone saying he wasn't going and was going to stay in his room and watch TV, he went to a closer American grave yard in western France instead of the eastern France one that the other world leaders went to. Also along the way his motorcade was stopped buy a feminist. edit the feminist event happened the day before thanks for pointing that out",Delta_25,e9i9f85,conservative
bUt rAiN!!!,vegeta121212,e9k0bgt,conservative
"There was two different events. On November 10th, various world leaders attended individual, small ceremonies at different sites all over Paris. This is the one that Trump didn't attend with the reasons stated as being inclement weather, presumably grounding Marine One. The ceremony mentioned in this article is the November 11th ceremony which was the larger ceremony with the world leaders in attendance.",-Kerosun-,e9ivuxh,conservative
"They don't care. There were like 4 to 5 threads on r/all shit talking him all day yesterday, because he has to be a monster. No one even waited for more information as to why he missed it. They just jumped at the opportunity to devour him like the pack of wolves that they are. ",MuricanStephen,e9ikq9s,conservative
I thought that happened yesterday?,yode8,e9iqp8e,conservative
"Who wants to buy a feminist, anyways?",skarface6,e9j9irf,conservative
They had to lock a thread in this sub because Nevertrumpers (useful idiots to the left) and leftists were whining about it. Losers. ,Rightquercusalba,e9io6jc,conservative
"They aren’t wolves, they’re sheep. ",cbzdidit,e9jq2kt,conservative
"There was two different events. On November 10th, various world leaders attended individual, small ceremonies at different sites all over Paris. This is the one that Trump didn't attend with the reasons stated as being inclement weather, presumably grounding Marine One. The ceremony mentioned in this article is the November 11th ceremony which was the larger ceremony with the world leaders in attendance.",-Kerosun-,e9ivvdp,conservative
who wouldn't? That will show them. /s,Delta_25,e9j9lln,conservative
I wonder how it feels to be the worst person at your job in the entire country?,HolsterOfNuts,e9hlobj,conservative
JAIL time for Brenda Snipes.,GMU1993,e9hl1il,conservative
"Mandatory jail time and fines... and an investigation going back to 2003.
No one walks away from this!",Bubbacat7,e9hlb73,conservative
Fire? I think what she did was a felony. LOCK HER UP!,cons_NC,e9i5smo,conservative
~~Fire~~ Prosecute,R-M-Renfield,e9hnhsq,conservative
"If an official is *this* corrupt/incompetent, can't the state just not accept their county's results?

",weetchex,e9i9n6k,conservative
"The DOJ should force them into a consent decree, whereby the Broward County agency that oversees elections should now be under direct supervision of a federal judge. 

Furthermore, Snipes needs to be thoroughly investigated and prosecuted to the fullest extent of the law. 

The people of Broward County need to know and trust that when they cast their vote, it will be counted and counted properly without fear of fraud. ",mikeygio,e9imhcp,conservative
She's elected. Good luck with that.,SickofInternetProgs,e9hort7,conservative
Hang her. This is twice now.,scungillipig,e9idqc1,conservative
Rick Scott was asked why he didn't do anything about her as governor after the first few incidents. Why didn't he?,justhere2havefun,e9jcxzq,conservative
"Unfortunately, to some she is a hero...",guanaco55,e9hnvoj,conservative
Or the best depending on your point of view,JMB_was_a_god,e9hs0hh,conservative
you do if you have a D next to your name,Delta_25,e9id42c,conservative
Still can be thrown in jail for obvious and blatant corruption and election fraud,RAZRBCK08,e9i50zn,conservative
So was Rod Blagojevich,soxfan90,e9im9rd,conservative
"I’ve seen her ticket prices, neither does she.",Willie1Eye,e9lcau9,conservative
CA has refused to do basic wildfire prevention like regular controlled burns for decades now.  They stopped doing them because they sucked at controlling them and they got out of hand.  While other states have no issues with controlled burns.,StraightNewt,e9lx5tb,conservative
What the hell does she want him to do about California wildfires? ,YankeeBlues21,e9lcsmc,conservative
California should care about California wildfires.,_Gardien,e9lefjw,conservative
"I’m glad she knows his true intentions, regardless of what he says or does.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9lcs0g,conservative
Nope it’s just hell coming to burn heathens on the surface realm.,Ketydubs,e9lgc6u,conservative
Cares more about Lina Morgana than she ever did.,SpecialistParticular,e9lg4y0,conservative
"Okay, Lady - get out your wallet and donate! I'd guess that Mr. Trump, who is not collecting a Presidential salary and has donated to many charities, will donate to this cause as well. Put your $$ where your mouth is!",JFGFNY,e9mma7x,conservative
I can’t stand her.,PurpleAngel23,e9mjk3g,conservative
"Yeah, right. This is the state that thought building a water pipeline from Alaska to them. Instead of building de-salination plants.

They want everyone else to help them.",gab907,e9lf5sv,conservative
"Well, she broke some ribs. Being ginger with moving after broken ribs is pretty normal. ",molon-labe7,e9iyqrx,conservative
"I wish her a speedy recovery. 
",Briguy28,e9izezl,conservative
"i hope she takes care of herself and follows her doctors orders exactly as written.

also, hope she's got some good drugs!",SKWM3000,e9j2jzn,conservative
"She must be in a lot of pain, I hope she fully recovers, wouldn't wish that on anybody especially at 85.",PerceivedShift,e9jvoxa,conservative
She should retire and enjoy her final years.,ChunkyArsenio,e9j4udx,conservative
Definitely time to hang up the robe,swoodard429,e9j1ake,conservative
She is dying of something and the multiple falls are a symptom of it.,svengalus,e9jemnu,conservative
I wish her a speedy recovery. Thankful for her service. ,13-mitch,e9j16qw,conservative
"Hell, just sitting in one spot and breathing is a challenge.",MooMooCudChew,e9j1ow7,conservative
Me too. Never root for injury.,DeadheadTruckin,e9izlgc,conservative
"If she retired, the whole country would enjoy her final years.",BrighamYoung,e9j5i94,conservative
"This. I mean really, why would the left care? I've seen the users of r/politics assure each other that they have a foolproof plan to impeach Gorsuch and Kavanaugh on the grounds that Trump didn't yell ""no backsies!"" when they were sworn in, and then impeach Thomas too, because why the hell not? And then expand the court to 15 justices at minimum, and pack it with 25 year old Law graduates straight out of UC Berkeley and Evergreen University. They're certain that this a totally practical and actionable plan, *not* self-indulgent mental group-masturbation, so why not just let Ginsburg retire? What's impeaching one more Trump pick if their going to annul everything his administration did when their inevitable victory takes place? Just let her get some rest. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9j848p,conservative
"It doesn't necessarily rule it out, but falls in old people and inability to mobilize optimally are par for the course with folks over 70. ",Chapped_Assets,e9jubv3,conservative
Yeah but we're all dying,davetn37,e9jkls5,conservative
"Those fools are *so* full of beans if they believe for a second anyone is going to be impeached.

That was just the Democrat party rabble rousing to get people to vote and donate money.

Those on the top of the Dem party have already made statements *against* impeaching anyone.

The right did it too not too long ago with the promise to repeal Obamacare.

I’ll never fall for that shit again. They however will, simply because it comforts their observational bias. And instead of getting mad at the Democrat party for falling through with their bogus threats they will claim it was some right wing conspiracy that stopped it from happening. Like Trump paying people off. 🙄",KKN0PP,e9jb6dj,conservative
"Not tryna pick on OP, but this question is asked about once a week. Anyone else notice that? ",hat_wine_clock,e9grrsm,conservative
Is there a disguise?,ClippinWings451,e9go8l9,conservative
Don’t forget r/politicalhumor,DPistola,e9go00x,conservative
I just think the number of liberals outnumbers conservatives on a platform like this. conservatives are typically older like 65+ and probably not using reddit,slothisland,e9hdcex,conservative
They really ought to rename it. People see its posts in all and popular and assume its normal political discourse. ,Tmblackflag,e9gohrq,conservative
I think that the majority of reddit is liberal and to post your opinion anywhere except for conservative subreddits means downvoted,misreken,e9ha1o1,conservative
[removed],,e9ha7cz,conservative
"There is actually a long story behind it... but yes, it was started by the left as a leftist hangout... it was never meant to be a neutral venue.",ClippinWings451,e9goa3q,conservative
"(Blue voter here) I do think those subs are tremendously liberal but that’s for two factors. 

Reddit’s user base is young and progressive so the odds of conservative users is simply much lower. Second, and this is as unpartisan as I can get—the current state of republicans give the liberals so much cannon fodder. They make themselves the butt of jokes every day. 

Don’t get me wrong, I would love to have them be more represented in those subs but those two points renders that unlikely.

Since I’m here and am starved for quality conversation, what are the beliefs /r/conservative users endorse and how do they differentiate themselves from the Donald?",EricFormansTaint,e9hahel,conservative
"A lot of crossover with /r/conspiracy in the comments today, I see.",AnnualThrowaway,e9h7v43,conservative
"I browse both here and /politics since I like seeing both sides. I do the same with news sources. /t_d annoys me so I don't venture in there .

There's more discussion here than there is in /politics. Most comments are literal copy pasta. Most top comments are identical in each major thread. 

I'm probably more center left than conservative, but as at least here I see more typed out responses than copy/paste shit I see over there.

",Eretrad,e9h7vcv,conservative
[removed],,e9gxr8l,conservative
It's basically the Democrat Party's official forum. Nothing but leftist propaganda. It was taken over by ShareBlue and other shill groups a long time ago. ,GuitarWizard90,e9gnjv5,conservative
"Look, the majority of the population of this website has liberal leaning views so they vote for posts that confirm their biases.

There's probably a bit of vote manipulation too but that's not really the point.

The problem that I have with that sub is the 10 minute cooldown timer they put on users that have negative karma. Healthy political discussion should include unpopular opinions.",kevkev667,e9hduib,conservative
Reddit is pretty far left leaning for the most part besides r/conservative or r/thedonald.  A lot of political subreddits like r/socialism or r/communism take it as far as to ban anyone with a differing political opinion.  Reddit isn’t the place to look for an unbiased political discussion or news source ,droolmonkey5,e9hdmu4,conservative
and r/news and r/politicalhumor and r/topmindsofreddit and r/blackpeopletwitter,mkov88,e9hh27k,conservative
"It is, it's a VERY liberal subreddit, with every dissenting opinion being shot down.

They're very intolerant also and I am not even a conservative, I just like this subreddit  because it's not full of crazies like the lads on r/politics.",Azul19,e9gp35x,conservative
I'm far from being conservative but have been attacked and down voted on that sub simply for providing an opposing viewpoint about things.  Don't expect to have any real debates or enlightening discussions in there. It's definitely a liberal circle jerk.,knobbysideup,e9hcxgi,conservative
"I'm actually pretty ""Liberal"" but I have to sub here because it's nice to be able to convey ideas with actual working adults and not 28 year old burnout NPCs.

Happy Veterans Day for anyone here who served.",MisterPhamtastic,e9gxt3w,conservative
"It's so one sided that conservative comments and opinions are considered ""trolling"" and are considered a bannable offense",anonymau5,e9h7jj9,conservative
Nope.  It's r/farleftradicals,justific4tion,e9gq20b,conservative
"Not conservative, ban me if you want but I’m here to give an explanation because conservatives levy this complaint constantly. R/politics is a place where users go to post political opinions (duh). The format reddit uses makes it easy for a majority opinion to quickly overwhelm a minority opinion. The majority of Reddit’s traffic is liberal. What you see on r/politics is that majority opinion manifesting itself. There are obviously downsides to the reddit format but there it is. I don’t think it’s reasonable to expect users to not upvote or downvote based on political opinions on a sub about politics. That’s just not how users are ever going to interact with that sub. Downvote me away here if you want. ",binghamtonswag,e9hacuj,conservative
"I saw a post that showed proof of their bias and abuse of power . I'll link it if I find it 


Edit : found it : https://www.reddit.com/r/ShitPoliticsSays/comments/9vykss/an_essay_on_the_actions_of_the_mods_and_of_the/?utm_source=reddit-android",UTSAV97,e9gq2jp,conservative
/r/politics was sold for $1.8 million to CTR aka Shareblue in early 2016 (mod payout),ntheg111,e9h660e,conservative
r/politics and r/politicalhumor have been leftist circlejerks for years now. They really ought to stop pretending to be nonpartisan. Any disagreeing opinion is immediately downvoted to hell. I remember seeing articles from Shareblue and Hillary's campaign site posted there.,pjislife,e9gx9d2,conservative
"Reddit was bought out by the DNC in 2016. They radicalized all of the popular subs, kicked out old mods, replaced with paid people, etc. Look it up. this is old ass news.",TheGreatPJDJ,e9gr4f9,conservative
The worst thing is when you create a reddit account you are automatically subbed to r/politics ,Mugiwara_bon_clay,e9gwt7v,conservative
You must be new.,Posty_McPosterman,e9gtu6t,conservative
What makes you think that? I'm interested on the reasoning for it. Please elaborate.,PM_me_your_lifts,e9hdy84,conservative
"Pretty much 95% of subs are r/ liberal in disguise. 

Shit, even if you go check out the libertarian sub you'll see their bias against Trump. Some have fair criticisms but you mention Obama and they say ""we hate that drone strike god too"" mention trump and they go, ""stfu you support the biggest statist in history, retard"" but never really show how he is truly worse than what happened during Obama's term vs trumps or even what Democrats are currently doing. 

The 4chan sub has a bunch of European gun grabbing teens that only found 4chan through pewdiepies greentext videos. 

It all comes down to this is reddit and when those idiots in r/ politics say that the world has a liberal bias, they mean reddit has a liberal bias. But they're one in the same to most of these future cuckolds.",HotWaffler,e9gxf0a,conservative
It’s far worse because it gets treated as news.,JeskaiMage,e9gw1nj,conservative
"Yeah, I'd say 70% of the comments are pretty left leaning and the 30% that get buried are centrist... I used to browse it far more often and then got tired of the same 20 articles that pop up. It's still a pretty good sub for discussion but I recommend r/politicaldiscussion for that.",IntentionallyWalked,e9hb2pe,conservative
It's actually extremist left. Not even just left.,wearetheromantics,e9hhxvv,conservative
Haha no it's not just you. If I had a dollar for every down vote I got there Bernie Sanders would be trying to make me poor again.,tanktakach,e9h3u3k,conservative
"Maybe rather than everything else being skewed left, perhaps you’re underestimating how skewed right your beliefs are?",karatelemon,e9hajkv,conservative
There’s nothing liberal about that board; it’s outright Marxist.,heyyoudvd,e9gvwrn,conservative
In disguise??,theredditplebian,e9hh6ph,conservative
"I’ve found the same issue with r/politicalhumor, I ended up muting it entirely ",Waveshine420,e9hho98,conservative
Not only is it liberal but any comment questioning the orthodoxy is ferociously downvoted...,mnemeth7,e9hip84,conservative
Calling them liberals is an insult to liberals ,phantomcut3,e9ho8ua,conservative
It's a very poor disguise...,heartless_13,e9gqk5u,conservative
"Not much of a disguise.  Should be renamed to r/orangemanbad.

Edit:  too late, that name is taken lol.",Snoochems,e9h40mz,conservative
"Pics. Worldnews, news, gifs went there today. But yea politics the worsr",kgs1977,e9h7iaw,conservative
I had to filter it from /r/all,KM4WDK,e9h62qp,conservative
"I created a comment calling them out on it. I got downvoted at first but overall it ended up in the positive. 

Edit: my point is that they seem to have a liberal slant but there are conservatives watching too. ",FinalRewind,e9hd62c,conservative
I'm not even conservative and the sheer monopoly that liberals have over Reddit pisses me off. Any post or comment about politics that presents any conflicting or alternative view gets downvoted into oblivion. Funny how liberals are the most conservative when it comes to free speech.,Frzaro,e9h85qb,conservative
Leftist not liberal,_Gardien,e9gswjj,conservative
Left left left guys are we not all Americans just get along ,Ozarkazzhole,e9hahsv,conservative
"r/leftist

same with r/news",mlmack,e9hajpk,conservative
Same with political humour. The right wing is so easy to mock ,mike4Ski,e9h79g2,conservative
Yes it's annoying as hell. Ill constantly call out posts for being horribly Innacurate or biased and i get bum rushed by libtards. It's ridiculous. ,skizpizzi,e9h8sst,conservative
"Democracy in action?

If there were more Conservatives you would see the posts get upvoted and the comments get support. 

So I guess it’s a matter of what’s popular and what’s not?",SamuraiJackBauer,e9hc5u0,conservative
"Liberal here, r/politics and r/politicalhumor are obnoxious in their assertions and criticisms. Its infuriating to watch the people you align with politically act so high and mighty that its no wonder the political divide is as critically toxic as it has become.",iamaleafonthewind13,e9hejxp,conservative
[removed],,e9h8ynh,conservative
[removed],,e9hqcle,conservative
Honestly it’s far beyond liberalism if you read some of the comments.,MyCustomUsername,e9gungs,conservative
"The r/politics subreddit is probably more left leaning/liberal now because Trump is such a polarizing person who has really low approval ratings and alienates whole groups of people.
He does and says really weird shit and people notice.
Like, totally aside from the rest of the GOP and republican base, Trump is pretty rude, weird and different.
It's pretty obvious that why it's more left leaning.
People don't really like him. 

I'm surprised you're surprised? ",Avionicskid,e9h7nzo,conservative
No I think the right just cant meme.,JosiahSilas,e9hdtog,conservative
Honestly they should just rename that sub /LeftistIncels,StraightNewt,e9gw7in,conservative
"Yes.
This question get asked at least once a week. Yes.",Terra_green2,e9gvnvm,conservative
"I am subscribed to that one, this one and also T\_D. It's like the people that subscribe to one side or the other live in two totally different realities.",weedful_things,e9h8tvs,conservative
No it's not just you.,pandaSmore,e9gqnta,conservative
I'm just waiting for the massive brigading on this thread. I can't wait. /s,xJownage,e9h17b8,conservative
Not even that because it hardly promotes anything liberal. It's just the Donald Trump hate sub.... constant negativity,Rock3tDoge,e9h8t1l,conservative
Reddit as a whole is r/Liberal in disguise,PongoP,e9hardp,conservative
The whole sub is designated for propaganda. They don't even try to hide it.,Demplition,e9hdimh,conservative
Or maybe the centre is just further left than you had realized?,Dylsexic_Wizrad,e9h8rjm,conservative
you must be new,REEEorderTheThots,e9h0lyz,conservative
"yes,

But we seriously get one of these posts like every 1 or 2 days, can the mods do something about that",_TeamCobra_,e9h84m0,conservative
Same with r/all tbh,lanceparth,e9h93ax,conservative
"Worse thing, as with their policies, they are in denial over it. ",TigerJas,e9h8ywm,conservative
It's not just you,StruggleSnug69,e9h9chi,conservative
Robots in disguise. ,MikeyPh,e9h8yw2,conservative
And there is nothing we can do about it.,R0binSage,e9h4km0,conservative
No it's not. It's the r/communism subreddit.,ardee2124,e9hbb1z,conservative
Attempting to have a discussion there only gets you brigaded if you steer off their topics. The mods even talk trash to you in messages. ,JumanjiHunter,e9h8civ,conservative
"Lefties are extremely efficient at collectively infesting an organisation and turning it into their slave drive, like they did with the environmental and libertarian movements.",UndergroundSurface,e9h7bvb,conservative
"There was an article somewhere within the last year or so in which a reddit spokesman said that /r/politics was non-partisan. So yeah, it's just you /s",d-law,e9h7jjt,conservative
More like /r/militantliberal,mainfingertopwise,e9h7wns,conservative
"I wish it wasn't though. I'm not conservative, I just come here because it's the only subreddit where I can share my opinion and not have my karma take a massive hit

I would go to /r/libertarian but they shitpost too much ",top-perro,e9hc52q,conservative
"its more like r/collectivism , r/authoritarianism , r/newspeak , or r/totalitarianism 

they give liberalism a bad name. Our country needs actual liberalism. They have gone too far into a new realm of collectivism.",Morpho_Pequod,e9hdxe4,conservative
You just figured that out?,BaronFalcon,e9h8hgd,conservative
No they openly are a far left subreddit and admit they are.,NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9hbrq1,conservative
"And....? If you want change go post some shit over there. Don't bitch about it, but do something",Leon_UnKOWN,e9hei8l,conservative
It’s just that Reddit is filled with liberals. They’re often too afraid to step up and verbalize themselves face-to-face and use the internet to feel confident enough to speak up. ,richicrow,e9haqst,conservative
"no it's not, plus they say:  ""As a reminder, this subreddit is for civil discussion.""",Goblicon,e9j24kn,conservative
It's not you,M_locks,e9h7lyy,conservative
Lol same with r/political humor,syrinx21122,e9h9k9e,conservative
[removed],,e9h7z1e,conservative
[removed],,e9h97y8,conservative
r/politics is strictly for SNOWFLAKES.,StephenScherer1,e9hdvxn,conservative
[removed],,e9hd1mv,conservative
More like r/marxism,Gzhindra,e9hcsoe,conservative
More like any reddit on the front page. Holy shit I post anything that isn’t negative towards Trump and I get downvoted to an oblivion along with 100 replies/messages talking about how dumb I am.,Jabronies96,e9hcwwa,conservative
NOPE!,smokeypies,e9hde44,conservative
"Yes, yes it is",Tantalus4200,e9hemqe,conservative
I like to pair gorgonzola Mac and cheese with a little cilantro puree dashed atop a dry zinfandel,nacrastic,e9h7q9a,conservative
"Yeah, you arent kidding. These posts pop up about once every three days. I understand being new and not familiar, but seeing this question asked as often as it is is mind numbing. ",Ledcookey,e9gssq7,conservative
"Probably always newbs like me who are just finding out. Maybe the mods should sticky a post here titled ""Yes, r/politics is a liberal/leftist subreddit"" ",project769,e9h46ww,conservative
"This is true. Its just annoying that r/politics honestly believes they are a neutral sub and if you say reddit is overall leftist leaning they start getting riled up with ""no its not"" or ""have u seen the donald"". Like come on man its overwhelmingly democratic liberal. 

Im democrstic liberal on most issues but this site is too much. These guys are a bunch of followers.",SilkyGazelleWatkins,e9h98mz,conservative
[removed],,e9h0qc2,conservative
They frequently sticky blatantly anti-conservative / pro-Democrat threads. There's zero pretense.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gv0jn,conservative
"i came here to comment that 3 different accounts posted the same topic on r/republicans r/conservative and r/conspiracy.

I smell astro-turfing. ",IPr0xy,e9gz4kb,conservative
Nope,FallingSpear,e9h0zap,conservative
R/worldpolitics is getting to be the same.,almostnormal,e9ha77p,conservative
well it's called politics so you would think it would be a mix of both sides.. but yeah its atrocious sometimes. ,Emperor_Asheron,e9h6s54,conservative
It's basically a clone of r/politics.,Azul19,e9gp8hb,conservative
there is also /r/TopMindsOfReddit ,Ricardo1701,e9gqtx3,conservative
"And r/themueller

I’m banned in two for wrong think or have to wait 10 minutes to respond the the flood of outraged responses ",FartBringerer,e9gorbr,conservative
r/politicaltumor is much better. ,Masklophobia,e9gqt5m,conservative
"They should rename r/askaliberal r/wedareyoutoaskusaquestionyoufuckingidiot

r/politics is mostly people from Europe or other countries.  Not even joking.  Any other liberal or democrat sub is likely to be the same.",PM_ME_YOUR_YARD_GIRL,e9h49e6,conservative
"Indeed! While i am by far not a fan of Donald trump. I made a joke on a picture, that got misunderstood as Pro-Trump. So people hammered the Downvote button. Well the funny thing is, that even after clarification that i am one of ""them"" (?) the downvoting continues. It tought me personally a valuable lesson. That i should listen more and judge less. While i strongly disagree with many Conservative views i will from now on take the time and listen to the other side of a story, sure its more time consuming but i think it is just due diligence. Because its so, so easy to blindly follow an ideology and dehumanize the ""Other side"".

I am not sure what you guys make of this comment, afterall i am not ""one of you"", but i dont think i am ""one of them either"" any longer. So in either case you guys won a lurker who is going to read your side of the story. ",Inesophet,e9h9amp,conservative
"I just looked for fun and half of the posts aren't even ""humour"" they're just ""fuck trump"". This one is straight up just from [occupy democrats](https://i.redd.it/udf4e1rh1lx11.jpg).",GKrollin,e9h6swj,conservative
It's not that bad if you sort it by controversial lol. All the conservative posts show up,Carterhatch,e9hbheu,conservative
"That's not technically true.

Gen Z is considered the most conservative generation in the history of the US right now and they were born around... 1996 and later. 

The platform though, you are correct about in general because conservatives tend to see through the BS of stuff like reddit and younger folks that are actually respectable human beings are treating reddit like it's no better than facebook, which it really isn't. 

Gen Z outnumbers Millenials by a staggering amount already too. ",wearetheromantics,e9hkaw3,conservative
"Yeah, that's the point. ",TheKillector,e9gxmmc,conservative
"When was the last time there was normal political discussion online? I’m serious. Between the trolls and people looking for upvotes/likes from their tribe, talking govt/politics online is the worst. It should be this cool opportunity to hear peoples ideas from different far away places, but sadly it’s more like a new level of Hell that Dante couldn’t dream of. ",Shinroukuro,e9h8pbu,conservative
"What if the majority of people share similar opinions? What makes you think it isn’t “normal”? What do you consider “normal discourse”?

Reddit, and the Internet in general, is probably not the ideal source for “normal political discourse”, but what makes you believe that it doesn’t reflect the sentiments of the public?",DeVulgariEloquentia,e9hbyty,conservative
Agree. Being new to Reddit I didn't understand why it was all far left posts there all of the time. Then I found this place. ,AbominableR,e9h3d9b,conservative
Only if it’s your first eight seconds on Reddit.... anyone with more than ten brain cells is going to figure out what goes on over there practically immediately.,Honky_Cat,e9hbfwe,conservative
[removed],,e9h91ya,conservative
They learn soon enough when they post a dissenting viewpoint and gets riddled with downvotes.,falkerman,e9haci5,conservative
Maybe you are just a racist /s,1stpickbird,e9henqv,conservative
That's exactly true.,wearetheromantics,e9hin9x,conservative
"My disagreement to your last point is that much of the change liberals are wanting is change for the sake of change. The transgender/bathroom thing, as an example, has never been an issue--until someone decided that we need to change all the rules.

We're okay with change, so long as it's logical.",Juxen,e9hb7is,conservative
"I don’t recall how it started (this isn’t my oldest account) but reddit is so full of leftists that it never had a chance, regardless. Every gigantic subreddit has been doomed from the start. ",skarface6,e9gqbrs,conservative
"I think it's probably true that the user base for Reddit skews more liberal than conservative (just look at the top post of r/pics and other subreddits blatantly making fun of Trump). However, I don't think it's fair to say the conservatives give liberals more ""fodder"". Having looked through r/conservative, it feels like they spends just as much time mocking liberals as r/politics spends mocking conservatives. It's just a matter of what one considers to be absurd or mock-worthy. ",sbrough10,e9hcdfo,conservative
If r/conservative and r/t_d were in a Venn diagram they would be a perfect circle. Don’t let them fool you. ,cosmonautsix,e9hbowx,conservative
"One thing TD is good for is posting the heartbeat of conservative goings on. You'll find links to the tweets and articles there from leading conservatives. 

They rant and rave and act like fools about it for the most part but at least you can get some good knowledge on what's going on from the right through the sub.",wearetheromantics,e9hj9gu,conservative
[removed],,e9h2mgy,conservative
"It wasn’t that long ago, it was in the summer of 2016.  Literally overnight the DNC dumped a bunch of money into astroturfing and basically bought that forum.  

",timbowen,e9gqb23,conservative
"It's site-wide, and can't be turned off unless the moderators choose to add your name to an ""approved submitters"" list. cc /u/wearetheromantics",darthhayek,e9i88vo,conservative
"Yep that's straight up fascism. 

I post some conservative idea/response, a lot of times with facts and links to stats to back it up and within 60 seconds I'm at -50. Once that happens, I get a deluge of people calling me names, calling me an idiot, etc... Posting counter stats or arguments. I can't respond to any of it unless I want to sit at the computer for 6 hours straight because of the lockout.

They actually have a mechanical fascism system built in that prevents free speech unless you agree with them. It's crazy.",wearetheromantics,e9hjtf7,conservative
"If you don't mind me asking, do you vote Democrat?

I'm curious because I see quite a few people echo that same opinion, that they're not conservative but they come here because it's one of the few sane, civil, and honest subs.

What I would like to know is do any people who fall into that group ever think ""hmmmm if all the left leaning subs are full of lunatics, liars, and hate filled people, and the right leaning sub isn't... Maybe these conservatives are actually onto something with their worldview"" ",ConsistentlyRight,e9gr8q6,conservative
From your post history you seem pretty far right leaning mate,KiddnPeets364,e9hckqw,conservative
"Yep, alot of my friends vote Democrat and they aren't anything like /r/politics. I talk bout some of the pros of Trump and they're like i can see that. And no one gets built up into a tizzy.",rook2pawn,e9h3id2,conservative
Unless you explain your opinion and give room for a discussion,Leon_UnKOWN,e9henfs,conservative
"Okay, this is epic",redfitzy,e9haj9e,conservative
"It's not just upvotes/downvotes, it's also how the moderators handle dissenting opinions.",DavidStHubbins11,e9hbnhi,conservative
"Thanks for proving the worth of a democratic republic instead of pure democracy!

Tyranny of the majority, indeed.",Moonthrower,e9hjhju,conservative
Baleeted,darthhayek,e9i8ea4,conservative
">[removed] 

lmao I feel like that says all you need to see.",goodhabitsaccount,e9hco1w,conservative
I'd believe it for sure but do you have the links to any information regarding that?,wearetheromantics,e9hk3sa,conservative
"The mods on those subs are Iiberals, so they remove every opinion that doesn't fit their agenda.",Azul19,e9h3cbw,conservative
"then they hit you with the ""but reality has a liberal bias""",flexotron1169,e9h7sn8,conservative
"So weird that this anti-DNC comment got downvotes in, what is supposed to be, a conservative subreddit, isn't it? Almost like what I said is factual or something.  **🤔**  **🤔**  **🤔**  **🤔**  **🤔** ",TheGreatPJDJ,e9hkqfo,conservative
"The vast majority of mods on the popular subs are liberals and sjw's.

They censor pro-gun comments, they glorify abortion(go on TwoX and see what I am talking about), they're anti free-speech, sjwism and feminism being shoved down your throat, vehemently anti-religion(and I say this as an atheist, but holy shite, things have gone completely insane), xenophobic towards immigrants, anti-science, transhopia everywhere, misandry being upvoted to oblivion etc.

The mods delete comments and dissenting opinions, they remove posts etc.

They try to push an agenda, as you'd expect from a private organization.",Azul19,e9h38a1,conservative
"r/libertarian doesn't have libertarians in it. 

Most of the posters there are sjw's, liberals, feminists, socialists, communists etc.

That's why.",Azul19,e9h321h,conservative
Agreed. They force you out of discussion with bully tactics... Ironic since they’re probably also posting to stop bullying in other subs.,JumanjiHunter,e9h8dl0,conservative
"No, we aren't. You can't scream about how socialism is good, and America is evil/was never great/racist/whatever and still be ""American."" American is more than just citizenship. It's an identity. A set of ideals and values. You can't support communism and be American. That's not how it works.
",Odoacer476CE,e9hcpco,conservative
"Yeah, who believes in the constitution anymore? 

You know what's easy to mock? Leftists now insisting the Senate be abolished because it gives small states the same voice as big states.",Moonthrower,e9hjd7p,conservative
I do it intentionally. It's a good time.,skinagrizz,e9h9zjy,conservative
TheY'Re tHe eDuCatEd mEmBerS of sOcIeTy!,Moonthrower,e9hjl0t,conservative
"Whether people have common interests depends upon whether they are unified with a long history or diverse with no contributions to what others have built for centuries.

Normal people born in the US want functional schools like they grew up with and will homeschool or pay for private schools to get away from disruptive and violent idiots who make it harder to learn a watered down curriculum.

Healthcare goes a similar way. Most prefer to pay for themselves instead of paying for someone else whose political stance is anti-majority and was only imported by politicians so they would vote leftist.",joey_diaz_wings,e9hain2,conservative
"Every single graph in existence shows that to be a lie. The"" right"" in America is in the middle. The left is so far left it's practically fallen off the chart. There is no ""far right"" in America. 

Everything is to the right of you when you're left of Mao. ",Odoacer476CE,e9hd9fg,conservative
">It's just you.
>
>More specifically, it's that you probably don't like the general consensus of r/politics, which looks reality in the eye and calls the current US presidency out for the shit-show that it is, and you equate that with being ""liberal"" instead of accepting reality.



Imagine actually believing this. ",LumpyWumpus,e9hr9w5,conservative
It started before then.,twonkenn,e9h9b2a,conservative
Good thing you have T_D then right? Cuz what you just wrote happens there plus an immediate ban. ,SamuraiJackBauer,e9hcd5q,conservative
Your mind is blown all right.,AM_Kylearan,e9h88dd,conservative
This is the dumbest saying ever. ,Odoacer476CE,e9hd45q,conservative
"TrUtH hAs A lIbErAl BiAs!!1!

",LumpyWumpus,e9hem1p,conservative
FaCtS hAvE a LiBeRal BiAs!!1!,LumpyWumpus,e9henba,conservative
That sounds pretty gross to be honest,Odoacer476CE,e9hdgr6,conservative
A general politics sub is going to reflect the general populations beliefs. Why would they sticky that and how are you just finding out that most of Reddit is liberal?,Bombingofdresden,e9h9i6l,conservative
"In all fairness it is constantly asked. [I did this several months ago](https://i.imgur.com/DzmFBhz.jpg) as a joke, it's always been like this.",mp-,e9hyew4,conservative
"Yeah... and it’s not disguised, it’s blatant",ClippinWings451,e9gvhxp,conservative
Someone is trying to plant an idea in conservatives' minds that /r/politics is partisan?,weetchex,e9h80fx,conservative
"I agree that's why i do not upvote these posts, usually I see about 1 a day, and frankly the mods need to clean it up. Dont get me wrong I agree with the content but like you said these are just meant to be karma whoring posts.",Delta_25,e9h8pa2,conservative
">  its atrocious sometimes.

as is their moderating",LZ_OtHaFA,e9hbcrb,conservative
except with fewer jokes,SKWM3000,e9gpth4,conservative
Clicked on the sub and the top post is about trump lmao ,LightShieldRBLX,e9gzeou,conservative
More like top retards...,Moonthrower,e9hh6j1,conservative
"Isn’t that *intentionally* leftist? Like a direct parody of TheDonald. If they’re anything like the aforementioned sub, it’s not shocking they ban at the drop of a hat. ",Whiskey_Dry,e9ha89z,conservative
That sub is meant to be the left version of T_D.,georgeoj,e9h7s9f,conservative
Haha yeah r/politics im a ten minute response too. ,collectijism,e9hfh8e,conservative
"Is there a way to filter out these shitty paid subreddits? The other day they were al spamming the exact same shit - something about red line being crossed and triggering a protest in reaction to Sessions resignation.

I use the mobile app and can’t figure it out.",devonathan,e9gsnhg,conservative
"I thought something was wrong, I get a delay when trying to respond. They can't handle people responding with anything non leftist, so they just stop you. ",pombie,e9h15u6,conservative
"Yeah my #1 question to people responding to my counter arguments there has become, ""Are you from the US?"" They almost never respond after that lol...",wearetheromantics,e9hi844,conservative
"Every time I post any conservative idea in there I get people that look up my history and see that I've posted in T_D before. (mind you I'm not a trump lover at all and my posts in T_D were typically just information seeking in purpose)

They then speak to me like I'm a nazi, call me a nazi or assume 10,000 different things that they then project onto me. I usually then point out well, I'm posting in /r/politics too. In fact, I've posted in /r/politics way more than I have in T_D. What does that make me now? 

My own answer, an idiot cause these people do not care about facts or correcting the terribly inaccurate articles posted in there...",wearetheromantics,e9hifbg,conservative
"The saying goes, ""Liberals want you to think just like them. Conservatives just want you to think.""",Moonthrower,e9hhcea,conservative
">drinks beer

Obama is a rapist confirmed. Infowars dot com.",darthhayek,e9i7lja,conservative
"Yeah I remember looking at top posts and pretty much all it is, is “fuck Trump”. Not a funny joke at all but that shit will get you 90k karma easy",Fortnite_Scrub3555,e9h7h2r,conservative
"People don't ""discuss"" anything on reddit. Reddit is a social media platform where people show off and troll. That's about it.",wearetheromantics,e9hijdf,conservative
"r/politics is a subreddit dedicated to US politics. If you're correct, and the sub reflects the sentiments of the public, what can you say about partisan control in the US government, and the nigh-uniform alignment in the sub?",unityrootts,e9hhl49,conservative
I know they were posting so many articles about votes being counted these last few days. Like wtf “all votes should be counted”?  Smh so far left they’ve fallen off the flat earth.,doddyoldtinyhands,e9h7se8,conservative
"How can about 50% of the population be a niche market?

And they dont care about the planet, they care about other people thinking they care.

Conservativism logic is generally what leads to a richer life. Financially, mentally, emotionally, etc. 

Nobody is against immagrants. Conservatives believe there is a legal process which should be followed and a vetting process. There are just plainly too many ""Asylum"" seekers. Fix your country, dont come here and bring your beliefs and way of life that led to your shithole of a country.  Too many low skilled, poorly educated people are arriving and refusing to assimilate. America is not the same as it was 100 years and ago and we are not an orphanage.

Its laughable to see  lower-middle class vote for policies that lead to place like LA and NY with extreme levels of poverty and absolutely outrageous costs of living, rampant minority crime and incarceration, and supporting poor lifestyles.
   ",1MillionMasteryYi,e9h9q3m,conservative
"But the transgender/bathroom thing is an issue and has been... Just not to you. This is part of my issue with social conservatism that has always annoyed me. It feels like if it does affect them they don't want it to change. I mean in your example if it is not an issue why do you care? Let the laws change, and let that part of the country be happy why do you care?",Slayergnome,e9hce01,conservative
"I agree with what you say, to a point. While I agree that in very recent times, the left can become very vocal on a whole range of issues, I dont think its fair to say that every liberal / leftist has this same viewpoint. I myself lean to the left but this whole transgender / bathroom thing is a bit over the top in my opinion, however, I do kind of understand where they are coming from:

Trans / LGBT communities have been demonised for centuries by the religious (right). In any religious country from the beginning of humanity this has been the case. We are probably at the first time in our civilisation where LGBT / trans people can feel the safest they have ever been and so are likely pushing this agena as a form of pent up frustration over all these years of being victimised so I cant blame them for wanting to have some more rights to be able to be the people who they feel that they actually are(finally)

&#x200B;

I work in a very hipster, leftist building and we have communal, shared toilets. There are 0 issues EVER in these toilets about sexual harassment or anything even remotely close to being sexual. In fact, the biggest complaint these toilets get is the lack of toilet paper at some parts of the day...

&#x200B;

TBH youre always going to view extreme viewpoints on literally any single subject that people can have an opinion about, regardless of which political isle you are from, and to paint all liberals the same just becasue one select group wants this type of change is I think a bit unfair.

&#x200B;

The difference with conservatives is that a lot of conservative politicians hold very similar beliefs about what it means to be conservative, these politicans speak only for their own group and very rarely want to share the belief of others who go against their beliefs. liberals, are more open to sharing ideas.

&#x200B;

I mean...just look at the current left / right issue in America right now. America has never been so divided....and who is running the country right now? The right.

&#x200B;",barz,e9hbx7i,conservative
"I've been on Reddit since reddit started. Just when they started the subreddit feature, /r/politics was left leaning but NEVER like the way it is now. I was also very left leaning most of my adult life, but whatever ""left"" is now, hell no.

It's pretty clear that even the ""left"" got co-opted by some kind of wierd identity politics version of the left. Heck there was a time that Harry Reid used to argue how insane birthright citizenship from Illegals was and that the Republicans wanted to install a migrant visa program. ",rook2pawn,e9h3epv,conservative
"I actually read something recently that documented it... that it was started almost as a joke, when a leftist sub realized it didn’t exist yet.",ClippinWings451,e9grij1,conservative
Reddit was much more balanced before the Black Jesus 4prez campaign of 2008.  Left-leaning but lots of libertarian influence and a pronounced strong support for the 2nd amendment all around.  In 2016 there was a massive shift to hysterical levels of bias,farbenreichwulf,e9h385d,conservative
Except a lot of conservatives on this sub criticize Trump whereas no one on the Donald does. The subs have very similar political views but here we can actually talk about what's happening and say something Trump proposed is stupid or talk about other solutions. ,Groadee,e9hcjf8,conservative
"I post in both and this is a categorically false statement.

Weapons sales to Saudis, tariffs, and the ""take the guns first"" comment went over in this sub like a wet fart in an elevator, while they barely got mentioned in T_D.",Dhaerrow,e9hjnep,conservative
"Weird, you'd think I went to t_d regularly, then.",Moonthrower,e9huth8,conservative
Not long before that they used to be huge fans of Ron Paul.,EGiNcholesteroL,e9gsg56,conservative
"Years ago, I used to have some pretty decent conversations there. I remember defending gun rights there and actually getting a lot of upvotes. No way that would happen now, though. I don't even try to talk there anymore. Sometimes I glance at their front page just to see how absurd they've gotten. ",GuitarWizard90,e9gztwn,conservative
They literally visited the offices of Conde Naste and came up with some agreements.. i would love for someone to get a hold of those papers and leak them! Im pretty sure they turned the keys of moderation over to the DNC in 2016.,rook2pawn,e9h3gz3,conservative
"I've voted Democrat primarily in the past.  This past election I didn't even vote for president because I was fairly disgusted by how my own party heavily influenced a campaign against the candidate I supported, Sanders.  I know a lot of people here would disagree with my support of Sanders, but that's not what I want to talk about at the moment.  And before you ask, I'm from one of the bluest states in the country and probably one of the bluest counties as well.  Whether or not I voted wouldn't have made much of a difference.

I've recently been reading this sub because I can hardly go to the /r/politics sub anymore.  It's gotten far too large to have any sort of meaningful discussion about politics.  Any negative opinions i.e. those not supporting the democratic agenda get downvoted into oblivion.  All of the posts, especially those critical of Trump get upvoted into the thousands meanwhile the threads contain little to no discussion.  Typically just chains of comments taking little digs at Trump or republicans.  Honestly, the sub should just be titled /r/democrats or /r/liberals because the bias is so strong.

After the convention in 2016 the sub also had a major change when the Pro-Clinton PACs started astroturfing the sub super hard.  Ask any Sanders supporter who was active at the same time and they'll tell you basically the same thing.  The sub switched from Pro-Sanders to Pro-Clinton overnight when prior to that the sub was very lukewarm and even negative on Clinton.  And I'm not talking about the posts, but rather the comments.  It was actually kind of appalling to see that they were willing to subvert discourse so blatantly.

Also, I have friends and family who are conservative and even Trump supporters.  No, I don't think they're evil, although, one of them does get their news from Facebook too often.",-Deuce-,e9gwbi0,conservative
Seconded.,BATTLECATSUPREME,e9gsu14,conservative
Do you ever think “hmm if all these conservative politicians are liars swindlers and rapists maybe i shouldnt support them”,Tuas1996,e9h99fo,conservative
"Sure, no problem. 

No, I am not an American(half South African half aussie), but my girlfriend(soon to be wife)is an American.

She has never voted Democrat in her entire life, as they're pro-choice and she's very pro-life, otherwise she's a very liberal person.

But to answer your question, no, I hate Democrats, if I was an American I would've NEVER voted for them.

The problem with the modern liberals, is that they're not liberal anymore.

Democrats are full of sjw's and extreme feminists, they've alienated so many people from their party with their extremism.

Identity politics and radical PC culture is what drives this country down.

Who would want such people to be in control of their county?",Azul19,e9h22fe,conservative
"Real people that have other responsibilities in life besides trolling /r/politics and participating in Antifa rallies are nothing like the people you'll see on reddit.

I swear that at least 60% of the people posting in there aren't even in or from the US at all.",wearetheromantics,e9hjmos,conservative
clap clap ,mountaintop123,e9he7jw,conservative
"I’m going to be honest, I think this is confirmation bias. I see just as many liberals complain about the mods on r/politics as conservatives. ",binghamtonswag,e9hbvnv,conservative
That's what reddit is as a whole.,wearetheromantics,e9hkpqc,conservative
"It does, once you've paid for zombies to force it on people and have liquidated alternatives.",joey_diaz_wings,e9ha5ak,conservative
"Hey, I go there too. The mods are pretty woke guys too.",darthhayek,e9i8iwp,conservative
"Thanks, Mr Aleppo!",MAGA2ElectricChair4U,e9h7vll,conservative
"Exactly, for some reason it's acceptable to bully and hate anyone with a viewpoint disagreeing with liberalism, yet they'll preach for hours about how we need to be open and loving.",Frzaro,e9h8y7b,conservative
You call them out as well? ,skizpizzi,e9ha7jq,conservative
This.,jkmacc,e9hdnpw,conservative
*Most of Reddit commenters in /r/politics FTFY,goodhabitsaccount,e9hcjda,conservative
"Yeah, I'd say they make it pretty obvious.",BTFoundation,e9h7w15,conservative
And when you point it out to them they actually argue that it's not left leaning at all. This is the lunacy of the left. Can't even admit when all their views and opinions are anti-conservative when they blatantly are.,wearetheromantics,e9hhz3j,conservative
The neutral sub name and neutral sub rules are the disguise,AnonONinternet,e9hc2gk,conservative
"I mean I consider myself pretty left-wing and I thought that was
obvious ",PM_ME_POTATO_PICS,e9hakjs,conservative
R/bestof has become the same thing. ,The_Mighty_Rex,e9j9ubp,conservative
DAE /r/politics bad?,piper06w,e9igumb,conservative
All of Reddit is about karma whoring. That's not necessarily an indictment of r/politics. ,charlesjkd,e9he686,conservative
The left can't meme ,hat_wine_clock,e9grsgl,conservative
"Agreed, I'm pretty left but The Muller is basically a fan sub hating everything Trump related.",chatokun,e9hdwue,conservative
It’s unavailable for me.  Is it really similar to TD? That place is gross.,Moddejunk,e9h8mhr,conservative
reddit enhancement suite,dgillz,e9h473j,conservative
Try r/apolloapp  ,FartBringerer,e9gthtg,conservative
Just like on T_D.,georgeoj,e9h7ta9,conservative
">Yeah my #1 question to people responding to my counter arguments there has become, ""Are you from the US?""

Well, the important thing is that they're not xenophobic about it.",darthhayek,e9i7gay,conservative
I don’t get what you’re saying here.  Should we not count all the votes?  Is this sarcasm on your part?,AnySink,e9hauqo,conservative
"Of course you think the Earth is flat.

Sorry, couldn't resist, you left that one wide open. ",micapark,e9h98ze,conservative
"‘Nobody is against immigrants’ you really think that do you? The president is against immigrants? Or is that wall he’s banged on about to make it easier to come to America? I’m pretty sure a lot of voters even voted for him based on this wall. Or we’re they all liberals trolling? 

You mention poverty, yet fail to acknowledge that those areas have a huge population, which would obviously have more homeless people due to a higher population? 

Conservatism logic doesn’t lead to a richer life. It only makes you richer if you’re already rich and well off. You don’t go from poverty to riches by being a conservative. In fact, you’re far worse off if you’re lower class.  But let’s ignore that fact cause there’s immigrants we need to deal with taking the hard labour jobs we don’t want to do ourselves!! 
",Concerned_Citizen__,e9halv4,conservative
"Look at Silicon Valley and then try to tell me seriously that ""liberals"" are more open-minded to new ideas right now. Why did a guy running against ""political correctness"" resonate with so many people otherwise?",darthhayek,e9i7vad,conservative
"I think you’re severely misguided if you think the right is running this country right now. They have political power, yes, in the form of the WH, Senate, and formerly the House. 

The left controls mainstream media (with some exceptions), education, and Hollywood.

Which group do you think has more influence on our society and culture? The left. ",Jack_Beans,e9hcxx0,conservative
">I mean...just look at the current left / right issue in America right now. America has never been so divided....and who is running the country right now? The right.

But who's causing all the division and acting like dicks? 

*__THE LEFT__*",Odoacer476CE,e9hd0wk,conservative
They used to love Ron Paul.,joshred,e9h923b,conservative
Why do people act like liberals have gone off the deep end on identity politics in the last four years? I remember being 13 in 2005 and thinking liberals were crazy obsessed with race. I’m obviously very young but I remember them always being like this. The sjw culture I remember being a problem 10 years ago ,DaveKast,e9hc7oq,conservative
"Correct The Record spend a few million on social media, and it's all but been confirmed they purchased carte blanche on reddit. Of note, there used to a be a pro Trump moderator on r/politics, but he was purged shortly after CTR was confirmed to be throwing money around. They also purged the pro burnie people and the moderation became openly hostile to anything not directly supportive of Hillary Clinton.",Notalent13,e9h44w0,conservative
"I miss when everyone was head over heels for Ron Paul. I think a large part of what happened is that the DNC hadn't quite figured out how to completely buy out and manipulate reddit for a while (mostly they had focused on controlling facebook). Once the 2016 election came around, they had it totally under their thumb and used every astroturf technique in their playbook to rile people up and make them froth at the mouth.

Now it's hard to tell when you're talking to a paid political operative, a robot, or a brainwashed person. Seems so rare these days to even have a productive conversation with people (though I do get them from time to time).",varemia,e9h4ufs,conservative
"Balanced?  Reddit had always leaned left, even right at the start.  Only back in the early years this place was more about tech, games, general geekery so it hardly stuck out like the sore thumb it is. ",XDG-KEC-QZA-PBU,e9h61ye,conservative
"Those libertarians were awfully leftist, though. And the hatred and vitriol for Bush was really widespread, even if it wasn’t at TDS levels.",skarface6,e9h8dwm,conservative
"I wish I'd been here then. I was (and still am) a major Paulista and that flip would have been awesome to witness.  


Of course, there are those in r/libertarian who claim to be left-libertarians, and I can't reconcile that with Ron or Rand.",shinypretty,e9hbg4p,conservative
"Most of reddit is VERY anti-gun.

For a community that claims to be progressive, they sure as hell don't respect the liberties of others.",Azul19,e9h2utn,conservative
I think today’s top story was literally “The President is an asshole”,DoctorZMC,e9h5c8s,conservative
I don't even go there anymore. I get my fix from r/ShitPoliticsSays.,shinypretty,e9hbh85,conservative
"I'll never forget the day Hillary collapsed on 9/11. Brock of CTR even outright said their astroturf operation went dark with no clue what was going on. For like a day and a half, the entire politics page was people having genuine discussions and wondering about Hillary's health. CTR came back online and it was like a light-switch and suddenly people were belligerently defending her health and acting insane again.",varemia,e9h4yme,conservative
Happy you’re willing to join us even though our views don’t align. You’re always welcome. ,LightShieldRBLX,e9gzdjl,conservative
Nice. This is what we need. ,wearetheromantics,e9hjia3,conservative
"yeah, your post seems really reasonable and not totally the same as the people you are trying to vilify.  

>I hate democrats

a completely shitty thing to say, as would saying ""i hate republicans""  

we're all Americans, it's time we remember that and find out common ground again.  This bullshit party before country rhetoric is what is killing our country, not your ridiculous arguments.

>democrats are full of extremism

there are extreme supporters of both parties.  lets not pretend that the most extreme members of any group define that group.

>identity politics...drive this country down

are you seriously trying to pretend that republicans aren't guilty of this?",11010000110100100001,e9h9y39,conservative
"Girlfriend, soon to be wife? I thought the whole MGTOW was about going your own way?",GucciJesus,e9h88n3,conservative
Most of Reddit. It’s no mystery that most of Reddit is liberal.,Bombingofdresden,e9hcmg9,conservative
"Well, when you proclaim everything right of center to be “Far Right Nazis”... suddenly the left becomes the middle in your mind.",ClippinWings451,e9hoxhs,conservative
"Yeah. Its mostly more of a parody than anything else, or at least that's how it started. If you want the proper sub for the Mueller investigation and trumps corruption it's /r/Keep_Track. Also, the comment above linked the sun incorrectly, it's /r/the_mueller",georgeoj,e9h983h,conservative
"Meh, t\_d is pretty much a pep rally / nonsense sub. It's fun in small doses.",shinypretty,e9hbjv6,conservative
Except T_D tells you in the sidebar and they’ve always made it known they’re a “non-stop Trump rally” and there aren’t really debates at rallies. If you want discourse with t_d there are sister subreddits made just for that ,superbobby324,e9hcbcg,conservative
"which isn’t labeled r/politics.

There’s no illusion around what T_D is, or what r/liberal is, or r/conservative. These subreddits are not presenting themselves as bipartisan.",ENCROSS,e9hcayu,conservative
We should not count invalid votes. ,cseymour24,e9hc3zn,conservative
"I love how you phrase this as just sincere and innocent questions...
",gt4674b,e9hbrxj,conservative
"Hey now, people all over the globe are coming around to see the truth that the earth is flat...",doddyoldtinyhands,e9h9aph,conservative
Poorest areas of urban cities seem to vote heavily democrat...,Moonthrower,e9huwp5,conservative
"Sorry I disagree.

Answer me this; What is the biggest news organisation in America? 

in terms of viewers its Fox news.

Which organisation only recently appeared with the president in a campaign? which no other media outlet has done in the past? Fox news

Which news outlet does the president regularly call up to give his personal opinion and to influence voters, as well as re-tweeting clips from their website? Yep, you guessed it... Fox News...



if the left has a bigger influence in society and culture, that's just because that's the general consensus around the world. The only difference is that the right think the left are attacking their beliefs. They are not, they are just evolving with the times while the right remains the same its always ever been.

The rest of the world wants to progress together, as a society, helping eachother out, yet Trump wants to isolate himself from the rest of the world. Thats not progress thats regress.

There is no grand conspiracy from the left. its just happening naturally. The right is fighting against the grain with their old, outdated views and see it as an attach on their beliefs when its not the case, they just take it personally cos they are sore fucking losers",barz,e9hdirt,conservative
"Ya I remember 6/7 years ago it was quite diverse and you would often see legitimate political discussion. That’s long gone now... This might sound cliched at this point but, I miss the old Reddit :/ ",goodhabitsaccount,e9hc73r,conservative
"Damn, you're the same age as me. I never put 2 and 2 together when I was that young but I definitely remember all the ""red flags"" and warning signs that make a lot more sense now in retrospect.",darthhayek,e9i81sf,conservative
It's rooted in Millennials so I'm sure the fringes of it were beginning at least by then.,wearetheromantics,e9hiril,conservative
"Curious,  was there ever any evidence that CTR paid reddit directly for influence?",farbenreichwulf,e9h4ek6,conservative
Tbh 90% of the time it’s ‘brainwashed’ people. Personally I’ve only recently started to see completely obvious shills in the past few weeks.,goodhabitsaccount,e9hcad2,conservative
It was horrifying,Karmelion,e9hc3mr,conservative
"I don't think that's true. I'll make some pro gun control remarks in r/news from time to time and get downvoted.

Test it out and you'll see.

Also, you need to remember there are a lot of Brits and Aussies reading these threads and they have different views on gun ownership.",ToxicAdamm,e9h8p2q,conservative
You have to keep in mind as well that a majority on reddit are not even from the US or even live here.,wearetheromantics,e9hiucn,conservative
Respecting liberties to allow liberties to liberally kill others with this liberty.,nwahsrellim,e9hb3kn,conservative
"When you take pride in being an asshole, people will call you an asshole. I think most conservatives will tell you one of the things they like about him is that he's as huge asshole to ""liberals.""",cajunaggie08,e9hb98t,conservative
To be fair asshole is being nice about it.,rward617,e9h9ub2,conservative
"well, he is, so at least it's not fake news.

His identity is built around being an asshole ""telling it like it is"" 

oh, look, now i'll get downvote brigaded by the same people that are getting angry that any opposing viewpoint gets downvoted.

how's that work guys?",11010000110100100001,e9h9pl8,conservative
"Oh man, that's crazy. Yeah, I definitely saw one or two days of the year where CTR was not in operation and it was like ""normal"". It was so wonderful just to see people being normal with each other. At least though, CTR had a paper trail. Very sad state for reddit. ",rook2pawn,e9h68v3,conservative
"Like I said, I have family and friends who are conservative and I understand why they vote the way they do, because I've spoken to them.  I'd wager 95% of the people in /r/politics don't know a single conservative in real life.",-Deuce-,e9h8xbs,conservative
"Both Democrats and Republicans are guilty of extremism and identity politics.

But, we were talking about Democrats here, not Republicans.

The two party system is what's hurting America, but at the same time, it's important to make distinctions.

I don't HATE Democrats as people, I respect everyone's beliefs, I detest the democratic party, because they're idealists.

They're thinking on how the US is supposed to BE, not on how the world currently is.

Extreme feminism and sjwism, unfortunately, has become the paragon of the democratic platform.

Sure, you'd agree with me on that one.",Azul19,e9halpv,conservative
"What??? 

I am not a MGTOW mate, I don't know where you got that idea from. 

I am just anti-sjw/feminist/PC critic.

Also, going through others post histories to attack them if you have nothing better to say, is just lame and dumb.",Azul19,e9hb0n4,conservative
And you know this how?,goodhabitsaccount,e9hcxqj,conservative
[deleted],,e9hdag4,conservative
"What? His comment was actually confusing, idk what he’s saying.",goodhabitsaccount,e9hc25o,conservative
"How do most people consume news? It is not the TV, but the internet. Look at hits on the MSM websites, and you will find out where people truely get there news.",Shit___Taco,e9irhgo,conservative
"Next thing you know, Fox will be [giving debate questions to their candidate in advance...](https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/donna-brazile-leaves-cnn/)",Moonthrower,e9htmzb,conservative
"There was a leak of admin logs a year or so ago where they admitted CTR was running wild but that they were just going to allow it. No direct confirmation of payment but CTR itself was open about spending the money so...yeah.

https://www.thedailybeast.com/hillary-pac-spends-dollar1-million-to-correct-commenters-on-reddit-and-facebook",Notalent13,e9h4gz6,conservative
"r/news is notoriously known for removing pro-gun posts and comments.

If you go and look up the threads on r/pro-gun, you'd see the blokes there complaining about it all the time.

Reddit is very pro-censhorship in general, they're doing this ALL the time, especially on women related subbreddits, when they're pushing feminism and sjwism down anyone's throats.",Azul19,e9hatj6,conservative
"Yeah, a little news flash for you... 

Guns do NOT kill people, people who misuse their guns kill people.

Self defense is a basic human right, owning a gun is the extention of it.",Azul19,e9hbt3z,conservative
"Yes, the public persona he displays is that of an asshole. But it’s not politics or news, it’s just an insult.

An actual useful headline would be “Trump angers veterans groups by cancelling visit to war memorial due to the weather”. The purpose of news should be about informing, and that headline doesn’t. Yes the media is biased and it always has been but you don’t have to be so obvious about it.",DoctorZMC,e9if5d7,conservative
"I doubt you’d get downvoted for that opinion, moreso for coming off as a condescending prick.",ENCROSS,e9hc668,conservative
Probably know 30 of them each... just blocked them all on facebook. ,Moonthrower,e9hufik,conservative
"No, I don't agree that the democratic party is extreme.   I don't agree with them on everything, but they are far from extreme.

I'd love for you to lay out examples of extremism that actual mainstream democrats politicians are pushing.  Your argument is complete smokescreen because you're vilifying millions of people because you equate them all with a few crazies.  

",11010000110100100001,e9hawlj,conservative
"> Also, going through others post histories to attack them if you have nothing better to say, is just lame and dumb.

Well, the first thing that pops up on your profile are posts to r/MGTOW. Like, lots of em. Enough to give the impression that you were buying the MGTOW philosophy. Didn't really have to go through anything, just checked your profile, as I normally do before talking to people on Reddit. ",GucciJesus,e9hc5p6,conservative
"What’s upvoted and commented on and political issues in general.

What are you basing your claim on?",Bombingofdresden,e9hd03z,conservative
You don't get it. They believe talking logic and reason are constructs white males created to get people to be below them in society. They think they lose every debate and argument because white male privelidge logic is not being evenly given to everyone. Its not fair. You see zero debate its 100% agreement everywhere now. Reddit went from 6 to 18 in world ranking websites because of this. They want us to leave so they can facebook this place.,collectijism,e9hfs5d,conservative
They’re a full of shit concern troll. Two seconds of looking at their comments shows they favor progressive taxation of inherited wealth and other leftist crap. ,gt4674b,e9i1764,conservative
"I agree, the mods are heavily anti 2A and arguably the worst about censorship. But unless you go there during prime European hours and when most Americans are asleep, the comments and upvotes tend to favor the 2A. Time and time again people say that if the Democratic Party dropped the gun issue then they’d win in landslides. ",brockoli1010,e9hc09x,conservative
"You have passed this test!

Most people are stupid right? You can agree to that right? 

So why the fuck would I trust a random person with a gun?",nwahsrellim,e9hc17o,conservative
"Raising the taxes on the poor/working/middle class, banning guns, ""hate-speech"" and ""hate-crime"" laws, that are all relative and open to interpretation, internet censorship, government surveillance, a broken immigration system, abortions up until the moment of birth, safe spaces at colleges, the death-penalty, a broken criminal justice system, privatization of prisons, compulsory voting/abolishing the voter ID system, radical feminism all over the media, identity politics(hating men, whites, religious folks, not just acknowledging the systemic problems that exist in our society), sjwism on the media/video games/politics etc.

These are some of the things that came off my mind.

Do you really cannot see the extremism of the democratic party these days?",Azul19,e9hbez5,conservative
"Oh sure, my bad, nothing against you personally.

It's just like, lots of people on reddit go on people's post histories with a plan to attack them.

Reddit is a very toxic place, so you have to be vigilant.

Take care!!! ",Azul19,e9hcimt,conservative
"I didn’t claim anything, I simply said that what your claiming as fact and common knowledge is unsubstantiated. 

Upvotes are known to now be extremely obfuscated and there’s very little transparency behind what’s actually happening.

The front page is massively policed in order to hide anything the admins would rather people not see. This began immensely evident when while working on the system the front page of Reddit became literally nothing but /r/The_Donald and then shortly afterward posts were never seen there again.

Both of those can be explained away but we also know that ~90% of Redditors don’t comment let alone post and there are very likely demographic relations to who posts more. If you lean right and see that /r/politics is completely left (which might be because of moderation st first) you’re no going to post there, who will? Obviously people who believe their content will be well received. That is a vicious cycle.

I was in the middle of a thought but I think you get my point that we don’t currently have anyway to accurately determine the true demographics of the site currently and that any one way of attempting to quantify them might miss something else.

I must sleep I got work soon hope that all made some sense.",goodhabitsaccount,e9heac5,conservative
"I haven't seen it, maybe I haven't payed any attention? 

I don't know.

But I hope so!",Azul19,e9hc9cd,conservative
If dnc went pro gun and anti illegal immigration they would never lose!,xTheHeroWeNeedx,e9hctma,conservative
"No, most people aren't stupid mate.

Good thing to generalize hoards of people.

We have universal background checks, that ensure idiots won't have access to firearms.

Isn't the police full of idiots as well? 

Both the police and the military are corrupt institutions, do you really trust them with your life?",Azul19,e9hcf87,conservative
"Okay, I took this: 

>*Most of Reddit commenters in /r/politics FTFY

As a correction that you were claiming the opposite. My bad.

I’d still bet good money that most of Reddit is liberal. Maybe it’s confirmation bias. I’m pretty liberal myself and think most people on here are such.",Bombingofdresden,e9heizd,conservative
"No I don’t. I actually have an experience with police that may shed light on that opinion.

In February of 2016, the night of Mardi Gras, my car was parked in front of my house on probably the busiest street in my small city. My car was side swept/ hit so bad it was totaled and the car that hit mine literally lost the right front wheel with the hub, the suspension knuckle, the strut, and the lower control and being ripped from the vehicle and laying in front of my own car. A police officer literally drove by as it happened and found the car a block over stuck on a side street. They arrested this guy for a different warrant already out for his arrest. The next day I called my police station asking about my situation with my totaled car and about the guy in custody and how all this would pan out. The official response I received was that it wasn’t his car he wasn’t responsible because he was booked on another charge and they couldn’t get ahold of the actual owner. I had to do a lot of leg work to find out who owned that car just off the license plate. I then went to the person who owned the cars house. Took two days. Went to the house were the car was registered and talked to a woman who said she owned the car. She also said the police had been there the day before and that they said they were at the wrong house. I got her insurance info myself and filed a claim. My issue with the police in this instance is they did nothing to follow up on my loss of property, I had to perform what would be a police detective’s job. So no I don’t trust the police and think they’re full of idiots. 

Have you ever worked in retail? 90% of people are dumb.

",nwahsrellim,e9hd8oq,conservative
"Are you in New Orleans? 

Police there have so much criminal shit to deal with, as soon as the criminal warrant arrest was done, you're off to defense for yourself with the civil shit. 

Sucks but it's true, with the low police pay and low staffing. ",Moonthrower,e9huby3,conservative
"I get it. The police screwed up in your case, therefore trash the Bill of Rights, eh?",PubliusVA,e9hdf0p,conservative
"Her ""act"" or ""shtick"" gets a lot of people their college degrees and has for decades now. And those degrees go right to government jobs. And sometimes they even win elections. ",triggernaut,e9js155,conservative
"Despite this article being from this past July, the FB page still comes up in search results. Can anyone confirm if the status of this page? I don't have an account anymore, otherwise I'd verify myself.

https://www.facebook.com/Fillyourbootsuk/


Maybe there's more to the story and what ever the issue was, was resolved.",MooMooCudChew,e9hqcca,conservative
R E G U L A T E,pk_c1n_xx,e9i4os0,conservative
" What Facebook is currently doing, and will do if it closes down  pages  is banning freedom of speech in the private sector. Such a move would deprive individual citizens of being able to share their stories of surviva healthcare  police corruption and police brutalit as well as government-funded schemes to defraud Americans of their constitutional rights. And the list goes on.",ExpensiveMention,e9hffb5,conservative
"Imagine if the Dems ever get control of Congress and the White House. They already control the House of Reps, the media and the education system. They also control the private sector. Google, Facebook, Twitter, etc. They’re creating a brain washed populace. It’s only a matter of time before the ignorant completely outnumber us. Then it’s GGWP.",HolsterOfNuts,e9hnkzz,conservative
They probably felt the heat and reinstated it. ,skarface6,e9huc8i,conservative
"Look, this was scummy. But, please stop misrepresenting ""freedom of speech"". Freedom of speech is a restraint on the government, not individuals or businesses. Facebook is a platform that offers free publishing to individuals. They owe nothing to you. This idea that just because they are the standard in social media, means they need to be regulated is counter to conservative principals. 

What about when Facebook gets replaced, like they did to MySpace? Will you then say that company should be regulated? Why wouldn't you apply that to every social platform, including blogs with comment sections? If I open of social site, should I be required to publish the crazy far leftist?

No, we are conservatives, and we believe in solving problems like these through innovation. We don't go trying to enforce our will upon others just because we feel under represented on these platforms. Leave that to the radical left. ",CamoAnimal,e9hkwfc,conservative
"The thing is the Democrats don't NEED to control government


they control everything else. They already control the media. They don't need the government in order to control the media. They control online discourse. They don't need the government for that. They control companies that control the economy. The fact is the Democrats have sideline to the government. They don't need it to run the world anymore

Democrats of essentially replaced government power with corporate power that they control. And Libertarians are perfectly okay with it",ExpensiveMention,e9i2ifx,conservative
That's always a possibility. Hard to justify shutting down the page of group focused on supporting the mental health of veterans with out one hell of a reason.,MooMooCudChew,e9hurzi,conservative
He actually made the distinction of it being in the private sector. ,skarface6,e9hub40,conservative
"No. YOU'RE misrepresenting freedom of speech

Because Libertarians are corrupt Corporation puppets

Because Libertarians HATE liberty

They dont care about liberty. They care about corporate profits. Everything they do can be explained thru that

Freedom of speech is not a ""restriction on govt"". Thats Libertarian propoganda.

Its an ACTUAL right that exists even without the govt.

Its not something that only exists when dealing eith the govt

that's part of the Libertarians war on Liberty. They hate Liberty. That's why they hate the government.

It's never about Liberty with Libertarians. It's just about hitting the government government

Freedom of speech is something you have regardless of the government.

the Constitution just protects those rights that you already have from government intrusion. But it's not something that only exists on government property

Libertarians would probably like a world like that. Where nobody had any rights or Freedom except on government property. Because that would be the perfect world for corporations. And Libertarians are basically Stooges for Corporations

Libertarians just hate Liberty. And it's ironic when they invoke the Constitution because Libertarians HATE the Constitution

it represents everything they are against. It represents the government. It represents a document declaring that the government is it exists for the people

in the very first paragraph of the Constitution it states that the government's purpose is for the welfare of the citizens.

Libertarians HATE this

Th idea that Libertarians support Liberty is like the idea that an Tifa supports anti-fascism

Libertarians are against the people. They hate Liberty and they support corporate profits. Everything they do is through is trying to maximize corporate profits. They don't really care if it infringes on people's Liberties are not. They really don't care if people suffer. That's not what their ideology is about


They simply use that and the Constitution and religion as an excuse.


freedom of speech is a right. Rights are not granted by the government. It doesn't exist only on government property. The idea that you only have rights when standing on government land and not on any other type of land is ridiculous.

The fact is freedom of speech exist everywhere. Because it's NOT granted by the government


and when a corporation or company or anybody that controls 90% of the world's Communications decides to stop certain speech that's a direct INFRINGEMENT on freedom of speech

Regardless of whether you believe corporations should be basically Kings or not

there's a reason libertarians can'T get 15% of the vote. and republicans and conservatives need to understand this. we can't let the libertarians run the republican party the way the democrats have let the socialists run their party. both sides have extremist. we cannot fall into the trap of letting the Extremists Dictate Policy


Unlike conservatives Libertarians HATE the idea of Liberty. They will do whatever they can to infringe on Liberty in the name of a corporation or a rich person.

they really do hate the poor. And the more honest ones of them will admit that. When you confront them on the fact that a true libertarian society would in fact be awful for poor people and probably for minorities the more honest Libertarians will just admit that they don't care. That they're just like communist. They don't care how many people suffer and starve in the name of their perfect ideology

 if someone was going to tell you that your freedom to own a gun only existed on government property. It on any kind of property that was not public land you were not allowed to carry a gun would you be okay with it? 


Republicans need to realize this. And as far as freedom of speech goes we also need to realize this.

Benefit corporation that controls 90% of communication is censoring speech can we really say that we have freedom of speech?

Libertarians don't care. But conservatives. People who actually value Liberty NEED to care",ExpensiveMention,e9i2b8v,conservative
"This guys Statement is anti freedom. He makes the claim the liberties ONLY exist in the context of the govt. Wich is false. He doesnt want liberties to exist outside of govt. But they do.

coincidentally the Libertarian that believe that also seem to believe that the government should be abolish to at least minimal  to practically not existent. Meaning that if your rights oule be minimalist",ExpensiveMention,e9i64ge,conservative
I don't see that in OP's comment. What do you mean? ,CamoAnimal,e9hx1l4,conservative
"... What?

I don't have the time to address all you said there, so let me just say this:

* If I say something derogatory (even if true) about my employer on social media, I wouldn't be surprised if I found myself out of a job. That is their right to employ me, and they fire me.

* I'm not allowed to bring a firearm to work, even though I live in a CC state. If I do so and get caught, I'd likely get fired. That is their right to set terms of employment as I am on their property. 

* If I go into a bar and start picking verbal fights with people, they'll probably tell me to leave. That is their right to refuse my business, because I am harming theirs. 

All of these scenarios are private businesses are exercising their rights to employ me or serve me. In none of those cases were my rights hindered. They didn't gag me and they didn't take away my gun. And, before someone says ""but corporations!"", replace ""business"" with any individual who may hire you or do business with you. Same applies.

They way you have presented it, your concept of rights doesn't make sense, because it assumes that you can say whatever you want without any reprocution. Liberty and freedom are not a one way street. ",CamoAnimal,e9i3ze1,conservative
"So, now you're not only crazy (see your rant about ""the Libertarians""), but also telling lies? You're on a roll tonight. How about you quote for me exactly where I said liberties only exist within the government?

edit: 5 hours later, and still no reply. Wonder why... ",CamoAnimal,e9ijv60,conservative
>is banning freedom of speech in the private sector,skarface6,e9hxsu4,conservative
"The thing is we have labor laws that prevent that. Your employer in many places can't just fire you

And here's the thing your drip deliberately changing and moving the goalposts. The fact is what I'm saying is that Libertarians hate Freedom. They hate Liberty. They are not concerned with the average person's ability to do what they want.


they're concerned with the ability of the very rich corporations to do what they want

just like they care more about a racists ability to discriminate against black people than a black person's ability to not be discriminated against

In the sense Libertarians want to Warp you're right it just something that's just only exists within the government. (The same government that they want to abolish. Essentially meaning that they want to abolish rights) 

The right to work for your company is not in shrined in the Constitution. And it's never been stated to be a right.

our freedom of speech is something everybody agrees of right. Everybody except Libertarians. The fact that Libertarians think that your rights end at the property line of government land is exactly why I say that they hate Liberty

now it's either because some of them are selfish. Some of them just hate Liberty. And some of them have been indoctrinated by libertarian propaganda. ( libertarian propaganda is overwhelmingly created by and funded by large corporations who also hate your rights)

Fact is Libertarians don't care what do you say what you want. Libertarians don't care if you suffer. Libertarians just don't care. The only time you'll see Libertarians actually up in arms to the point where they protests is if something happens that jurts corporations

Libertarians are perfectly fine with redefining what freedom of speech is in citizens united to claim that money is speech. But they won't accept that speech is speech.

And I try to conflate these things with ridiculous examples like a small local bar

And using extreme examples like threateningly attacking someone. Or bothering the patrons

the fact is it all traces back to the libertarian beliefs that you don't have rights. That We'll talk about you having rights when they try to abolish the government. When they're fighting the government. But that outside of their quest to eliminate the government and replace it with corporations that you just don't have rights. They don't believe in rights. They don't believe that the average citizen Should be allowed to do anything. They believe that the country and the world should be run by the rich.

that the more money you have the more power you have and if that's okay. They believe that the rules the laws and everything you do should be determined by the people with the most money

And they won't deny it. They out admit it  it.

P notice how you lost over all of that stuff. Libertarians hate the poor. But they actually do they admit that they hate the poor.

You don't care if people suffer. They care if the rich are slightly uncomfortable


and I'm not talking about stupid crap like healthcare any of those socialist nonsense. I'm talking about basic things like you're right. The ones in wnshrined  in the Constitution.

you will never see a Libertarian defend a poor person. You will never see a Libertarian take a citizen side over a corporation. It just won't happen.

that's because libertarianism was created by corporations. It got slightly big (mot that big) because of all the corporate money put into it

It runs 100% on corporate propaganda

but all of that distracts from my basic statement. Libertarians don't believe that you have any rights. They believe that maybe you might have some rights on government land. But they also believe that there should be no government land. So in essence Libertarians don't believe that you have any rights except when dealing with the government that they want to be as close to non-existent as possible. Meaning they want your rights to be as close to non-existent as possible

And it's no coincidence that that's exactly what greedy corporations want as well

so I'm back to talking to Republicans. You cannot let the extremists of the Libertarians run the party. Democrats made a mistake when they let their extremist from their party. When they catered their policy towards the Socialists. Republicans and conservatives cannot let the Libertarians dictate policy. Libertarians already destroyed their own party. You can't let them destroy the Republican Party party",ExpensiveMention,e9i54gc,conservative
"Yes, but just before that, they said ""banning freedom of speech"". In the Constitual sense, Facebook cannot ban freedom of speech, which seems to be what they are asserting. That's why I said said Constitual freedom of speech is a limit on the government, not private businesses. ",CamoAnimal,e9hymyn,conservative
"Yes. You want an example of libertarianism socialism and conservatism in practice? Look at Reddit.


 . The libertarian sub has literally no moderating policy whatsoever. They allow anything to be posted and they won't delete it. Because that follows libertarianism. As a result that turned into a shitshow. With more socialist posting than Libertarians. Turning into a such a crap hole that they had to flea and become refugees to r conservative

",ExpensiveMention,e9i5i8j,conservative
"The heck are you on about Libertarians for? When did I ever say ""Libertarian""?

You should seriously consider talking to a therapist about all this. It's obvious you've got an axe to grind and it ain't with me. ",CamoAnimal,e9i5xyn,conservative
"But he didn’t say “freedom of speech in he constitutional sense.” 

Freedom of speech is a concept. Constitutional Freedom of speech is that concept in action with restraints on government restrictions on it. 

It doesn’t require a government body for freedom of speech to be removed, it’s just that we have protections against that form of constraint on freedom of speech. ",FuckTimBeck,e9j75dn,conservative
"There seems to be a pretty broad definition going on here for ""freedom of speech"". Yes, I was scoping it to the Constitution because that  is generally what Americans are referring to when they use that phrase. Maybe OP has a more intrinsic concept if it. (Though, if that was the case, they did a poor job of clarifying it.)

Out of curiosity, what does ""freedom of speech"" mean to you personally? And, do you think it obligates blogs, messaging boards, and social media platforms to provide a voice to all users regardless of what they say? ",CamoAnimal,e9j9jo9,conservative
People seem very upset that Trump played hooky for the ceremony.  Any word on what happened?,Falkamper,e9in7f6,conservative
https://www.stripes.com/news/europe/trump-spends-veterans-day-in-france-honors-wwi-dead-1.556303 edit nice to see the vote brigade is here again.,Delta_25,e9i9gf3,conservative
read my post below,Delta_25,e9kg0ea,conservative
He was adviced not to go,pastagains,e9ip9sm,conservative
Secret Service said the helicopter couldn’t fly. Can’t really do a presidential motorcade on the fly from Paris. ,memberCP,e9iutnr,conservative
John Kelly made it,Falkamper,e9ixd6l,conservative
Macron's statement about Nationalism being a betrayal of patriotism is nonsensical. But globalists everywhere will nod their heads in agreement. ,triggernaut,e9ii2h8,conservative
"Macron is an idiot, like all progressives.  Progressives have more in common with Nazis than Conservatives ever could.",BrighamYoung,e9j56ab,conservative
"When America does well, the rest of the world does well. America first. ",mikeygio,e9iivn7,conservative
"Pretty much. At the most one could say nationalism is ""excessive"" patriotism, but it is definitely not the exact opposite of patriotism like Macron says.

Of course, according to the intelligentsia, if you believe in American exceptionalism, that's already ""excessive patriotism"" and thus nationalism. I guess by that standard, I am a nationalist, since I believe in American exceptionalism.
",asphaltcement123,e9inv6e,conservative
"Surprising how this has to be said, it ought to be common sense honestly. Put your country first.",asphaltcement123,e9inzkm,conservative
What is the top part referencing?,savais,e9hj3sp,conservative
"I'm guessing it's related to this - 

[https://www.dailywire.com/news/38206/florida-elections-supervisor-threatens-arrest-ashe-schow](https://www.dailywire.com/news/38206/florida-elections-supervisor-threatens-arrest-ashe-schow)",TMA2day,e9hm3fd,conservative
Thank you!!,savais,e9hmzj9,conservative
"Can’t read the whole article but I’m guessing it’s diving into more votes for Baker than Warren in the MA elections?

If so then apples to oranges. Northeastern states have a history of approving Republican governors whom this forum would label a RINO. In the case of Baker he is pro low taxes but also pro gay marriage and believes healthcare access is a basic right. Of course Baker will do well with progressives at the state level but stick him in a Republican national primary and watch him get slaughtered by the social conservatives. ",GoHuskies1984,e9hf5vu,conservative
Pro tip. Plug the article link into outline.com. Boom. ,Boon-Lord,e9hmier,conservative
How do you vote for Elizabeth Warren after the past few weeks? Blows my mind.,MyCustomUsername,e9i2wis,conservative
It doesn’t matter when one side can openly steal elections.,rjohnson99,e9i2pzz,conservative
"> social conservatives

Or just people who know what rights are and understand the proper role of government. ",YankeeBlues21,e9ii3ee,conservative
"God bless, I was using archive.is but it stopped working for WSJ.",DavidStHubbins11,e9hoisr,conservative
He doesn't mean small government he means the bible belt social conservatives. Im feeling you they seem insane to most people up here. ,Falkamper,e9isx9a,conservative
It’s not being insane.,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9j9dk6,conservative
"My local newspaper ran a segment about a Creation Museum down south, and some place out west doing Abstinance only education.  We've also had news segments about them teaching creationism in the classrooms.  Gay rights was also a big news issue in the cycle up here for a while until the Supreme Court case.  To the people in my community those issues sound nuts.",Falkamper,e9jacur,conservative
"Give it a week. 

By any means necessary, they will win a senate majority.",AddictedToGlue,e9k8v5p,conservative
"Forgive, sure. Forget and/or pardon, NEVER. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9kd2ti,conservative
"Forgive the intentional efforts to fundamentally change our nation? Homey dont play that.

He's the Manchurian (Islamic) candidate",lax714,e9k2300,conservative
Sure.,Ginger_Lord,e9hsmlj,conservative
"Oh, right. We forget many of you on the Left believe non-citizens should have the right to vote. So you dont consider it fraud, do you. ",Ledcookey,e9i2dr3,conservative
"Yes, that would be fraud.",Ginger_Lord,e9i37wf,conservative
Then...?,Ledcookey,e9i64pb,conservative
"I didn't believe it, but I just read the transcript.  Looks like the headline is correct.  I can imagine a few reasons that the lawyers might object, given that this was the first non-citizen ballot encountered, but I'm not going to put words in their mouths.  Even from a very cynical standpoint, they know what the talking points on the right are and should have let this one go.  Bad lawyer!",Ginger_Lord,e9i7ije,conservative
So ignore the facts as long as it gets you the answer you want? How very noble of you.,Mewster1818,e9jv25x,conservative
The truly WTF part is these guys are only 4 normal days worth of illegal immigrants.,SickofInternetProgs,e9igbtn,conservative
they are not refugees nor asylum seekers these are economic migrants ,Delta_25,e9i41bm,conservative
">
 “We want to work and send money to our families. I have four younger sisters and my parents back home.”


Yeah, tough shit, immigrate or fix your own god damn country. ",chugonthis,e9j3nws,conservative
They're invaders. They should be dealt with as such. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9i4ero,conservative
Politically that would play right into the liberals’ hands. They’d looooove for a soldier to be caught on film striking or shooting or tear gassing anyone in this caravan. ,JPSchmeckles,e9irom8,conservative
Anything short of giving them citizenship the media isn't going to approve. Fuck the media.,DogBirdLizard,e9jg0ek,conservative
Time to busy heads in law enforcement doesn't. Disturbing the peace is still a thing. I'm sure they didn't get a parade permit to terrorize a residential area. ,DozerM,e9ijrwq,conservative
Let it go to the Supreme Court so we can establish illegals have no voting rights ,ravenswin,e9hjerm,conservative
"What's there to argue about? If you're not a citizen, you have no right to vote.",MooMooCudChew,e9hbk8q,conservative
"November 11, not all votes in....this is insanity",BeachCruisin22,e9hbyfa,conservative
We are living in a madhouse.  Consider if the lying liberal media truthfully reported what is going on in Florida.  This trying to steal the election would have ended immediately and the law breakers would be in jail.  Now we have those at work to steal the election demanding illegal alien votes to be counted.  ,optionhome,e9h4ryu,conservative
"This was the plan, no? Get to the recount and then include ineligible votes. ",FuriousChef,e9h95c4,conservative
Why has no one been arrested why are we even talking about counting the votes wtf is going on !!,TxRandyMarsh,e9hbj61,conservative
They are such crooks. ,heartless_13,e9ih5cs,conservative
"> Let it go to the Supreme Court so we can establish illegals have no voting rights

What?  We might as well throw up our hands and all move out of the US if we have to ask a judge if an illegal alien can vote.",optionhome,e9hp0zs,conservative
"IMO any and all votes not accounted for by the end of election day simply shouldn't count.  If people want to bitch then they should bitch at their local and county officials for being incompetent.

Of course since that precludes leftist vote fraud it'll never happen.",anuser999,e9iggp9,conservative
they are filling in more ballots as we speak,Delta_25,e9i9l5y,conservative
"That’s why the Dems are pushing the “count every vote” phrase. Count every vote, including illegal, ineligible and completely fabricated votes.",FuriousChef,e9h985w,conservative
This is what I have wondered.,R-M-Renfield,e9hhpl3,conservative
"If the leftists take over, this will be a thorn in their side.",ravenswin,e9i4ao8,conservative
Not illegal...just undocumented. We just need to document them and everything should be fine.,xxx_asdf,e9hksef,conservative
Acosta is banned from the grounds. CNN can just appoint a diff reporter. They arent being silenced. Neither is Acosta. Hes been deemed a security risk. Fair or not. Acosta doesnt have a right to a job or to the WH grounds,KaiserGrant,e9icgqx,conservative
"Let's be clear. The First Amendment protects the right of the press to publish. It does not guarantee them access, it does not guarantee them respect, and it does not allow them to slander. 

The press in this country should be ashamed of themselves.",bartoksic,e9i8u0t,conservative
More tax payer money wasted on fradulant law suit.  I hope the Jude pnelizes and fines them for this,slappypappyj,e9ie5j9,conservative
"Constitution doesn’t guarantee Jim Acosta access to that room.  If he has grounds to sue then so do I. 

CNN doesn’t even get guaranteed access. ",JPSchmeckles,e9iuw4q,conservative
"They’ll definitely lose it. 

They didn’t suspend CNN’s, they suspended Acosta. There are multiple other credentialed CNN reporters not suspended. 

It is his abusive behavior. ",tm1087,e9i42vr,conservative
*Bad orange man was mean*,Dank_Cartographer,e9i204p,conservative
I will laugh if Trump responds by cutting all of CNNs access.  It would serve them right.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9iegny,conservative
"And some DC judge will say ow ya the first amendment guarantees CNN access to the white house and the right to be obnoxious at every fucking press event.  

This should be dismissed shortly after filing.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9iro5d,conservative
#crazy orange man hurt feelings ,TheOnlyCDB,e9ifnst,conservative
They could just send a less obnoxious employee to the pressers...,pimpinassorlando,e9j1eha,conservative
"Bring it, motherfuckers!
It will be the final nail in your coffin...",Bubbacat7,e9iyycy,conservative
Watch the lawsuit get sent up to the Supreme Court and struck down,MyCustomUsername,e9jf0n9,conservative
"Also, you know. The press corps doesn't include any one who wants in. There are already millions of outlets without an employee present. ",AddictedToGlue,e9jrghy,conservative
We live in post-shame America for a reason.,SpecialistParticular,e9j0jey,conservative
"Would it be grounds for a lawsuit if they suspended CNN altogether?

I just don't see a 1st Amendment issue in *any* of this, but I'm sure there are nuances or precedent I'm missing.

I find it ironic that Acosta was free to trash the administration *that very night* on national television without consequences, but having a privilege revoked is now the end of the Republic. ",LonelyMachines,e9ii5f0,conservative
Exactly this. CNN still has the same access they had before; they just can't send Acosta specifically anymore. Pick anybody else and it's fine.,ZarahCobalt,e9izk4k,conservative
CNN really isn’t even entitled to be in the White House anyway.,MyCustomUsername,e9jezkr,conservative
"It’d be a much better argument. They are preventing the entire network from access is a better argument. But, it is still terrible. 

I don’t think there is any law that requires the WH to allow a certain number from CNN. 

The problem is not his opinion. I mean they allow The Atlantic and Slate and have absolutely no problems with them and they’ve never been abusive. The problem is the disruption and abuse by Acosta. 

I think they should go back to a longer session, but no cameras. It allows thoughtful opposition and challenging questions (which there is no problem with) without the grandstanding of Acosta. ",tm1087,e9iiscv,conservative
"> But, it is still terrible.

It is unbelievably terrible.  They are only doing this for optics.  Since they won't report the truth, they'll steer their dumb viewers into believing that Trump is flagrantly breaking the 1st Amendment, and after they lose the case, they'll spin it even more that Trump controls the courts now.",Telineye,e9isf37,conservative
"This just reads like the author is just trying to sell his book.  I agree that many ""green"" agendas are scams based on fear mongering directed at a non-technical audience.  But there is a balance to be had between solar/wind power generation and our conventional power fossil and nuclear (yes please) generation methods.

>Ironically, electric utility companies love wind and solar green energy. They know perfectly well that wind and solar are useless because wind and solar generate electricity erratically and have to be backed up by reliable conventional electric generating plants.

Under the assumption storage options don't exist, or power isn't generated at peak demand, or that certain locations are not subject to black/brownouts.  Yes LIBs are terrible environmentally but tech on saltwater batteries is promising and electrical storage is not the only means of storing power.  I'd rather have my solar pump draw water during the day when it can produce 12V to a cistern which is then gravity fed to several buildings as needed, than running a transmission line out to the well and protecting it from animals.  

>Wind and solar are truly useless, like having a 6th toe or an appendix.

That's some pretty extreme rhetoric, something I'd expect to come out of a lefty if their opinions were reversed.  



",highlanderiic,e9k2679,conservative
"There are no reliable storage for vast quantities of power available. Even if there was, it would take a hit on cost and efficiency. As in the cost would become unsustainable and the loss of energy in the storage process and back out again would leave even less available for use (increasing cost even more per kilo watt even more).

Yes it will be nice when new technologies come about. Until then green technologies are indeed a scam.  One backed by governments across the globe like the suckers in California.",ultimis,e9k370y,conservative
Facebook is guilty of election tampering.,willplex,e9i9j72,conservative
WSJ is guilty of bias against those who don’t want a subscription.,SaltineAmerican_1970,e9ia5ly,conservative
"Remember Citizens...  the Russian buying @100K in Face Books ads was deemed to be election meddling?    

So, what does the blatant political slant of all of the major social media companies add up to?

I am going to say, a conspiracy of mass political propaganda on a scale never before known. 
",ozric101,e9iggg3,conservative
"Political and corporate power aligning stinks of fascism.  

B-b-b-b-but fascists can't be leftists?  Puh-leeze.  Look at China, they're not ideological communists any longer, they're actually ideologically fascist now.  The Nazis themselves were leftists in many, many aspects.",BrighamYoung,e9j5deh,conservative
"WSJ, tear down that wall!",GAnonAnonG,e9ic1nm,conservative
"> So, what does the blatant political slant of all of the major social media companies add up to?

Allowing felons, non-citizens, and those who cross the border without stopping at a legal border checkpoint to vote, unless they're Russian. Obviously, the Dems are holding a grudge against the Russians for dropping that whole failed Communism experiment.",SaltineAmerican_1970,e9ii901,conservative
This may be the stupidest thing I've ever seen someone write.,SandmanMS,e9jaepl,conservative
"Seriously, is this what we stand for? 

I'm all for firing Snipes and investigating for any fraud, but you can't just not count hundreds of thousands of votes. You're punishing the voters for the mistakes of these officials. How would you feel if Democrats pushed to disenchant a red county because it had incompetent officials? 

This is the kind of nonsense that makes us seem like the party that doesn't want fair elections. We want all legitimate votes to be counted, while also ensuring that non-citizens can't vote and people can't vote multiple times.",oren0,e9ilsor,conservative
100% agree... ,ozric101,e9i248l,conservative
No it's not. We don't throw out votes.,pimpinassorlando,e9j192g,conservative
Voters installed that trainwreck and reelected her four times. They share culpability. At this point the entire ballot pool is tainted and mixed with fraudulent ballots that can't be separated. ,ngoni,e9ivh1f,conservative
So we strip the voting rights because of a corrupt woman? How about not allowing any of the retirement communities that dominate the localities down there to vote either while we are at it? They're at least as damaging as this woman.,Falkamper,e9iw3mm,conservative
"So we dilute the voting rights of every single other county in Florida because of a corrupt woman? Mixing in invalid ballots with valid ballots as Snipes has already admitted to doing makes every other vote in Florida worth less, which is simply another type of disenfranchisement.",hello_japan,e9izer2,conservative
"Im sorry, I don't mean to snap, I have some very serious issues with large 55 plus retirement communities and their establishment/affect on the local communities they inflict themselves on when the communities get as large as they do in Florida.  You're right of course, this woman should never have been voted back in place...can they revote?",Falkamper,e9j100q,conservative
"It’s all good, it’s a touchy situation. I don’t know if it’s possible but maybe a revote would be the best option.",hello_japan,e9j166n,conservative
"At this point it seems the best option. Line up again and vote, have federal officials there and do it all in the level.   

My concern with the retirement communities is that they affect the region in negative ways, and I don't like the idea that you have to be 55 to live in an area,  feels like it's a broken community, I've seen the voting results, and I feel as though they disenfranchise the locals disproportionately in terms of voting for local needs because they have their own villages, and with essentially all retirees with no children I don't think it's fair to the remainder.   I have family in them and it's so disturbing to visit, and I can't believe they're allowed to have communities with age restrictions.",Falkamper,e9j6nx0,conservative
"So sad.  A way of life where your religion is the politics of the false leftist ideology.  You can never be happy, you can never be content.  Your whole life centers around outrage of issues that you don't even understand.  Parrots of the slogans of their leftist leaders.  In a way it reminds me of the Catholic Mass from decades ago.  The Mass ceremony was entirely in Latin.  None of the worshippers spoke Latin.  But as part of the ritual they would in unison speak the Latin responses to those of the priest.  ",optionhome,e9h4mwr,conservative
"Yes liberals, your crap was all solved in the 60s, and yet here you are....

I call it Protest Nostalgia.

But what else would you expect from the NPC.  Creativity?",paulbrook,e9heba0,conservative
"> Democrats recaptured control of the House of Representatives this week, and leftists are already grinding their teeth over Trump and salivating at the prospect of putting him and Justice Brett Kavanaugh through investigatory and impeachment hell for the next two years.

What makes anyone think that the Democrats will confine themselves to impeaching Trump and Kavanaugh? Once they are reminded that they have the media with them, they'll go on a spree and begin trying to impeach everyone they can.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9hdfge,conservative
[removed],,e9h5xt4,conservative
"Higher ed, youth focused media are all completely controlled by leftists who believe the ONLY outcome worth achieving is eradication of the right.  Is there any surprise they have programmed people to think this?",booblitchutz,e9hirkl,conservative
Paranoid?  Please explain @buttfuckyourmum,GlenGanges,e9h8kal,conservative
[removed],,e9h8rw9,conservative
You spend too much time on the internet.,hello_japan,e9hat6h,conservative
"I may have misread your username.  Nonetheless, what is true is there is a DeepState.  It is embodied buy the massive bureaucracy and unelectable officials who basically do as they please.  It is corrupt.  The caravan represents all the politicians, Democrats mostly, who are violating their oaths to uphold our laws.  Their first and only responsibilities are to USA and it’s legal citizens.  Doris is a problem in a number of ways.  First he does have a history of manipulating currency, with the intention to destabilize while making huge profits.  Democrats should especially treat this guy like the POS he is.  Except Soros provides the dark money that helps fund many of the politicians and groups (like Antifa), who lean anti-USA and Marxist.
This is not tin hat stuff.  It’s there in the open.  Do good people care?",GlenGanges,e9he932,conservative
"I have no idea why people vote democrat.  
I want lower taxes, a strong economy and secure borders. The democrats want to do the opposite of all three. 

",GoldenShadowGS,e9har2r,conservative
"It's the siren song of free shit, paid for by someone else.",mlmack,e9hc94o,conservative
"The democrats do not care about a strong economy or lower taxes because they want everyone to be the same. They would rather have everyone live just above the poverty line no matter how hard you work than to have people that make better decisions, have better ideas, and work harder and longer have more than those who don’t. They try to demonize good, responsible decisions and hard work so that they can get everyone mad at the wealthy. They want to take from successful people, give to unsuccessful people and call it equality. 

They don’t want strong borders because they need more people to come into the country that they can promise “free” stuff to to buy their vote. They rely on them voting for the same policies they left in their home country, you know, because apparently they work so well. ",Ravens1112003,e9hdqvg,conservative
"I get the idea that democrats are buying votes from the lower class with welfare policies. But that doesn't explain all the Beto signs I've seen in the middle of upper and middle class neighborhoods in Austin, Texas. How do they benefit from voting democrat?",GoldenShadowGS,e9i5fc8,conservative
It makes them feel virtuous. Moral superiority is a hell of a drug. ,jd_porter,e9igo41,conservative
satire because the actual risk is much higher,Shazepe,e9gf6p1,conservative
My favorite was the man who agreed to testify against the Clintons and then committed suicide; he shot himself 5 times (one of the worst cases of suicide on record).,StephenScherer1,e9gh342,conservative
"Partial list: https://lasvegas.cbslocal.com/2016/08/10/the-list-of-clinton-associates-whove-died-mysteriously-check-it-out/

Yes, I know some might be legit deaths, but come on.... do you know anybody who has 50 or 60 close work Associates and /or acquaintances dead?",d_42,e9gxe0r,conservative
BB reporting facts ,Dank_Cartographer,e9g5szh,conservative
Everyone talking shit but no sources for r/all,HSBen,e9gsz0r,conservative
I wonder what the actual percentage of people who “commit suicide” that are connected to the Clintons is.,War-Damn-America,e9giv4y,conservative
Is it really satire though?,CreativeRoutine,e9gfwbf,conservative
I wonder what the suicide percentage rate is for the people who have seen Hillary naked.,989x4000,e9gfxiv,conservative
"I honestly wonder if the number 843 has any hidden significance, and yes I know it's satire...",wolf2787,e9h2hos,conservative
Babylon Bee really does have some great satire,DocMilk,e9gjhsm,conservative
Can we stop with the Babylon Bee?,tohollywoodandback,e9gnc5p,conservative
"Funny how it's always suicides, eh? Hahaha...ha..ha...",mrhammsack,e9ghqrz,conservative
"I wouldn't call this satire at all though.

Much more the reality.",Azul19,e9gms22,conservative
Right... “suicide”.  More like forced suicide. ,Huntsmen7,e9hav4f,conservative
"I'm glad that conservative media has a publication like The Bee - pretty high quality comedy, which is something the right usually struggles with.",audiodiscovideo,e9gu5dk,conservative
“Suicide”,bobbbsanders,e9h24wm,conservative
They don’t call her Grandma Death for nothing. ,Mikie_D,e9gune1,conservative
"Correction: People with dirt on Clintons have 843% greater risk of BEING MURDERED.. The long list of
victims of the Clinton Machine ONLY appear to be suicides by those people with ZERO BRAINS.... The
rest of us see these as MURDERS....
",LVDave,e9g77kr,conservative
And I commend t_d for putting the national suicide prevention link on their side bar. It's hard to be a conservative and want to have dirt when there is nothing to work with.,BradburyMan,e9gvu5v,conservative
"LOL, nice one fam :D",Azul19,e9gmopr,conservative
I see /r/conservative is continuing the trend and becoming /r/conspiracy. Enjoy the downward spiral. ,afellabear,e9h0n3h,conservative
Really makes you think about the grief a man must be holding to shoot himself in the back of the head five times.,richardguy,e9gnr10,conservative
Which one was the guy that got shot in a robbery gone wrong where he wasn't robbed?,LaLongueCarabine,e9hgf7g,conservative
Didn’t that happen in south park?,H0MICIDAL_Camel,e9gxupo,conservative
Which one was this?,lead_oxide2,e9gpxqb,conservative
"If the number of people close to you that have died unexpectedly (but let's be honest it's more of a miracle to not be killed off) is over 10 you're either extremely unlucky, have a lot of elderly friends or you're a Clinton",Straight_Ace,e9h7oen,conservative
https://lasvegas.cbslocal.com/2016/08/10/the-list-of-clinton-associates-whove-died-mysteriously-check-it-out/,d_42,e9gxejj,conservative
"It's not just suicide, you need to count weird or unusual deaths: https://lasvegas.cbslocal.com/2016/08/10/the-list-of-clinton-associates-whove-died-mysteriously-check-it-out/",d_42,e9gxhn2,conservative
"100%, but it’s nothing nefarious, they would just rather spend an eternity in hell than another minute with Hillary.",Penguin_Party12345,e9gmk09,conservative
"They don’t commit suicide, their brain just rots. Look at Bill.",Hello_34,e9gi3ou,conservative
I don't think that is suicide though. That's just a shock that leads to multiple organ failure!,PickleTruck,e9gnezj,conservative
"/r/nosleep

Probably the same way people react when they see me naked. Start screaming, ripping their own eyes out. Sorry about that Sarah. :-/",HissingGoose,e9gl6mh,conservative
"8+4=12

12-3=9

9 inverted is 6

6 is the devils number
 
Case closed.",CallMeCoolBreeze,e9h3z0d,conservative
Why?,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9hgg51,conservative
No sometimes they get robbed and shot in the back repeatedly. Always wondered why the burglar didn't take all the valuables on the body though...,1BruteSquad1,e9gmnpv,conservative
It's called sarcasm. ,2nd2last,e9g9a0a,conservative
WHOOOSH.,Ranlier,e9g9ler,conservative
Check out the site because you got stung. ,skarface6,e9gf9q7,conservative
Hey partner delete this before you become front page r/atetheonion,DickAppointment,e9gid4a,conservative
r/whooosh,Hero_matt,e9gu6em,conservative
"Man, living without a sense of humor must be no fun.",varemia,e9h2lw8,conservative
"Do you drive by your ex's house and yell out ""I see you're still a bitch!"" from the car window?",DanReach,e9hfu0p,conservative
Their asbestos addled brains can no longer tell the difference. ,RoverRebellion,e9h9244,conservative
While shaving in the morning.,nelsonbt,e9gny4s,conservative
"Yeah, and what a lousy shot the guy is.",StephenScherer1,e9gs05b,conservative
That looked suspicious to me too.,StephenScherer1,e9hh6tb,conservative
"Unfortunately, it happened in real life. There was also another man who was a very poor shot; he shot himself 3 times (another very bad suicide).",StephenScherer1,e9gyo05,conservative
"It's on YouTube a documentary on the Clintons. There were over a dozen people who agreed to testify against the Clintons; ALL of them committed suicide before they could testify. There was also one man who shot himself 3 times. (He was probably just a lousy shot.)

""THE CLINTON CHRONICLES BODYCOUNT""
YouTube
Jeremiah Films
2 years ago",StephenScherer1,e9grhnc,conservative
"Except Hillary is the Devils sister, so they only can escape her for a time. ",RKfan,e9gteei,conservative
Bill looks like the guy on Indiana Jones that drank from the wrong cup.,989x4000,e9gie5l,conservative
"A couple of points here:

1. Not sure Bill has ever seen Hillary naked.
2. I think Bill is rotting alive from many forms of venereal  disease.",PickleTruck,e9gnir7,conservative
"""Help! My liver and kidney both stopped at the same time just now!""",989x4000,e9gpagf,conservative
I need proof ;-),989x4000,e9glac6,conservative
Divide by 2 (for number of Trump's terms) and you have 3. Half life 3 confirmed.,NotaInfiltrator,e9hel5q,conservative
"Seems like you've had too much to think, have some soylent and a free blacked.com subscription... yess yes, guns are bad, orange man is bad... ",mrhammsack,e9gmtli,conservative
Murder by death,BadJuJu2,e9gi2eb,conservative
It’s called “satire” ,Kreetle,e9glew5,conservative
"""It was just a joke!""",afellabear,e9h2r4z,conservative
https://www.truthrevolt.org/videos/andrew-klavan-republicans-are-smarter-democrats-and-more-liberal-too,Delta_25,e9i16ty,conservative
"Oh, i think I phrased that really badly. I meant, wasn’t that a parody done on southpark because of this. ",H0MICIDAL_Camel,e9gypyu,conservative
[removed],,e9gry2k,conservative
Of course he’s seen her naked why else would he cheat on her?,Hello_34,e9gpl99,conservative
">	1. Not sure Bill has ever seen Hillary naked.

At least he’s got that going for him",Kanyetarian,e9gooo7,conservative
"Forget it, I'm sick of all those damn lawsuits. Perhaps the Russians could utilize my ""talents"" 🤔


/s (you never know)",HissingGoose,e9glqwj,conservative
"Dude, it's a satire site",SkilledInternetUser,e9ha2oj,conservative
"""Conservatives can't make jokes dont you know""
[A](https://i.imgur.com/hnAYpFD.jpg)",HarperGayle,e9h2xr8,conservative
Unfortunately NO.,StephenScherer1,e9gzao9,conservative
thanks for clearing that up,Lyoko_M3F3,e9gvbld,conservative
"Ok, that's priceless.",billyjoedupree,e9h5acw,conservative
Red Sparrow,989x4000,e9gltun,conservative
"Hmm ok, must be thinking of something else.",H0MICIDAL_Camel,e9hn83j,conservative
Do you recall what he said?,pick_3,e9hbyh4,conservative
You might want to view THE NEW CLINTON CHRONICLES on YouTube. There is alsoan older version THE CLINTON CHRONICLES Bodycount.,StephenScherer1,e9htlhx,conservative
https://imgur.com/a/nXzh3Jx,Lyoko_M3F3,e9hqw4a,conservative
Thank you! ,pick_3,e9hw7fu,conservative
"Oh snap, democrats won the house, we gotta pretend to care about this again?",Chxo,e9hswm5,conservative
...and no one cares...sadly.,XGuntank02X,e9hurbc,conservative
"If you’re old and retired you don’t give a shit. You’ll keep voting for your Medicare and social security with no cuts, because you don’t work and you won’t have to pay a dime for the rest of your life. 

But this number scares me. 

I’m either a) going to be paying increased taxes for the rest of my life, b) going to lose my job in the biggest economic depression the US has ever seen when we default on this debt. 

GOVERNMENT DEBT IS A TAX ON ALL FUTURE WORKING CITIZENS. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9hdwxr,conservative
"Taxes need to go up, spending needs to go down. It's pretty obvious what the solution is.",Astalano,e9hd2l7,conservative
"Can we just be honest and admit that neither Republican nor Democratic voters, in aggregate, care enough about balancing the budget to actually support cutting government spending for things that they like?

There is only a small portion of the Republican party, which seems to be the libertarian-leaning Republicans, who actually support cutting government in almost every direction. This includes leftwing-oriented spending like Medicare and Medicaid, and rightwing-oriented spending like farm subsidies and military. Sadly, the libertarian side of the Republican party is not big enough to get anything done by themselves.",NakedAndBehindYou,e9ihsj7,conservative
End the welfare state. End the endless pointless war. ,Bronc27,e9hg4uo,conservative
"For anyone who doesn't think this is a big deal, let me tell you why I think it is:

A large amount of this debt (almost 50%, I believe) is to foreign governments. Some of those governments (like China) are countries with which we aren't exactly allies. What happens when they start using that debt as leverage to make us do what they want? The US and China, for example, have been sparring over China's expansionist ambitions in the South China Sea. What if China one day said we have to let them do whatever they want in the South China Sea, without repercussions, or they'll stop buying US debt? Just one example, but we can't afford to have ourselves so beholden to the whims of governments over which we have no control. Or what if a bunch of other UN countries that hold American debt say they won't lend us any more money unless we stop supporting Israel? 

The Bible says the debter is a slave to the lender. We need to be careful. ",soxfan90,e9hi6do,conservative
"$5.8 trillion of this is intragovernmental debt. In other words, a government agency had a surplus and used that money to buy a treasury bond. In essence, that debt only exists on paper; it is not the same as foreign debt.


As a percentage of GDP, our debt held by the public is 77% of GDP, which puts us 43rd highest total among the world's nations [source here](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/National_debt_of_the_United_States).


While not ideal, this is far from a ""crisis."" It seems like a big number, but just think about it this way. If you were to put $1,000 on a credit card when you were 14 and had almost no income, that would also seem like an insurmountable burden. Now that you're an adult with a job, $1,000 on a card seem like what - maybe a month to pay off?


Sure, US government debt is ""trillion with a T."" But our GDP is ""trillion with a T"" too.",Frashizzle,e9hi4lg,conservative
"Interesting, so if you confiscate all national assets you'll have enough money to fund Bernie's 30 trillion health plan for 5 years.",_Playgu,e9hba2q,conservative
"This used to make me crazy. 

But over time.... it just seemed like, well nobody cares. It’s impossoble to pay down now, it never even goes down a little. 

So why worry?",KhabibHeelTurn,e9hb1rz,conservative
What is your point?,ozric101,e9h32x7,conservative
looks like fiscal conservatism is back on the menu boys!,ItsReasonOrTreason,e9i1w02,conservative
I laughed out loud but then cried because it is true.,Nonsenseism,e9hxtn2,conservative
"Lol yea. 

Mark Sanford lost his primary, the most fiscal conservative congress person for not liking trump. 

Now we want to care about the debt? Come on. ",memberCP,e9iv07x,conservative
"The fact is to make deep spending cuts we'd need a super majority in the house.  Even then, due many people's dependence on welfare we'd need to spend a huge amount of political capital to get it done.  Possibly causing each branch to make a hard flip and pass more welfare bills.  This is the reason welfare is so hard to cut, a raging good economy and welfare reforms are our only hope in putting a dent in it.  Also, an aging population will cause massive deficits in the not to distant future.",PerceivedShift,e9i6o62,conservative
"Guys, calm down. Our debt to GDP ratio is about 1:1. That's a very normal amount for such a developed economy. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9hsq57,conservative
"Taxes need to go down, spending needs to go down by a lot more. ",ricolahh,e9hgox0,conservative
"I vehemently disagree.  No new taxes, fees or mandates until the fucking political class actually reduce spending!  And not the mamby pamby reductions in increases...actual reductions from year to year.",GlenGanges,e9hj2gf,conservative
Well that is 50% really stupid,Nonsenseism,e9hxys2,conservative
"Two years and its barely incresed 2 trillion

By that pace trump will underspend Hussein",ExpensiveMention,e9hfu2o,conservative
Tax revenue rises when you lower taxes,WhoIsHarlequin,e9hspx9,conservative
Do you actually want to take away Social Security and basic health care for seniors who have spent their whole lives paying into the system?,UndecidedVoter2020,e9ht0eb,conservative
"China can't really use this debt as ""leverage,"" considering it has very set terms and interest rates. And our economies are too intertwined and mutually dependent for them to even want to do so. 

And if they were to stop buying our debt, someone else would, considering US bonds are literally riskless. It's the prime rate used to judge other investments. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9htbgd,conservative
"Boy your comment has so many inaccuracies. 

Most of US debt is held by public or federal agencies.

 Fro m the 14 billion dollars held by public 47 percent is held by Foreign governments and investors more exact 34% is held by other governments. China Japan Brazil Germany France UK

And debt also doesn't work like how you think it does. It's a type of investment that the treasury of United States its guaranteeing to pay you back 2 to 3% depending by the time date. It's similar buying that of Apple if Apple could print money and regulate its own economy

If i owe bank a dollar i have a problem with the bank. If i owe a billion dollar to the bank, the bank has problem with me.",nostra77,e9hu0oy,conservative
Brilliant!! ,Rightquercusalba,e9hbkyz,conservative
It doesn’t matter until it does.,foodVSfood,e9hbu83,conservative
Sounds like how most people view CC debt. At some point it just becomes the norm to pay X or Y plus interest each month.,GoHuskies1984,e9hh6z1,conservative
We don't have to pay it down to zero. That's not how debt works at the inter-governmental level. ,UndecidedVoter2020,e9hthjy,conservative
"The way to look at US goverment debt is to view the goverment as a business. As long as GDP continues to rise faster than debt, we can grow our way out of it.  Sure, we'll be paying it off forever, but that's what corporations do with debt and it works as long as growth continues.  Where we get into trouble is if we try to raise taxes too high which will hurt over all growth, or if we have such bad economic policies like Zero Percent interest rates during the Obama lost decade that economic growth is choked out.  ",StraightNewt,e9hsn69,conservative
"If everyone's in debt, no ones in debt. ",TheGreatPJDJ,e9hb8vb,conservative
"I worry. That's why I will never vote for a Democrat. When Republicans and Democrats fail to do anything about the debt, when everything comes crashing down I  would rather have a remaining foundation to rebuild from rather than isn't made of sand. That foundation is the constitution and a capitalist economic system. Whether it will reman depends in whether we stop the radical lefts march to power or not. It depends on whether we can secure our border and keep our military strong while defending what remains of our constitutional Republic and strengthening it in those areas that are politically feasible.",Rightquercusalba,e9hbyv5,conservative
Something needs to be done about it?,towhom_it_mayconcern,e9h5utr,conservative
"Let's just say I'll be pleasantly surprised if we get thru the next two years without a new front in the 3 trillion dollar ""war on terror"", or further expansion of the corporate and social welfare program our military has become.

 While i am hopeful for progress with Korea it feels like we are going backwards in the middle East with Iran, and our continued expansion of the Saudi sphere of influence in the middle East. 

I'm also fearful of the long-term prospects of a ""war on illegal immigration"" because while I think we need to enforce the laws on the book and deport undocumented people who are picked up for any misdemeanor. It seems like the corporate private prison complex is getting way too involved in this, as it is we now spend more a year detaining an immigrant, than we do for a prisoner in a super max prison! And while I think people should obey our immigration laws, I can tell you they don't need the same level of security or surveillance as the worst criminals our society creates.  But the public route isn't much better ee don't need an expansion of the department of homeland security theater, and all the government jobs that will create. Maybe if the rhetoric and political posturing wasn't so toxic we'd have more local police departments doing their job, and aiding in the deportation of criminal aliens.",Chxo,e9izl6q,conservative
"The only politically feasible way to actually balance the budget is to just set the government spending increases so that they are slower than inflation. The budget deficit could be inflated away, which is the least painful way of getting rid of it. But doing that would require decades of dedication from Congress, which is obviously too much to ask from politicians who only care about the next election cycle.",NakedAndBehindYou,e9ihy8t,conservative
"Universal healthcare will be enacted within 20 years looking at the rate we are going. I see no slow down in military spending, and more and more people are returning and living longer and longer lives due to new medical technology. 

I only see our debt going up from here. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9hvls1,conservative
"Never going to happen. No one would ever vote for it. Most Republicans and Independents would be against it. 

&#x200B;

It's boom years now. Taxes should go up. Spending should go down. In boom years, you save money. In recession years, you spend some of it on welfare as more people are unemployed until the economy stabilizes. 

&#x200B;

Boom cycles help the government pay down debt. That should be taken advantage of. You shouldn't increase taxes during a recession, when people are already struggling to adapt to changing circumstances.

&#x200B;

If Medicare and Medicaid are going to be voted out, then fine. You can have low taxes. But here's a challenge.

&#x200B;

Give me within the next 10 minutes a list of a sufficient number of House and Senate Republicans and Democrats who are going to vote to abolish medicare and medicaid. I'll be waiting.",Astalano,e9hhp55,conservative
"But you can't reduce the debt service, which is currently the largest spending post. After that you have the defense, which you *could* want to cut, assuming Trump's policies are effective, and then only come medicare and social programs, which are politically very hard to cut. 

A fiscal conservative *must* consider a temporary tax raise (specially in a booming economy) targeted at lowering the debt, and then only can both taxes and spending be lowered.",thbb,e9iegcr,conservative
"Reduce spending were?

The 3 biggest budget items are military. Social security. And welfare

We could cut the military. But ""conservatives"" dont like the idea of not invading

Cut social security? The program people have paid into? That old people rely on? Yea ok. 

Welfare? Food stamp use is already down. What would u do? Kick poor ppl out of govt housing onto the streets? Stop feeding ppl that cant afford food?

Even if u wanted ti be cruel u forget that those ppl vote",ExpensiveMention,e9iq0pn,conservative
"Congress sets the budget, not the President. This isn't a Trump vs. Obama thing. 

And even so, Obama's presidency took place in an atrocious economy, while Trump's has been in a bull economy. Now is the time to actually balance the budget, or at least try. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9hsw4z,conservative
Yeah but it’s still not good.,mdh431,e9hglfj,conservative
"No, it doesn't. Ask Kansas. The latest in a long line of places who have made this mistake. We can lower taxes, but you'll have to reduce govt services. SS, Medicare, medicaid, and military spending will have to be cut. Nothing else will fix this. You can disagree, but that would be your personal politics, not reality. ",R101C,e9huajr,conservative
"This is incorrect. The Laffeur curve is different for every economy. The EU has higher taxes and it is not at the threshold where are avoiding taxes in most of Europe. There is a point where people do avoid paying taxes, but the US economy isn't there yet. People avoid paying taxes when you go over the 50% level for income taxes. If you see 35%-45% income tax on normal people and tons of other taxes go up as well, then you will start to see people avoiding taxes like crazy. 

&#x200B;

The Laffeur curve is exponential. But if you are at the point where taxes aren't being avoided that much, then lowering taxes won't actually generate all that much more revenue.

&#x200B;

Okay, supply side economics, or Reaganomics. Taxes are not direct a stimulus of supply. They are typically a demand-side policy. They stimulate demand. More money because of tax cuts. You buy more stuff. Then supply catches up. 

&#x200B;

If taxes are chronically high, then yes, a big tax cut might cause a cascade effect, but it depends on the start point and the nature of the tax cut. 

&#x200B;

Reaganomics came at a point where tax rates where very high (even though there were loopholes).

&#x200B;

> In 1981, **Reagan** significantly reduced the maximum **tax rate**, which affected the highest income earners, and lowered the top marginal **tax rate** from 70% to 50%; in 1986 he further reduced the **rate** to 28% 

&#x200B;

[https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reaganomics](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Reaganomics)

&#x200B;

Lowering the tax rate from 70% to 28% is huge. Lowering it from 35% to 30% is not a big deal in comparison to that, for example.

&#x200B;

At lower tax rates like that, there are more cost-effective ways of affecting supply, if you aim is government policy influencing supply. That would be things like education, infrastructure, reducing tariffs, deregulation, etc. Those are way more important than tax rates with regards to supply, because they affect supply directly.

&#x200B;

E.g. Person A has 150 dollars. He can buy 100 bars of chocolate. He gets a tax cut. He has 180 dollars. He can buy 120 bars of chocolate. That doesn't mean the factory will immediately increase the number of chocolate bars they produce. Maybe person A can buy 120 bars but decides that he is happy with just 100 and wants to spend the other 30 dollars on something else. So not all industries will necessarily increase supply very drastically. The number of people buying McDonalds might be a constant and maybe even with a tax cut, people aren't going to buy all that much more from McDonalds. Next scenario is that the chocolate bar factory might just increase the price. So person A will spend 160 dollars for 100 bars. 

&#x200B;

Here's a more supply oriented policy and its direct effect.

&#x200B;

Highway A has 6 lanes. Lots of traffic, lots of delays, limits on number of goods that can be transported every day. Highway A gets an additional two lanes because of infrastructure spending. Highway A can now handle a higher number of goods. Increased supply in that area.

&#x200B;

Company A needs 150 architects. Area A produces 100 architects. Not enough homes can be built to keep up with supply. Area A gets their school upgraded with better teachers, improved teaching methods, better technology. Area A in a few years produces 130 architects. More homes can be built. Increased supply of labour. 

&#x200B;

Firm B wants to extract oil from Area B. Area B is protected land. Area B is deregulated. Firm B starts extracting oil. Supply of oil increases.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",Astalano,e9hvewn,conservative
Phase it out as best we can but yes. I do. ,Bronc27,e9ib6w1,conservative
We are on a collision course with math. We built a government run pyramid scheme and somebody has to lose eventually. Delaying it only makes it hit harder. ,Ryanami,e9i4ydb,conservative
Convert what they paid into private retirement accounts plus interest or market growth (what ever ). Everyone else build your 401k's. Stock market will go berzerk. Maybe make it mandatory to pay 15% into 401k's and simply make it impossible to withdraw from it until retirement.,geekwithout,e9hvui1,conservative
"The debt isn't a huge problem yet, it just has the potential to become one.

Right now the US has a fairly normal debt to GDP ratio, but it's rising. If it crosses into dangerous territory, we will struggle to service it and investors will start to see our debt as less and less risk free. Other countries' sovereign debt will begin to supplant ours as the risk free rate.

Obviously this would only exacerbate our fiscal issues as we'd have to borrow at higher rates and things would spiral.

Not helping things is that politicians get a lot of short term benefits for say, cutting taxes. It juices the economy and voters love it. But when the bill comes due in 20 years, those same politicians aren't in office anymore. Mortgaging the future for the present is a big problem.",eclaircissement,e9kh6yn,conservative
"Except people go bankrupt all the time. People lose their houses all the time. And, people actually pay off their credit card all the time. We haven’t made a dent in the debt in 30 years. Hasn’t even been one year where it’s gone down",KhabibHeelTurn,e9hiwvw,conservative
"I know that. 

But we aren’t paying it down at all. Not one bit. And there doesn’t seem to be anything that can be done. Literally no one in federal congress seems to care about it. 

Now, am I saying they should just spend whatever they want, no I’m not. I think yearly deficits should be kept to a minimum. But worrying about the overall debt just doesn’t seem to be worth it.",KhabibHeelTurn,e9ie5a8,conservative
We haven't had a Republican president that balanced the budget in half a century. The only time we ever ran a surplus in recent history was in the Clinton administration.,UndecidedVoter2020,e9htg4j,conservative
Call Paul Ryan!,alext0t,e9hmrol,conservative
Why?,accountingqqq,e9haciw,conservative
[removed],,e9hvuxu,conservative
Exactly. Govt spending should cycle opposite the economy as a way to take peaks and valleys off of booms and busts. Steady growth is better over time than cycles of intense up and/or down. The deficit spending happening now (and growing) is going to hurt much worse next recession. We are on a sugar high that we can't afford. ,R101C,e9hughg,conservative
Sound like a Dem,GlenGanges,e9irk02,conservative
"Obama inherited an economy on an upswing



Even tho obamas policies made it the worst recovery in history

Its very easy to claim credit in those situations.

Its much harder to have a good economy that rises AFTER it recovered

Obama had a net loss of 112k manufacturing jobs

Trump had a net gain of 114k

And hes only 2 years in.

",ExpensiveMention,e9i862k,conservative
What would you do with the tens of millions of newly destitute people unable to work?,UndecidedVoter2020,e9ibmfy,conservative
"The debt to GDP ratio is in no way out of place compared to other developed country. You can have $21 trillion in debt if you also have a comparably high GDP. 

Further, there's better ways to make inroads against the debt besides throwing tens of millions of elderly Americans into poverty. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9i5l4f,conservative
"> Maybe make it mandatory to pay 15% into 401k's and simply make it impossible to withdraw from it until retirement.

That sounds like way too much overhead and just social security by a different name, and people will still think it's unfair for whatever reason. Just get rid of it all. If you don't want to work towards contributing to your retirement, 401(k) or otherwise, that's entirely on you. You live with the consequences of the choices you make.",gizayabasu,e9jhf45,conservative
"We don't need to pay it down as long as our economy is as large as it is. The US Government can borrow money essentially for free. If we can use that money to see returns at greater than the prime rate, it makes financial sense to borrow money to pay for current expenses due to the time value of money/interest rate arbitrage. 

I would like to see us have a more balanced budget, though. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9iez5b,conservative
That's because Clinton had to compromise with Republicans. ,Rightquercusalba,e9inai8,conservative
...debt?,towhom_it_mayconcern,e9hb6ho,conservative
">the sooner we have universal healthcare, the sooner we can get healthcare costs to be reasonable

Yeah, sure. ""Reasonable"" healthcare costs. All it's gonna cost you is $80.00 cheap jeans, $150.00 discount shoes, $25,000 for a starter ""economy"" car, 30% less in every paycheck, and waiting on a list for years for that major surgery.

THAT'S what universal healthcare costs. I've been to Sweden and seen the $80 jeans and every piece of clothing being twice as expensive as here. I have friends in the UK who are on waiting lists to get treatment. 

What on earth would make you think that by giving OUR government complete and utter control over your healthcare would result in anything being reasonable?? 

You want reasonable costs? Get the federal government OUT of healthcare. Eliminate the copycat state and federal bureaucracies that regulate interstate insurance and healthcare, and let the states decide for themselves. Let doctors treat patients directly without having to hire 8 people to do the paperwork. Make Medicare and Medicaid fraud and abuse a capital offense with extremely severe consequences. 

The GOP should have repealed the ACA, but since thy didn't we'll have to wait awhile for any of these things to come to fruition. ",TearsForPeers,e9hxxse,conservative
But I thought we passed ACA...,ReaganTroll,e9hvzmu,conservative
[deleted],,e9hw4ap,conservative
">Good, the sooner we have universal healthcare, the sooner we can get healthcare costs to be reasonable. 

And I see literally no way that it won't just become another pot of free shit that the top 15% of earners have to pay for. 

No thanks, fuck universal healthcare.",soylent_absinthe,e9j26g1,conservative
"It's not going to hurt at all. You can just borrow money as Obama did to pay for it. But then you have to pay off the debt later on. 

&#x200B;

It will hurt when something drastic happens which means that people start demanding debt repayments all at once. Then the US ceases to exist as a country because it will no longer be able to function and will become a slave state like Greece.

&#x200B;

Things can change very fast in world history. Don't bet on things being stable forever.",Astalano,e9hvugu,conservative
"For stating facts?

The representatives arent kings. They REPRESENT the people

The people want welfare. 

U want to igmore the will of the people

But the ppl vote",ExpensiveMention,e9ivjwv,conservative
"The economy was not on the ""upswing"" heading into January 2009 lol. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9i8msm,conservative
"Not OP but in my mind, we would pick a cut off and go from there. E.g. anyone under 40 today will not be eligible for SS until they're 80 instead of 65 amd benefits will be less. That way the old people now have it still and young people know WAY ahead of time that they'll have to save more.",doobsftw,e9ifutp,conservative
Destitute people in ages past used to rely on their families and local communities.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9ii9hj,conservative
"Except we don’t just have 21 trillion in debt. We have over 100 trillion in unfunded liabilities for the next 75 years. That’s what we have promised that we’ll pay out in Medicaid and SS to the people like me who have only recently come into the job market. Nobody likes to talk about that. Look at states like Illinois. One of the major things that’s bankrupting them is their pension problem. They promised way too much, couldn’t deliver, and now they’re broke and have a near junk bond rating.",Pyronot,e9iw4xr,conservative
Exactly. So I refuse to get worked up about this absurd number. No one even seems to care. ,KhabibHeelTurn,e9ifr9p,conservative
Republicans are in power now so we don’t worry about debt now. ,foodVSfood,e9hbvmd,conservative
What about it? Articulate your stance.,accountingqqq,e9hbolz,conservative
"That's ridiculous, consumer prices in other sectors wouldn't be impacted significantly by single payer healthcare. Income taxes would not go up 30% either, that's all wild exaggeration.

And citizens in other countries don't wait excessive amounts of time for major surgeries, at least not more than Americans already do. If you have a dire medical need, they will schedule you accounting for that. 

The fundamental issue is that Americans pay insane prices for worse results. It's not fiscally responsible to continue such an arrangement. 

",UndecidedVoter2020,e9hytrt,conservative
And more Americans are covered than ever. ,UndecidedVoter2020,e9hwdrq,conservative
"[10% of the UK population has private insurance, down from a peak of 14% in 2008.](https://www.google.com/amp/s/amp.theguardian.com/business/2017/jan/16/private-medical-insurance-sales-surge-health-nhs) Nowhere close to half. 

And the US does has the best medical training in the world, I'm not advocating for changes to medical school. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9hwmzd,conservative
"You do realize that not just the top 15% of earners pay healthcare costs at the moment, right? Most Americans, including the bottom 85%, already pay exorbitant healthcare costs and get inferior coverage compared to other wealthy countries. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9j2o1h,conservative
"Huge difference between borrowing during a recession and borrowing during a time of sustained growth. Obama's 2nd term, borrowing dropped dramatically. It's now back to where it was during his first term, which is insanity. ",R101C,e9ijfwj,conservative
"You sound like a Democrat because to them -NO PROGRAM CAN BE CUT.  Your straw man of people want welfare is crap.  Greedy shits that don’t want to work don’t want welfare, they want a free ride so they can discover their “passion” on the backs of others hard work.  Find your passion on the weekend at your own expense.
Yes the people vote.  Many of them need to grow the fuck up too.",GlenGanges,e9ixdcl,conservative
Why’s that? Seems extremely short sighted. ,DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hc30b,conservative
"Don't take my word for it, [it's the truth.](https://taxfoundation.org/how-scandinavian-countries-pay-their-government-spending/) 

And if you don't believe that, go see for yourself. Get on a plane and go spend some time in a socialized democracy like Norway or Sweden and see how much it costs.  Can you say VAT?

They're taxed a huge amount for those free universities and nationalized health services.  ",TearsForPeers,e9i6q6y,conservative
ACA was a sellout to the Insurance Agencies... nothing more. ,ozric101,e9i2vsx,conservative
"And premiums skyrocketed after the ACA because healthy people had to subsidize people with pre-existing conditions.  ""Insurance"" isn't supposed to cover people who *already* have issues.",soracrowe,e9if2ej,conservative
There are also more Americans than ever...,ReaganTroll,e9hwuw0,conservative
"""Covered"" yeah except they pay almost nothing",PLEASE_SEND_NUDES69,e9ii3b3,conservative
I got the country wrong. Srry,Hipster_Dragon,e9hwtih,conservative
">You do realize that not just the top 15% of earners pay healthcare costs at the moment, right? 

Of course, in the current system - I'm saying in a universal option, there's no way the people at the top who are already functionally paying for all the other services in this country won't see their costs go up because MUH FAIR SHARE.",soylent_absinthe,e9j4k86,conservative
"And u sound like an idiot because to you ""cut dah programz!""

You dont know the first thing about the programs or what can cant or should be cut

You just listen to Libertarian propoganda 

The fact is these programs havent been cut because its not simple or easy and many people rely on them

but politicians know youre oo stupid to understand that so they tell you what you want to hear so that you'll vote for them and then they manage the country the right way",ExpensiveMention,e9jy4c2,conservative
"I agree and really made that comment in jest. After all, weren't the republicans trying to avoid raising the debt ceiling only 4-6 years ago? I replied somewhere else in this thread that the debt doesnt matter until it does. I think eventually we will pay a price for it. There will be some tipping point that causes the debt the matter very suddenly.The US has been in a period of economic expansion for nearly 10 years now (accelerated the past 2) while the US and US consumer has added records amount of new debt. Its not healthy and will eventually become unsustainable. ",foodVSfood,e9hcyai,conservative
"Those taxes pay for aggregate government spending. I'm not advocating that we increase our spending on social programs to the level of Scandinavian countries. 

[There's no way around the fact that we currently spend drastically more per capita than any other wealthy country, whether that money comes from taxes or private expenditures.](https://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/commons/thumb/0/0b/OECD_health_expenditure_per_capita_by_country.svg/600px-OECD_health_expenditure_per_capita_by_country.svg.png) 

The US experimented with a healthcare system that operates differently from the rest of the world. It has led to us paying more, for less. Other countries have solved the issue, and burying our heads in the sand and bankrupting our citizens is fiscally irresponsible and ignorant.",UndecidedVoter2020,e9i7uag,conservative
"Premiums have not ""skyrocketed,"" at least not anymore than the rate at which they were growing before the ACA. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9ilwse,conservative
"And a greater *proportion* of them are covered than ever. Excuse me, I didn't mean to give the impression I was only speaking in absolute terms. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9hwy2i,conservative
Single payer will reduce costs to a level where the burden on virtually all tax payers is lower. It really can't be understated just how radically much more the US pays for worse healthcare than any other comparably wealthy country. ,UndecidedVoter2020,e9j5xxk,conservative
"Well now don’t you sound like an Antifa weeny!
Look up base line budgeting you dip shit.  It’s an easy way for lazy politicians to automatically grow government, spending and the debt. ",GlenGanges,e9k8zl9,conservative
"Thanks for clearing that up haha. I agree, we are not setting ourselves up right now with the very healthy economy we have.",DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hd9ya,conservative
">Those taxes pay for aggregate government spending

ITS ALL AGGREGATE SPENDING. Please tell me you don't believe that taxes gathered by the US government are somehow segregated for particular uses? If so, why is Social Security beyond bankrupt? 

Please examine your link and breakdown exactly what all those [US healthcare dollars are spent on.](https://www.cms.gov/Research-Statistics-Data-and-Systems/Statistics-Trends-and-Reports/NationalHealthExpendData/downloads/highlights.pdf)

Medicare and Medicaid together (which is essentially single payer healthcare) account for 37% of that figure in your link. 

37%.  That money comes right out of the American taxpayer's pocket.  How effective are these two programs, for the billions we spend on them everyday?

Entitlement programs like these (and welfare) cost the US economy MUCH MORE than anything else (including military spending) and you want to triple down and expand these programs to include every US citizen?  

I question your definition of ""reasonable.""

EDIT: And spare me your downvotes. Meaningless internet points don't affect me, but I guess it makes you feel better since you can't argue the points. ",TearsForPeers,e9i94d1,conservative
"I mean we can pass a law making every citizen ""covered"". It doesn't make healthcare less expensive or of better quality. ""More Americans have a good healthcare"" should't be considered a policy, but rather a goal.",ReaganTroll,e9i2rgv,conservative
"Lmao im not antifa

But u Libertarians are so stupid and ridiculous and extremist you actually make antifa seem moderate in comparison 😂

Alexandria cortezs best campaigners are Libertarians who shoe ppl that shes the moderate in comparison",ExpensiveMention,e9kpcqf,conservative
"
>ITS ALL AGGREGATE SPENDING. Please tell me you don't believe that taxes gathered by the US government are somehow segregated for particular uses?

Because we're discussing the marginal impact or instituting single payer healthcare, so you can't use the aggregate increase in taxes that would be need to institute loads of other social programs in excess of healthcare. 


>Medicare and Medicaid together (which is essentially single payer healthcare) account for 37% of that figure in your link. 

>37%.  That money comes right out of the American taxpayer's pocket.  How effective are these two programs, for the billions we spend on them everyday?

Very. Without them, we'd have tens of millions of elderly and disabled Americans in abject poverty without health insurance. 

>Entitlement programs like these (and welfare) cost the US economy MUCH MORE than anything else, including military spending. 

Actual welfare transfers are a boogeyman in American politics. [For instance, in 2017 we spent $70 billion on food stamps and nutrition assistance programs.](https://www.cbpp.org/research/policy-basics-the-supplemental-nutrition-assistance-program-snap) Which is good for, [~1.7% of the federal budget.](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/2017_United_States_federal_budget) If you want, we can discuss the value of that 1.7% in providing impoverished Americans food, that's fine. But the US simply doesn't have a welfare state by any reasonable international interpretation of the term. 
",UndecidedVoter2020,e9ia8d6,conservative
"Substandard healthcare is better than no healthcare. And the system we have in place doesn't even provide most Americans with ""good healthcare."" 

By many objective measures, our healthcare is significantly worse than other first world countries despite the fact that we pay nearly twice as much per citizens. Our average lifespan is mediocre. Our infant mortality rate is a national embarrassment. Opioid abuse is rampant. 

That's not to even mention the economic effects of so many Americans either being bankrupted or dragged down by excessive medical costs. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9i35qf,conservative
And I bet you voted for Cortez.  ,GlenGanges,e9kpr8s,conservative
"> the marginal impact or instituting single payer healthcare

MARGINAL IMPACT?? Nice, marginal. That's like called the D-Day invasion a marginal shore incursion. Or calling an amputation a marginal surgical procedure. [26% of the GDP is not marginal](https://www.cbpp.org/research/federal-budget/policy-basics-where-do-our-federal-tax-dollars-go), and that's with the existing programs. 

The US DOES have a welfare state, since 26% of GDP is an enormous percentage. And you want to double or triple that? 

My problem with your reasoning is you keep thinking all these costs happen in a vacuum. It's the classic progressive mistake of thinking there's a big barrel of money called ""TAXES"" that comes in every year, and no matter what happens policy-wise that big barrel of money will always be there, year in and year out. 1.7% here, $70 billion there, who's counting. Its all good, right?

But you know what happens when you start taking more and more of people's money? You get what's happening in California, with an exodus of taxpayers. More people are leaving California than are coming in, and that trend will continue. 

People aren't stupid. They won't stay in a place that takes more and more of what they have, unless of course, you build the Berlin Wall and keep them in, with dogs and machine guns.  

But isn't that the end goal of progressives anyway? 

EDIT: Another downvote, yay!  Are you a bot? Is this an automatic NPC response to anyone challenging your pontification? And yes, we have to take care of the poor and those in need. But fiscally, that will not happen if you take MORE AND MORE MONEY from hardworking taxpayers and de-incentivize any reason to not be on the gov't dole.
To paraphrase Margaret Thatcher, Socialism is great until you run out of other people's money.   ",TearsForPeers,e9ic21q,conservative
You do realize the usa is one of the only first world countries to pay for its own military?,ExpensiveMention,e9ipjh1,conservative
"""Marginal"" in this context is being used in the context of economics ""associated with a specific change in the quantity used of a good or service, as opposed to some notion of the over-all significance of that class of good or service, or of some total quantity thereof."" 

And seeing how relying on the private market leads to MORE costs to the average American, I hardly think people will start leaving the country when their disposable income goes up and they start living longer. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9id4gr,conservative
">I hardly think people will start leaving the country when their disposable income goes up

Well, they are in California. Is the worker's paradise not all it's cracked up to be? 

Good luck with the line of economic reasoning that allows you to think a 60% tax rate will result in more disposable income (for every citizen, not just the rich, which is about what it is in Norway). ",TearsForPeers,e9idsx1,conservative
"I'm not advocating for a national fiscal policy that mirrors California. I'm simply saying that spending more on healthcare to get worse results is fiscally irresponsible. 

Whether it comes in the form of a tax or a payment to insurance companies, paying twice as much as the OECD average to get worse healthcare is not worth it. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9ieq4w,conservative
"> I'm not advocating for a national fiscal policy that mirrors California

Uh... yes, YES YOU ARE. You said as much in your initial comment that I responded to. You said, AND I QUOTE, ""the sooner we have universal healthcare, the sooner we can get healthcare costs to be reasonable."" 

This is exactly the same line of reasoning as the current policy rationale in California. It goes like this: ""Let's just enact a policy that sounds really good, and makes us feel really good, and promises free stuff to everyone here, and since it's such an awesome idea it'll just magically work! We'll just raise taxes on the evil rich and evil big corporations to pay for it.""

Then a year or two down the road, when the rich and the corporations leave, all-knowing California says, ""Hmmm, there's not enough tax revenue money coming in. We can't cut spending on this awesome free policy, because we're the awesome gov't who knows best and never cuts spending. So lets just triple the driver's license fee, and increase property and income taxes on the middle class, since they have more money than all the poor people our awesome free program is helping!""

Rinse and repeat, and pretty soon there's no one left except for all the poor people who cannot pay for the free program they've benefited from.

 ",TearsForPeers,e9ifu6k,conservative
That's just the slippery slope fallacy. My proposal that we enact a healthcare policy like that used by similar nations like Australia or Canada does not mean we go full socialist.,UndecidedVoter2020,e9izquz,conservative
" Any amount of socialism is a step in the wrong direction, and the US is a lot further down the road than we were when I was a college kid. 

Leftists love to use “reform”  as a Trojan horse. Every socialism success story begins this way:  Lenin championed “reform”, so did Castro and Guevara, and so did Maduro in Venezuela. 

Why don’t you research how reform is working in Venezuela today. ",TearsForPeers,e9jh6wz,conservative
"Ridiculous, you can't argue that every new change will lead to Venezuela. Japan, the United Kingdom, Ireland, Switzerland, South Korea, etc. all have single payer healthcare as well as robust market economies. ",UndecidedVoter2020,e9jw4n8,conservative
"You love that word, ridiculous. Just because you use the word doesn’t make it applicable. 

The UK and Ireland are much more socialist than democratic; Japan is facing a tsunami of demographics that isn’t able to replace its aging population; South Korea is the healthiest of the bunch, not in small part because our military has kept them from being overrun by the DPRK and it’s patron state China. 

Those places are not the US. We don’t need to become more like them, we need to be a better version of ourselves. Why is more government control (i.e., socialism) always the answer? 

Try not to use the word “ridiculous”in your inevitably deflecting response. ",TearsForPeers,e9k87xy,conservative
More pay wall ,Chapka69,e9h8z2g,conservative
No shit. Idiots like Max Boot don't seem to realize that these elections remove the people they tout as moderates (same thing happened w/ the Dems in 2010) and end up tightening ranks around Trump (or Obama). ,Marko_Ramius1,e9hi14b,conservative
More wall,ravenswin,e9hjgih,conservative
https://outline.com/www.wsj.com/articles/the-blue-wave-breaks-gently-1541806434,TastelessSmell,e9ifkzi,conservative
"It’s not as bad as you think. Everybody made a huge deal of Beto spending $70 million in Texas but that wasn’t the only state where the Democrats spent obscene amounts of money. The Democrats spent way more money. 

Remember, even Reagan gave up a ton of congressional seats in his first midterm. The presidential race will be a different story. ",pablo-platespinner,e9isejc,conservative
"Shouldn’t there be a point where their progressivism is rejected though? Back and forth see-sawing only means gradually moving to the left. What will it take for America to become fed up with the Democrats’ far left antics and either force them to become the party of Truman and JFK again or to have many years of sustained GOP dominance? 

I just feel really disheartened about the result of the election (and the potential to lose AZ and FL’s senate seats). We’ve been successful and moderate, they’ve been neither, and America seems to think there are two equal options in front of them. ",YankeeBlues21,e9itrew,conservative
"Progressivism eventually just serves itself. I’m with you on that one. 

If you look, the moderate Democrats were the seat flippers. There were some fresh faces, lots of which were military veterans. I don’t associate all Dems with extremism. The places where the Dems made gains were in places either the Republicans put up a shit candidate or there were in fact 2 equal options. ",pablo-platespinner,e9iw79j,conservative
"If they were moderates, they wouldn’t be Democrats in the party’s current form. The entire party platform has gone *hard* left in the last decade. Why would a moderate align with the party of socialized government programs, open borders, no American cultural unity, class warfare, race/gender grievances and that wants to “fundamentally change” something they claim to love. 

I’m disappointed in the voters that can’t see that we need to actively fight what the Dems have become if we want to maintain any semblance of what the Founders intended this country to be. The Republicans governed well, but needed to accomplish a lot more to fix the trajectory we’ve been on, and were rewarded with “but Trump’s tone!” What about what the left has done to social unity for decades? What about the tone of the Dems and all of the institutions controlled by the left (media, academia, entertainment, etc)? I’m not thrilled with some of the president’s antics, but he has good reason to be as angry as he is with how the left has acted for decades (especially this past decade) ",YankeeBlues21,e9iy0et,conservative
"I don’t like where the Democrats are headed as a whole. I’m just attempting to talk you off the ledge despite the downvotes. 

It is much better to be a Republican right now. You’ll have to excuse me if I’m optimistic despite the fact conservatives don’t dominate every single branch of government at the moment. 

Look into the r/intellectualdarkweb. Lots of reasonable liberals hang amongst that group. Lots of great conservatives with them. They’ll be the ones to lead us out of this. ",pablo-platespinner,e9iyw99,conservative
You’re entirely right and are articulating great points in this thread.,hello_japan,e9jva9t,conservative
"I appreciate it. Just seems like we’re rolling the boulder up the hill and can’t get a majority of people to not push it back on top of us in exchange for free stuff and crazy far left social ideas. 
",YankeeBlues21,e9j1men,conservative
"I don't know, I wasn't looking -- next thing I knew...boulder is gone.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4CC5N1_bZsQ",0xc0c0c0c0,e9j8ajr,conservative
"> wondered in her new book why so many women rejected ""**an exceptionally qualified female candidate and instead choose a misogynist as their president.**""

1.) I'll presume she means Hillary. It seems rather obvious she's corrupt. She had a huge scandal and has been caught lying time and time again. 

If the Democrats backed *anyone* else they probably would have won. Even if it was another woman.

2.) Why is Trump a misogynist anyways? He said a few vulgar and inappropriate things, sure, but as far as I'm aware he's never insulted or belittled women.

Let's face it. We all have an innate desire to procreate and produce children. We all look at people of our preferred sex and think of them in sexually explicit ways. Women don't look at half naked firemen and think ""oh, I wonder what his political beliefs are? does he want children? what type of wedding would it be?""

They think it's a hot guy they'd like to fuck. Period. Men are typically more open about their sexuality so it leads to us saying more inappropriate things. I'm not saying that it's acceptable, but it's the fact of the matter.

I don't think Trump is a misogynist for saying the type of stuff we, men and women, all think. I just think that makes him rude and vulgar.",Rizenstrom,e9jrz2t,conservative
[deleted],,e9jrn9q,conservative
She stopped trying to smile because 8 years of work by her and her husband went up in smoke before her eyes. ,HonorMyBeetus,e9jxpr8,conservative
"Can someone be accused of being a misogynist if the First ""Lady"" they hate is a man?",Bubbacat7,e9kf480,conservative
"Yeah you’re right, but liberals needed something to get their pussies hurt over.  Literally.   Some of the vile and ignorant shit said on the left always gets a blind eye or hidden under the guise of “protest and art”",DPistola,e9jtg8y,conservative
Huh?,MaximusBluntus,e9k4fci,conservative
"Ironic. I want him fired for demonstrating blackface, referring to the citizens of Detroit as violent criminals, airing and further perpetuating threatening comments against the Chinese, mocking Melania Trump’s accent, and espousing homophobic comments towards Sean Hannity and Donald Trump when Hannity called him out.

He is the absolute last person to be calling for anyone’s head. This clown should’ve been removed a decade ago. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9i06fg,conservative
"Jimmy Kimmel, Lord Protector.",SickofInternetProgs,e9hzis9,conservative
"Can we fire him for wearing black face?

Woke white liberals always make exemptions for themselves.",gster50,e9i8xzt,conservative
"How does it feel to *want*, Kimmel? You should know that the ONLY people who pay ANY attention to you are
liberal ""useful idiots""...
",LVDave,e9i06l7,conservative
"Even leftwing media like [Vice](https://motherboard.vice.com/en_us/article/qvqpp5/no-evidence-the-white-house-video-of-jim-acosta-was-doctored-forensic-expert-says) admits that the video was not doctored. This was independently confirmed, of all people, by a digital forensics analyst at UC Berkeley and the associate director of the National Center for Media Forensics.",oren0,e9imc7o,conservative
I'm sure Trump will request her resignation tomorrow.,ReaganTroll,e9hzkdi,conservative
He's an idiot,lax714,e9ih8jo,conservative
Jimmy Kimmel should removed from the PUBLIC airwaves.,ozric101,e9i1wym,conservative
So was the video doctored or not? ,TaloKrafar,e9ijwlv,conservative
[removed],,e9i7ukw,conservative
Aka tard,Rightquercusalba,e9ioplh,conservative
It wasn’t. ,mikeygio,e9il0iv,conservative
It wasn’t but the issue isn’t the video. The issue is is his behavior ,Str8DonLemon,e9jqqhb,conservative
"Let me guess, you fell for the “Doctored Video” conspiracy theory?",PrawnsAreOk,e9id384,conservative
Stop being such a filthy sexist you misogynist pig!,ngoni,e9ivtg9,conservative
Is there are break down somewhere where they explain that it wasn't? ,TaloKrafar,e9inn66,conservative
"No, he is just a concern troll. ",cragnathor,e9iip7g,conservative
"It depends what you mean by ""doctored.""

If you mean ""edited,"" then yes, the video was zoomed in and turned into a GIF, which caused it to *appear* to be sped up due to video conversion black magic fuckery.

However, when most people say a picture or video is ""doctored,"" they typically mean it was wildly edited.  Like, you'd photoshop an entire person in or out of the picture to completely change it.  Here's the actual definition:

> change the content or appearance of (a document or picture) in order to deceive; falsify.

Zooming in on a video, using slow motion, fitting a vertical video to a horizontal screen, stabilizing a video, etc., are all technically ""changing the content,"" but they aren't really ""doctoring"" it.  This is basically a textbook example of equivocation:

> the use of ambiguous language to conceal the truth or to avoid committing oneself",Telineye,e9ir9ud,conservative
Appreciate the explanation. I'd just like to see some firm evidence before I make a judgement. ,TaloKrafar,e9itw77,conservative
"So along with everything else Broward did, they can not even design a proper ballot what a fucking joke that place is.     ",ozric101,e9ifko7,conservative
"Dumbasses in South Florida designing dumbass ballots?

First time is tragedy the second time is farce, to quote a Bernie Sanders hero.",SickofInternetProgs,e9ijvqr,conservative
"I mean, I love my wife, but there are times when I remember how simple and easy it was when I was single. I am by no means fans on the Obamas, but I think it’s pretty obvious they love each other, and she’s just giving an honest opinion. ",Rabidraccoon76,e9l5s0i,conservative
">>  ""that’s normal — because I felt that way,""

Coz, you know, whatever liberals feel, is *normal*.",tenshon,e9l0srf,conservative
Agreed. Anyone married over a year has thought this at one time or another. ,oldschool54,e9lbjmr,conservative
Wonderful,VolkRevel,e9ium5a,conservative
"*AHHAHAHAHAH*

I love it when virtue signaling gov abusing has beens own themselves on Twitter. 

This is also the type that watch CNN and think they are moderate.",KKN0PP,e9iyk8z,conservative
"*AHHAHAHAHAH*

I love it when virtue signaling gov abusing has beens own themselves on Twitter. 

This is also the type that watch CNN and think they are moderate.",KKN0PP,e9iym7v,conservative
"Preaching to the choir while 99% of SNL cast mocks conservatives and more than half of them probably mocked Crenshaw after his bit was over. They have to throw red meat to the leftists, expect them to double down on stupid once this flash in the pan moment of sanity passes. ",Rightquercusalba,e9iptc0,conservative
I thought you had to be a citizen to vote? Did I wake up in another country?,the-divine-comedy,e9hfrvm,conservative
How are Floridians not absolutely outraged at this?,the-divine-comedy,e9hg9dq,conservative
Non citizens? Fug me.,lax714,e9hgew8,conservative
"I went to vote in jersey. Did not require any ID. You sign next to your previous signature, then you vote. It was an extremely unsecured process. I’m sure plenty of dead people have voted for Gillum last week",AJcraig28,e9htc1o,conservative
Idiocracy.,_Gardien,e9hiez6,conservative
I've been told on more than one occasion that non-citizens are not voting.,mlmack,e9hqs91,conservative
This foreign involvement is getting out of hand.  Imagine the absolute mayhem that would be happening if Republicans were trying to get hundreds of thousands of illegal immigrants from Russia the right to vote.,Castaway77,e9jquav,conservative
Nope.  It's soon to be the Union of Socialist States of America.,mlmack,e9hqkab,conservative
AKA they are.,heartless_13,e9ihu0h,conservative
"If natural rights are left to majority rules, you were never free to begin with. ",hat_wine_clock,e9h8n36,conservative
"Pure democracy is tyranny of the majority over the minority. It is a terrible system, and destroys individual rights.",machinerer,e9hx3iv,conservative
"“Democracy has nothing to do with freedom. Democracy is a soft variant of communism, and rarely in the history of ideas has it been taken for anything else.”

\- Hans Hermann Hoppe",Buckley33,e9hx1mu,conservative
"It is the least democratic parts of the constitution that most guarantee our freedoms. 

But I also think some element of democracy is needed to preserve freedom, lest we become an aristocracy or a dictatorship. ",soxfan90,e9hhete,conservative
"Here's an archive for anyone running into the paywall:

https://archive.is/2LZC3",MooMooCudChew,e9i3j7c,conservative
"We already do as a nation, and it isn't a problem.  Should we want interest on car loans to be less than the amount spent on surgery?

The US debt is mostly owed to US citizens.  It's good debt that the government gets a good interest rate on.  And lenders get a good deal, or else they wouldn't lend.

I can't think of a form of government spending that is less harmful, can you?",zummit,e9hbpw0,conservative
"The not-deficit-spending option is less harmful. 

There is no such thing as ‘good debt’. It still consumes revenue that could be used elsewhere. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9hgdhf,conservative
"Yeah spending our unborn great grandchildren's tax dollars today is a great idea! Let's increase the debt, they won't mind! We'll be dead before they understand what we did anyway. 

Also let's [break some windows](https://www.investopedia.com/ask/answers/08/broken-window-fallacy.asp) and get some Americans to fix them. That will stimulate the economy even more.",ngoni,e9heb3m,conservative
Debt can be fine when your investment grows quicker than your debt. In the governments case the taxable economy. The problem is that while the current tax cuts have undoubtedly spurred growth it simply isn't enough to make up for lost revenue. This is of course concerning that the rate deficit spending has gone up in the ball park of 0.5 trillion since last year even though the economy is growing at a very fast rate. We'll see how things shake out during the next economic downturn.,jonnyboyC13,e9hjfiq,conservative
"No, if the government has money and has something they would like to spend it on, it would be better not to spend it (in most cases).

The debt is an odd exclusion to this rule.  The interest rate they offer is so cheap - below inflation - that it's basically a way to get a free margin.",zummit,e9iig8q,conservative
So you'd prefer to tax it today and get a worse deal?  That would be irresponsible.,zummit,e9hewml,conservative
"The debt in those circumstances (either investment or mortage) is usually ok because it's tied to assets whose value either maintains or increases while inflation eats away at the real value of the debt.  The taxable economy is not an asset per se, any more than one's job is an asset, so this idea doesn't hold true for government debt.  

The idea of ""we'll out-grow our debt"" is heavily touted by such 'luminaries' (lolol) in economics as Paul Krugman, Nobel Prize Winner Extraordinaire.  The problem with that mindset is that we have a massive spending problem, and we are adding to the debt more annually than we are paying off.  Thanks to the joys of compound interest, this means that our debt will eventually become unserviceable unless we increase our payouts or reduce our spending.  Neither is probable.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9hkn7x,conservative
No the sensible thing is to live within your means and only exceed them briefly in times of emergency. A day that ends in y is not an emergency.,ngoni,e9hjbjg,conservative
"Fully agree, I feel the most recent tax cuts would have been better served by only focusing on corporate tax rates and excluded the income tax. Or at least including some cuts to keep the deficit spending in check.",jonnyboyC13,e9hnl1s,conservative
The Public is just as much to blame for this as the politicians. ,ozric101,e9i203y,conservative
[looks like the top minds are visiting us again. ](https://np.reddit.com/r/TopMindsOfReddit/comments/9wox29/top_minds_of_rconservative_believe_democrats_ruin),LumpyWumpus,e9mli6d,conservative
"I'm not sold on that yet. Dems had nothing to run on for the midterms and crushed it. Even if they had help from a lot of outgoing GOP congressmen. Our base wasn't energized or their based was more energized.
I still dont get our voters. Unless they showed up and were just outnumbered, how on earth could you reward the Dems for what they ran on.... Nothing? How can you screw over the President, who has indeed overseen a great economy and kept many promises?
I have little faith right now of a win in 2020. It seems to me either people fall for media bias or nothing is good enough for some people. ",MaddSim,e9koz1y,conservative
Well now that Hillary is running again I’m a bit worried because she has millions of mindless voters who will cast their ballots for her no matter what.,McKnight36,e9kqcq1,conservative
"Were any of you guys watching what happened this midterm?

This was a dry run. The dems were testing how much fraud they could get away with, the the result was apparently that they get get away with *all of it*, no matter how blatant. It will only get worse from here.

What does it matter if Trump will win with the people, when we now know that election results don't matter since they'll just lie and cheat their way to victory.

",Silicon_Avatar,e9kpx0c,conservative
"Remember, it is OK to brigade if you are TOP MINDS....

Fucking stacking the deck Reddit. ",SuperCharged2000,e9murd5,conservative
"You just have to accept that around half, maybe more, of voters in this country are completely ignorant. They don’t understand anything. At all. ",HolsterOfNuts,e9kpc8y,conservative
"> Dems had nothing to run on for the midterms and crushed it

I disagree, it seems like they ran on a pretty ""consistent"" platform of **ORANGE MAN BAD**. It's a completely empty, emotional platform, but that's your typical leftist.",allsystemscrash,e9kpo18,conservative
"They ran on outrage, 24 hours a day, 7 days a week outrage.

It did take its toll, and many voters said they just want people to 'get along'.... make the outrage stop..

That was their platform.

In terms of midterms, this was not bad for the incumbent Pres...",SuperCharged2000,e9kt2q2,conservative
People mindlessly vote for both candidates in every election. ,bongo1138,e9l7t7o,conservative
"She not going to run



My moneys on Bernie winning the nomination ",Matthmaroo,e9l6fl4,conservative
Incomtpence in one county is not fraud in the general vote. ,memberCP,e9l54nd,conservative
"Please if you have pictures or 1st hand testimony of fraud to the relevant campaigns 


They will pursued it ",Matthmaroo,e9l6e5h,conservative
We could start committing voter fraud ourselves. There are no repercussions apparently and Republicans control most local offices so it would be a lot easier for us.........Just a thought.,SnickersReese,e9kq3jh,conservative
Are you suggesting people are ignorant for being Democrats?,bongo1138,e9l7quv,conservative
"Oh, I know. Trust me. And then you have some that are ignorant solely because they believe the media, and aren't aware of all the stories the media ignores or isn't completely truthful on.
And also, the coverage of candidates. There are several democrats that ran in the mid terms that were treated like God's gift to the world by the media. They never do that with Republicans unless that republican is going against its party. John James, the black man in Illinois was ignored by the media. He didn't win but he had a strong showing. Had the media gave him the special treatment, I think he could've won. ",MaddSim,e9kppmw,conservative
I think it’s inevitable. The rematch is what TV ratings dreams are made of. Throw Beto on as VP and it’s gonna be a complete shit storm. ,gandalfsbastard,e9m5gwf,conservative
"Eh, I doubt he will run again (and get the nomination).  Props to him if he does, that man has integrity.",JohnLocksTheKey,e9lta01,conservative
We can't let ourselves fight injustice with injustice.,goldrotmgonly,e9kuay1,conservative
"You know, there was a time not that long ago where I would dismiss that idea out of hand. Not so much today.

Battles (of the metaphorical kind, as well as the real kind) can only be fairly fought when both sides are on an even playing field. At one time, if the other side fought dirty and broke the rules there would be public outrage forcing the other side to return to common decency. 

We don't see that today. There are no repercussions or recourse to the other side lying and cheating. 

The game has changed, and not losing our country to these people is more important to ""losing with dignity"".",Silicon_Avatar,e9kr2fk,conservative
"I’m not “suggesting” anything. They are. If you understand even basic economics and believe in the constitution, you’re aren’t a Democrat. Period.",HolsterOfNuts,e9lkqxz,conservative
"> We don't see that today. There are no repercussions or recourse to the other side lying and cheating.
> 
> 

The solution isn't to cheat. It's to stop the cheaters. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9ktrzb,conservative
This kind of thinking leads to the shitty situation our country is in right now. ,bongo1138,e9lkzvx,conservative
"> The solution isn't to cheat. It's to stop the cheaters.

I guess we'll just have to see how well that works out in the next few weeks.",Silicon_Avatar,e9kz3wl,conservative
"I’ve given them benefit of the doubt time after time. But between the way the acted after the election, the way they’ve behaved in the streets attacking people, the COUNTLESS times they’ve been recorded provoking conservatives and assaulting them... fuck them. Every single one of them. Couple that with the way ever single Democratic senator except one said Kavanaugh was guilty without a SHRED of evidence? And now they’re trying to steal elections? Every last one of em can kick rocks. If you consider yourself a Democrat then you’re just like them at this point. You’re supporting and enabling their behavior. AND THEN DUMBASSES ELECTED MORE DEMOCRATS. Also just about every major city in this country has been run by Democrats for at least fifty years and they’re all shit holes. Chicago? Detroit? Baltimore? Atlanta? All shit holes. I would even go as far as to say NYC and LA are shit holes. They ruin everything they touch. They’re obsessed with spending other people’s money but you can damn sure bet they’ll keep plenty for themselves. Democrats are vile disgusting creatures.",HolsterOfNuts,e9lld1q,conservative
You’re an angry dude. ,bongo1138,e9lqmlt,conservative
You don’t say.,HolsterOfNuts,e9m4yyy,conservative
Why do we not see handcuffs?,StephenScherer1,e9gio27,conservative
Lock him up.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9g9rbi,conservative
I. Am. Shocked.,audioprod,e9gkr2h,conservative
"The left doesn't realize how close we are to an actual bloody civil war. The spark that's going to ignite the powder keg is likely going to happen soon. I don't know what it will be, but I know it's going to end up with conservatives taking up their arms. ",uniquecannon,e9ge3f4,conservative
"I wish people would stop talking about a civil war. There's a lot of moderates and conservatives in so-called democratic strongholds that have no interest in siding with far-left fanatics. It's not as clean cut as the mostly one-issue north v. south war. There's left-leaners in red states and right-leaners in blue states, and moderates everywhere. So is how is such a war to be fought, anyway? Most people will refuse to take arms and join the fanatics. And I doubt most politicians would even support such a war. Also, the stupid college kids who seem to support these rabble rousers the most in the name of ""justice"" will fold like a wet paper if anyone gives them a mean look. Not to mention that most of them are not armed. If a bunch of gangs take arms, the army will move in to shut them down.

&#x200B;

I understand that the 60s were pretty rough with bombing and such but there was no civil war then. Surely we can get through this without one.",Terra_green2,e9gif3b,conservative
Every single person involved with that mob should be arrested. ,LumpyWumpus,e9h70kp,conservative
If anyone wants to start pushing back...yo,BeachCruisin22,e9gue3m,conservative
That explains why they were going after his kids. ,Gzhindra,e9hdt4t,conservative
"Serious question: I saw a video of them chanting for 10 mins, is this the antifa people are afraid of?",efficientenzyme,e9gdvxq,conservative
Because laws don’t apply to antifa and democrats,JMB_was_a_god,e9gl6bm,conservative
"Because this is Weimar America and political violence is a feature, not a bug.
",nited_states,e9gnjt4,conservative
"You're right, if the Podesta's are involved, then the Clintons are funding it too.",ThruHiker,e9gq1zn,conservative
Lock them all up. But this is DC so we know nothing will happen. They know it too.,ngoni,e9ga8xp,conservative
Here’s hoping we don’t get violent. Civil war would be horrific. ,skarface6,e9gf4o9,conservative
"It's Soros for the most part,  the left are just his useful idiots and a civil war is what he wants.  He makes billions from sewing chaos in economies and societies. 

When the right have had enough,  that will be the pretext to institute martial law and then,  well, you know the rest. 

We must not give them what they want.   If we do,  we are surely doomed.  Both left and right,  whether the left realize it or not. ",wynhdo,e9gf1t5,conservative
Isn’t that their goal? ,ShirtlessGirl,e9gtkf8,conservative
I know what side I’d be on ,steelallz,e9h6osu,conservative
"This shit is stupid, I'm completely alienated by conservatives, I spent 20 years actively voting and leaning with conservative ideology but now because I hate Trump authoritarian style I can't even even find common ground.

Where are the people who support individual and state rights, small government and responsible spending but don't want to be a frothing red hat wearing MAGA talking about civil war.",efficientenzyme,e9h31t3,conservative
undermining literal votes is a red line,BeachCruisin22,e9gusoo,conservative
"> I wish people would stop talking about a civil war. 

War is the natural outcome when the rules for power sharing are no longer accepted.  When the Democrats demanded that Trump be impeached or overthrown by a Military coup about 5 minutes after he won I knew the republic was probably over.  


>There's a lot of moderates and conservatives in so-called democratic strongholds that have no interest in siding with far-left fanatics. It's not as clean cut as the mostly one-issue north v. south war. There's left-leaners in red states and right-leaners in blue states, and moderates everywhere. So is how is such a war to be fought, anyway? Most people will refuse to take arms and join the fanatics. 


A second American civil war would look a lot like the Spanish civil war.  In that war people had 3 choices: Join the dominate side in their area, flee the area for their side, or die. People who tried to stay natural where either labeled Fascist or Communists and executed.  There was no mercy or quarter shown by either side.  I don't know if it would play out the same in America, but based on reading /r/politics I have very little doubt that the fanatics over there would murder anyone who doesn't tow their line.  


>Most people will refuse to take arms and join the fanatics.

With fanatics you don't have a choice.  It's join, die or run.  

>I understand that the 60s were pretty rough with bombing and such but there was no civil war then. Surely we can get through this without one.


I don't recall the left refusing to accept the result of a fair election or send their activists to attack their political foes.  Antifa is clearly working for the Dems.",StraightNewt,e9gx10t,conservative
Balkanization or civil war. Those are the only two futures I see for this country.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9goz4s,conservative
"While I agree with you and I think talk of a civil war is really naive in general and the horror of such a conflict is not well-understood, unfortunately a civil war only needs a very small percentage of the population to take part. About 8% of the population took part in the American Civil War, for example.",hello_japan,e9hd69t,conservative
"> is this the antifa people are afraid of?

Do not underestimate how dumb and violent mobs are. The vast majority of those twig-armed weasels will never start shit when they're alone. 

But once they feel safe- surrounded by their peers and outnumbering you- they can go unhinged real fast.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gj6hh,conservative
"The problem is they commit mob attacks on people and in some cities the authorities charge the victims with serious crimes for self-defense.

For the past year their violence has been constantly escalating and the free passes they have received are unbelievable.",Viva-La-Pepe,e9gfryc,conservative
They broke his door (while his wife was home). They’re also the same organization that attacks random folks.,skarface6,e9gf7lf,conservative
Afraid in the same way a swarm of insects can ruin crops.,rAlexanderAcosta,e9go468,conservative
Yep.  Check out the videos of their actions in Portland.,mlmack,e9hzybs,conservative
"I wouldn't assume that ten minutes of video is neutral, contains all the activities of the evening, nor is unedited.",mcbobboreddit,e9h1aov,conservative
They prefer the law of the jungle to the law of the land. They will eventually succeed in causing Civil War. It will be the shortest Civil War in history because they are natural born cowards. ,StephenScherer1,e9grpfj,conservative
"Seriously, people keep comparing America to Nazi Germany because, well, you know- Overlord Drumpf is Hitler, etc.

But I'm seeing a lot of parallels between 2018 America and Weimar Germany. The main difference is the economy, but that could change at any time.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9gouio,conservative
There's always tar and feathers.,gbimmer,e9gc374,conservative
Straight to the gallows,trumppence4ever,e9gcahs,conservative
"> Civil war would be horrific.

Especially for the side that's afraid of guns.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gizxb,conservative
[removed],,e9gh4zb,conservative
"Which is funny, considering they do know which side has the guns. ",uniquecannon,e9gusnu,conservative
"How is Trump an authoritarian with the amount of deregulation he is doing? How is getting rid of the individual mandate and doing his best to get rid of Obamacare authoritarian? How are tax cuts authoritarian? How is appointing originalist justices to the Supreme Court authoritarian? What has he done that’s at all authoritarian?

The “frothing red hats” are a response to the frothing pussy hats and frothing leftists in general as they have been amping up their rhetoric and violence steadily since about 2010 and Occupy Wall Street. I don’t know what you expect conservatives to do in the face of that. I don’t know what reaction you expect when conservatives are being bashed on the head with bike locks and where anyone to the right of Mao is demonized and dehumanized by calling them racists and Nazis on mainstream news channels like CNN. I’m not happy about it either nor do I like the civil war talk, but you are really misidentifying the aggressor and the causes here.",hello_japan,e9hcmhj,conservative
"I agree, and it is a grave matter. Is it worth an actual war that may destroy people and possibly the country for years to come? Write your senators and the president, urge everyone to action.

War should be a last resort. I came from a country that lived through wars. It is NOT something you want if there is a way to solve it in a civil and bloodless manner. If the other side actually intends to commit genocide, which was the case in my country, then war is inevitable. Otherwise, war should never be an option. NEVER. ",Terra_green2,e9gvbrq,conservative
"Thank you for the information.

Antifa is working for radicalized interests. I haven't seen proof they are working for actual politicians, Maxine Waters' stupidity regardless. We need to ask Congress to crack down on politically motivated crimes. I believe there was a bill being worked on regarding masked protesters.

I have a feeling the Clintons are behind the impeachment talk and other radical anti Trump conversation, since it started during the Trump/Clinton run. Is it worth destroying the Republic for Hillary Clinton?",Terra_green2,e9i0k1g,conservative
"Well, let's hope it doesn't come to either. Also, the United States will cease to be a world power if it fragments.

As for a civil war, I'm mostly familiar with the U.S. one and not with others except the War of the Roses, but aren't those are normally fought over specific issues like religious strife or succession (?) so that the winning side makes a decisive decision for the other. In other words, a civil war in the United States will solve nothing since it seems to me like the nation is facing disagreements over multiple issues and policies. It's not like it can stop and say ""ok, now Henry's on the throne and we can stop"", ""ok, now we're stopping slavery and we can continue on,"" ""ok, now that we forced everyone to be Puritan so everyone bends to our will."" 


The kind of multi-issue disputes facing the United States won't be solved by an actual armed strife. Even if an armed strife occurs, it will end in the same thing-- agreement to fragment since it's come to that. So it's much better to skip that stage and just agree to fragment. A convention of States is what conservatives should aim at/mobilize. Once super-liberal States like California and New York sees that conservatives are serious about parting ways, one of two things happen: 1) they agree and everyone convenes to end this in a civil manner or 2) they realize that their progressive minority can't bully everyone into doing their will and will change their ways to accommodate other parts of the U.S. and keep their quirks local. 


It will all end in the same thing, so calls for an actual armed war will solve nothing.",Terra_green2,e9gujj5,conservative
"Look at what’s been going on in college campuses for the last decade.  Any time leftist mobs trash the campus or commit assault because someone is about to or has just said something that they disagree with, the campus authorities, administration, etc brush it off as “healthy free speech”. No consequences and often they are lauded.",booblitchutz,e9gurfq,conservative
Can you show me that? I saw a video where someone knocked on the door,efficientenzyme,e9gftr3,conservative
"When I Google then I get cringey stuff, can you link me the worst ones that are confirmed by a reputable source?",efficientenzyme,e9i1mwo,conservative
There are no short civil wars,molon-labe7,e9h9ilq,conservative
"Nope. Get the authorities to do what’s right. And, if they don’t, then raise a gigantic stink and put pressure on the authorities until they do. ",skarface6,e9gf691,conservative
"Have you considered who the rest of the world would support in such a conflict? The rest of the world is overwhelmingly leftist by American standards and would undoubtedly be supporting the American left in some way, some logistically and with arms and some with an outright deployment of military force to aid the American left. It’s really not as simple as we have the guns and they don’t. There is no way such a conflict would stay local... it would be a global conflict as we would be destabilizing markets around the world and people would be losing massive amounts of money which would incentivize them to get involved. 

Not to mention the fact that world peace, such as it is, is effectively enforced by America in a *Pax Americana* and if we fell into civil war, you would see regional conflicts breaking out around the world. Russia would take the opportunity to invade its neighbors. The Middle East would erupt in violence. Israel would probably be our (keep in mind that “our side” only means the American right and not America as a whole) only global ally of any military significance in such a conflict. Our other “allies” would not be allies specifically of the American right, they would be allies of the American left.",hello_japan,e9he6pu,conservative
"Not necessarily.

Give me a gender studies degree and I can roll that bad boy up and smack somebody with it. It'd probably sting a bit, too.

These leftists aren't exactly unarmed.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9goxq9,conservative
Very true. ,skarface6,e9gjhsd,conservative
"God forbid it gets to that point,  but if it does then hell yes.  If we have to go in,  we must go all the way in. ",wynhdo,e9gi6xc,conservative
"> It is NOT something you want if there is a way to solve it in a civil and bloodless manner. If the other side actually intends to commit genocide

Go read /r/politics for a while and then ask yourself what they would do if given the power to kill Trump voters without penalty. ",StraightNewt,e9gx655,conservative
"I'll be honest, I hope for a second great war. I think it's what we need.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9jflyq,conservative
"https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/2018/11/08/mob-tucker-carlsons-home-antifa-break-door-chant-fox-host/1927868002/

",skarface6,e9gjed5,conservative
"Could you show me that video? All I've heard is that the door was broken, which I assume takes a good deal of force.",JustAnotherJon,e9gm13x,conservative
"https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sq-dcJrnGTM

These people are animals.  The best part is that the police just stood around and watched.",mlmack,e9i25ey,conservative
There are when one side has the vast majority of the guns and the other side is so cowardly that they only attack when they greatly outnumber their target.,StephenScherer1,e9hglzp,conservative
"But they won't no matter what we do.  It's going to come down to violence one way or another.

They're starting a war.",gbimmer,e9gfka7,conservative
"We would also have to consider how our own actual military branches and government departments would react.

Who would the army side with? I know a lot of soldiers the detest leftist pansy life style, don't know about higher operations people like generals. 

And what about the police? 

The only thing we the right would have is the fact that it's a lot harder to invade America due to our isolation.

Knowing this we would have to overtake the left run cost pretty quickly because it would allow for an access point for non American ground troops. ",Late_Nightsx,e9hw7q1,conservative
"As much as I'd hate violence on the streets, It's not the ability of conservative militias and factions to fight and win that scares me. Conservatives own guns, liberals usually don't, after all. The two things that scare me are warlords using the breakdown to push even more radicalism, and foreign invasion. 

If we have to deal with ANTIFA by forming our own ""AntiCA"" (And I'm certain we can find a better name than that!), that group could easily get even scarier than ANTIFA. I can't see a cycle of violence ending between two criminal militias. It'd turn America into another 3rd world shithole just like all of Aftrica and much of the South Americas. And that's before either group goes full-blown corrupt and starts engaging in criminal enterprise. 

And as if that isn't bad enough, we could have to deal with UN or EU ""Peacekeepers"" coming to our shore. If that happens, well... If American Democracy isn't hypothetically killed by partisan violence, then foreign invasion will finish the job. ",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9gja27,conservative
"Oh I know about r/politics. I don't believe they represent anything. There's likely a lot of international and paid accounts there.

Anonymous accounts on Reddit should not dictate how we think and act. For all we know they could be 90% Russian and Chinese. I

If Reddit had become an anarchist propaganda site then the FBI should be alerted. But to let an online site with unknown agents radicalized the conversation is to submit to anarchy before it began.

The problem in the ground is Antifa and Congress should be pressured to do something about it.",Terra_green2,e9hzpg6,conservative
"My father almost died twice serving in the army in wars. When my parents came here they settled in a very safe, boring place where nothing ever happens and are super happy to live there still. If war is ever a reality most people will find themselves wondering why they didn't appreciate what they had, in the relatively free, safe, stable United States, which is still significantly better than most of the rest of the world and at least CAN be potentially fixed by peaceful means.

ETA: But I think I'm done saying what I feel- thank you for the conversation. :)
",Terra_green2,e9jh322,conservative
"https://m.washingtontimes.com/news/2018/nov/8/stephen-colbert-antifa-mob-tucker-carlsons-house-s/

Two things, one there was another video posted that was longer and I don't know if it got taken down but I can't find it.

Two this mob is cringey as fuck, I mean they're downtown in a populated area leading a chant with a tambourine. 

From the original post what I can remember was someone vandalized his driveway with spray paint but the only stuff about breaking down is unsubstantiated unless it came up in a police report I didn't see.",efficientenzyme,e9h3j2h,conservative
"Yeah that's fucked up, why are they targeting some cars and not others.

Those guys seem like assholes but the proudboys kicking civilians while police watched boiled my blood too",efficientenzyme,e9i2lpp,conservative
"Yes, I get that, but literally the same thing was said during the last civil war on both sides. Assume there aren't short civil wars because there really isn't. ",molon-labe7,e9hj1z2,conservative
don't gloat. they act dirty and will still put up a fair fight.,AntifaArePathetic,e9i4r3j,conservative
"I would be really inclined to disagree with you if we were looking at this event in a vacuum, but I think an ongoing and consistent pattern  bears your point out. The veiled incitements to violence on the part of Waters, Holder, and Clinton, the unbelievable leniency Eric Clanton was shown, this shit right here... It's compelling in aggregate. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9gqn7b,conservative
"Also, isn’t that what the proud boys are? Anti-Antifa?",steelallz,e9h6uor,conservative
You’re right and that sucks.  The only difference is Africa doesn’t have hillbillies lol. They can hit a jackrabbit with a six shooter at 50 yards,steelallz,e9h6sbb,conservative
"Exactly my biggest concern too.  That's why we can't give them what they,  or Soros, what they/he wants.  If we do, we all lose, left and right.

I agree that if we have to then there can't be any half measures but if it gets to that point we're all doomed anyway. ",wynhdo,e9gjti7,conservative
">The problem in the ground is Antifa and Congress should be pressured to do something about it.

Antifa is the militant army of the Democrat party.  I've watched the media and the dems make several attempts to normalize their behavior and only back tracking when they got lots of push back.  Areas dominated the Democrat party lets Antifa commit acts of violence without penalty.  The police don't arrest them, if they are taken to court for their crimes most of the time they walk with no or minimal jail time.  The press lies about their violent behavior, and social media doesn't ban them for hate speech.   Getting A half Dem congress to do something about them is about as likely as the Democrats embracing small goverment and passing pro-life bills.",StraightNewt,e9jdhl1,conservative
"Thanks for the video. I wish it showed the entirety of the event. Its definitely cringey, it's just such a low blow. It kind of reminds me of when people talked shit about Obama and Trump children, just tasteless.

I hate that the public discourse has deteriorated to this point. Going after people's family is not fair game under any circumstance.

",JustAnotherJon,e9iv50t,conservative
"You have some good points but the setting has changed.
1.  Liberals think guns are bad and want to prevent citizens from owning them. Liberals rarely own guns. (Liberals do not think ahead, criminals never give up their guns in any society.)
2.  Conservatives frequently own guns.
3.  Current events clearly show that the Left is openly willing to steal our Freedom (BROWARD County, Florida, the county immediately South of me.)
4.  The Left is behaving like Bolsheviks attempting to take away freedom from our families - FOREVER. 
5.  The Left has raised the stakes beyond mere disagreement all the way to removal of FREEDOM (Freedom to believe the broad minded view and not deviate from it is no freedom at all.)
666.  The Left will be fighting to STEAL our freedom from our families.  There are NO LAWS during Civil War. We will be fighting to exterminate a filthy UnAmerican plague. We will save the Left the effort needed to arrange a prisoner exchange; there won't be any. There will be changes in voting. Liberals will lose the right to vote, permanently.",StephenScherer1,e9hn66r,conservative
"I am very well prepared. I know it is comming I just don't know when.  I might even miss the conflict entirely but my children and grandchildren will surely go through it. There is no ""fair"" in war neither is there a ""second place"".  You must already be prepared the day it happens. You need both weapons and food and water.  Most people forget one essential item, a bullet proof vest. You cannot protect your family if you bleed out!",StephenScherer1,e9i9gqf,conservative
"Sorta, but only sorta. The Proud Boys show at conservative events and add some ""muscle"" to the crowd. They have gotten into fights against ANTIFA kids before, and they've won.

That said, they're a far cry from crazy like ANTIFA is. They aren't showing up liberal events with Molotov Cocktails and bike locks, after all. And they sure as hell arn't driving out public speakers from colleges, or rioting and destroying property. So I'd say they're pretty far from ANTIFA, at least in terms of MO.",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9kr5t9,conservative
Why aren't we doing something about the source soros then? ,Late_Nightsx,e9hwfxs,conservative
"""and only back tracking when they got lots of push back.""

&#x200B;

Which shows you it's still not acceptable in society. I completely understand your frustration with Antifa and they are one of the major reasons I voted all R this election and will likely not vote D ever again. However, I also see pushback in other quarters. Colbert condemning the attacks on Tucker's house (who cares if it's sincere- he realizes it's a can of worms and he may be next) and Hollywood people starting to condemn the leaders of the women's march. If super liberal Hollywood is starting to realize the consequences of their 2-year orgy of ""resistance"" idiocy, others will hopefully follow. Yes, Waters and her ilk are despicable. But they'll start backing off if public opinion turns against them.

&#x200B;

Whatever issues the country is facing, armed conflict is worse and if it actually happens people will find themselves wondering why they didn't appreciate the relative stability and security that this country offers, and realize that what seemed like big problems were actually not as bad as what they're facing in a reality of war. Like agonizing over not, say, having the job of your dreams or being married once you hit 35, and then getting cancer and realizing that however bad the issues you previously faced had been, your previous situation was still a lot better than this since it could still be fixed with a relatively small amount of suffering.

&#x200B;

But I don't think I'll try to argue over this anymore on this thread. Thanks for responding and I hope for the best for this country.",Terra_green2,e9jhxwb,conservative
"You had me until:

>5. The Left has raised the stakes beyond mere disagreement all the way to removal of FREEDOM (Freedom to believe the broad minded view and not deviate from it is no freedom at all.) 666. The Left will be fighting to STEAL our freedom from our families. There are NO LAWS during Civil War. We will be fighting to exterminate a filthy UnAmerican plague. We will save the Left the effort needed to arrange a prisoner exchange; there won't be any. There will be changes in voting. Liberals will lose the right to vote, permanently.

You're going to have to explain this a little more. 
",molon-labe7,e9hp3e9,conservative
"Do you think the rest of the world would not get involved?

What do you think would happen then?",hello_japan,e9hw3no,conservative
I agree ,steelallz,e9l8wi6,conservative
"It is my best guess that we will have Civil War. within 2 generations (40 yrs). I find this to be inevitable.  

Consider 2 groups divided by ideology.
1.  European decent (the old melting pot, Spain-Germany-Italy-etc, all white people with similar morals and beliefs) 2/3 of these people are Right Leaning.
2.  Minorities with Hispanics being the decisive group 1/3 Right Leaning but extremely tolerant and accepting of CORRUPTION (that is the only real political system South of the border).

Current demographics give the 🇺🇸 a nearly 50/50 split when Democrats run the dirtiest and most corrupt politician since Huey Long (look it up). The change in demographics we currently see means that as group 2 keeps flooding in and having many more children as well; group two will overwhelmingly dominate. College students of minority decent, mostly Hispanic, dominate South Florida colleges. They are very aware of the disaster in Venezuela and they are equally aware that Socialism caused the disaster. Still, they strongly support a Socialist agenda. They prefer to divide up that which they did not earn even if means a significantly reduced standard of living for the country. 

Twenty years from now this will be a Socialist country. Traditional American values will be out of style. You couldn't even get elected as a white conservative. The Muslims will have been removed from much of Europe and emigration to Europe will be common. The discussion will be:
1.  Is Socialism really better than Communism? We could get it right this time.
2.  That SOB TRUMP packed the Supreme Court and we can't truly experience the glory of Socialism much less Communism. We will win in the end, as those bastards die off and we will replace those Americans with good Norte Americanos, RECONQUISTA.

Fourty years from now one State will have opened the eyes of whatever was left of AMERICA. That State is California:
1.  Our own government projects that California will be over 50% Chinese in 30 years. The 104 average IQ Chinese will not be very tolerent of the 85 average IQ Mexican ""Worker Bees"".  China has thousands of years of history were they send in Chinese to an area they want and then place their military on the border claiming that they must and will protect the Chinese within that country from attack. Then, the Chinese migration really begins.  (That is exactly what happened in Tibet where the religious leader, the Dalai Lama has a palace. The Dalai Lama can't go to Tibet because he publically objected to the traditional enemy of Tibet taking over Tibet. The Dalai Lama would be killed.)
2.  Our own government projects that in 35 years China will have a totally modern Navy twice the size of ours. I project that Chinese warships which greatly exceed the number of our warships will be sitting off the coast of California. Expect a thrilling time on the ships. There are not enough women in China and there are millions of 85 IQ Worker Bee Girls on shore who should be serving their betters on-board ship. The Chinese are very practical, can you think of a higher and better use for Zombie-Brain Girls? Expect a new California State Language it won't be English or Spanish. Expect China to claim that they will not allow Chinese in California to be mistreated and expect the Chinese in California to ask for help from China and eventually ask to be part of China.
3.  Your children should learn Mandarin if they want to go out West. I suggest the first Mandarin words they learn should be, ""YES, SIR"".

We live in a CAPITALIST REPUBLIC which is the perfect system for 2/3 of those people with European blood. It is NOT the perfect system for anyone else. 

SOCIALISM is the preferred system for 2/3 of Hispanics and most other minorities  but is an inefficient annoying highly discriminatory and decisively UNAMERICAN system that is Hell on Earth for those of European decent. 

HOUSTON, WE HAVE A PROBLEM.

",StephenScherer1,e9i3yka,conservative
"There is only one major player that could really use an ally because their neighbor is big and bad and scary scary.  That player is Russia. Given a choice of being overrun by Mexico and enjoy corruption and poverty forever or Russia and accept a little inefficiency in exchange for troops who are tougher than nails; it will be an easy decision. Celebration Time, break out the Vodka.",StephenScherer1,e9i8al2,conservative
"Yikes, I don't know really how to respond to that. ",molon-labe7,e9i9gil,conservative
"People don't like to dwell on unpleasant scenarios. Veterans are more accepting of reality.

I would suggest you prepare NOW and hope for the best. History could be wrong for thr first time ever. 

Having weapons extra ammo and freeze dried food and bottled water will not hurt you. Lacking these items could be a fatal mistake.",StephenScherer1,e9iabzh,conservative
[removed],,e9gz9th,conservative
"A lot of them probably do. That said, their criticisms aren’t completely invalid.

The way I see it, it doesn’t matter what the left thinks. If the president does something good, we commend him for it and if the president does something bad, we criticize him for it. It’s as simple as that.",MrNukedDuck,e9h5k3z,conservative
Trump should have gone. It was a dumb mistake.,SickofInternetProgs,e9he8oi,conservative
"Our president not showing is disrespectful as hell. So many died during the First World War and he gives them the finger because weather. Get fucking real.

The politics and pictures posts are all stupid, it’s reddit, but I’m enraged at the disrespect shown to our armed forces as well as to the hundreds of thousands who died. WWI was devastating.

We on the  right are supposed to care about these sacrifices. But how can we say we do when the president does this.",neemarita,e9h83t1,conservative
[removed],,e9h5zr1,conservative
Seems true to me.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9h7b7e,conservative
"Look to the attitude towards soldiers on posts and comments not related to a military holiday.
",Briguy28,e9h28lf,conservative
This thread is a concern troll beacon,BeachCruisin22,e9hgl1n,conservative
"Someone in another thread mentioned that Trump's helicopter pilot didn't want to fly in the rainy/windy conditions. I don't know if that's true, but if so, there isn't much Trump can do about it. They take the safety of the president very seriously. If the pilots say no, then they mean no.",GuitarWizard90,e9gx2pg,conservative
The left regularly burns the American flag.  They're lying when they pretend to care.,StraightNewt,e9gy40n,conservative
"I can tell you right now, honoring veterans is something that is done for the media. 90% of Vets dont care to be honored, they would rather just have the day off to spend with our families. ",a93818,e9gyky1,conservative
The left will find any reason to bash a Republican president.  They took a photo if trump on September 11th and ran with it like it was excited for it.  What they didnt talk about is the crowd if fans in front of him he was happy to see,FranchiseVC,e9h6rxh,conservative
"The left tears down statues, they piss on history everday,.. so there is that.

I have a feeling this was more about logistics, maybe there was a good reason not to make the trip by road.  

I love how eveyone wants to read intent into Trump every action. 

Stop being so fucking hypercritical... ",ozric101,e9h05aj,conservative
"I do think it’s generally the left that says we have a military worship culture and we need to cut spending to the military and blah blah blah. And I’ve had the feeling since the story broke that if it was a democrat president they would applaud him or her for “being brave and not celebrating the needless slaughter of Americans.” Or some bullshit. 

But I’m not defending trump here either, I don’t know the whole story but it does seem to be in bad taste. ",CassieJK,e9hg4br,conservative
"I've read today that the French picked up on a security threat.  After all, they are welcoming immigrants which seem to spend their time car bombing, shooting, knifing....  I'm surprised I haven't read of them defiling American cemeteries in Europe.",cantcforest,e9hvl5k,conservative
[removed],,e9h1gue,conservative
"This whole thing has bothered me. Was he sick? ""its raining I'll pass"" doesn't pass the sniff test.",BroseidonZ,e9hbkha,conservative
Trump has been consistently good with regards to the military. That is why he gets the benefit of the doubt.,Astalano,e9h6kc7,conservative
">The way I see it, it doesn’t matter what the left thinks. If the president does something good, we commend him for it and if the president does something bad, we criticize him for it. It’s as simple as that.

This. I will commend when it is necessary and criticize, as well. We should all do this. Just because it's our side doesn't mean we are infallible and everything we do is praise-worthy. This was a big, insulting mistake. We cannot remain blind to mistakes just because it's the right. If Obama did this, as I had said before, we would be up in arms.",neemarita,e9j1smp,conservative
"The left controls the media to spin narratives that the use to aid Democrat opposition. You are a fool if you think that these tactics don't matter. Just as foolish as the people who say ""Trump should stop Tweeting."" No, you don't have to call balls and strikes as little Ben would say, not when you are sitting in the stands and the umpires have rigged the game.",Rightquercusalba,e9h99ob,conservative
I can't even fathom why he wouldn't have? He has been in rain plenty of times before.,JumpyPorcupine,e9jjx7k,conservative
Stop acting like you know the entire story behind the cancelation. ,Rightquercusalba,e9h8zij,conservative
His policies are the hero. Pretty clear.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9h7cef,conservative
Please show me.,Mamacrass,e9herxq,conservative
[removed],,e9h02o2,conservative
"So motorcade out there, that's what the other leaders did. ",0ttervonBismarck,e9h1n72,conservative
I have no doubt that [this man](https://gfycat.com/DazzlingAptKittiwake) would have made it if he could've.  He respects the military beyond all else. ,TheKillector,e9gy9s0,conservative
[removed],,e9gz4n7,conservative
"But then again, nfl players who kneel are considered the devil because that’s disrespecting veterans? Can’t have it both ways man.",jon_targareyan,e9h76wr,conservative
"So I'm just getting ready to go to church with my friend. He's 91 years old. Enlisted in regular army. He's been through some. We'll be there, in uniform. We'll stand in silence and remember our colleagues, our friends, our family members who made the ultimate sacrifice. And like every year we will shed a tear. There will be no cameras, no reporters, no TV crews. Just a few of us standing in silence and in respect for the dead. I am so sorry you feel the way you do /u/a93818, I really am. ",gaseouscloud,e9h8pnb,conservative
"It's the Nevertrumpers crawling back to this sub to voice their ""concerns."" ",Rightquercusalba,e9h9b46,conservative
"Yeah, if it was indeed his call to just not go and wasn't actually a result of some secret service weather protocol for helicopters and a lack of prep time for a motorcade route then he deserves the flak to be honest.

A lot of Americans died in that war, as did even more of it's Allies' citizenry; to pay respect at the centenary of it's culmination is just a leader's duty and responsibility.",Luke15g,e9h8d7x,conservative
[removed],,e9hekvk,conservative
"It is not enough to oppose evil, you have to stand for what is good. If we turn a blind eye to stupid or wrongful decisions made by Trump - or any conservative/republican figure - just because they’re on “our team”, we become no better than the bigots on the left.",MrNukedDuck,e9hbkaz,conservative
What's the story then? Why didn't he go? He could make a statement. ,TaloKrafar,e9h9b3u,conservative
"Everyone else is there. If they could make it, if John Kelly could make it, then our president could.

The truth is he did not want to go. We should not defend him when he fucks up and does something so awful and disrespectful. The cognitive dissonance is amazing.

Americans died. Terribly. It was fucking TRAGIC how so many young men were wiped from the face of the earth so quickly. In a horrible, senseless war, sacrificing for what. Peace in Europe. And he just told them who the fuck cares about remembering. \*I\* care. We should ALL CARE.",neemarita,e9h9u5n,conservative
"Unless he canceled because of an emergency at home (he didn’t) there is absolutely no excuse. They were commemorating the end of a conflict that over 100,000 Americans perished in. Those men should always have the honor of being remembered by their President, but especially on an important day such as this. ",TadKosciuszko,e9h9cww,conservative
What is the entire story?,gaseouscloud,e9h9dfy,conservative
"Show you every post and comment about soldiers not related to a military holiday? 
",Briguy28,e9ibt1l,conservative
"That sucks, if true. I'm sure there will be a better explanation than not wanting to be in the rain, though. They invented this thing called an umbrella ages ago. Maybe Secret Service didn't want him there for some reason. There's plenty of potential reasons, so I'm not going to bash the president before I hear an official explanation.",GuitarWizard90,e9h0f99,conservative
"Trump isn't just another leader. Take it up with his security detail, the Secret Service and possible scheduling issues. We have no clue what the people on the ground were dealing with at that time. This happened earlier but it shows how unpredictable these types of overseas visits can be. 

https://www.bloomberg.com/amp/news/articles/2018-11-06/planned-attack-on-macron-foiled-as-police-said-to-make-6-arrests

France is turning into a shithole, maybe the motorcade was deemed too risky based on circumstances we will NEVER be privy to. I'm ok with that.",Rightquercusalba,e9ha1h1,conservative
Is this a joke? Bombs and shoots up civilians? When has this happened?,nelsonbinladen,e9h4hvx,conservative
"Brought to you by the democratic socialist party. Remember ""We aren't communist only because it looks bad on TV"".",DozerM,e9h0jlp,conservative
Yep.  I’m a pretty hard republican and this was my first thought. So disrespectful not to go.  SO disappointing.,Guinnessron,e9h7dla,conservative
Just telling you the perspective from someone on the front lines. ,a93818,e9h8pew,conservative
"And I will drink a beer for the two I lost last year in my platoon, one was a friend and one of them was my first soldier when I was made a team leader for the first time. I dont see why you feel bad for me just wanting to be home with my family and not caring about if the president or a bunch of other people who are out of touch and acting like they care do. ",a93818,e9h9kef,conservative
">""I like heroes that haven't been captured,"" Trump on how he respects one singular POW, who was an opponent to him at the time and was regularly making negative comments about Trump. Trump also said he  ""would totally take it (the comment) back"". Trump got a ton of shit for this comment, as he should have, but any sane person would never assume that this attack on one person is how he feels with the troops in general. 


Fixed that for you. I wouldn't want you to come off looking ignorant or misleading. 

",AManHasNoFear,e9hhapu,conservative
"Give me a break, this has nothing to do with evil anywhere but on the left. It has to do with Trump critics being politcally illiterate or worse, they hate Trump so much that they are willing to pile on the anti Trump leftist bandwagon and virtue signal to preserve their conservative street cred. Sorry, but the evil on the side of the radical left is precisely why I don't pile on Trump and pretend that situations like this are a big deal. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hcxqy,conservative
He didn't go because it was raining too hard for the helicopter and they hadn't cleared a ground route. It was 80km and without pre-planning I'm sure the secret service nixed that idea real quick. It would be a security nightmare.,CynicallyGiraffe,e9hlrqb,conservative
[removed],,e9hansf,conservative
Save your concern for someone who cares. You don't get to set the terms or criteria for what constitutes acceptable in this scenario when you have no clue the reasoning behind all the parties involved. ,Rightquercusalba,e9hb6g6,conservative
"I don't know, that's why I'm not lashing out and crying about it.  Good grief, Trump has a solid track record of supporting the troops and veterans and I'm supposed to believe that this cancelation was some type of spit in the face of the military? The fact that the media is collectively  jumping on this like they would a grenade landing a mile from Obama's feet tells me they are desperate to create a narrative to damage Trump and distract from voter fraud. And useless so called conservstives are piling into this sub to voice their deep concern. It's pathetic. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hazko,conservative
[removed],,e9h0uyi,conservative
[removed],,e9h62tb,conservative
"Dude - they literally had *100 years notice* for this event, and he is the only international leader who cancelled due to “the rain”. ",bozleh,e9hd760,conservative
"The Office of the President is bigger than the man who occupies it. As President, Trump needs to lead by example. Do you think Reagan or Bush would have let a little rain prevent them from honoring America's war dead?",0ttervonBismarck,e9hsfht,conservative
[removed],,e9hezpg,conservative
"So they call themselves ""socialists"" until people caught on then tried ""progressive"" now they think ""democratic socialist"" will work.",ngoni,e9hdugm,conservative
"Is hard Republican code word for ""I'm not a concervative but I voted Republican""   You probably vote in a district where Jeb Bush is considered to far right extremist. ",Rightquercusalba,e9h9rrm,conservative
[removed],,e9hi1m9,conservative
"It’s fine that there’s more context and all but it was just a stupid thing to say in the first place. It’s pretty childish and in the larger scale of things, isn’t something the president or a presidential candidate should say. I can’t recall when the statement was made.",Jollybeard99,e9hij7s,conservative
"I’m not saying it’s a big deal or that he should be impeached for it, I’m saying we need to be intellectually honest and consistent. Credit goes where credit’s due - as does criticism!",MrNukedDuck,e9hd7kw,conservative
"What would you say if Obama did this? Every one of us would be calling him out for it and we would be justified. You have to be able to do it on your side too or you lose all credibility. It’s like turning on CNN or MSNBC and seeing them defend every possible democrat talking point, that is why their ratings suck because no one takes them seriously and realize it’s just propaganda. 

Trump has done more for the military in the last two years than Obama ever did in 8 but he was wrong here. ",Ravens1112003,e9hfa7n,conservative
No what I’m saying is there is no excuse. I don’t need to know the reasoning. ,TadKosciuszko,e9hbrp6,conservative
[removed],,e9hepy7,conservative
"You are a classic concern troll. Nice scrubbed post history, totally convinced you are a conservative.",Rightquercusalba,e9habn8,conservative
"You aren't very bright if you believe that. Go ahead, post the video you think proves your claim. Oh my god, Trump left the umbrella on the tarmac!!  He doesn't know how to close one!!!! Reeeeeeeee! Orange man bad! ",Rightquercusalba,e9ha6ta,conservative
"Cry about it a little more. Pretend that Trump said ""fuck it guys, rain is bad, let's packer up!"" Because that's how dumb people sound right now. Trump's  Helicopter wasn't able to fly due to the weather. His only option was a motorcade and you have no fucking clue whether Trump was advised not to travel based on any number of reasons you have just determined that it's all his fault. Nahh.. sorry, Trump has a lot of shit going on, tomorrow is Veterans day, he isn't snubbing veterans because he missed an event in France. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hg2r2,conservative
100 years notice? Then why didn't Obama lock in an ironclad plan during the 8 years he was planning it?,ngoni,e9hdmi8,conservative
"Reagan would get eaten alive in today's political climate. So I don't really care what they would do, especially not Bush. ",Rightquercusalba,e9inilx,conservative
"https://omny.fm/shows/the-dan-bongino-show/ep-849-were-warning-signs-missed?t=28m30s

Proof that you don't know what the hell you are talking about. ",Rightquercusalba,e9nk81r,conservative
It's called priorities based on circumstances that we aren't fully aware of. I'm not going to waste my time speculating other than to push back against the current leftist narrative that pretends to be based on all of the facts. ,Rightquercusalba,e9hifpc,conservative
Sorry I misspoke. I voted straight republican on the conservative line. Including REP Chris Collins.  I still think trump was wrong on this,Guinnessron,e9h9vd6,conservative
This was directed only at McCain and in response to McCain’s attacks on Trump.  McCain was living in his own world were he was immune to any criticism because of his status as a former POW.  Let’s not forget McCain is also complicit in the entire Russian collusion narrative.  Vet-great.  Former POW-respect.  Using both to further your self serving power ambitions-get the fuck out.,GlenGanges,e9hkspa,conservative
Then don't be stupid and compare it to evil. It's barely a blip on the radar until the left builds up a narrative and useful idiots that claim to be on the right help spread that narrative. ,Rightquercusalba,e9ip03q,conservative
">What would you say if Obama did this? Every one of us would be calling him out for it and we would be justified. 

I'm sure he has done multiple things like this. He has a track record of weakening the military and going on an apology tour bashing the country that millions of veterans have served and died for. So if he did this, I wouldn't be surprised. And I would have a damn good reason to believe he did it for purely political reasons. 


>You have to be able to do it on your side too or you lose all credibility. It’s like turning on CNN or MSNBC and seeing them defend every possible democrat talking point, that is why their ratings suck because no one takes them seriously and realize it’s just propaganda. 

That's why I don't fall into the trap of this propaganda. Trump has a solid record of supporting the troops and standing up for the American people. So when Im.told that this was weather related I consider it to be a good enough reason to cancel knowing other issues are likely at play here. A combination of weather, security, scheduling and priorities. 

>Trump has done more for the military in the last two years than Obama ever did in 8 but he was wrong here. 

In don't call it wrong because I don't know the whole story. And based on his track record I don't feel the need to speculate or judge him. It's not worth it. 

",Rightquercusalba,e9hi14u,conservative
"Oh, so you suffer from TDS. Not surprising. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hcpom,conservative
That's shows how little you know on more than one issue. Orange man bad! Just keep repeating that until you feel better. ,Rightquercusalba,e9hij42,conservative
[removed],,e9hf3f9,conservative
[removed],,e9hij8v,conservative
"There is no conservative line when you vote straight ticket. Also, you didn't come here to ask why it was canceled you came here to pretend you know that it's Trumps fault. You sound like a concern troll. ",Rightquercusalba,e9haisp,conservative
"No, I like the Don just fine. This is just completely inexcusable. I’m not “triggered” or “shaking” this is just an unacceptable thing that he has done. 

I know this is hard for some people to understand, but many people are capable of supporting a politician while also criticizing them when they do wrong. ",TadKosciuszko,e9hcux7,conservative
[removed],,e9hipv7,conservative
/u/bozleh disagrees. Apparently this is a 100 year planning effort.,ngoni,e9hj5sa,conservative
"Comments like this are small minded and inappropriate. It doesn't further constructive discussion AND it shows you aren't capable of wanting to maintain civility. 

",IndiaCompany,e9hk7o3,conservative
My guess is that you aren't a very good person and that you don't  respect the military either. ,Rightquercusalba,e9hixcm,conservative
">No, I like the Don just fine. This is just completely inexcusable. I’m not “triggered” or “shaking” this is just an unacceptable thing that he has done. 

Yes, because Trump said, ""screw the military."" That's the current MSM narrative based on his ""inexcusable"" decision. Pay no mind to the fact that this is the same media that gave Trump shit for having a personal cell phone and screaming NATIONAL SECURITY concerns. Well guess what, maybe this trip was canceled for security concerns or a combination of issues when the president is in a countryknown for terrorist attacks and a media which labels anyone to the right of John McCain a right wing extremist and neo nazi fascist. 


>I know this is hard for some people to understand, but many people are capable of supporting a politician while also criticizing them when they do wrong. 

You aren't just criticizing him. You have determined that this is an inexcusable act, a decision made by the president to snub the military and people who died serving their country. That's bullshit. You are jumping in the anti Trump bandwagon whether you realize it or not. 

",Rightquercusalba,e9hfk48,conservative
"He's not always right. I just don't feel the need to nitpick and speculate when I know the motives behind those that capitalize on imperfections and blow them up into big deals to fuel their narrative. They fucked up when they opened up the Russian investigation and Democrats openly resisted him by any means necessary. Now it's a full on fight, the fuck if I'm going to play sideline ref and spectator all at once and ignore the cheap shots they are taking. So what if he makes mistakes? That's life, and this fight is much bigger than Trump and if you don't pick a side you are going to get sucker punched. Sorry if that offends you, you do you, I won't ignore reality and play into the left's hands. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hkcuk,conservative
"Donald Trump using his personal cell phone to conduct business despite members of the intelligence community telling him not to is a national security concern. I’m not sure how that’s related but it is a concern. 

Why would they cite rain if rain wasn’t the answer? They could have very easily cited a vague “security concerns” that would have been accepted without evidence. They didn’t because that wasn’t why he didn’t go. He didn’t go because it was raining, and that is inexcusable. ",TadKosciuszko,e9hfy4k,conservative
"I'm just going to play devil's advocate here:

>Why would they cite rain if rain wasn’t the answer?

If there was something that would have caused panic, I could definitely see that as a reason to cite rain as the reason.

>They could have very easily cited a vague “security concerns” that would have been accepted without evidence. 

Who would accept it without evidence? Not any of the media, that's for sure. They would be running the same ""Trump hates the military"" stories as they are now. They would just say the ""security concerns"" would be a false flag or something. 

>They didn’t because that wasn’t why he didn’t go. He didn’t go because it was raining, and that is inexcusable. 

I agree that it seems like a very shitty thing to do. But to assume that the cancelation was because Donald Trump was worried about rain, without thinking of the possibility of the SS chiming in their concerns such as: needing helicopter air support, poor visibility, possible behind the scenes threats, etc. is a little short cited I feel. But if I am wrong, I'd be perfectly happy admitting that when/if info comes out. It was a shitty thing to do, but I don't think it was something ""inexcusable"" without knowing everything.",AManHasNoFear,e9hi51m,conservative
">Donald Trump using his personal cell phone to conduct business despite members of the intelligence community telling him not to is a national security concern. I’m not sure how that’s related but it is a concern. 

It's related because on one hand Trump can't use a personal using his own discretion but when security Co certs are a possible reason to cancel a foreign even he's 100% at fault for not going anyways.

>Why would they cite rain if rain wasn’t the answer? They could have very easily cited a vague “security concerns” that would have been accepted without evidence. They didn’t because that wasn’t why he didn’t go. He didn’t go because it was raining, and that is inexcusable. 

That's what you have determined because you suffer from TDS. It could have been a combination of things, with one reason given because it's the simplest one. If he gave a vague reason people would still be nitpicking and bitching and speculating and blaming him. And guess what, if he did that you would still cry and if not you wouldn't say a damn thing if Trump did something positive for the military. And that's how the media spin works, people like you are useless to Trump when it matters and useful when it benefits the left's anti-trump narrative. That's why I despise Republicans and so called conservatives  that trip over themselves to attack Trump, oh sorry ""criticize"" Trump. Just calling balls and strikes, nothing to see here!! 

",Rightquercusalba,e9hgpsx,conservative
"The president cited security concerns all of the time as to why they can’t do things. Think of the sign language interpreter thing in South Africa under Obama. In that instance they decided to give some evidence, but generally speaking they just say “security concerns” and if they are asked about it the press secretary of the secret service doesn’t answer because they don’t need to. 

The likelihood Trump would just take this without going off on twitter about it not being just the rain also strongly leads me to believe it was just the rain. ",TadKosciuszko,e9hihqb,conservative
Wildfires are happening all year round in California now. It's scary.,Terra_green2,e9jfoa8,conservative
It's going to stay that way until they either begin managing their forests correctly or the whole place burns up.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9jnmts,conservative
Nature finds a way. ,Rightquercusalba,e9jxv5n,conservative
I guess a few hundred square miles of inferno *is* a way.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9k9vxj,conservative
It's a way to return the land to mother nature because idiotic leftists are anti science. Fire is a healthy component of a natural landscape and ecosystem. If people want to put fires out they better be prepared to cut trees down or remove the dead understory. They claim to support green energy and then cry when fires get out of control because fires are suppressed during wetter seasons where controlled burning can be done safely. ,Rightquercusalba,e9kfyb6,conservative
I know.  ,Hillary_For_Prison,e9kg1mx,conservative
Pfft.  Acosta and all who support him can choke on a big fat one.,BrighamYoung,e9j7bc1,conservative
I’m sure some activist judge will immediately side with him.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9j83gv,conservative
Someone doesn’t understand what a free press means.  He’s free to report.  He’s just not welcome at the White House.  ,HammyTam,e9j04yd,conservative
"Like always, making everything about him.",KKN0PP,e9j8da6,conservative
Jim needs a job at a carwash. ,ozric101,e9j5zwq,conservative
Pound sand.,_Gardien,e9j62kb,conservative
House boi market.com?,FeelThePorn,e9lcc8k,conservative
yea....goodluck,donjohn1986,e9j0p7f,conservative
That's Don Lemon and Anderson Cooper. ,Rightquercusalba,e9jxwia,conservative
Then it goes to the Supreme Court.. and sploosh.,KKN0PP,e9j8c9c,conservative
"Here's a video (Space Force News):

https://youtu.be/X8SfB00WBRI?t=200",ChunkyArsenio,e9j5b68,conservative
"CNN just neads to pick a different journalist.  Actually, C N should pick an actual journalist ",tehForce,e9icqel,conservative
He doesn't want to ask legitimate questions. Just grandstanding and trying to get into heated debates with Sarah and Trump. Very unprofessional and embarrassing behavior. ,GuitarWizard90,e9ih5g6,conservative
Jim Acosta doesn't ask questions. He just needlessly debates.,SickofInternetProgs,e9ifwpb,conservative
Proudly run a kitchen at a restaurant that offers free meals for vets. Means we're super busy on Veteran's Day but worth it,Starguts_,e9gyww8,conservative
Glad to see some places literally putting their money where their mouths are.,danjvelker,e9hufjk,conservative
"Target is also giving Vets 10% of their total, so if you need anything around the house, may be worth the trip",LeFabulousFaggot,e9i06ve,conservative
"Funny today seeing all of reddit turn all pro military for a day because President Trump couldn't make it to the WWI memorial. 

They will soon go back to their old ways once another Trump bashing theme comes along. ",LunchroomRumble,e9gxjos,conservative
Thank you for your service,Delta_25,e9h8jcw,conservative
Like every time they’re suddenly in favor of federalism or what have you. ,skarface6,e9hu5kw,conservative
"**Submission statement:** [A myth lingers](https://www.quora.com/Why-are-CNN-ratings-so-terrible-Is-it-because-they-are-untrustworthy) that CNN is struggling beneath Donald Trump.

CNN is on track to earn $1.2 billion profit on $2.5 billion in revenue this year, and [ratings have never been better](https://www.vanityfair.com/news/2018/11/inside-the-trump-gold-rush-at-cnn). None of this is new phenomena. CNN earned [$1 billion](https://www.washingtonpost.com/lifestyle/style/one-billion-dollars-profit-yes-the-campaign-has-been-a-gusher-for-cnn/2016/10/27/1fc879e6-9c6f-11e6-9980-50913d68eacb_story.html?utm_term=.e2c3481875e4) in gross profit during the 2016 election, smashing previous network records, [as led by Jeff Zucker](https://mobile.twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/265476443138572288?lang=en). Jeff Zucker has now renewed [his contract as president of CNN Worldwide through 2020](https://www.vanityfair.com/news/2018/06/jeff-zucker-renews-at-cnn-through-the-2020-election), and has commented *if we break away from Trump coverage* ['the audience goes away'](https://thehill.com/homenews/media/414390-cnn-boss-if-we-break-from-trump-coverage-the-audience-goes-away).

> [TRUMP](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/12/28/us/politics/trump-interview-excerpts.html?hp&action=click&pgtype=Homepage&clickSource=story-heading&module=first-column-region&region=top-news&WT.nav=top-news): We’re going to win another four years for a lot of reasons, most importantly because our country is starting to do well again and we’re being respected again. But another reason that I’m going to win another four years is because newspapers, television, all forms of media will tank if I’m not there because without me, their ratings are going down the tubes.

MediaQuant estimates over a [$1 billion lead in free media](https://www.mediaquant.net/2016/11/a-media-post-mortem-on-the-2016-presidential-election/) funneled to Donald Trump in 2016. Foreign meddling identified in the 2/16/2018 [Mueller indictment](https://www.justice.gov/file/1035477/download), meanwhile, is estimated to have been in the range of tens of millions of dollars. Domestic media coverage is [known to have impacted the election](https://shorensteincenter.org/news-coverage-2016-presidential-primaries/), and yet this vital topic is largely ignored in our national dialogue on an ongoing basis. Political strategists have [attempted to overtly call this out](https://www.vox.com/policy-and-politics/2016/12/1/13803036/gop-boo-cnn-jeff-zucker-defense-trump-harvard), but now all we hear about from the media is the animosity passed back and forth between the president, his supporters, and the press.

[Another narrative](https://thehill.com/homenews/media/393981-msnbcs-odonnell-i-would-love-for-the-president-to-attack-me-instead-of-cnn) exists:

> ""I would love the president to attack me right now,"" O'Donnell, a former writer and producer of the NBC political drama ""The West Wing,"" said. ""I actually think he attacks CNN as frequently as he does because MSNBC is much higher rated.""

> The perspective comes as Trump continually refers to CNN as ""fake news"" in tweets, while ""CNN sucks"" is chanted by supporters at his rallies.

> As O'Donnell also notes, the president almost never goes after MSNBC, instead largely focusing on CNN, NBC News, The New York Times and The Washington Post.

> ""You'll notice: He never says the letters M-S-N-B-C. We have a much bigger audience than CNN. And he would prefer people to watch CNN, because on CNN, they pay people to defend Donald Trump,"" he continued. ""They pay Washington lobbyists like [former Sen.] Rick Santorum, whose job it is to do business with the Trump administration. They pay him to go on CNN and defend the president of the United States.""

> O'Donnell also touched on his rival in the 10 p.m. time slot, ""CNN Tonight"" anchor Don Lemon, opining that the president attacks Lemon personally because Trump supporters appear in debate segments on his show.

> ""That's why he'll attack Don Lemon instead and he'll never attack me, because Don is on in my time slot,"" O'Donnell argued. ""He'd rather have you watch a show, where, yes, you're going to have to put up with Don Lemon, which the president doesn't like. But a good third of the show will be a spirited, and insane, lying defense of Donald Trump.""

Vox has declared [CNN is mainstreaming misinformation for Donald Trump](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4pS4x8hXQ5c), with their 'prioritization of drama and spectacle over serious truth telling'.

According to legendary news anchor Ted Koppel ‘[CNN’s Ratings Would Be in the Toilet Without Donald Trump](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0ZOgnHUQ_P8)’. MSNBC host Joe Scarborough has openly declared that the network '[turned over their airways to Donald Trump](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HYnrBItsIqA&feature=youtu.be).' Former CNN host [Reza Aslan alleges](https://mobile.twitter.com/rezaaslan/status/1008047454577496065?ref_src=twsrc%5Etfw%7Ctwcamp%5Etweetembed&ref_url=https%3A%2F%2Fd-30968889111598055019.ampproject.net%2F1810021759000%2Fframe.html):

> Let’s be clear about this: Jeff Zucker made a fortune creating Donald Trump at NBC; he made a fortune getting Trump elected with a billion dollars in free airtime; and he’s now making a fortune pretending to oppose Trump at CNN.'

Larry King keeps his criticism simple: [CNN stopped doing news a long time ago](https://thehill.com/homenews/media/415669-larry-king-hits-cnn-stopped-doing-news-to-focus-on-trump).",system_exposure,e9jxxfs,conservative
"According to the The New York Times: [CNN Had a Problem. Donald Trump Solved It.](https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/04/magazine/cnn-had-a-problem-donald-trump-solved-it.html)

>But then along came a presidential candidate who was a human breaking-news event. Trump provided drama and conflict every time he opened his mouth. So too did his growing band of surrogates, who were paid by either the campaign or the network, and in one case both, to defend his statements. Indeed, it often seemed disconcertingly as though Trump had built his entire campaign around nothing so much as his singular ability to fill cable news’s endless demand for engaging content.  
 
> Had Trump lost the election, CNN would probably have returned to its previously scheduled struggle for survival. Instead, it has become more central to the national conversation than at any point in the network’s history since the first gulf war. And the man who is presiding over this historic moment at CNN happens to be the same one who was in some part responsible for Donald Trump’s political career. It was Zucker who, as president of NBC Entertainment, broadcast “The Apprentice” at a time when Trump was little more than an overextended real estate promoter with a failing casino business. That show, more than anything, reversed Trump’s fortunes, recasting a local tabloid villain as the people’s prime-time billionaire. And it was Zucker who, as president of CNN, broadcast the procession of made-for-TV events — the always news-making interviews; the rallies; debates; the “major policy addresses” that never really were — that helped turn Trump into the Republican front-runner at a time when few others took his candidacy seriously.  
  
> CNN was hardly the only news organization to provide saturation coverage of the Trump campaign. The media-measurement firm mediaQuant calculated that Trump received the equivalent of $5.8 billion in free media — known as “earned media,” as opposed to paid advertising — over the course of the election, $2.9 billion more than Hillary Clinton. Nor is CNN the only cable-news network that has benefited from Trump’s incarnation as a politician. MSNBC and Fox News each had a surge in ratings during the election that has shown no signs of slowing since then. Fox, the president’s preferred outlet, is coming off the best quarter in the history of 24-hour cable news. MSNBC, the network of the resistance, has been thriving, too, often even beating CNN during prime time.  

> But CNN was the first major news organization to give Trump’s campaign prolonged and sustained attention. He was a regular guest in the network’s studios from the earliest days of the Republican primaries, often at Zucker’s suggestion. (For a while, according to the MSNBC host Joe Scarborough, Trump referred to Zucker as his “personal booker.”) When Trump preferred not to appear in person, he frequently called in. Nor did CNN ever miss an opportunity to broadcast a Trump rally or speech, building the suspense with live footage of an empty lectern and breathless chyrons: “DONALD TRUMP EXPECTED TO SPEAK ANY MINUTE.” Kalev Leetaru, a data scientist, using information obtained from the TV News Archive, calculated that CNN mentioned Trump’s name nearly eight times more frequently than that of the second-place finisher, Ted Cruz, during the primaries.

Margaret Sullivan of the Washington Post offers [this analysis](https://www.washingtonpost.com/lifestyle/style/jeff-zuckers-singular-role-in-promoting-donald-trumps-rise/2016/10/02/7c3d4366-865b-11e6-a3ef-f35afb41797f_story.html?utm_term=.ab28acb6f1a1):

> Ratings. Clicks. Audience. Say what you will about Trump as a human being or a potential leader of the free world, he has an ineffable ability to get attention. He has called himself a “ratings machine,” and in the world of TV, ratings equal profit.

> “It may not be good for America, but it’s damn good for CBS,” Leslie Moonves, chairman of CBS, said of the Trump phenomenon in March, according to the Hollywood Reporter.

> “The money’s rolling in, and this is fun. It’s a terrible thing to say. But bring it on, Donald. Keep going.”

> Moonves’s ebullience makes it clear that ratings madness infects all of commercial TV, although, of course, particularly the cable-news channels.

> None rolled out the welcome mat more eagerly than CNN, which has billed itself as the “most trusted name in news.” And unlike Fox, which is blatantly conservative, CNN pitches itself as nonpartisan. It’s supposed to be the down-the-middle alternative to Fox and, on the left, MSNBC.

In the words of [Drew Magary](https://www.gq.com/story/cnn-jeff-zucker-thinks-this-is-a-game):

> There you have it. We are reduced to living in a TV industry where the head of CNN feels compelled to defend, to the President’s power-hungry son-in-law, his practice of employing a handful of people who refuse to actively support racism and sexism. It's not hard to see the profound effect that Zucker has had on Trump, and vice versa. Both men love ratings. Both men love attention. Both men love the art of spectacle, even when it's not backed by substance. Zucker treats the fate of the country like it's disposable entertainment, and Donald Trump does the same, and that is why nothing works.

CNN is not alone in its media malfeasace, but [interactions with the president grow more conspicuous day by day](https://www.nbcnews.com/news/all/trump-unloads-cnn-journalist-jim-acosta-you-are-rude-terrible-n933571) and our democracy is at stake.

[A symbiotic relationship](https://thehill.com/opinion/white-house/414927-donald-trump-needs-the-media-as-much-as-the-media-thrives-on-him) clearly exists.",system_exposure,e9jxyo1,conservative
"The fact that this article isn't satire is frightening.  That's the state of civilization.  Abortion is okay, but eating meat is immoral.",yizrmziw,e9l224r,conservative
"Hmm, but bacon",pickle-for-sanity,e9l1h2z,conservative
"Ending animal farming would hurt the economy significantly by putting farmers out of business and limiting the supplies of grocery stores. Man has been eating and farming animals for millions of years, and with new technology we have found more effective ways of harvesting animal product. Even if animal farming was ended, the number of people hunting for food would spike and animals would still die. So no, we can’t end animal farming unless you want everything to turn to shit.",McKnight36,e9l1lja,conservative
What is it with the vegan push on this sub lately?,goldmouthdawg,e9lw89e,conservative
"Everyone needs to eat grass, tree bark

No more good juicy steaks or  BBQ pulled pork",Chapka69,e9l3xdd,conservative
Screw that.,BrighamYoung,e9l4a6l,conservative
The obvious solution is petri-dish grown meat.,MisterMouser,e9loqjt,conservative
We just need to eat them before they’re born. Then it ok.,MrsNapalmNinjaBunny,e9l46gs,conservative
cali just voted yes for that...,Delta_25,e9llmbn,conservative
"> Ending animal farming would hurt the economy significantly by putting farmers out of business and limiting the supplies of grocery stores.

But if it's immoral to raise and kill animals in these farming conditions - and when you look at pictures and video it's hard to argue otherwise - then the economic consequences aren't relevant.",FelixFuckfurter,e9l3nw3,conservative
Not only that but the market has shown people are willing to pay more money for ethically raised meat and I think younger generations are going to further that trend more.,Adarkes01,e9l3xqr,conservative
"> and when you look at pictures and video it's hard to argue otherwise

Cutting down trees looks pretty violet to the plant. Is that somehow amoral?",greeneyedunicorn2,e9l5yjw,conservative
"Truth be told we should all be eating a lot less meat, for a million reasons.  Health, pollution, greenhouse gases, animal welfare . . .  

  

I however ate a Sausage McMuffin for breakfast and I'm mad at myself now.",FelixFuckfurter,e9l49df,conservative
">  people are willing to pay more money for ethically raised meat

Rich people who have extra 100s of dollars to throw around. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9l5wwh,conservative
Plants aren't sentient. That's a terrible analogy.,AnUnstableNucleus,e9lf818,conservative
"If you see no difference between kicking a tree and kicking a cow, please turn yourself in to the nearest police department before you start spree killing.",FelixFuckfurter,e9l6zrb,conservative
"German attempts to dominate Europe were bad, so we must embrace a German dominated European superstate.                      

",tau_decay,e9iathf,conservative
Aggressive German hautiness?,SickofInternetProgs,e9i5fdm,conservative
"I don't think it was a swipe a Trump. I think it was related to Europe. Specifically, and currently, Poland. Also, the distinction he noted between nationalism and patriotism is exactly the same as Mark Levin made on Friday.",ErasmusLongfellow,e9j1wur,conservative
It can be a swipe at Trump and Poland.  European leaders are scared shitless that European countries will start to embrace nationalism that threatens the European Union. Trump is clearly a threat to that union as well. The U.S has the ability to support some of these Europe countries that are afraid to defy the European Union and by support I mean trade deals and military cooperation. ,Rightquercusalba,e9jydry,conservative
Watch how fast that tune will change if the Florida recount holds the republicans win. ,NCSUGrad2012,e9ghxjd,conservative
"As soon as I see ""Trump......without evidence"" you just know that the media is pulling a scam. ",johnmrson,e9gsppg,conservative
"Same braindead NPC fucks screaming there was no evidence of Clinton gifting classified intelligence in real time to China, too.",Moonthrower,e9gnht1,conservative
It's ironic because Obamas claim xenophobic Claim about Russia was actually unsubstantiated it had no evide,ExpensiveMention,e9hfy4e,conservative
God this NPC thing is so tired. Some focus group sat down and discussed how to bring dehumanizing their opponents into the 21st century and this is what they came up with?,Rotau,e9gxvyf,conservative
[deleted],,e9hd0tk,conservative
Have you taken a look at r/politics?  Those bozos dehumanize conservatives 247.,mlmack,e9hc2un,conservative
"Its been a meme for a year or two, but never really took off. A study came out showing some people don't have an internal voice and gave a tenuous scientific foundation for philosophical zombies. This gave the meme a small bump again and resulted in the creation of NPC wojak. 

Kotaku, in all their glorious stupidity, wrote your current programming in an [article](https://archive.fo/HMa24) about their hurt feelings. Having confirmation that it really irritated the perpetually offended was all that was needed to launch the meme from minor in group joke to the wider internet culture. It would have fallen by the wayside long ago, as is the fate of most sub-par memes, were it not for people like you. ",ElbowWhisper,e9h4m1u,conservative
I uhh agree with that we should focus on these Russain bots who run this sub instead /s,UPURS145,e9h3eeh,conservative
The point isn’t dehumanization. Its pointing out the very predictable patterns of the press and canned dialogue of many progressive activists.,samurguy990,e9h47xj,conservative
"The lamestream media is absolutely a bunch of NPCs, autonomously screaming ""ORANGE MAN BAD"" when he kicked Acosta out of the White House for grandstanding, when the only reason they didn't grandstand for Obama was because his dick was too far down their throats for them to ask any relevant questions of his presidency.

Like why I lost my healthcare plan and had to buy one at twice the cost.",Moonthrower,e9hob5s,conservative
You wouldn't get offended by it if it wasn't so true my friend. ,ObjectiveSuspect,e9h044k,conservative
"No it’s because it shuts down conversation by telling someone their opinion doesn’t matter. It’s like calling someone an idiot and walking away. Russian influence on our system through social media does exist, and by ignoring it you’re hurting yourself.

Some of the most leftists articles about how mansplaining will destroy our county, and some of the rightest trying to make Hillary Clinton out as a murderer are, to borrow a phrase, fake news.",Rotau,e9hxdwt,conservative
"It offends me because I’ve seen it a thousand times in the history books. When your enemy isn’t human you can justify doing terrible things to them, no?",Rotau,e9h072o,conservative
Just like Russian bots ,jaberwockie,e9h0kxx,conservative
"No one is saying the left isn't human. It's a meme pointing out how they regurgitate lines and can't defend their own beliefs, as *if* they were programmed robots, not stating that anyone thinks they're literally robots.

Dehumanization is when you call an entire group less than human who shouldn't even exist in society. Dehumanization is, for example, calling a zygote ""just a bundle of cells"" that don't have a right to life. It's any time you use it to do horrible things to people under the justification that they're not human ""like you"".

No one is using NPC to do bad things to people. Literally all it does is make fun of the way they argue.",varemia,e9h5k60,conservative
"Its a fact that Russia has hired thousands of trolls to try to influence American politics. They are all real human people. 

Edit: https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.nytimes.com/2018/02/18/world/europe/russia-troll-factory.amp.html",Rotau,e9h0oz9,conservative
Lmfao,hello_japan,e9hal1u,conservative
Lol ,jaberwockie,e9h16t8,conservative
:thinking:,ObjectiveSuspect,e9h2bf6,conservative
Beep boop,Moonthrower,e9hnwua,conservative
Holy shit Trump's getting 2 terms,unityrootts,e9iplu4,conservative
"If the republicans are smart, they’ll bring up all the shit she said after she lost.",CT-2497,e9inqtr,conservative
I hope she primaries against Bernie again so they can have a Buried Alive match with the loser being put in a home.  ,t3ch21,e9inwdf,conservative
Note: This is an opinion. Hillary hasn't officially announced anything. ,TRKillShot,e9inzqt,conservative
Oh dear god,KaiserGrant,e9inh8g,conservative
🤞🏻🤞🏻,jina100,e9j5l04,conservative
I barfed in my mouth.  ,budado-head,e9j6esw,conservative
"I wish people would QUIT posting articles that are behind a paywall... Oh well, I just downvote em and move on...",LVDave,e9inqr5,conservative
"Republicans might not, but Trump sure will. ",Hillary_For_Prison,e9j5sdl,conservative
"“If the republicans are smart”

Already hoping for too much,",t3ch21,e9inzv3,conservative
"Out to pasture* fixed it


Joke of course. I don’t believe in politically motivated violence. But fuck both of them.",HolsterOfNuts,e9ioiou,conservative
https://old.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9w8c2x/wsj_hillary_will_run_again/e9is2xp/,tau_decay,e9isugg,conservative
If you open the article in incognito it circumvents it,PugsAndHugs95,e9iz497,conservative
"Flamboyantly gay Jew with a black husband... yup, my favorite type of Nazi.",PrawnsAreOk,e9i09v4,conservative
"Not my favorite commentator. Also not a Nazi. ""Two things can be true at once, gang"" - Ben Shapiro",burtmaklin1,e9idl0f,conservative
"I tend to be cynical, but that warmed my heart. ",NexTerren,e9hj266,conservative
Jesus. He's monopoly busting and enacting democrat tactics and they still complain? This has never been about actions it's politics and hatred for Trump.,Masteroflightning,e9i9vf2,conservative
Who's the party of big business again?,link_ganon,e9i6gc9,conservative
"Dear Reuters... get your head out of uour ass. The Postal service had a special rate for China with the intent of helping their  business growth coming out of the Cold War. Look it up. They were subsidized. Same with Amazon, got a spcl bulk rate deal... theur shipping is subsidized.",lax714,e9ieuuw,conservative
[removed],,e9ihb81,conservative
"Basically. Everything that's happened since 2016 has been ""revenge"" for HRC's embarrassing global-scale loss in a race where she had EVERY FUCKING THING behind her winning.

",AntifaArePathetic,e9imj5w,conservative
Seems like a comment thats a little detached from reality,Ledcookey,e9il68u,conservative
FOX News called the House for Democrats more than an hour before polls in Cali closed. I wonder if this was a factor in any of the close races.,Rightquercusalba,e9hcodf,conservative
More illegals voting I’m sure,rharravs,e9hbdhh,conservative
Anyone who thought CA was going to save the USA is a fool. CA and NY are cancers on this country and need to be cut.,J0kerr,e9hapdi,conservative
So all the election night commentary is pointless. If you’re allowed to mail in a vote up to two days after election then we should wait until everyone has voted then count the votes. In CA if you see your candidate losing just run your ballot over to the polling station. Looks like Dems did this and Republicans sat on their hands because they thought their guy had won.,the-divine-comedy,e9hfyb7,conservative
[removed],,e9ja36j,conservative
"Have to help me out here (actually asking for an explanation).

If the states and the federal government have a combined budget of 3.3 trillion dollars, and CA, NY, and TX produce 6.1 Trillion alone...I am not getting the numbers here when they say we are spending more than making.",J0kerr,e9kfyzl,conservative
Just FYI - this was the 2016 election. ,RigsbyQuist,e9gd5h0,conservative
"Again,nothing will be done. Same old story. ",Sakii20,e9hhnx4,conservative
Sad to see that when the left cannot win fair and square they resort to violence (e.g. showing up to Tucker's house) or cheating  (e.g. FL).  Just accept that the world is not willing to be the kind of progressive the left wants us to be.  TBH they are acting like the textbook definition of fascism. ,Big_Test_Icicle,e9grirr,conservative
Liberalism is a cancer.  No different than locusts who ruin crops.  The only way to stop it is to prosecute the slimes.  If they are again not charged then why wouldn't they continue to do this in every election,optionhome,e9ga7qu,conservative
"OK, so do we know whether there was any investigation? Either this woman is lying, she is mistaken about what she saw, or there was fraud. 

Is now the wrong time for #believeallwomen?",oren0,e9gw6n2,conservative
"If they've done it before with no repercussions, they'll almost certainly try again.",JoeWinchester99,e9gh0lq,conservative
Why let that get in the way of a catchy headline that generates hits.,synn89,e9gn776,conservative
A progressive's MO is to break the rules or the law to get what they want. They also selectively choose which laws to follow depending if they agree with it or not. This is the danger of a progressive. The rule of law breaks down if it's not equally applied to all.,anonFAFA1,e9gxu44,conservative
"Sad to see that right can’t win fair without mailing bombs or shooting up synagogues. The world isn’t willing to be the kind of Trump sycophant the right wants us to be. TBH they are acting like the actual textbook definition of fascism. 

",afrobinsson34,e9hysbl,conservative
It's not liberalism.  It's the leftist socialists that are ruining this country.,mlmack,e9gb63q,conservative
"it's not liberals, it is progressives.  You can deal with liberals, progressives need to be exterminated.  ",BeachCruisin22,e9hbfyo,conservative
"You're joking, right? Those were fishy AF! Not to mention it's the left inciting violence and shouting people down and censoring them when they don't like what they're hearing, aka FASCISM.",heartless_13,e9iim1f,conservative
100% agreed. Liberalism is healthy for democracy as it brings a different viewpoint to the table. It’s the leftist that condone violence and mob mentality that are dividing this country politically.,jacob406,e9gcu1x,conservative
"Classical liberalism can be fantastic. It’s mostly dead on the left, unfortunately. ",skarface6,e9ger9q,conservative
They’re normalizing Republicans...no!!,the-divine-comedy,e9hrl9d,conservative
"Lovely! We all need some good news. I hope Crenshaw goes far in politics, he seems awesome.",Terra_green2,e9i0zh5,conservative
We need more people like him in public office.,Canadian_donut_giver,e9icdc2,conservative
"Before his ""reforms"" the GOP had 19 House Seats.  Now they have 11.  That's 20% of the total from 35% before the great independent redistricting commission chopped up California.

For context, California has voted 40% for GOP Governors including last Tuesday and 4 years ago.

Some reform.",SickofInternetProgs,e9iws7m,conservative
I think Arnie has low T.,KKN0PP,e9ix2vl,conservative
[removed],,e9j9opp,conservative
Northern California has 2 GOP congressman and 13 Democratic Congressman.,SickofInternetProgs,e9kfu57,conservative
I have no faith in our political process anymore. They get away with everything ,JMB_was_a_god,e9gjc3h,conservative
"This would almost be funny, if it wasn't so damn serious. These folks are trying to pull some BS and it is staring us right in the face. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9ginhd,conservative
"Start locking people up for ""losing"" these ballots and watch how fast this stops.",Buddha_Punch,e9gs7ba,conservative
It’s just comical at this point. I thought they hit a new low with the Kavanaugh stuff and someone claimed he was a gang rapist. Making me lose my sanity. ,latotokyo123,e9gkcix,conservative
[Oh fuck right off with that.](https://howtobearedhead.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/01/tumblr_m4eqnhTwsU1qfl6alo1_250.gif),YankeeBlues21,e9gidex,conservative
"Trump is President. We had both the house AND senate... Trump is obviously trying to change things..... we still have open , and ridiculous , cheating on elections. Honestly, can the grip be broken , or is it too late?",drifter1,e9gukyx,conservative
"At this point, I'm expecting surprise ballots to be found in every election that hasn't been decided yet.

It's so disgusting.",gizayabasu,e9h1cwy,conservative
Are these enough to flip the vote?,imsofakingweedtarted,e9gq43x,conservative
"Doesn't everyone love surprises?

But seriously, this is horrible. Now I wonder if the same thing has been happening in the liberal stronghold of my flipped congressional seat. This throws trust in the process out the window.",from_gondolin,e9h5jj9,conservative
Sore Losers! ,Reppiks2897,e9gl09k,conservative
Stuff is getting scary,DefineTheLine,e9h6803,conservative
Anyone surprised that they're marked D?,heartless_13,e9j783a,conservative
Our political system is a hero that has lived long enough to see itself become a villain.,frozenrope22,e9hbd8b,conservative
buy ammo,BeachCruisin22,e9gufri,conservative
[removed],,e9h0s6u,conservative
And it seems that swing voters don’t care. They’re more concerned with Trump being abrasive than the reason *why* he’s abrasive. ,YankeeBlues21,e9gjw1f,conservative
[deleted],,e9h3cje,conservative
"10-years minimum for any obvious tomfoolery, problem’s solved.  Like that idiot down in Florida who’d already messed up previous elections and destroyed ballots, she shouldn’t have had the chance to mess this one up too/",Masterjason13,e9gtptx,conservative
"The Trump effect, he’s a threat to everyone who opposes him. Gee wonder why. ",xPineappless,e9gzz5f,conservative
Wait is that Mrs Malcolm Reynolds?,cragnathor,e9iix2h,conservative
"In Georgia, the Democrats are not trying to flip the vote. The Republican candidate is ahead by like 50,000 votes. The Democrats pulling that many ""misplaced"" votes out of thin air in Georgia would absolutely be incredibly suspicious and challenged to hell.

What the Democrats are trying to do is to get the Republican candidate's % of total votes below 50%. Georgia has a law that states that if no one gets above 50%, then the top two candidates will go into a run off election in December. Currently, the Republican candidate is sitting at around 50.28%, the Democrats only need enough vote to knock it down to 49.99% to get a re-do election.",PrestoPesto1,e9gwhmc,conservative
"You can never be too good looking, have too much money, or have too many bullets!

-Marcus
Borderlands
",Bonnypirate,e9gzsls,conservative
">Republicans actively suppressed votes in Democratic areas in Georgia. Democrats ""found"" votes in areas they lost by a narrow margin to Republicans. Both sides are cheating and playing the victim. 


Go concern troll somewhere else. Idiots who aren't even Americans hang out on Reddit and think they have things figured out. 

>What about the voter suppression that occurred in Georgia under Kemp?

>I'm no American politics specialist, I'm not even American but I frequent both Republican and Democrat oriented subs to get a clear picture and I've struggled to find any Republican discussing the suppression in Georgia.. 

LOL... Republicans suppress votes by not catering to lazy people who can't get to a polling place. Give me a break. 

",Rightquercusalba,e9h89wy,conservative
People qould care but the media doesnt cover enough,hipsterdufus84,e9glf57,conservative
"Tomfoolery or not, no one should even have the wiggle room to claim innocence with this. That level of gross incompetence with something as important as the integrity of the election process should be as punishable as intent.",Buddha_Punch,e9gtviq,conservative
"Yep. Christina Hendricks was in Firefly, but most notably Mad Men (where this gif is from)
",YankeeBlues21,e9ij7ak,conservative
To bad for them runoffs go well for Republicans in Georgia. And its going to be more noticeable as I doubt Abrams could get a turnout on the scale of this election again.,notagooduname,e9hio4u,conservative
"That seems to be the real problem. The leftist controlled media doesn’t cover this properly, and unfortunately the average centrist probably doesn’t realize just how fucked up this is right now, this not really seeing a need to change anything vote wise.",Masterjason13,e9gtlqy,conservative
"I have heard good things on that show, I need to sit down and watch sometime. ",cragnathor,e9ijg34,conservative
"Kansas will get a Dem governor for 4 years, then it will go back to normal (like the Senator in Alabama or Scott Brown in Massachusetts). Probably the same will go for Sinema in Arizona.",SickofInternetProgs,e9ikjd1,conservative
Kris Kobach is a moron and was a horrible candidate. Laura Kelly deserved to win because her message resonated with voters and ran a energized campaign,SilentKiwi23,e9igg9t,conservative
"Running a campaign is tough. 

I find that most (not all) Conservatives have a hard time letting go of the ""facts don't care about your feelings"", sure reason does matter but you also need to APPEAL to voters through a strong message. 

Each candidate has to find their own niche that makes them who they are. ",speedybuddy562,e9je5k3,conservative
"So my take away is trump endorsed a clown, who won the primary by less than 500 votes, then blew a sure seat.  God, so much winning. ",hipsterdufus84,e9i8lyp,conservative
Arizona is purple going blue due to Californians and illegal immigration.,JMB_was_a_god,e9it9hb,conservative
[deleted],,e9ili24,conservative
Agreed. ,etherealsmog,e9j7w7s,conservative
Yes because Trump should’ve known this guy was going to slack off. ,latotokyo123,e9igg6k,conservative
I'm Trump all the way my dude. ,SilentKiwi23,e9imnbu,conservative
"All it takes is clear cutting the brush. That’s what we did before the state legislation that restricted clear cutting because of an imaginary squirrel that lives in the brush, according to my recollections.",SaltineAmerican_1970,e9kjzmq,conservative
"It's the deadliest wildfire in history with dozens dead, and he's busy threatening to cut off federal funding instead of declaring it a major disaster to increase relief funding. Can't say I agree it's pretty disgusting",johnson881_,e9jmarv,conservative
"As poor timing as it is, California is terrible with land management. Very few forest fires occur naturally (by design) and very few control burns are scheduled, so, you get these massive, uncontrolled wildfires. Forest fires naturally happen. If they're are not allowed to happen, it's almost like nature holds off until there's a breaking point. Then you get a wildfire like you see today. ",molon-labe7,e9jrxdq,conservative
"Probably not the best time to point this out, but he’s not wrong.  Our land is extremely mismanaged here; too many trees per acre, bark beetle and drought are a dangerous combination. ",cbzdidit,e9jqzyh,conservative
"Of course you'd say that. Your entire post history is filled with far left/anti-Trump and anti conservative posts.

How about you just read the side bar and Mission Statement of this sub and then kindly GTFO. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9jszr0,conservative
"Yup and I totally get to let it be “natural”, but times have changed and our land isn’t what it once was.  There is more susceptible chances of fires happening because of man. ",cbzdidit,e9js85w,conservative
"Yep, sure. Well, there are three options because a fire is inevitable.

A) California let's forest fires happen.

B) California allows for controlled burns to happen

C) Wildfires happen destroying both massive amounts of wildlife and human structures.

Mismanagement causes these wildfires, but the fires themselves are inevitable. It's up to the state of California to decide what size of a fire they want. They chose the largest and most uncontrollable. So, you're correct, it's a result of man not taking responsibility for the land he is entrusted to. I hope the people effected by this are safe and they're able to get this under control as quickly as possible. It's hard to do so because controlled burns weren't taking care of fallen trees and underbrush, there's a lot of fuel for it to run off of. ",molon-labe7,e9jskty,conservative
100% true.  Sad to see how over-protected it is here. Water being another touchy issue ,cbzdidit,e9jugbu,conservative
Why is it that ballots that are magically found days after the election never favor republicans? Really activates the almonds,diehardgiraffe,e9httbv,conservative
On PLEASE.,Terra_green2,e9i1eol,conservative
"Because Republicans are suppressing votes /s


.....in districts run by democrats!",tmv4,e9hvnts,conservative
"Honestly this isn't a good look for conservatives. Washington, DC is extremely expensive. While Cortez is an idiot, we need to be encouraging ordinary people to serve in politics rather than just the 1%. I'm able to live comfortably in a low-cost rural area, but it would not be easy for me to cough up a $5000 security deposit and $3000/month rent on short notice -- especially since there are banking regulations prohibiting you from using a loan for these. And do we \*\*really\*\* want our answer to be ""ask for money from your donors who will give it to you with no strings attached""?",wharris2001,e9j2fxz,conservative
She'll be rich in no time.,LosSpamFighters,e9iuutg,conservative
"Im in the DC area. No one is paying $5,000 for a security deposit. Try $300 or $400. Also my one bedroom where I can see the top Washington monument from the balcony is $1800 a month. She’s being dramatic. ",Zac1245,e9j52l0,conservative
"Short notice? Did she not realize she was running for the seat until two weeks prior?  
  
I started saving money for security deposit/moving expenses/first month’s rent a full year prior to the time when my husband *might* have been moving out of town for a college internship.",jina100,e9j5fgj,conservative
Yeah but she needs to have the penthouse apartment with a private elevator. You’re just a deplorable. That apartment sounds a bit too nice for you. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9j5ewk,conservative
"Yeah but could you honestly expect HER to live in the slum YOU apparently live in? I mean realllllly, she’s obviously so much better than that.  
  
(/s)",jina100,e9j5iqa,conservative
This exactly.   Socialism is for the people not the socialist ,DPistola,e9j72lm,conservative
"True, she needs something more fit for the ruling class. ",Zac1245,e9j64uq,conservative
"True, the ruling class should not have to commute. ",Zac1245,e9j66vk,conservative
"Today's weather forcast:  Cloudy with a chance of butthurt.

**user reports:**

2: Civility

1: Russian propaganda

1: Spam

1: Voting Manipulation

1: Shitpost

1: lmao you dumbasses still have your feefees hurt since you lost the house? womp womp

1: It's rude, vulgar or offensive

1: You guys are cunts",chabanais,e9g81nz,conservative
"Wait, I took like 4 stickers, was that wrong of me? Just voted once, but wanted extra stickers.",PM_ME_UR_MATHPROBLEM,e9fd54n,conservative
Is there much evidence to support this? Extraordinary claims require extraorginary evidence.,JumpyPorcupine,e9fnn9d,conservative
"Absolutely right. I voted 27 times. My neighbor came home and opened his car door and his stickers poured out. I looked down the street and to my horror the democrat family from down the street turned the corner in their respective Priusi and one by one their respective stickers continued to pile up on the street. They were multiplying. It felt like seconds until suddenly the street was full. A monsoon of stickers raining down upon me. ""I voted!"" blocking out the sun. Suddenly with one massive crash the true tidal force of the stickers hit me. It truly was a blue wave",CanIGetABeep_Beep,e9fmsye,conservative
[removed],,e9fv7eq,conservative
[removed],,e9fbdcs,conservative
This literally makes no sense. Democrats love to show off they voted while conservatives don’t need to show off. Ok... ? I literally have not seen this in real life at all. ,Scientist78,e9g6qin,conservative
https://i.imgur.com/5ckIHDb.jpg,bsutansalt,e9foo06,conservative
This is unrealistic. Change the Democrat silhouette to a gravestone.,runeu,e9fg8uk,conservative
"I'm in a mood after returning from a long workout, so let me add to my above comment. 

If the Dems think that Republicans are all idiots, and hicks, and superstitious fools, then wouldn't voter ID be more of a hindrance to the Right? Especially considering the Dems higher concentration in cities and denser areas where the ground game is much easier, you would think that requiring valid ID and voting at the proper location would be an easy win for them. 

The only reason they would want such lax rules is if they think (a) their voters are much more inept than their opposition's, or (b) they rely on breaking rules and chaos to win elections. 


If you are not capable of getting a photo ID, and showing up at the right polling station, and keeping your registration up to date by voting every 4 years at least, then I do not want you picking our leaders. They do?

Look at the benefit laws. Every politician swears up and down that illegals can not get benefits, and that immigrants have to be self sufficient. This is written into federal code. But everyone with eyes and a brain knows that immigrants, and illegals, do get benefits. We know this. It is open knowledge. So why would they expect the public to have faith in our lax voting laws, when in so many other areas our government has proven itself incapable or uninterested in enforcing laws. The only enforcement is simple barriers like photo ID. If you are against photo ID for voting, etc. then you favor stealing votes from honest citizens. ",umaijcp,e9gh3ra,conservative
"Mods, we got an invasion on our hands.",sir_fenwick,e9fim2h,conservative
"Don't even take em.  Those stickers are a clear misallocation of my state's tax revenue, they literally have rolls of them.",highlanderiic,e9fbgda,conservative
"C'mon guys, your political ideologies shouldn't go against legitimately funny memes",E1eventeen,e9g9036,conservative
[removed],,e9gay3f,conservative
[removed],,e9gef53,conservative
[removed],,e9ghnm8,conservative
Someone cross post this to political humor,JackHazardous,e9fmu9f,conservative
70% upvoted. Being brigaded again.,sjwking,e9fpssg,conservative
"The election of Dennis Hoff shows the true difference between Democrats and Republicans.

Republicans vote for dead people. Dead people vote for democrats.",SendixBunny,e9ga0pk,conservative
"If you need a sticker to feel good about voting, you're doing it wrong.",ReaganTroll,e9fbitn,conservative
"Hey, everyone's vote should count. This is just to make sure the voice of those who couldn't otherwise be heard, the felons, illegals, and dead can be properly counted, too. ",PascalsRazor,e9frkji,conservative
WOW hahahah,steelallz,e9fk64t,conservative
Ain't that the truth. ,youtwoha,e9fgdry,conservative
"Ha, playing by the rules is only for those of us who care about the rules I guess.",fifsousaphone,e9fimgf,conservative
"As if the democrat voter would be wearing a suit!

More like white boy dreds and pajamas in public.  Or full drag.",booblitchutz,e9ffdo3,conservative
[removed],,e9fdeys,conservative
do as i say vs do as i say not as i do. That pretty much sums it up ,EnditAll4me,e9fyocs,conservative
You forgot the vagina for the guy on the right. ,hideout78,e9fpu9x,conservative
Don’t forget the 30 social media posts to make them feel special,slopezski,e9fpmg9,conservative
[removed],,e9fnu3m,conservative
And they are demanding more time to count the votes from the caravan. ,BlueFreedom420,e9fulex,conservative
"Ah, those must be the sponsors. Makes sense, both sides are bought.",Major_Dick,e9g6z1i,conservative
I hate Democrats with a passion. ,DigUpStupid1,e9ftgz3,conservative
So true! So glad they lost,sharkman100,e9fuvcr,conservative
">1: You guys are cunts

I don't know why, but I'm laughing hard at this one.",shinypretty,e9gjfqi,conservative
Le epic russian bots,Dannythehotjew,e9gawie,conservative
"Yes it was, when I voted they were out and I got none. I'm coming for you and your stickers.",ChuckJelly23,e9fpj0m,conservative
"> but wanted extra stickers

**NAZI'S WANTED MORE STICKERS TOO YOU FUCKING FASCIST!!!**",Jizzlobber42,e9fonyr,conservative
"I like the stickers too! Stealing a few extra stickers is pretty low on the bad things to do list so I wouldn't worry about it. 

I would do the same but at my polling place there's a person who controls the stickers and only gives one to everyone ",FlankingZen,e9fdk4y,conservative
Should’ve voted 4 times then. ,Intimidator94,e9fdk1d,conservative
Blatant cover story,alt_curious,e9frhz2,conservative
Did I miss something?,saucenutz,e9fv3q2,conservative
"https://www.thegatewaypundit.com/2018/10/four-democrats-caught-in-voter-fraud-ring-targeting-seniors-in-north-dallas/

https://empowertexans.com/local/two-democrat-poll-workers-plead-guilty-voter-fraud/

https://newstarget.com/2018-10-29-voter-fraud-is-real-and-democrats-are-behind-it.html

https://nypost.com/2017/07/14/the-vote-fraud-that-democrats-refuse-to-see/",Delta_25,e9fosok,conservative
"Do you really believe that the reason the Dems fight so hard against voter ID, updating voter rolls, and citizenship verification is because they are concerned that their voters are too inept to manage the challenge of showing a valid ID at a valid polling location when required? 

These are common sense measures and most countries have them at a minimum. Even if it is a fevered fantasy of the Right that voters are being bused to multiple polling locations, the fact that some people suspect this is justification enough to protect the vote with up to date rolls and photo ID.

I have seen it myself. I have seen college students double voting. Buses full of voters touring the city when there are polling locations within walking distance, and prefilled absentee ballots mailed out and then collected by candidate representatives knocking door to door.

The whole early voting/absentee/lax rules regime of dem states is an insult to all honest citizens. I have seen illegals with ""i voted"" stickers. And why not, they pay sales tax! (mostly). They receive snap and wic and section 8! If they are entitled to benefits, they are entitled to vote, even if the receipt of benefits after breaking the law to enter the country amounts to simple theft. What is an illegal vote on top of all that.
",umaijcp,e9g68sq,conservative
/r/nosleep ,HissingGoose,e9fuxx9,conservative
Beep beep ,FlankingZen,e9fspzc,conservative
"It's satire, pointing fact that once you vote you get a sticker. The Democrat in this image has tons of stickers because they voted more than once. The Democrats have a history of this, and it's where the phrase vote early and vote often (more than once in your election) came from. ",f0ru0l0rd,e9fxhu1,conservative
"It is, the GOP really need to work on their post election ground game if they want to compete.                   ",tau_decay,e9fd6kh,conservative
It is showing how democrats have no problems voting multiple times when needed. ,ngoni,e9ffjqu,conservative
It's a commentary on voter fraud being perpetuated by the left.,Canadian_donut_giver,e9hafyr,conservative
"I think you forgot a few boxes of stickers left in a bathroom, or maybe a school or car trunk.",RightMillennial,e9fumpl,conservative
BEETLEVOTE! BEETLEVOTE BEETLEVOTE!,Riggs909,e9g7zq9,conservative
With a couple boxes of uncounted ballots sitting in the background...  just in case we need them.  ,wh0ville,e9ga878,conservative
I know... I can smell the belly crack sweat from here!,chabanais,e9fju28,conservative
"You're right, instead of providing every polling place with stickers they should fill 1/3 of a pothole",FlankingZen,e9fdmub,conservative
"They should utilize that indelible ink for your finger. One man, one vote. ",mikeygio,e9fmiea,conservative
Only an NPC asshole would come up with something like that. Are you programmed by MTV or nah?,CherryCokeNixon,e9gzrgi,conservative
"What are you talking about?  You guys stole the WA governor’s race in 2004, the MN senate seat in 2008, you’re trying to steal AZ and FL right now and you most notoriously stole the presidency in 1960. ",CherryCokeNixon,e9gzqc6,conservative
There aren’t though. Gallup measures this every year. Liberals are third behind moderates and conservatives. ,CherryCokeNixon,e9gzo4t,conservative
They can only find their agenda funny. I’ve tried ,DavidGabrielMusic,e9fnuzv,conservative
Democrats want to censor facts. That's all they do censor censor censor ,DigUpStupid1,e9ftipj,conservative
"Should we not be proud of active democracy? Similar to waving an american flag, the ""I voted"" shows that we support our government representing the people, and I think it's perfectly fine to be proud of that, and want to show the world.",PM_ME_UR_MATHPROBLEM,e9fd45t,conservative
I don’t get why felons aren’t allowed to vote. Isn’t prison the punishment? If your working and paying taxes you should have a right to vote on the government that spends your taxes right?,ThIconclast,e9g7kyi,conservative
When it's in a different sub it's called a crosspost.,alt_curious,e9frok0,conservative
Ha I don’t like the original post but that got a spit laugh out of me. ,ThIconclast,e9g7pk6,conservative
"> they don’t even own a suit

Only in court. ",chabanais,e9fooq3,conservative
"Billy's joined the National Front

He always was a little runt

He's got his hand in the air with the other cunts

You've got to humanize yourself",chabanais,e9gnjya,conservative
ORANGE MAN BAD!!!!!,chabanais,e9gb3a7,conservative
"I've got a great idea: in order to determine how many stickers they need, they should have a voting day a week before the real voting day where people vote on how many stickers they want.",PM_ME_UR_MATHPROBLEM,e9fr7by,conservative
See. This is proof right wingers are violent!,SuperMarioKartWinner,e9g16ns,conservative
Yeah I got one and the lady was rationing what she had left.  Some little kid wanted one after her mom stuck hers to her phone.  It took some screaming from the little one to get the sticker lady to relent and give her one.  ,bluewaterredblood,e9g427r,conservative
My polling place allows voters to take as many stickers as they would like.,Somebodys,e9g5p3z,conservative
[removed],,e9fxme5,conservative
There would be a mass reporting of a republican that voted 4 times by the MSM tho,ItalianMAGAMIGA,e9fftd2,conservative
[removed],,e9fte8f,conservative
[removed],,e9fsy7u,conservative
[removed],,e9fsrj2,conservative
Consider only victory. Make defeat an impossibility in your mind.,youngandaspire,e9fuied,conservative
"Some people choose to ignore the fact that at that time, the Democratic Party was a conservative political organization.",carmichael561,e9g1cb8,conservative
I'm from Texas and the only reason that senate race was so close because every Democrat i've ever met voted but probably not even half the republicans i knew bothered to show up.,Patjay,e9fr0ia,conservative
"Democrats keep finding new boxes of ""mailed in"" ballots (coincidentally not traceable to any single person) like some sort of cheesy informercial: ""But, wait, there's more!""",nited_states,e9fri8j,conservative
Evidence?,Angry_Grammarian,e9ft0kk,conservative
Vote early and vote often!,etherealsmog,e9fih8o,conservative
"You might try a shower, mate ",shmehdit,e9fukzk,conservative
With stickers ,Reallifelivin,e9flsvu,conservative
"I would approve of that, government spending on fluff should be outlawed",GreatWhiteLuchador,e9fqxu2,conservative
Fingerist.,chabanais,e9foipz,conservative
[removed],,e9g72wp,conservative
"This is the Republican Party you're talking about here, nothing is scarier to them than active democracy.  Suddenly it's unconstitutional to count all of the ballots of an election just because it might keep them from stealing an early victory.",ZeroCharistmas,e9ffm09,conservative
By wearing a sticker you are oppressing all of the illegal aliens who have not yet gained the right to vote yet.,chabanais,e9fdvsw,conservative
Yeah but why did I get downvoted? Haha,DavidGabrielMusic,e9g6rk4,conservative
"Hmmm maybe we call that registration of stickiers day

Or just registration day for short",The_seph_i_am,e9fxyx4,conservative
free(safe) space,teamSpahr,e9fxu9h,conservative
"I like it....but Free Space should be replaced with ""Random Buzzword"" imo",Jizzlobber42,e9fxsw3,conservative
Stunning analysis.,Pontius23,e9ft21x,conservative
So you cannot factually refute them.,chabanais,e9fv6hm,conservative
>Only leftist websites are acceptable sources.,Dorian_v25,e9fv0rb,conservative
"This is essentially identity politics of news sources. You aren't criticizing their reporting or their sourcing of information. You're criticizing them by their identity as a source you consider biased. Every story should stand on its own, reputation or not. I think it'd be good if we applied this universally.

edit: -7 at the time of this edit. I'm curious what's wrong with judging articles individually by the evidence and reason they have? If something is false, it's easy to fact-check by other articles and by the evidence provided.",varemia,e9fycaq,conservative
"Can't attack the facts, so attack the source. Classic leftist.",unibuckeye,e9fzo1p,conservative
I love Zenyatta,FlankingZen,e9fun7i,conservative
Make sure to remind them if they ever complain about congressional gridlock.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gojkc,conservative
"Shame on them. Dishonor on all of them! Dishonor on them, dishonor on their family, dishonor on their cow! ",f0ru0l0rd,e9fxnij,conservative
"https://www.heritage.org/election-integrity/report/where-theres-smoke-theres-fire-100000-stolen-votes-chicago

Here's a good start.

Edit: 100,000 fraudulent votes and the only response from the Top Minds of Reddit is petty down votes? That some big league intellectual poverty. Feelsbadman.jpg",ngoni,e9fwa6e,conservative
"Don't you know your history? Look up the origin of ""vote early and vote often."" I won't do your homework for you. ",f0ru0l0rd,e9fxuv5,conservative
"I don't have a hose big enough for you, Champ.
",chabanais,e9fux58,conservative
Somebody elect this genius,FlankingZen,e9flw1y,conservative
"The goal of it isn't fluff. It's designed to remind others who see it to vote. There are some who don't pay go days well, or the day gets away from them, but after seeing a sticker... Plus it applies social peer pressure to others to vote. That's a good thing in my book, and not fluff. It's social gamification, and it helps. ",f0ru0l0rd,e9fy2vz,conservative
dont threaten me with a good time,Delta_25,e9fowpn,conservative
"Thats the problem. I post/comment all the time in r/news r/politics etc etc. Post with 3500 upvotes, i comment to try and spark conversation, nothing. 138 downvotes and thats it. Most of them arent even aware of what theyre fighting for or against. ",DickAppointment,e9g8wnq,conservative
"Even ballots found in a storage locker 48 hours after the legal date for everything to be turned in, Champ?  And then when reporters ask about it they aren't told how many ballots there are and they're threatened with arrest?
",chabanais,e9fg3iw,conservative
"Usual answer is ""tards.""",chabanais,e9g7rbe,conservative
Genius!,mp-,e9fxyap,conservative
[removed],,e9fyz03,conservative
Love how I post proof and get downvote brigaded,Delta_25,e9fw5g2,conservative
I wonder why mainstream media refuses to cover stories that would make the unofficial political party of mainstream media look bad. ,Magehunter_Skassi,e9fzar8,conservative
[removed],,e9g35n7,conservative
"This is the scary thing. If a news source a leftist trusts, say CNN, straightup lies, they'll believe it without facts.",ChunkyArsenio,e9g7o8y,conservative
"for the left, feelings trump facts",Delta_25,e9gnu6c,conservative
">champ

You aren't even old enough to buy alcohol, you don't get to call anyone 'champ' lmao",SMDNOED,e9fyag9,conservative
its a temporary fix stickers don't last long under load,Delta_25,e9fovp4,conservative
You seem more like a fist kinda guy rather than simply a finger.,chabanais,e9fq6mb,conservative
\^\^\^ found Tiffany,shinypretty,e9gjgpy,conservative
"NPCs. I’ve witnessed it first hand on more than one occasion. I’ve seen people come into threads asking, “Someone please tell me what I’m supposed to be mad at.”. It’s bizarre and showed me that the they do not think for themselves.",FuriousChef,e9h45cr,conservative
"As I'm sure you know, this is just the tip of the iceberg on what's going on.  10 minutes of research will prove that but this guy doesn't want to hear it.  It's insane how some people turn a blind eye to this kind of corruption.  ",flippy76,e9flba2,conservative
If you don't investigate something how can you find out anything I can assure you there is 0 incentive on the part of democrats running these major cities to look into cases of voter fraud.,chabanais,e9fzlek,conservative
Every down vote means $1 donated to NARAL.,chabanais,e9fzrw5,conservative
"CNN can sometimes report the news, they just always add their personal opinions, which I think is something news shouldn't do. Dismissing by the source is wrong on all sides in my opinion. Even in biased organizations, authors of articles vary.",varemia,e9g43x5,conservative
"If I were 10 years of age I would still be your elder, Sport.",chabanais,e9fzn2s,conservative
Run against him ,FlankingZen,e9g2h4c,conservative
Neither does coldpatch. ,aCreditGuru,e9g387f,conservative
When you post in here your use to getting fisted from the left,Delta_25,e9fw8bg,conservative
"> tip of the iceberg 

Da Joooss?",chabanais,e9fopwx,conservative
"There was a presidential voter fraud commission this year which didn’t uncover anything. 

And at the very least, if that’s the response, it’s asserting a claim with no evidence - just an idea that evidence might exist to be found. ",scsingh93,e9g0vu0,conservative
Apparently I'm doing my part. :(,unibuckeye,e9g6c9o,conservative
[removed],,e9g4r71,conservative
"I'm curious on your opinion on the FCC Fairness Doctrine than which the majority of was overturned by four Ronald Reagan appointees to the FCC. Along with the personal attack rule and political editorial rule it implemented being overturned in 2000. I didnt look very had, but there is a possibility it was overturned before Bush was sworn into office, but statistically unlikely.",Somebodys,e9g6cfj,conservative
Hunger games is how we should elect our representatives ,Delta_25,e9g3ng5,conservative
"> There was a presidential voter fraud commission this year which didn’t uncover anything.

The states refused to participate. 

>just an idea that evidence might exist to be found.

That's why you should study it.

",chabanais,e9g60un,conservative
God's work!,chabanais,e9g7snc,conservative
"Straight bullshit can be assessed by the content of the article. Dismissing it without reading it is kind of silly is all I'm saying. You call them garbage sources but don't even explain why. You just automatically dismiss them without even seeing what they have to say.

I'm saying assess each article by its merit, not by an automatic assumption. I think it'd be a good idea.",varemia,e9g5u5o,conservative
"I don't know enough details on it. On its face, it sounds like the fairness doctrine is forced political speech. There has to be some external arbiter of what counts as ""fair"", and I don't trust anyone to be fair. I just want more voices to be heard and reasoned with.",varemia,e9g6p8a,conservative
Televise it and the advertising revenue can pay for the games.,unibuckeye,e9g6fxj,conservative
Thank you. You're my hero.,unibuckeye,e9g9alw,conservative
[removed],,e9g6k7d,conservative
And you're the wind beneath my wings.,chabanais,e9g9dtl,conservative
"I disagree strongly with you. It's not about ""equal credibility"". It's about equal criticism of evidence presented. No one gets a pass just because they're believed more (credible). If neither presents good evidence, neither should be believed. And that's how a lot of politics has been lately.",varemia,e9g6ybm,conservative
Did....did we just have a moment?,unibuckeye,e9ga1gj,conservative
"And here is the problem. Trump and the right have launched an attack on the very idea of credibility. 

It's why you see so many people who couldn't pass highschool biology question the scientific community on a myriad of issues.

More importantly it demonstrates a naivety with the modern age. Those sites have networks of circularly confirming sources. If you dont acknowledge credibility than the 30 year Harvard scientist is given the same respect as a source as a 20 year old infowars editor. ",Expresslane_,e9g7fzt,conservative
Put the lotion in the basket.,chabanais,e9ganiq,conservative
"I'm a degree'd anthropologist, so don't bullshit me about credibility of tenured scientists. People in the field for decades are often wrong and hold beliefs that don't hold up to scrutiny.

I am saying judge each article on its merits. Whether it has good sourcing and reason or not. That shouldn't be controversial, but you seem to think it is by the way you are responding. Argument from authority is invalid in academics.",varemia,e9g7ncw,conservative
"Sorry, but there is no legitimate reasoning behind such demand. 

You never cave to the unreasonable demand of idiots. ",ozric101,e9i1o7o,conservative
They are going to do to Whitaker what they did to Kavanaugh,cmiller1225,e9ie05c,conservative
They are shitting themselves 😂 I hear the musical clang of prison doors for them~,heartless_13,e9j7kcj,conservative
[removed],,e9i24bx,conservative
"He's just acting AG until they can nominate a full time one though? Unless you mean the next AG would get the ""muh vague rape accusation from 30+ years ago without any evidence"" treatment as well.",AntifaArePathetic,e9imuo5,conservative
"Did you learn nothing from the Strzok hearings and the IG report?

Whitaker is allowed to hold his legal views they are perfectly valid. 

",ozric101,e9i2ksu,conservative
No. He's entitled to his opinion. The conflict of interest would have been if he was on the campaign.,SickofInternetProgs,e9i2ia6,conservative
100% no.  ,tja_1478,e9i2ump,conservative
"Yes, he's interim but they are still going after him like they do now. Woe be to whomever actually does get nominated for AG. ",cmiller1225,e9iozbu,conservative
"Nope I did not. Don’t follow things that closely, but I scroll through different political subs infrequently and all I hear is how Whitaker’s appointment is an outrage—just wanted another point of view. 

Follow up question if you’re up for it. Do you think Mueller’s investigation is worth protecting, or do you think it’s a “witch hunt” and a “hoax” like I’ve seen Trump claim?",bg752,e9i3c6h,conservative
"I think it's worth protecting and I think it's a witch hunt. Trump understands it's important to finish the report and I believe it will be concluded in due course. But even when the ink dries, given the amount of animus poured into this investigation by the left, they will never think the matter is closed. ",triggernaut,e9i45rn,conservative
"The Mueller investigation is over.  They're writing the report.  There's nothing to protect.   

The whole premise of his appointment is flawed anyways.  You don't hire special prosecutors to do counter intelligence.",tja_1478,e9i7j1f,conservative
"BINGO...  Mueller is just there to CYA and drag it all out until the public no longer cares about the many many laws that were broken during the Obama Administration and the election cycle.
    
Just another case of Government power out of control with No oversight.. I will be glad when it is wrapped up.    
   
Shame all the criminal will just skate...      ",ozric101,e9if51e,conservative
I didn't know an elections supervisor had the powers of law enforcement.  She's really confused about what she can and cannot do.,gbimmer,e9ffq91,conservative
*this is a grave threat to our democracy and free speech*,Dyeredit,e9fd8lf,conservative
Something’s super fucked up and we need to get to the bottom of it ,i_floop_the_pig,e9f6n4f,conservative
I believe they are confused aboutbwho should be arrested.,StephenScherer1,e9fcdqi,conservative
Ok why aren't these assholes getting their upandcomence? Is this jsut all outrage fodder? we need these traitorous fucks to be arrested now.,Dogfacedgod88,e9fme1m,conservative
"Haha, she played the fucking race card, totally shocked",Tantalus4200,e9fh67x,conservative
"This is starting to feel like this needs a Battle of Athens, Tennessee style response....",Menhadien,e9fek2y,conservative
"News doesn't report on leftist corruption, that would take up all their time.",BrighamYoung,e9f5xpu,conservative
Let him try.  Freedom of the press.,CreativeRoutine,e9gdbwi,conservative
Lot of disrespect for reporters going on,FixBayonetsLads,e9fiydl,conservative
The media is doing everything they can to downplay and ignore what’s going on in Florida.   This is the election fraud they’ve been screaming about for 2 years....but it’s not the kind they are interested in.,Obamasamerica420,e9hczrx,conservative
"It's amazing that the presidents bars a reporter for being disruptive, rude, and refusing to give up the mic, and everyone goes ballistic, but some random election supervisor is totally allowed to threaten to imprison the media.",Faraday314,e9g725b,conservative
What's the context of this? If they are being harassing then yeah I could see this happening no doubt. Reporters/paparrazi are crazy. ,Classical_Liberals,e9g9845,conservative
of course not. It’s not a big deal when liberals do it. ,jlewis412,e9g06ar,conservative
Democrats can do whatever the hell they want. Like the police in their district aren't corrupt as well. ,Rightquercusalba,e9fg6w1,conservative
I thought our country was a republic?,989x4000,e9ffi9p,conservative
"Cameras are tools of the white supremacy, bigot.",why-this,e9fi70a,conservative
"Tennessee is where that happened. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Battle_of_Athens_%281946%29

Very interesting story if you have the time to read it.",Havebaconwilltravel,e9fnsdj,conservative
"Lol, so accurate",Tantalus4200,e9fh0qe,conservative
I love your flair lol ,FlankingZen,e9fll7b,conservative
"Yeah, I think sheriff Israel might just go along with it.",rf-engineer,e9fxb98,conservative
"We are a Constitutional Democratic Republic - we elect our officials. The part where the citizens vote for their representatives is the democracy (small ""d"") in our Democratic Republic.

Election fraud is definitely a threat to our democracy and therefor our Republic.",kaioto,e9fjpf6,conservative
It is. Schools teach it is a democracy,CreativeRoutine,e9gdcv0,conservative
"Ah, thank you for correcting me.

It also serves as a great example of why the 2nd amendment is so important.",Menhadien,e9fsdm1,conservative
">The servicemen of McMinn County heard of what was going on and were anxious to get home and do something about it. According to a contemporaneous article by Theodore H. White in Harper's Magazine, one veteran, Ralph Duggan, who had served in the Pacific in the Navy and became a leading lawyer in the postwar period, ""thought a lot more about McMinn County than he did about the Japs. If democracy was good enough to put on the Germans and the Japs, it was good enough for McMinn County, too!""

Awesome.",nited_states,e9fvl3i,conservative
I agree. We have been battling voter suppression in the south for forever. ,RE1SY,e9fqdpz,conservative
I haven't been to school in 20 years so I don't know what they're teaching. ,989x4000,e9gdhqt,conservative
"> We have been battling ~~voter suppression in the south for forever~~ **election fraud schemes of Democrats from Atlanta to Chicago since the Reconstruction.**

FTFY

",kaioto,e9fslym,conservative
He should have offered to sign them. ,powpowbang,e9huslc,conservative
NSFW,DeadWater27,e9hj8fl,conservative
"as a member of the patriarchy, i just want to thank femen for using feminism to manipulate women into taking off their tops. men have been trying to figure out how to get women to do that for centuries and it's just nice that we're finally getting some help from the girls. 

also: kudos for sending a protester with nice breasts out there. some of the women in femen's ranks are less than appealing, but i enjoyed this spectacle very much.",SKWM3000,e9htfzy,conservative
Its never a hot chick protesting topless,hipsterdufus84,e9i92qj,conservative
Any idea why she had fake plastered on her tits already?,Xero03,e9i0ce4,conservative
I know right? She really showed Trump there. Can Femen start protesting in my city please?,bartoksic,e9i8ius,conservative
"do they have a web form on their homepage for requests?

could they show us their roster so we can select which topless protesters we want to show up in our home town?",SKWM3000,e9i8nor,conservative
Take his eye,lax714,e9iaoto,conservative
At least Obama and JFK were sitting Senators. This guy is a middling congressman with little other experience. Unless they nominate him to speaker then I doubt they are pushing him hard for 2020.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9hbhsy,conservative
">a young fresh face with *a sprinkling of woke*, a cool persona, a new perspective, he speaks Spanish, and would be an exciting and upbeat candidate

*sigh*",MadLordPunt,e9hd8y1,conservative
They could do worse than a lying DUI-convict. ,Glsbnewt,e9hxzwp,conservative
I think from a conservatives standpoint the more democrat hopefuls the better. It will fracture them leading to war from within. ,tsmithtx,e9hfe53,conservative
"Trying to re-capture the ""hope and change"" movement with a guy as close to Obama as they can get. ",IndiaCompany,e9hm70i,conservative
"I think he could take a real crack at 2020 presidential run. He runs good campaigns and would be very easy for moderate voters to get behind. 

On the other hand if you want substance beto isnt your guy. His whole campaign was good feelings and helping the poor.",CanIShowYouMyDick,e9iepqc,conservative
So who's going to break it to Kamala and Cory that it's the white guys turn?,MooMooCudChew,e9i6jo1,conservative
"Bring it, Beta! Our Alpha will destroy you!",heartless_13,e9j7ah5,conservative
"He’s not even in Congress the next two years. Granted, I’m sure the DNC will find something for him to do in the interim but I feel like his time will be 2024 likely. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9hdq2h,conservative
Exactly! He's a freaking white cis-male for flying spaghetti's sake! ,putercom5,e9hc1tj,conservative
Trump was a businessman and reality star with no political experience at all and he won. ,friedkabob,e9hevsm,conservative
"He can't be speaker without being a rep.

edit: You learn something everyday...

",ReaganTroll,e9hc60l,conservative
I still put multi international bussiness CEO as more experience than congress. Same with IKE being head of Army. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9hfr5y,conservative
"George W. Bush was a Governor, didn't matter then. ",PoppaTitty,e9hobhz,conservative
Speaker doesn’t actually have to be a representative. Weird quirk of the constitution.,fishnchipzyeah,e9hjq3h,conservative
"Actually, he technically could. But he won't. ",soxfan90,e9hf8z3,conservative
"I’ve never understood this position because I don’t believe the government should be run like a business, and even if there are similarities between the two I don’t think Trumps approach to business translates well to governance. But either way, my point is that the presidency doesn’t come with a minimum government experience requirement and shouldn’t. It’s a beautiful thing that the American people can choose any citizen they wish to lead the country. ",friedkabob,e9hgejz,conservative
"Perhaps it would help to think of politics as the process by which resources and power are allocated in society. In that case business man, congressman, general..anyone with an understanding of how a large organization works can be considered to have experience in the realm of politics.",subversive07,e9hybwc,conservative
Yeah what's 20T in debt and 200T in unfunded liabilities among friends? What could go wrong?,ngoni,e9iwfgo,conservative
"""Four people arrested and linked to the French extreme right were on Saturday charged over a suspected plot to attack President Emmanuel Macron during World War I remembrance ceremonies.
The four men aged between 22 and 62 appeared before an anti-terrorism judge in Paris and were charged with associating with terrorists and arms possession.

They were arrested on Tuesday after one man, living in southeastern France and armed with a knife, travelled to Moselle, eastern France, where he met with three other suspects""


Is it far-fetched to believe that these terrorists or others might have also been targeting President Trump?

Ive heard Trump has been moving solo during this whole trip due to security concerns. As much as Trump loves the military, i doubt he is snubbing them in the way the media and reddit is implying...


Yesterdays event :
""https://www.cnbc.com/2018/11/10/trump-cancels-ww1-memorial-at-us-cemetery-in-france-due-to-rain-sparking-twitterstorm.html""

 ""White House officials said the decision was taken due to the weather and cited security concerns in hastily arranging a motorcade""


Todays event: https://thehill.com/homenews/administration/416102-trump-arrives-separately-as-world-leaders-gather-to-mark-end-of-wwi""


""White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders said in a statement that Trump arrived separately ""due to security protocols.""

And inb4 ""what is this website"" 

https://mediabiasfactcheck.com/ndtv/

Factual Reporting: HIGH

",Boon-Lord,e9haryg,conservative
Yea this might explain a lot of Trump’s actions this weekend.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9hb1uh,conservative
That and he knew that they were going to shit all over him by attacking his brand of American nationalism aka patriotism. ,Rightquercusalba,e9ir28g,conservative
"I love the tag line. 77% of Democrat voters supported impeaching Trump in 2018. Uh yeah, cause they’re sore loser cry babies. I guarantee you 100% of those asked couldn’t give you a single impeachable offense backed by evidence. Know why? There isn’t one. I’m more and more convinced that Democrats are plain fucking retarded.",HolsterOfNuts,e9hm9rg,conservative
Isn't it funny that the Democrats promise everything under the sun and never follow through? Even impeaching President Trump?,heartless_13,e9ijode,conservative
"They can totally impeach him.   Impeachment is a political decision, not a legal one.  They don't need a crime to do it.  Of course without evidence of a truly heinous crime the impeachment will be stopped cold in the Senate and Democrats will suffer massive political fallout in the next election. ",Hillary_For_Prison,e9jnt9g,conservative
"When you can not longer feed the mob you created red meat, they tend to turn you.

",ozric101,e9i2bp6,conservative
Good gesture. I can always appreciate it when both sides can get together and laugh with each other.,halleyscomit,e9gwfof,conservative
Good move by SNL.  I got to meet dan a few weeks ago.  Told him i would love to vote for him but unfortunately wasn’t in his district. ,Metaljoetx,e9gyl0n,conservative
"That's the way to do it.

But the video wasn't working.  Here's [another site](https://www.avclub.com/snls-pete-davidson-eats-crow-for-mocking-wounded-vet-da-1830366346).",paulbrook,e9hf25r,conservative
Steven Crowder's take: https://www.louderwithcrowder.com/dan-crenshaw-snl-appearance/,DBG1998,e9gzoyn,conservative
"I’ve never enjoyed those shows, so welcome to the club. You’ve seen behind the curtain, now you can’t unsee what they really are",YankeeBlues21,e9gsy63,conservative
"The Daily Show used to be legitimately funny. You can say what you want about Jon Stewart but you can't deny he's a smart guy. 

Since Noah however... boy did that show take a nosedive. Just embarrassing nowadays.

&nbsp;

As for entertainment, just get a Netflix subscription. Lots and lots of high quality, apolitical content.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gv806,conservative
"i think many on the left now believe that they cannot remain neutral, because to remain neutral allows us to have an influence. so it's becoming difficult to find entertainment that isn't in some way shitting on us.",SKWM3000,e9gt6x8,conservative
"Not trying to be cliche but you took the red pill, no going back now.",Havebaconwilltravel,e9hf005,conservative
"I got rid of cable. I can’t watch anything overly political. For example, I was LOVING this new show, New Amsterdam and then like episode 4 or so they had this super over political episode about race and police and it has ruined it for me. I’m just tired of having it shoved down my throat from EVERY ANGLE. It’s like it’s mandatory for a show to do it now.",HolsterOfNuts,e9gtgga,conservative
I think Crowder is pretty funny. Owen Benjamin is also pretty good. Try those two.. ,mikelarue1,e9h6qoo,conservative
There are tons of choices these days. I like to just rewatch older (90s) TV comedies. Still funny with less political bias. ,Terra_green2,e9gviv8,conservative
"Honestly, the optimist inside of me says that people will wake up and see how slanted the mainstream has become very soon. There was a glimmer about a month ago when the kavenaugh debacle was happening, but im starting to loose hope. It seems even here in the south, the NPC mentality has taken root and may not ever truly be weeded out.",freedomhertz,e9hak4q,conservative
"No it's TRUE, Hollywood shoehorns in a bunch of conservative bashing shit that just wrecks media but achieves their narratives. Look at the Predator movie that came out. They had that comedian from Key and Peel. Almost immediately the first scene was a Fuck God scene and fuck the military scene. Fucking blatant propaganda. I often screen media based on who is in said media. I also watch a ton of foreign media as well. ",Kite23,e9her56,conservative
"Most modern entertainment has been infected with feminism and sjwism.

Just look what they do with movies and video games.

They try to bully people onto enforcing their ideas, in the name of ""tolerance"".",Azul19,e9h3p5k,conservative
"commenting on yours because it was first, but yes, exactly. I wouldn't say ""truth"" (because everyone has an angle, and they are all flawed to a certain extent) but its like, once you start getting the other sides opinion, you realize how much the left is pushing their agenda and how skewed they are making everything.",psycopuppy,e9gtvxn,conservative
"I have that, any shows/ stand up specials you can recommend when I'm trying to turn my brain off at the end of the day?",psycopuppy,e9gvdyw,conservative
"Yeah, no. I used to think he was a smart guy until the writers' strike happened. He tried to do it ~~on his own~~ with just a few writers and boy did it tank.

EDIT: that was November 2007 to February 2008. It was painfully obvious that the brains were with the writers.",dotlurk,e9gz0tb,conservative
"It's in music too. I love Kane Brown (country artist) and most of his new album is great. Until his more political song ""American Bad Dream"" about school shootings and black people getting killed by cops. ",Bostonbuckeye,e9m5gg0,conservative
"Just like that new star trek series, it started of well enough but just had to introduce hamfisted propaganda about authoritarian regimes and ""liberal"" values.",dotlurk,e9gyzcp,conservative
Last Man Standing is great too.,unibuckeye,e9ha3xr,conservative
"That’s what I’m saying. You’ve seen that it’s not “comedy”, it’s “preaching”. Things like late night shows are the secular, leftist version of a televangelist program. ",YankeeBlues21,e9gu0ug,conservative
"I’ll throw out some shows currently on Netflix off the top of my head.

If you’ve never seen it, Mad Men is one of the reasons I still have my Netflix account (for my annual rewatch). Peaky Blinders is a fantastic show, particularly if you’re already a fan of the similar Boardwalk Empire. The 3rd season of The Last Kingdom is about to drop, so if you like historical dramas, that could be something to get into. If you like American history, Turn was a good show about a Revolutionary War spy ring. Luther is a solid detective show if you’re an Idris Elba fan. Father Brown is a cute little detective show I like to have on in the background while I do some other stuff, definitely worth it for GK Chesterton fans. And don’t forget the classic Twilight Zone",YankeeBlues21,e9gx5qm,conservative
"The joe rogan stand up is fucking hilarious, my brother and I were crying through the whole thing.",freedomhertz,e9h7cu8,conservative
"Demetri Martin and Dana Carvey (hes actually right leaning), both have good stand up shows on Netflix.",breeskys,e9hayuj,conservative
"If you give us some examples of things you like, perhaps other users and I can recommend stuff that's up your alley.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gvjc6,conservative
"Anthony Jeselnik - dark, dark humor with cocky dead pan delivery.

Dave Chappelle - Has a Netflix series. I watched the first episode. Pretty funny and not overly political

Mitch Hedberg - no politics at all, pretty funny observational humor. RIP Mitchell!

Anjelah Johnson (How We Do it) - An actual funny female comedian unlike Sarah Silverman or Amy Schumer

Jim Gaffigan - pretty funny apolitical comedy, but uses ""the voice"" a little too much and it does get old.",super_ag,e9hfu5r,conservative
"Watch the Tom Segura and John Muleney standup.

In his new standup, John gets a little political but he's pretty fair with it. 

""But the last guy did a the same bad things and you didn't care before!""

""Well I wasn't paying attention before!  And that sounds like a copout, but the last guy really looked the part of someone who knew what they were doing, so I focused on other stuff.""",MamaBare,e9hauy7,conservative
"And the worst thing is that their young college liberal audiences genuinely think that they're ""staying informed"". 

That John Oliver is laying down hard truths instead of being just a mouthpiece who's pushing an agenda. You'd almost admire the propaganda machine that's been created; because people aren't just willing to listen to it- they *actively crave it*.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gvgrr,conservative
Peaky Blinders is legit. Very very good show and very very enjoyable. Feel like the intro to the episodes are very well done.  ,Derp2638,e9gxlep,conservative
Ozark! And the ranch ,Chapka69,e9h4yfx,conservative
The Last Kingdom was my unexpected binge watch of the past few months. ,smokejaguar,e9h9opd,conservative
"His most recent one, or the first Netflix special?",MarkNUUTTTT,e9hk0fi,conservative
"Spot on, I liked the first few John Oliver episodes and older Colbert episodes, even if they seemed to skew left. The more I started diving into their arguments and analyzing their takes, the more I realized how flawed or shallow the political takes were. It’s like that one shitty Poltics user who posts a fuckload of links every post and that is somehow supposed to mean Trump is a Manchurian Candidate, but really it’s all a bunch of nonsense, speculation and double-backs. 

I used to give these shows the benefit of the doubt, but now all I can see is political indoctrination crafted by mid-20s staff writers who know little to nothing about the real world or nuanced politics.",SirRollsaSpliff,e9gwrzc,conservative
I think it was the special,freedomhertz,e9hl79v,conservative
No. It wasn't a mix up. She is actively attempting to commit voter fraud. Lock her up.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9ga069,conservative
WTF country is this? VENEZUELA?! ,TSX_50,e9gb6qu,conservative
Economic fraud carries prison sentences from 10-15 years. Electoral fraud usually 5 or less. This is out of whack. These laws need to be stiffened and offenses aggressively prosecuted. ,PhilosoGuido,e9gmcxb,conservative
"""Mix up"" ",ConsistentlyRight,e9gquha,conservative
Ok so don't count any of them. ,Glsbnewt,e9hcmy0,conservative
How is this POS even allowed to oversee the vote on who gets to pick up dog shit?,GlenGanges,e9h6slc,conservative
"20 ballots out of a random 205 ballots is approximately 10%. So 10% of the ballots that were randomly selected for verification were fraudulent.

There were approximately 800k votes in Broward and 80,000 “found” votes.... again... 10%.

Whoops. ",hello_japan,e9hb1mb,conservative
"Public Office corruption and malfeasance should carry a life sentence or a death sentence whatever the jury decides is appropeate, it is an exteam volution of the public trust and should NEVER be tolerated in a free society.   
    
Sadly the people we trust to make our laws have seen fit to tilt the tables to protect themselves from ANY responsiblity.       ",ozric101,e9gq4fx,conservative
"Whoops! The mixups keep coming. 

https://twitchy.com/dougp-3137/2018/11/10/surprise-georgia-democrats-encouraged-as-thousands-of-new-votes-have-come-in-for-stacey-abrams/",BudrickBundy,e9grirh,conservative
"Locking the comments since this has become a cesspool of leftist brigaders and conservatives who are unquestioningly accepting the left's narrative. A statement from the White House says: “The President and First Lady’s trip to Ainse-Marne American Cemetery and Memorial has been canceled due to scheduling and logistical difficulties caused by the weather. An American delegation led by Chief of Staff General John Kelly and Chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff General Joe Dunford will attend on their behalf.”

Let's apply some common sense to this narrative that is being sold to us. Some counter-points to consider:

1. The President has been arguably the strongest supporter of veterans issues in the office since Reagan. Is it more likely that he doesn't care and ditched the event purposely or that this was, in fact, a logistical error in the Secret Service planning for an alternate transportation method?

2. The President has security requirements that far exceed that of other dignitaries, officials or even foreign heads of state, especially in a nation of extreme leftists that hate this President. If a contingency plan for a motorcade was not in place already, it is impossible that a proper one could be developed immediately on the fly. 

3. The Secret Service is not perfect and has suffered a [number of recent high profile scandals](https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2015/03/secret-service-disaster-timeline/387643/) (drunk-driving, prostitution, sloppy investigations and advance work, multiple cases of unauthorized persons breaching barriers). These occurred under Obama, and strangely the leftist media never had personal criticism for Obama over their failures. This, however, is all Trump's fault. In fact, we're supposed to believe that he just didn't want to go and this is a coverup.

4. If the President didn't plan on attending, why would he have made the trip over there in the first place?

5. The left loves to attack their opponents of what they are guilty of. The left has a long history of disrespect for the military and for veterans. From spitting on soldiers, to burning flags, to insulting veterans, to kneeling for the anthem, to attempting to disenfranchise servicemen's absentee ballots, to endless attempts to defund the military, etc, etc. Are we really getting the whole truth from the leftist media, or is this an attempt to attack a Republican to detract from their long history of the same? ",PhilosoGuido,e9hxdeo,conservative
[removed],,e9h058c,conservative
"He deserves it for this. Hes been a great President, but his mouth and this event havent been very good.

That being said, its not like this thing makes me think he doesnt support the Military. He's done much in the past to honor those that serve and have served. ",Ledcookey,e9gws7v,conservative
any truth to the claim that his security detail nixed the trip?,SKWM3000,e9hgt80,conservative
1 hour  long motor cad yeah how about no...,Delta_25,e9gvmys,conservative
"This is yet another situation where trump does something, I’m supposed to care, but I just don’t. ",link_ganon,e9h4yqu,conservative
[deleted],,e9gzmyp,conservative
No it's not. And big surprise that Fox News virtue signals on issues like this. They better get Chris Wallace on the scene to uncover the truth! ,Rightquercusalba,e9hde9h,conservative
[removed],,e9h7q76,conservative
[removed],,e9gw1f1,conservative
[removed],,e9h8beg,conservative
People who hate trump that's who,Delta_25,e9h4era,conservative
[removed],,e9he31m,conservative
Edit your comment all you want to whine. It's been deleted too. No one will read it.,PhilosoGuido,e9hp0dl,conservative
He's the leader of the fucking free world.  You think he can just ride along in any random limo or taxi they find?  You know how many active assassination plots there are against him at any one time?  Seriously.  The Secret Service probably didn't let him go cause they don't want a fucking potential presidential assassination on their hands.    ,SwimmingJunky,e9gwxt8,conservative
"an hour long drive through a foreign country overrun with ""immigrants"" yeah how about no. ",Delta_25,e9gxses,conservative
">Because he just gave a huge middle finger to the thousanda who died. It’s a middle finger from all of us Americans by our president not showing up. 

That's bullshit. Trump has honored thousand that have died and those that have or are serving.

>I can not believe people are defending this. Even my dad who’s a staunch supporter is disgusted and furious, between this and his tweets about the fires here.

Lol, yeah right.

>What would we say if Obama did it? We’d be up in arms, rightly. And we know he gave no fucks about our military.

That's the difference that you clearly can't see. We knew Obama didn't give a shit. 

",Rightquercusalba,e9hdobq,conservative
"Good work comrade, you've got Trump right where you want him! ",Rightquercusalba,e9hm3qk,conservative
[removed],,e9hvilr,conservative
[removed],,e9hq1hd,conservative
You have to understand the article they wrote. Not once did they rebuke anything that was twitted. Everything was verbatim and without commentary. The story is straight facts. If they are willing to do that it speaks volumes about Trumps actions. ,towhom_it_mayconcern,e9h6hgk,conservative
"Trump’s a big military guy, huh? Making fun of John McCain and attacking gold star families?",willre00,e9hfn9x,conservative
"You're a real gem. I see you come from the ""Everyone I Disagree With Is Hitler"" school of debate. You leftists truly are NPC's. Way to live up to the worst stereotypes of the asinine left. 
 
https://i.kym-cdn.com/entries/icons/original/000/021/818/hitlerbook.JPG",PhilosoGuido,e9hy375,conservative
"Wrong. The mission statement of this sub is as follows: 

> We provide a place on Reddit for conservatives, both fiscal and social, to read and discuss political and cultural issues from a distinctly conservative point of view.

The mission statement of this sub exists solely due to the hordes of leftists trying to silence this sub. If they could engage in civil discussion without resorting to personal attacks, dogpile downvotes, and endless parroting of hackneyed talking points, then we wouldn't need to ban them. In fact, conservative ideas thrive when contrasted with the vapid superficiality, pseudo-intellectualism, and creepy totalitarianism of leftism.

If we didn't enforce these rules this place would turn into just another leftist cesspool like the rest of the reddit political subs within a week. If you want to debate conservatives, try /r/DebateConservatives or /r/askaconservative. This is not that place. ",PhilosoGuido,e9hz1bd,conservative
"John McCain is a stain on the Republican party, I'm glad Trump called him out when he insulted Trump supporters and called them crazies. Guess what, Trump supprters are veterans as well. Using your logic John McCain was anti military. That's called leftist logic, which means it's not logical at all. ",Rightquercusalba,e9hh7y5,conservative
"He said “I like soldiers who aren’t captured.” How is that not a direct attack on every captured member of the military?

Trump made a direct on someone *because* of their military service. McCain May have come out against Trump supporters, but he didn’t use service as the reason. McCain was clearly not anti-military and to say so is silly.

I see you also avoided my second point",willre00,e9hk7qe,conservative
">He said “I like soldiers who aren’t captured.” How is that not a direct attack on every captured member of the military?

It's not. If it was he wouldn't be such a big supporter of the troops. It was an insult directed at McCain. Pretty simple. Millions of military supporters many if whom serve or have served knew that as well. I'm sorry you didn't get it, maybe you will learn some day. 

>Trump made a direct on someone *because* of their military service. McCain May have come out against Trump supporters, but he didn’t use service as the reason. McCain was clearly not anti-military and to say so is silly.

He used service as a reason because McCain had been using his service as political tool his entire career. He hit him right where he had to to send a message that he isn't going to pull punches just because McCain served in the military.  

>I see you also avoided my second point

Oh sorry, did I offend you? Maybe I don't have time to cater to the every whim of Nevertrumpers. 

",Rightquercusalba,e9hl1xl,conservative
We gonna lose AZ tho. ,Zac1245,e9j02et,conservative
"No one won, except for fans of voting fraud. I just don't trust any close election where Democrats are in charge anymore. They're showing that nothing is off limits in order to seize power. We have one party that has no ethics and one party that has no fortitude. No one is winning.",warmabsurdrabbit,e9izrvm,conservative
"With the Senate map we were playing offense against, only a +2 gain is a major defeat in my book. Nowhere near worth trading the House away. ",YankeeBlues21,e9j35cw,conservative
Shouldn’t be losing AZ though is the point. That seat hasn’t been dem in decades. ,Zac1245,e9j3fn1,conservative
exactly.,SKWM3000,e9j3sns,conservative
"I was agreeing with you. We should have taken a net 6-8 senate seats this time around, considering the map and how far left our opponents have become. That we lost AZ, especially given the 2 candidates in that race, has me extremely worried for the future of this country. 
",YankeeBlues21,e9j44r5,conservative
"My bad, read your comment wrong. AZ, GA, NC, NV, etc. are on the verge of being lost. It’s not a good sign. It’s great we won Florida but we couldn’t even pull off Montana for God’s sake. ",Zac1245,e9j4mm5,conservative
"If you’d have asked me last week, I’d have thought it more likely we flip (or hold considering 2016) Michigan with John James than lose Montana. Very disheartened by the results. ^^Sad!",YankeeBlues21,e9j5be3,conservative
Don’t be so fucking defeatist ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9je0is,conservative
Don’t be so fucking depressing and defeatist.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9jdqk1,conservative
Can’t help it. I’m very depressed about the results. I thought we’d made progress after 2016. ,YankeeBlues21,e9je6q4,conservative
"We didn’t, Trump was a stop gap. We need to reform the party, but the never Trumpers are so fucking full of themselves they can’t get on their moral high horse and get back in line with the party.   ",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9jeb94,conservative
How is this lady not in jail. ,Subvet98,e9f96p8,conservative
"According to Article IV, Section 7(a) of the Florida State Constitution, the governor can suspend a county officer on the grounds of incompetence. The suspension has to be reviewed by the Senate. The Senate can reinstate the official if they do not agree with the governor. Why doesn't Rick Scott actually do something about this?",chem031,e9fqqq0,conservative
"You can find [this list, with actual links, here](https://www.dailysignal.com/2018/11/09/rnc-points-out-12-times-florida-countys-elections-supervisor-has-been-incompetent-and-possibly-criminal/), for anyone that wanted to read the source material, like me
",TurnDownYourRadio,e9fdbar,conservative
Corruption at its finest,WhatisTaxation,e9f5umx,conservative
"46% larger (1125x1746) version of linked image:

[https://pbs.twimg.com/media/Drhj707WoAEzB0l.jpg?name=orig](https://pbs.twimg.com/media/Drhj707WoAEzB0l.jpg?name=orig)

*****

^[source&nbsp;code](https://github.com/qsniyg/maxurl)&nbsp;|&nbsp;[website](https://qsniyg.github.io/maxurl/)&nbsp;/&nbsp;[userscript](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/36662-image-max-url)&nbsp;(finds&nbsp;larger&nbsp;images)&nbsp;|&nbsp;[remove](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=MaxImageBot&subject=delete:+e9f5sy9&message=If%20you%20are%20the%20one%20who%20submitted%20the%20post%2C%20it%20should%20be%20deleted%20within%2020%20seconds.%20If%20it%20isn%27t%2C%20please%20check%20the%20FAQ%3A%20https%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2FMaxImage%2Fcomments%2F8znfgw%2Ffaq%2F)",MaxImageBot,e9f5sy9,conservative
"For anyone asking why she isn't in jail yet...  
Sheriff Scott Israel is your answer. ",JustATheoryInc,e9fss67,conservative
Sounds to me like the state ought to get involved and root out this corrupt pig ,steelallz,e9fdkw4,conservative
I live in Miami and can attest this is ridiculous. The fact that this woman is still not in jail and/or fired baffles me.,Soldier2304,e9fflrt,conservative
RACIST!!,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9gngy8,conservative
"I dont know what the fuck is going on, except for the fact that something big is happening. This is so blatant. Perhaps it's a dry run for cheating in 2020. Perhaps this is a distraction from something else. Idk. But something is taking place. ",hat_wine_clock,e9gp5rr,conservative
Nothing to see folks! She’s a dem! ,thnkabtit,e9guv3i,conservative
I think it’s because if voting actually made a difference they wouldn’t let us do it,respek42,e9gw322,conservative
And how is she still in any position to even touch voting ballots? ,cmiller1225,e9f9906,conservative
Cuz she’d cry “racism” and people would believe it over their lying eyes. ,justhere2havefun,e9fdlvu,conservative
"Yeah, this tells me that the penalties for violating elections law are not nearly harsh enough.

Start it at 5 years per violation and see how many Democrat foot soldiers are willing to put their necks on the line.

The second that Broward failed to comply with the half-hour deadline, she should've been removed from the facility in handcuffs.",nited_states,e9fs3m3,conservative
"> How is this lady not in jail.

Democrat",Jizzlobber42,e9g1lm9,conservative
The previous governor did. Then this woman was elected to replace. Guess how many people she fired when she took the job?,ngoni,e9g7ksx,conservative
"As this has been an issue for years, why didn't the governor do something prior?  How does a current governor pending an election result not appear to be abusing power if they interject now, with all that was already known?",nkn_19,e9gubxc,conservative
You’re smart. You do smart things.  Be like you. ,steelallz,e9fdm2e,conservative
"Ahh, awesome

BTW your username reminds me of Art Bell heh, is it inspired by him?",HissingGoose,e9fhijp,conservative
She is in a leftist controlled county.  She is exactly who they want counting ballots.,optionhome,e9f9dr1,conservative
"> Start it at 5 years per violation and see how many Democrat foot soldiers are willing to put their necks on the line.

Too light of a penalty. I'd say 15, minimum.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9geylr,conservative
I just figured I'd help save anybody else the work of trying to google all of these,TurnDownYourRadio,e9fe40y,conservative
"Actually, it was inspired by the guy stopped at the light outside my window while I was creating my reddit account",TurnDownYourRadio,e9fx0zl,conservative
Yeah I came here to look for the sauce. Thanks! ,AzzidReign,e9ff7vp,conservative
"Ahh yes, music that could break up a kidney stone? Hear that a lot on the road.",HissingGoose,e9g194q,conservative
SPAGHET SAUCE,steelallz,e9fjqic,conservative
Yea I don’t think anyone’s high school history teacher needs to secure the same 12 year 400 million dollar salary that Bryce Harper is about to get ,ard4,e9h99hc,conservative
Of course the union would be appalled. They want all the money for themselves.,NoMoreMrNiceBastard,e9hblo8,conservative
"Unions cultivate laziness, so it's no surprise they would be against merit based pay.",mlmack,e9hoihy,conservative
">  One union official told the Sacramento Bee that “education should not be a competitive endeavor.”

And here, nicely encapsulated, is why American public schools in general and California public schools in particular are so awful.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9ht8ai,conservative
"yes, rock star pay is silly unless the teachers are generating rock star revenue.

However the main point is that the unions don't want merit pay which would result in better education and better teachers and a higher average income",Da_Kahuna,e9h9q9w,conservative
"How do you judge merit for teachers. As a student, it seems kind of difficult...",JoahTheProtozoa,e9hpcqp,conservative
"I’m very skeptical of merit pay. 

Disclosure: My wife is a teacher in the inner city of Camden, NJ. 

How can one base the salary of a teacher on merit when much of what the merit is based is out of their control?

Some of my wife’s students come to school without bathing, some who don’t eat or sleep well, some with visible untreated medical conditions, some with visible injury from abuse, and some who should be diagnosed with learning disabilities or autism but their parents refuse to do it out of denial.  They come from complete and utter dysfunction AT HOME which translates to dysfunction in the classroom. Many live with grandparents because mom is on drugs and dad (if the father is known) is often in jail. 

I don’t care if you had the teacher of the year teaching those kids, how do you get those kids to succeed at a level where you yourself can eat when there’s no parental involvement?

Edit: To be clear, I’m not totally against merit pay. I just think there’s gotta be a better way to implement it. I don’t have the answer. ",mikeygio,e9ir506,conservative
You'd need vouchers to do it. I don't think its possible for the reasons you've stated under the current system.,0xc0c0c0c0,e9iwsk8,conservative
"And they come to places like Texas, Tennessee, and Georgia and vote for the same policies that made taxes so high in the first place. ",steampunker13,e9fpvs8,conservative
This is why Broward county in Florida is the way it is. People there are from NJ and brought thier political habits with them.,synn89,e9fx2cb,conservative
Leave your polices behind.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9ften6,conservative
"Now hold on a damn minute, people are leaving NY due to the weather, not taxes /s",MonkeyWrench,e9fu6qa,conservative
and all that will be left are the filthy rich (includes government) and the poor.,cons_NC,e9fwbyd,conservative
Please go to another blue state.,PurpleHouseSlippers,e9frzho,conservative
[removed],,e9fxrqa,conservative
"Idiotic Liberals complaining about high taxes while also voting in favor of high taxes. Reminds me of an article from 2014

[Liberal Austin homeowners surprised to find they have to pay all the taxes they voted for.](http://archive.fo/APt9D).

If you want a more recent example, you only have to look to California during this midterm where there was a proposition to repeal the Gasoline tax and it failed to pass. The people literally had the ability to lower their gas prices and they refused to do so despite complaining about high gas prices.",PrestoPesto1,e9gh7lp,conservative
"I have said several times that Nevada is blue now. Many argued with me that the gubernatorial race here would end up with a Republican because of the history. The Exodus is already happening and many more are coming to this state because Oregon and Washington are already lost to liberalism and taxes. Socialism didn't work there, it's not going to work here, but they are already voting in droves to drive Dems into power. RIP NV. ",powpowbang,e9g6vep,conservative
"Well this wouldn't surprise me at all.

My girlfriend has lived in CA for years, the taxes there are VERY high, same goes for NY.

The Democrats have ruined both of these states...who would've thought? 

Raising the taxes on the middle/working class wouldn't help the economy...",Azul19,e9gn6fn,conservative
I'm one of them. We fixin' to be out of here in 6 months.,Odoacer476CE,e9g26o4,conservative
are those the same economists that suggested that NYers would flee and real estate values would plummet after 9/11/2001,Lsdnyc,e9gh1cs,conservative
"Maybe they should put up a wall around California and New York

Have some checkpoints to make sure they're not affiliated with the far left.",989x4000,e9fs5l6,conservative
I know I’m taking the first ticket out,Dank_Cartographer,e9fpn11,conservative
"Then vote blue and get taxes raised.....
. buttheads!",krepogregg,e9guvgd,conservative
"If I could leave California I would. Problem is I'm barely making end meet now, so i don't have any way to save towards a big move. Plus I have custody of my kids, but trying to take them out of state would probably end up causing a custody nightmare. I'm tired of this states mental left and the absurd politics. I live in one of the strong conservative areas, but I've had enough. Thinking of getting out once my youngest graduates. ",MilitusLetum,e9gjf0v,conservative
"Add 1 for Connecticut with four more years of Malloy, I mean Lamont.",r777m,e9gkrvx,conservative
"Gee, I wonder why?",HauntingStomper,e9gm0ja,conservative
Sorry guys. We are full up in Nashville ,electricspook,e9gqjgp,conservative
"The good news is we'll have plenty of rich white neckbeards and dependent losers to make sure the state never changes*

U",BeachCruisin22,e9guijw,conservative
Californian here. Want to leave and be around other white people. ,Venusian_Citadels,e9gucqy,conservative
Retarded people of California voted to keep the gas tax...,ultimis,e9ghiuz,conservative
"On the bright side, those Socialists from California and New York are non-breeders.

The breeders in New York and California are the ""multicultural"" immigrants.  Hopefully, after they've established their mini-countries in those states, they'll cause enough havoc that they'll serve as a cautionary tale for others.

The saddest part is, before African-Americans could even realize their potential and enjoy the nationality forced upon their ancestors, in comes particular immigrants who are even better and more clever at victim-hood.

Black people, this should have been your birthright.  Your privilege.  And you voted for the side who plots to replace you with outsiders.",markcocjin,e9halcm,conservative
They flee to Texas and then vote for Democrats. ,Upasaka-paul,e9hcb9c,conservative
My fiancé and I just moved from San Francisco to Texas.    It's true ,Landxr33,e9ghs8n,conservative
Ding ding ding.  Don't forget Colorado and Arizona.  ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9fqqst,conservative
"Not exaggerating when I'm telling you about the debate I got into on the Texas subreddit about a guy from California claiming he left there due to the policies, taxes, etc. yet he wanted to vote for Beto because he supported many of those same policies. Gold medal winner in mental gymnastics right there. ",QSector,e9g99v3,conservative
Almost all urban areas are infected with leftism any more. ,ozric101,e9ftr9c,conservative
you beat me to it they must be idiots if they will go to a new state and then vote for the same policies that made them flee their old states,smartguy360,e9gkh06,conservative
"Yup, my girlfriend lived in CA for YEARS.

CA has a ridiculous amount of taxation, strict gun-control, regulations on literally EVERYTHING.

Needless to say, that both NY and CA are shite.

Well, the Democrats have ruined these glorious states to be exact.",Azul19,e9gn0rr,conservative
Interesting take. IMO I’d flee NY if i could and I’m more in favor for conservative fiscal policies. I’d wager more people that flee see their tax dollars that benefit others and never themselves. ,plastiqmanb,e9gfatb,conservative
"Its everything. Taxes arent even the major player in my area, and taxes are extremely high. My mom pays $10,000 a year in property tax.

Whats really forcing the move is just housing prices pre-tax. I have a full time job, make $21 an hour, have full health benefits. But theres no way I could afford my own place. The only apartments I might be able to rent are in gang infested areas",Ravclye,e9gcz2v,conservative
"Nope, because they'd get taxed just as much. ",joeysuf,e9gd8gz,conservative
"California’s is 1.3 trillion in debt.

Limitting state income tax write offs is a good thing.

It’s funny to me that people in NY vote for extremely high state taxes and then demand to pay less federal tax than anyone else.",gster50,e9g0kl0,conservative
That quote in the Grey's box killed me. Talk about r/Swoosh,game46312,e9gtp1b,conservative
"It was because the way the ballot was worded... Something to the effect of ""take away funds used to repair roads, Bridges and highways"" yes/no. People had no idea it had anything to do with the gas tax unless they researched.",Unnamedking2,e9hg14s,conservative
"Its only a matter of time before both Nevada and Washington enact a state income tax.   Having lived in both states, they have swung heavily to the left as a flood of people fleeing California have made their way into those states, similar to Arizona which still retains some libertarian elements but is gradually being overrun by throngs of people unhappy with the cost of living elsewhere yet voting in the same types of politicians that ruled the states they are fleeing from.  ",JessumB,e9g9ewp,conservative
Move to a swing state. Plz,ExpensiveMention,e9g9xlu,conservative
"California mentality spreads to other states and leads to similar effects.

How do I know? 

Well, my girlfriend lived in CA for years.

Plenty of Californian folks have migrated to TX Austin.

You can imagine what happened to this city...",Azul19,e9gnqba,conservative
"You don't like living in ~~mexico~~ California?

Mexifornia",Scozzar,e9gyr99,conservative
"There's no way to reason with these people. 

They complain about the things that they voted for.

Reap what you sow.",Azul19,e9gnsyz,conservative
And Florida :(,YankeeBlues21,e9fsura,conservative
"Texan here. Love my state, but I finally had to unsubscribe from the Texas subreddit 'cause I got so damn tired of the Bobby Francis worship.",Strait409,e9ggjqu,conservative
"Yup, I'm in Canada and can't get away from it. Looked into moving to the US but it's fairly difficult, even with a STEM degree. ",DeviatoricStress,e9ftzef,conservative
"$10,000 is nothing here in NJ. My wife and I pay more than that on our first house here in South Jersey. We have neighbors over 20k.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e9ggm9i,conservative
"This 100%.

Raising the taxes is a BAD idea. 

It literally destroys the economy, people spend less, depression increases, crime increases, productivity decreases etc.

One way to ruin a county, is to raise the taxes into oblivion.",Azul19,e9gngn6,conservative
Sounds like Long island to me. I left 2 years ago. I highly recommend it.,bullbolony,e9ghx05,conservative
"You could move out of the urban areas ;)  
But yes I entirely understand what you are saying",MonkeyWrench,e9gd3w2,conservative
[removed],,e9g2knc,conservative
This is pretty disingenuous since although  these states pay a smaller per capita to the fed they A. take less since they fund their own stupid welfare programs and B. They actually give more money in total (less per capita) ,_mooch,e9hmzoj,conservative
Sorry hoss. I'm movin' to a free state. I've had enough of libs/ progressives for a thousand lifetimes. ,Odoacer476CE,e9hcc34,conservative
Higher taxes and a balanced diet of political correctness?,989x4000,e9gp816,conservative
And North Carolina :(,cons_NC,e9fwcw4,conservative
It's finally calming down. Most of the Beto volunteers and workers have bailed. ,QSector,e9gicuz,conservative
Just fly to Mexico then cross illegally. It's pretty easy to get in and stay that way. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9gqtn3,conservative
Yeah LI. Im hoping to go to Texas or Florida once I can. Although Id miss the full seasons :(,Ravclye,e9ginsi,conservative
Im not really in an urban area. Not rural by any means either. Problem is my job unfortunately depends on being in a high population area right now. Finishing up a few certifications soon that will free me up,Ravclye,e9gdnyw,conservative
"Yup, the taxes in Austin are some of the HIGHEST in TX.

PC culture everywhere.

Just like in CA, when it's legal to imprison you, because you misgendered someone...",Azul19,e9gpj3a,conservative
And Pennsylvania,ExpensiveMention,e9g9um4,conservative
Live in NY. In a year we have lost about 10 people that I know of from work to North and South Carolina and a lot more plan to go soon,Ravclye,e9gcqzq,conservative
I'm really glad to hear that. Now let's just hope he doesn't run for president like some people seem to hope he will.,Strait409,e9gk47q,conservative
When it's PC culture everywhere that means it's okay to go into the women's bathroom and pee all over the seats. If they have a problem with it tell them you're trans!,989x4000,e9gppcu,conservative
And Oregon,InquisitorThorn,e9gehf9,conservative
They’re a fucking disease.,deepfeels96,e9gxqwt,conservative
Why the shit would they come here... PA is hot as hell and cold as shit. It's no fun here.,Castaway77,e9gj3j3,conservative
Well I hope they lean right,cons_NC,e9gd1qq,conservative
"80% of NYers lean left. 

&#x200B;",Lsdnyc,e9gh2h6,conservative
"I feel like pewdiepie is pretty redpilled at this point, and could end up redpilling a lot of people.",justific4tion,e9gq07w,conservative
Ironically enough this video got censored on YouTube...,bongmaniac,e9gnrz8,conservative
"The sooner you realize you are the enemy, the better",BeachCruisin22,e9gvueo,conservative
"He makes some fair points, but he advocates ethnic separatism.  That is a terrible goal.

Western Civilization needs to be transmitted to non-whites, not be withheld from them.",paulbrook,e9gu8i3,conservative
"I'm pretty sure you can make a rational argument for how fragile individualism is compared to collectivist ideologies and how certain cultures, not necessarily incompatible, but nevertheless and at this point don't believe in or at the very least don't respect things like human rights, without blaming the jews. This shit does more harm than good. Anti-semitism is not a value, certainly not a conservative one.

Also, what does PewDiePie have to do with all of this?",_Playgu,e9h7q35,conservative
"well, guess that means he'll be getting suspended here pretty soon. ",MinimumMonitor7,e9gq2fs,conservative
">Western Civilization needs to be transmitted to non-whites

Unless Western Liberals (capital L classical Liberals) and Egalitarians are willing to assert linguistic unity and ethnic dominance and cultural dominance over the outgroups who enter their society to assimilate them, *this won't happen*.

",lost_snake,e9h1rwi,conservative
[removed],,e9gzg7r,conservative
Yup. The China is a very collectivized culture. Some immigrate and assimilate adopting individualism but a lot don’t. There’s not a lot of pressure to assimilate on many immigrants which is an issue ,phantomcut3,e9h831u,conservative
"I’m not sure why PewDiePie was brought up specifically for this article but he has been talking about corruption and bias in business and fairness for the last year. Being the most subscribed with a long time following, his voice resonates with a lot of people that are tired of the hypocrisy. It’s also important to research or understand his background. He is the exact opposite of what the mainstream monster wants to be voiced. ",redrider660,e9hmgpi,conservative
"The thing is, Liberals seem utterly unaware of how much *the absence of non-Western culture in their lives* allows them to think the way they do.  Their lack of introspection is outstanding.  

But that is why their attitude is a house of cards that collapses after significant exposure to non-Western culture--given the right catalyst (the power of delusion and denial can be great).  

The way I can think of to cure this is to engage with those Liberals who *have* had that exposure--and they are many:  White Liberal romance about other cultures drives the young ones abroad and into black inner cities to strike heroic teacher poses (not teaching Western Civ, but repairing the wrongs of evil Western Civ which has somehow made the qualified non-Western teachers disappear).  I suspect that many veteran white inner city school teachers and ex-teachers--harbor a deep dislike of what they face(d) every day, and only need the right conversation to bring it out.  Then the conversation becomes how to inculcate non-dysfunctional culture, which is at least a step up from pretending it is already there.",paulbrook,e9hc4tl,conservative
"I don't believe there is any fundamental barrier to changing a person's behavior.  Granted, there is usually a towering cultural one.  And that's the challenge:  Changing culture--what your parents and friends are telling you.

Sorry, Pedro, but ""mañana"" simply sucks, and anyone who makes a positive noise in the direction of that concept is mistaken and should not be listened to.",paulbrook,e9hcsd7,conservative
Are you seriously saying that Western Civilization is incompatible with non-whites?,hello_japan,e9htxah,conservative
"No....... I’m saying that putting European values and culture upon parts of the world that have not advanced past the mud hut will not work. It’s a shitty thing to say but on a societal level most or nearly all of Africa is incapable of a western like civilization, because there are simply not enough people with the smarts to do it. There are entire countries in Africa where the average IQ would be   Categorized as *mentally retarded* in the US.

Putting those values on the Middle East won’t work either because of their shitty culture and religion. “Kill the infidel” and all that. Not to mention the first cousin marriages that have been happening on a mass scale for 50 generations increasing bringing various side effects such as lower intelligence and aggression.",JMB_was_a_god,e9hunc8,conservative
"What about ""douchebag"", Sarah? What level of development does that put you in?",FistyMcBeefPunchy,e9hbxf5,conservative
"lol this chick is delusional. all the people in go
hollywood that blast and try to make the president look bad. only want publicity. and thats it. they just want the free press that comes with it. and no one is saying that. thats just my opinion as far as i can tell ",donjohn1986,e9hgaiz,conservative
Who?,ReaganTroll,e9hbyaq,conservative
What a bitch.,paulbrook,e9hfnx4,conservative
"Wasn't this the same comedian who lied about being paid less the men at the comedy club back in the day, and the owner pushed back proving she was a liar?",SickofInternetProgs,e9i1yfx,conservative
Seriously can we just ignore these people. They more we expose these entertainers the more they get paid,slappypappyj,e9iega2,conservative
"Can we stop with this ethnicly Jewish bullshit. You don't get to disavow the entire religion then come back whenever you want oppression points. You're either a practicing Jew who believes in God or you're not. Either choice is fine, but you need to pick one.",MuricanStephen,e9i67j5,conservative
"> what a female dog.


FTFY",CMBDeletebot,e9hfo4m,conservative
"u/SpectorDeflector69

I thought it was the right that hated free speech ",Chapka69,e9fnm5f,conservative
"Ah but it's Democrats doing the threatening.  This won't be shown on MSNBC, probably not on CNN either.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fo07w,conservative
"Trump revokes one ""journalist's"" hard pass security clearance so he now has to ask permission to go into the White House, and the left cries ""violating the 1st Amendment.""

This person threatens to *arrest* people for trying to film the process. Any word from ""solidarity"" CNN?",justhere2havefun,e9fn1r9,conservative
"Ballit Count? NO, covering scams and corruption.",StephenScherer1,e9gir1z,conservative
"""How could Trump do this??"" - The Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9fqcvg,conservative
But trump didnt call on acosta that one time! Its literally hitler!,ExpensiveMention,e9g9tcn,conservative
"""every day you wait is another day we can find more surprise ballots!""",SKWM3000,e9iu4wf,conservative
Send that child to her room and lets move it along people. ,ozric101,e9ixs0l,conservative
"we're fools for not having a shared ledger voting system (like blockchain, but not exactly blockchain either)

(and yes we're fools for letting the democrats get away with crap like this time and time again)",AntifaArePathetic,e9iuwoj,conservative
"Regardless of political affiliation, Bill and Melinda Gates were definitely worthy of the medal.",albino_creeper,e9g27k5,conservative
"I would have to say all of those seem like they provided more of an impact than a donors wife, idk if that’s just me. This isn’t to say all of those are deserved. ",TheSkyNoLimits,e9gdo2y,conservative
Nothing is as ridiculous as Obama winning a Nobel Peace Prize.,mlmack,e9hcg19,conservative
"Don't forget Joe ""keep the children away"" Biden.",unibuckeye,e9g9t2c,conservative
">Can the left take a chill pill?

Haha. No, no they can’t. ",skarface6,e9gex2g,conservative
"I like that they want to encourage other billionaires to give to charity and that they’ve given many millions themselves, even if I disagree with some of where their money goes. Kudos to them getting extremely rich people to help the less fortunate.  ",skarface6,e9gezfr,conservative
And MJ.,TheKillector,e9gxp6x,conservative
"Meh. She’s done groundbreaking work in a field that’s highlighted by the administration. I’m definitely fine with it, even if it could be in part/largely because of who her husband is. Hopefully this gets more funding and work done in fighting addiction.",skarface6,e9gf3g8,conservative
"To be fair, “the left” in this article are some people on Twitter. This article is just as meaningless as a Yahoo article about celebrities “owning” the NRA with a tweet. ",dinklezoidberd,e9hbntr,conservative
I think what Gates has done is more than just give money. He wants results and makes sure that these funds are used properly. ,gaseouscloud,e9h8v8n,conservative
I can see that. I really don’t know much about it so I didn’t want to say anything extra. I’m also not entirely sure what the award really represents so I’ll probably look into that before I make any further judgement. ,TheSkyNoLimits,e9ggkls,conservative
"Except, you know, so many leftists out in the real world not being able to chill out about Trump.",skarface6,e9hgfg4,conservative
AFAIK it’s a random award. It’s definitely not like the Medal of Honor or anything like that. ,skarface6,e9gjhff,conservative
That’s not anything new. Clinton Bush and Obama all were called out for every minor thing by members of the opposite party. And all of them had legitimate reasons/policies to be disliked. ,dinklezoidberd,e9hgt68,conservative
"Yes, I well remember the many Republicans and Tea Party folks screaming at the sky when Obama was elected. Same with the mobs, and violence, and all that. ",skarface6,e9htakc,conservative
"> Donald Trump is America ’s first wartime president in the Culture War.

Well said!",d_42,e9hga6z,conservative
Absolutely disgusting. What crooks.,heartless_13,e9gcuot,conservative
"Say it with me, y'all

VOTEEEERRR FRAAAUUUUUDDD",LilDebbo,e9h7wo5,conservative
"I’ve said this before. It applies here as well. 200-300 years ago, these incompetent people would be left out in the woods so their stupidity didn’t infect the rest of the village. I sincerely think we need to get back to that. Democrats talk a big game about respecting and maintaining democracy and rule of law, but are the very first to break the law and undermine democracy if it can benefit them. They do nothing but promote violence and ignorance. There are good people who are Democrats, yet sadly they stand by and do nothing while the majority act like miserable failures. Ergo, nothing changes for the better",electricspook,e9gr71k,conservative
[removed],,e9g90lr,conservative
Read the article.,Piestrio,e9g9j9c,conservative
"They're gonna force Justice Thomas to kill the entire concept of nationwide injunctions by district courts-

http://thefederalist.com/2018/06/29/travel-ban-ruling-justice-thomas-takes-aim-insane-use-nationwide-injunctions/",ngoni,e9gaj2i,conservative
Judicial review was a mistake,JMB_was_a_god,e9gl7us,conservative
I would have made so much money on the Keystone pipeline. Oh well. ,DeviatoricStress,e9glsh9,conservative
"oh God, please. anything to stave off the demise of our republic a little longer.",SKWM3000,e9go6qd,conservative
Sadly I'm skeptical anyone aside from Thomas and Gorsuch would take that most honest approach.,paulbrevik,e9gqv77,conservative
You still might. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9h430q,conservative
Don't you care more than personal gain? ,IHaveNoNickname,e9h4md9,conservative
This is exactly what will happen with confiscation. ,R0binSage,e9fgm7m,conservative
"I’m glad I live in Utah. Our police force basically said they will ignore a federal gun confiscation. 1 because they own guns just like the people they would have to confiscate them from, 2 it wouldn’t be constitutional, 3 they would have a war in their hands. ",RKfan,e9fjien,conservative
Wait they don't know who asked the court to take his guns?? Shouldn't that be on a record somewhere?,ThatGuyYouKnow999,e9fl9iv,conservative
"r/NOWTTYG ""No One Wants to Take Your Guns""",tehForce,e9fkqmh,conservative
Remember this every time a Democrat says they're not coming for our guns. ,Mawaukey,e9fjrq4,conservative
Why were they taking his guns? It didn’t say in the article,NateDogg9597,e9ggryn,conservative
If the Democrats supported guns they would ask the Supreme Court to rule that any anti-gun law is unconstitutional and get over with it.,sjwking,e9gz8ib,conservative
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=_GbHDxCCDT8&feature=youtu.be,989x4000,e9f6qeb,conservative
"I'm not a fan of red flag measures. You don't get a chance to defend yourself. Someone can just say that you're a threat, and *bam*, police knocking on your door.

And since I've seen a lot of people feel threatened just because someone is, gasp, a conservative, it won't take anytime at all before it is weaponized.

I'd love to see data on the political affiliation of who requested the red flag, and who it was carried out against. Dollars to doughnuts its Democrats siccing the police on Republicans. ",haplogreenleaf,e9ghpdq,conservative
"We have discussed situations like this at work and we think the cops in our area would probably serve the order by walking up and saying ""sir do you have any weapons in your home,"" while shaking your head no to indicate that they should say no. ""ok have a nice day."" It is absolutely ridiculous that people would shoot a 60 year old man who was just trying to defend his 2nd amendment right. Surely the officers could overpower a retirement age man without shooting him.",rheajr86,e9ft2ox,conservative
His death was useless if he didn’t take someone out with him. If they are coming to confiscate my guns without due process I will at least take 1 or 2 down with me if I am going down.,Muk1st,e9gh678,conservative
"The law is bullshit, but this guy was dumb as shit too.",Nothing_is_Free,e9f77hk,conservative
"Honestly it's the fault of Mr. Willis, not the police. The guy became irate and was armed when he was being served. The law may be wrong, but take it to court. The officers involved are not responsible for the law, it's their job to enforce the laws. So resisting is not going to help the situation, especially when you're resisting and armed. ",Smithy7777,e9g8swc,conservative
"Both sides are wrong here. Obviously gun confiscation is wrong and also illegal, but you can't resist police officers doing their jobs.",Glsbnewt,e9fx4c1,conservative
https://thehill.com/homenews/administration/376097-trump-take-the-guns-first-go-through-due-process-second,dinklezoidberd,e9hbwkf,conservative
yeah our state rules,adlp,e9fufvn,conservative
Glad they get a legit police force who will follow the constitution! ,Zac1245,e9g2tl4,conservative
"They know, they just don't want to tell.",alienvalentine,e9fnrm7,conservative
"Oh they know(if there was somebody), they're just refusing to tell.

Because the right to face an accuser doesn't matter any more than the right to bear arms, and be protected from unreasonable search and seizure.

Give it another decade and they'll be quartering troops in your house too.",TwelfthCycle,e9gg5vq,conservative
">when you're arguing with a leftist in /r/politics and he tells you no one wants to take your guns and that you're just a paranoid Drumpftard but he literally made a comment 15 minutes ago in the same exact thread calling for the confiscation of all firearms

It's happened too many times to count. ",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9gp338,conservative
and remember all the times they said the police would never comply...,Zac1245,e9g0qmk,conservative
well technically they are not they send the police to do it for them... ,Delta_25,e9fp1py,conservative
Just look they do with free-speech...,Azul19,e9goz2n,conservative
Red flag laws. Family or friends can say you are a threat to yourself or others and they can come take your rights without due process.,Buddha_Punch,e9gtmnb,conservative
Are you a cop?,Zac1245,e9g1c5i,conservative
I would suggest complying and then taking it to court. Much better outcome prospects for you (plus the poor police officers doing their job) and potentially winning more rights for everyone if it goes far enough.,MisterMouser,e9grw1u,conservative
No he wasn't. I would have shown up to the door with a gun if someone was at my door at 5:17 in the morning.,rheajr86,e9ftbcm,conservative
"So the law says cops can show up and take weapons?  Is there no notice from the court giving someone the opportunity to refute the claims made against them? No notice saying ""hey this court has been told by this person you are dangerous so you need to come to court and turn in your guns?""  No opportunity to face your accusers?  ",nooneuknow42,e9g4kwn,conservative
Yup! There is other ways to fight this.,abuigues,e9fsoi5,conservative
I wonder how Lexington & Concord would have turned out with that mentality?,JoeWinchester99,e9gdzyf,conservative
"No.

An innocent man is dead because these cops were trying to infringe upon his constitutional rights. He did nothing wrong. The police murdered this man.

""Just following orders"", amirite?",jtljtljtljtl,e9gd4sx,conservative
"Yeah, no. Only the cops are wrong.",Odoacer476CE,e9g1z1q,conservative
"> gun confiscation is wrong and also illegal

Enforcing illegal stuff isn't a cops job, they take an oath to uphold the constitution. ",Zac1245,e9fzy8k,conservative
The American Revolution literally started because the Redcoats were trying to confiscate guns from the militia and the Patriots resisted them.,JoeWinchester99,e9gehmg,conservative
"What part of “from my cold, dead hands” isn’t understood ",YungTurdy,e9g2o7b,conservative
"Fuck that. Cops that are trying to take an innocent man's guns don't deserve my respect or anyone else's. They're lucky that none of them died in this ""struggle"" but if one of them did I wouldn't feel any pity. An innocent man is dead because of these cops ""just following orders"". Sound familiar?",jtljtljtljtl,e9gcx70,conservative
You MUST resist unlawful orders. I wouldn’t advocate going to war based on this story. I’m sure I’d go to war at my front door if this happened to me. You know they’re going to kill you anyway. Give yourself a fighting chance.,Dammit_Banned_Again,e9gylu0,conservative
It’s still going to result in a lot of deaths.  No matter how it goes down.,R0binSage,e9hcweh,conservative
"The three other articles posted here this week said it was a family member that also live in the same house.
",tehForce,e9fu6nq,conservative
Police who are 100% willing to do so.,Zac1245,e9g1ajp,conservative
Wow that’s actually insane. Sad to see this as an actual law,NateDogg9597,e9gv4gy,conservative
https://thehill.com/homenews/administration/376097-trump-take-the-guns-first-go-through-due-process-second,dinklezoidberd,e9hbu7p,conservative
"No, but i have worked with a few. I myself work on Army helicopters. But a few of the guys in my guard unit are or have been cops.",rheajr86,e9g8y1q,conservative
"I'm not a cop, but I did work as a sheriff's deputy for a couple years, and now work alongside them in a victim services capacity.

It's all a matter of the department and the culture.  Some places they'll kick your doors in.  Around here, they're ignoring damn near half the legislated gun regs, other than the ""no felons with firearms"" bit.",TwelfthCycle,e9gg8t4,conservative
"Seriously 5:15 with no warning?? That was fucked up. 


",TedyCruz,e9g18lv,conservative
"....no. I would be happy to take as many with me as I could even if it cost me my life. It's not about my life, it's about the message. 

#It will be hell for them to take them from all of us. ",Liberty_Pr1me,e9g7kmc,conservative
Are you honestly comparing this to the Revolutionary War? This is such a far cry from that. ,Smithy7777,e9gmak3,conservative
"Again I don't like the law either, but, he did escalate. It's extremely stupid to pull a gun out when your mad in front of police while they're trying to enforce the law. There was a struggle, a discharge of the firearm. Under those circumstances its likely that he would get shot. That does not make it murder.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",Smithy7777,e9gm954,conservative
And the constitution says that the rights to bear arms shall not be infringed upon.,GL9106,e9g241k,conservative
"I mean the law is illegal and will be overturned by SCOTUS, but while it remains on the books the police have to enforce it. It's not their job to be the supreme court.",Glsbnewt,e9g0912,conservative
"I agree but unless we get a liberal SCOTUS to reinterpret the 2nd amendment, no need to go Rambo. Call a lawyer right away, fight it in court and get it fixed. No need to risk the lives of yourself and the police officers doing what they were ordered to do.",Glsbnewt,e9gfaj8,conservative
Looks to me like they understood it pretty well.,BasherSquared,e9gbzmh,conservative
"We already have a system for handling such disputes, it's called ""court."" Pointing your gun at a police officer is not a valid way to express your disagreement with their actions.  ",Glsbnewt,e9ge0uk,conservative
Hopefully it just doesn’t go down. Someone who gets their guns taken away is going to make it to the Supreme Court and get this shut down. At least that’s what I’m optimistic enough believe will happen. ,dinklezoidberd,e9he8xs,conservative
who are sworn to uphold the Constitution.. ,Delta_25,e9g1g9w,conservative
"And? I don't care who proposes it, I still oppose the move. Which Trump ended up not making.",Buddha_Punch,e9hc00p,conservative
"Add to that this man was known to have issues with alcohol, and his very vocal opinion about 2nd amendment. The article shows quotes from his family attributing to these points. But all of this is irrelevant to the fact that this man seems to have been unjustly ordered to give up his firearms. I'm pretty sure that would make me pissed enough to take my gun to the door to greet the cop even in the middle of the day much less before i normally rise.",rheajr86,e9g9al6,conservative
"I agree bro but come while I understand how disgusting this is, I'm not drawing on police. I'm fighting it in court. I understand what's at stake here but at this very moment in time he costed his own life by drawing on police. We aren't there YET! 

We need to vote these fucks out who keep trying grab that's for sure.",abuigues,e9gbr2u,conservative
"The British didn't announce to the colonists ""Hostilities will commence on April 19th, 1775. Ready yourselves."" Instead they executed a pre-dawn raid to seize an arms stockpile from the militia. It was because of Patriots who were vigilant and had to courage to stand up against oppression that they failed.

Tyranny is creeping up on us. This man was a victim of a pre-dawn raid to seize his lawfully held weapons. He fought back and they killed him for it. What will you do if they come for you next?",JoeWinchester99,e9gnoko,conservative
"It escalated when agents of the state tried to take this man's rights. I'm as pro police as most conservatives too, but the enforcer of tyranny is also a tyrant.",Buddha_Punch,e9gtqwm,conservative
You're victim blaming.,jtljtljtljtl,e9gx5qi,conservative
"Police dont have to do anything, they are not even mandated to protect you. But sure cops should be allowed to round up guns until the supreme court decides this case years ahead. ",Zac1245,e9g0vmp,conservative
"Nothing will get fixed

How many times must this be said?

When your guns are taken under red flag measures there is no recourse. No trial, no notice, and no mercy until a few months later where you are given a hearing. In some cases the measure can be extended indefinitely- as your various licenses and permits get ""lost"" your ammunition ""damaged"" and your guns ""misplaced"".

When it is finally over (if ever) there is no such thing as legal recourse. You can't sue the state or the person for it; and no one has yet been able to see the records for these confiscation orders (the MD seizure was sealed).",richardguy,e9gsqbo,conservative
"Pointing a gun at a police officer is 100% a valid way of expressing your disagreement with them, particularly police raiding a man at 5 in the morning to deprive him of his God-given rights with no notice beforehand.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9gfl85,conservative
The legal system literally created these confiscation laws. Whose side so you think they're on? Stop having so much faith in the system. ,jtljtljtljtl,e9gfltr,conservative
"And yet tread upon it anyway, with the excuse ""I was just doing my job""
",richardguy,e9gsfv0,conservative
"I agree 100%. I’m just pointing out that what happened in the article was literally suggested by the president of the United States. Even if he hasn’t done it, it’s terrifying that he seems to desire that option. ",dinklezoidberd,e9hcai2,conservative
"If the courts are willing to give an order to take your guns, they are also willing to completely disregard your constitutional rights when you try to fight back in court. You wouldn't win, and people like you are exactly the kind of people that they want to deal with.

We must defend our rights.",jtljtljtljtl,e9gcrgj,conservative
"Okay, so let's say you turned in your gun peacefully and then went to court about it. And when the same court that issued the warrant in the first place says you can't have your gun back, then what recourse will you have?

Well, you could just vote out the gun-grabbers. But look at what's going on in Florida right now. When the elections are openly corrupt, what can be done to right the system?  Not much after you've already handed over your guns.

You say ""we aren't there yet"" but how will you know when we are? Tyranny is not going to announce itself ahead of time and give you a chance to prepare. It will creep up on you and the first step is always going to be removing your means you defend yourself. You have to be eternally vigilant. That is, unless the words ""Give Me Liberty or Give Me Death"" no longer mean anything these days.",JoeWinchester99,e9gflfo,conservative
"I think the problem is you're skipping logically from this incident to a war. Are the people of Maryland ready to wage war against their own state? What other vast list of grievances do they have against the State of Maryland?  Logically this man's actions does not make much sense, for he lost his life for nothing, in an incident that may also deeply affect the family members, friends, and even the officers involved. 

For what? What did he gain? What did anyone gain? Another dead body, and another grieving family. Take it to court. Move to Texas if you have to. This isn't a revolutionary war, and to say the Maryland government is at all the same as the British in the Revolutionary War is quite a stretch. I hope they take this issue to SCOTUS, because I'm not a fan of the law either. But I'm not sacrificing my life for this, and I don't recommend for others to do the same, *assuming similar circumstances.*",Smithy7777,e9gpfo4,conservative
We are a nation of laws. Courts exist. Use them. There is absolutely no need to go down in a blazing glory to make a point. His life was not being threatened by the police. ,Smithy7777,e9iia63,conservative
"Thankfully he has surrounded himself with some people competent enough and trusted enough to talk him out of some rash, emotionally made impulses like that. ",Buddha_Punch,e9hcmhs,conservative
"This could've gone to scotus and been defended. Vote these justices out.  

I'm willing to defend our rights to arm and this scares the shit out of me but I just can't believe we are at the point of actual warfare. We can't be there YET!",abuigues,e9ghvu5,conservative
It's indeed a scary as fuck and we need to fight! I'm not just inclined we are at the point of warfare yet,abuigues,e9ghygt,conservative
">  We can't be there YET!

How many more laws preventing people from exercising their rights make us ""there yet?""

We've been ""there"" for a while.",soylent_absinthe,e9gra0j,conservative
I'm sorry man....I'm not willing to lose my life and leave my family behind over keeping my AR.  NOT YET!  ILL GO TO WAR IF ITS A MASS SCALE CONFISCATION,abuigues,e9gse07,conservative
I hope the boot polish at least tastes good when they come for yours.,Liberty_Pr1me,e9h6nt1,conservative
Can someone go to Montana and find some lost Rosendale ballots? Seriously why is it always lost Democrat ballots. If our election process has really become this corrupted than all is lost.,the-divine-comedy,e9gv5pk,conservative
"How do hidden ballots always benefit Dems? 

How do lefty NPCs never let this cross their minds?",orangeeyedunicorn,e9gs4bo,conservative
"Looks like that Blue Wave is coming after all, they just had to unclog the toilet before flushing their bulls--t first.  I guess with that in mind we should probably be calling it a brown wave, which is fitting considering the fascistic turn the left has taken in recent years. ",BudrickBundy,e9gqngi,conservative
Dump those ballots right into the Boston harbor,YankeeBlues21,e9gsldx,conservative
So what if they were found ? The law says that ballots have to be counted and reported by a certain time after the election. These would be found after that time has expired. ,be_quiet_roo,e9grsvr,conservative
"Oh look, more fucking fraud.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9h9pk0,conservative
It isn’t. JD scholten was ahead of Steve king in Iowa for most of the night before king pulled ahead and kept his seat.,Rotau,e9gxqi0,conservative
"We knew it, we saw it, and we did nothing.",Isredditreal2009,e9gxfij,conservative
"You must realize it is now time we #CountEveryVote, even if that vote was disqualified for one silly rule or another. And if that vote was left blank, let's just have the Democrats fill in the blank for the ""right"" candidate. No one's looking! If that fails, there's some extra ballots tucked away in a storage closet someplace. ",BudrickBundy,e9gry7w,conservative
That didn't happen five days after the election though.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9h79qe,conservative
[removed],,e9gxp2t,conservative
"Remember the hanging chads? Probably not, since you're a redditor. Look it up! The Democrats started not just to ""correct"" improperly filled out ballots, they were simply filling out ballots in 2000 also. They even wanted votes for Pat Buchanan to be counted as votes for Gore. If you fill out the ballot improperly or not at all, that's on you. The Democrat party doesn't care about your right to vote. They care about winning. ",BudrickBundy,e9h7wq7,conservative
"Sorry, but if want to make sure you go to the poll and you vote on ELECTION day.",ozric101,e9gyg4r,conservative
Good thing we are not a democracy then.,JMB_was_a_god,e9gzewc,conservative
[removed],,e9gyks4,conservative
"And now the election is over, sorry but like I said if the voter really cared they could have gone to the poll on election day. ",ozric101,e9gzrz9,conservative
[removed],,e9h057e,conservative
Most of those votes WERE NOT CAST AT THE POLLS.  ,ozric101,e9h073r,conservative
Are you talking about the fact that they were mail in votes? Show me proof that they weren’t mailed on time. ,Rotau,e9h07z6,conservative
"That is a shame, maybe they should have GONE TO THE POLLING LOCATION IN PERSON. ",ozric101,e9h0gnm,conservative
The burden is for YOU to show they were mailed on time. Otherwise why have any deadline or change the rules before the election not after. ,swanspank,e9h3tvb,conservative
"Lol are you really trying to say that sending a totally legal mail-in ballot like millions of other Americans means your vote doesn’t count?

You need to get out of your own head. ",Rotau,e9h0jaa,conservative
"Another reason we need voter ID and have to vote in person (minus military and college and such). It’s how we do it in Virginia, a republican will never win here but at least on election night you know the winner. ",Zac1245,e9h8p4i,conservative
No it isn’t. It’s reasonable to assume that the ballots were sent correctly unless someone reports otherwise. ,Rotau,e9hxmyn,conservative
I am saying that shit happens... and votes get tossed out all the time for many many reasons.  ,ozric101,e9h170m,conservative
"
Why? Rules don’t say that. Rules just say the ballot must be mailed early enough to arrive before the deadline. Doesn’t say anything about giving exceptions for other unforeseen events. ",swanspank,e9iqha7,conservative
"Votes should always be counted. Otherwise we don’t live in a democracy, we live in a tyranny. ",Rotau,e9h1gdp,conservative
"We have a Republic... not a Democracy... 

Lots of thing SHOULD happen, but that is not how the world is.  Most election offical try very hard and take their jobs sersouly, but still some votes are toss out and so long as the outcome is not effected it doesnt really matter.   

",ozric101,e9h1uct,conservative
"I’m sure you’d feel exactly the same if your vote was thrown out.

A republic is a type of democracy.",Rotau,e9h2fga,conservative
"You would be wrong... just as an example there about about 11 million persons in the State of GA a single vote means next to nothing.      
       
One vote being thown out does NOT equal tyranny.      
  


",ozric101,e9h2y95,conservative
"Bull. Shit.

I understand that stuff happens from time to time but if hundreds or thousands of uncounted votes are discovered... enough to influence the elections...  they better fucking be counted ",Rotau,e9h3bzd,conservative
"There are laws and regualtions about late ballots, the lawyers will aruge about whose vote gets counted and whose get tosseed.  ",ozric101,e9h3uko,conservative
"Yeah, presumption of innocence. You don't lose the right to vote unless/until you're convicted of a felony.",PubliusVA,e9g5cnx,conservative
"Seems like the outrage is coming from all around. Florida just allowed felons to vote, they should be happy he can only register.",Poz_My_Neg_Fuck_Hole,e9kjtwj,conservative
"This article is pure feelings over facts. Regardless, why waste energy getting upset over this? Let's not be like the left and get outraged or offended by every little thing. ",I_WANT_TO_LOSE_3_LBS,e9gpbqk,conservative
Not convicted yet so yeah he can still vote he'll probably get out of getting the death penalty unfortunately but legally he can vote if we start picking and choosing which laws to follow we definitely won't be better off,soulreaver1984,e9hcjp0,conservative
We just lost the house and the insanity continues.  Many years ago I read about how Rome died from within.  Even with Trump as prez we are dying as a country.  Not invaded but dying from the cancer of liberalism.,optionhome,e9g2vx0,conservative
[deleted],,e9g2vwd,conservative
"As guilty as he is, this is correct. He has not been convicted of a felony yet therefore as an adult US citizen, he can vote.

Remember, it's the Left who seeks to tear down the Constitutional foundations of our nation, not us. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9g7vuu,conservative
"> presumption of innocence. 

A mass murderer who plead guilty getting to vote.  ",optionhome,e9g9ieu,conservative
"Sorry to be *that* guy, but comparisons between us and Rome are superficial at best. ",LonelyMachines,e9ggpw5,conservative
[removed],,e9g8vgz,conservative
He registered as a Republican in July.,AlwaysPhillyinSunny,e9g98c2,conservative
">plead guilty

Source?",PubliusVA,e9gad2f,conservative
">A mass murderer who plead guilty getting to vote.

He offered to plead guilty if the death penalty was off the table. He didn't plead guilty.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9ghhfw,conservative
"Yeah, we will be lucky if we last 1/3 as long.",cornshelltortilla,e9gmivg,conservative
"> comparisons between us and Rome are superficial at best.

There are no outside threats destroying our country.  Those destroying it are all right here among us.",optionhome,e9h46r1,conservative
"> Maybe we're dying as a country because trump is Prez.

A roaring economy for ALL people regardless of color or gender is  just fucking horrible if you goal is to foster victim groups that war against each other.  And don't forget all people who are White are the devil.",optionhome,e9g9lqc,conservative
"He has plead guilty, but not in court. He's said he's done it but just because someone says something doesn't mean there's no court case.

I assume what he said will get brought up immediately and make this a fast as fuck court case, but there still needs work to be done to determine his sentence. 

Also, kinda weird how this article doesn't mention who he wanted to vote for.",ClearCelesteSky,e9lxx2w,conservative
600 years or so?  That would be a good run. ,LonelyMachines,e9h5vg8,conservative
"If it's not in court, it's not pleading guilty. A plea is by definition something done in court. ",PubliusVA,e9lz8q1,conservative
The Roman empire didn't last that long,cornshelltortilla,e9h5yjq,conservative
"Yeah, I'm agreeing with you, though I worded it poorly. He said he did it, and we all know he did it, but until he says he did it in court, he did not legally do it.

Thus, he can still vote. He's still an innocent man.",ClearCelesteSky,e9m1o1z,conservative
"Depends on how you define it.  If we start with their conquests of Carthage and Greece in the 2nd century BC and follow it to the fall of Constantinople in 1453, yeah. ",LonelyMachines,e9h66q4,conservative
It’s amazing that antifa doesn’t see how violent they are.,Ardeiles,e9f5qg2,conservative
"“Antifa isn’t just any violent mob, antifa is OUR violent mob!”— Liberals",COKETFM,e9f6rid,conservative
You can't make this shit up. ,GFZDW,e9f4hup,conservative
"Ah so violent far left is good, violent far right is bad.  
Some animals are more equal than others I guess. ",MonkeyWrench,e9f6is9,conservative
I’m just glad someone is punching the masked nerds back ,steelallz,e9f7y0n,conservative
Co founder of Vice hardly a Nazi. These NPC's will say anything they are programmed to.,s4mu8l,e9g248b,conservative
Can someone give me a TLDR of “Proud Boys”? ,NotUrAvrageFish,e9fc6jn,conservative
Arent they both hate groups?,boomshakalakainak,e9gvwep,conservative
Paypal is doing a good job of setting up future bankruptcy for angering everyone,krepogregg,e9f9i1t,conservative
"The proud boys never said harm nobody.

Antifa on the other hand is harm everybody ",HowRememberAll,e9gk9di,conservative
"It's the law of incoming rounds. You only notice the shells coming at you, and not ones aimed at people you either don't like or don't care about. With the whole media on the left, it's little wonder that most people aren't aware of antifa's riots, the blm cop killings, the assaults on GOP congressmen and staffers, or the political motives of some of the recent shooters.

But let some dipshit with a swastika tear down a hillary sign, and now we're off to the races. They point and shout ""See?! That's why *all* conservatives are racist, because they don't immediately denounce this"".

Meanwhile, most conservatives don't know or don't give a shit that some racist dipshit did something stupid, because of the law of incoming rounds. ",haplogreenleaf,e9ghco8,conservative
I still can't comprehend to this day. How can any organization deem violence as the appropriate action to protest?,goldrotmgonly,e9ge4a4,conservative
You should’ve seen the /r/technology post about this. Many antifa defenders. ,Jabronies96,e9ffpnp,conservative
"They do, they just believe they are in the right and so have no problem with it.  They're religious zealots, nothing more and nothing less.",anuser999,e9gh7ft,conservative
"Well.. the DNC trains them to push the limit and get a ton of mentally challenged people to go march with them.

&#x200B;

It's a mixture of felons who know how to act out in front of cops (on every video theres a few that just stare right at the cops while making threats to people) and people with mental disorders (e.g. people who throw shit).

&#x200B;

It's not a matter of a lack of self-reflection. They know exactly what they're doing. Which is why they all need to go to jail.",Swarlos8888,e9f80yv,conservative
Antifa believes they are acting out of self-defense. That is how delusional they are.,8K12,e9fllpg,conservative
"They know, they just think they are morally justified.",Dogfacedgod88,e9gc8v1,conservative
[removed],,e9flxdo,conservative
"Nope it's more like ""Bu-bu-bu-but they punch Nazis!!!! And that's good!!""

The issue is that the liberals have begun to consider everything that isn't Democratic liberal or left of it to be Nazi. 

People on the left that can make the simple distinction between conservatives and the Alt-right/neo-nazis never seem to like antifa.",Castaway77,e9f7cd2,conservative
"Poorly named group of conservatives who show up to counter liberal protests, from what I can tell. They're being called a racist group but that doesn't seem accurate as they have *members* of varying races. ",GFZDW,e9fd1bh,conservative
"I'd say it's a combination of 2 main types of people, firstly sociopathic individuals who don't believe that the rules apply to them and that they can do whatever they want to people they dislike. And secondly, people who have been manipulated by the first group into fearing for their lives and freedoms if they don't answer the call to arms. Some of them honestly do believe that they are defending their rights(of course you have to bear in mind that they also believe in positive rights).",Mewster1818,e9gy3mb,conservative
Are the proud boys violent?,JackFucington,e9fnnum,conservative
"Fuck it goes farther than that, I’ve seen leftists in r/politics saying that they’re starting to view all Trump voters as rabid dogs. ",J-Vito,e9f7i6d,conservative
"You’re right, and I think that’s what concerns me most. It’s really one thing to engage in some hyperbole about your opponents political views. It’s another thing entirely to feel that violence is justified against your fellow Americans because they aren’t in the same party as you are. I fear that if a Democrat is elected President in 2020 there truly could be reprisals against everyday conservatives. ",COKETFM,e9f7ph7,conservative
"And the founders, from my understanding, have actually removed neo-natzi sympathizers from the group. ",molon-labe7,e9fddo4,conservative
IIRC they also go to their own protests that antifa tries to shut down. ,skarface6,e9ffwwz,conservative
"Interesting. I see Gavin McGines (I think that’s how u spell it) on the pic. Not personally a fan of him bc he seems to rather be provocative compared to being more intellectual like Shapiro/Crowder, who I personally enjoy ",NotUrAvrageFish,e9ff0lu,conservative
This makes sense. We can't let fear govern our decisions though. We should live through it and understand those fears respectfully.,goldrotmgonly,e9j8r0w,conservative
No. They only retaliate.,Odoacer476CE,e9g304e,conservative
"Eventually they'll learn that, rabid or not, if you poke a dog enough times it's probably gonna bite.",CondoPresident,e9fb44b,conservative
[removed],,e9fl8c2,conservative
">  I fear that if a Democrat is elected President in 2020 there truly could be reprisals against everyday conservatives.

Obama literally did this. He tapped the phones of conservative journalists and had the IRS target conservative groups. Of course, he also tapped the phones of his political opponent (Trump.) Right now, even with the small iota of power of counting ballots they're manufacturing votes in Broward County to rig the election against a Republican. This is what Democrats do. They're corrupt.

That's not even considering Obamacare, which to my mind is absolutely an attack against everyday conservatives.",HardCounter,e9fk8ud,conservative
"The founder is also married to a native american woman and has several children with her. If anything Gavin is anti-sharia and very critical of Islam. He makes no claim towards race but rather culture. He isn't an insane ideologue either. He thinks west is the best and that, for some reason, pisses people off. ",SullyDuggs,e9fg2bv,conservative
That's good to hear though you'll never hear it from the MSM.,GFZDW,e9fdioi,conservative
McInnes,SullyDuggs,e9fg51j,conservative
[removed],,e9g3kb4,conservative
He shoved a dildo up his ass live on air and that imo makes him a liability to the right as much as antifa is a liability to the left.,potato7890,e9gdvij,conservative
Not a fan either. Seems they are trying to take a page out of the antifa playbook and when you go down that road... ,GFZDW,e9fftec,conservative
That's what they want. Don't give them the satisfaction.,royallprick,e9fjvai,conservative
Dawg you need to relax.,Castaway77,e9fzwys,conservative
It blows my mind seeing posts and comments about him in other subs. All they have to do is watch 1 of his videos to see that he isn't a neo nazi,The_Mighty_Rex,e9ftlw3,conservative
"Yeah, they also use pretty loose definitions for the ""Alt-Right"" too, so go figure",molon-labe7,e9fdl0g,conservative
I mean he reasonably backs up all his claims with facts and is pretty good at arguing his point. Sure he has his comedic side but he’s still a smart guy,NotUrAvrageFish,e9g4mvn,conservative
"The proud boys exist because police are routinely falling to do their job of dealing with violent mobs. They, or something like them, are a necessary reaction in light of that failure.",Buddha_Punch,e9ggq1z,conservative
"I think it's a 'fight fire with fire' mentality.

Shapiro predicted there'd be pushback against antifa's violence, and I think the Proud Boys are part of that.",HardCounter,e9fkiaj,conservative
"nah if they want to start a ""civil war"" with no guns then they are more than welcome to lmao",adlp,e9fu9z0,conservative
Fuck that “if you fight your enemies they win” Trudeau bullshit.  This is our lives they are threatening ,ravenswin,e9flay8,conservative
"Nah, we just have to make sure that once it starts we don't stop until the problem is solved once and for all.",anuser999,e9gjwc2,conservative
"The people making those posts and comments are counting on the fact that most people are *way* too lazy to do their own research and are more than happy to just lap up the programming.  There's a reason we call them NPCs - they just get programmed and off they go, no thinking required.",anuser999,e9gjzti,conservative
Those pesky uneducated rural bumpkins also provide the food for the coastal elites. How long would New York City last if food stopped flowing in?,diehardgiraffe,e9gff51,conservative
[deleted],,e9g2c0e,conservative
Can I identify as someone who makes less money? How do I declare that to the IRS?,AddictedToGlue,e9gdv9k,conservative
"I love it. If they want to throw objective truth and reality out the window then use it against them.

While we're at it, why can't he marry two women? And his dog? And an idea? And a company? ",d_42,e9hg01k,conservative
"Hey I want to do the opposite.  I feel like I’m 65,  why not be.  I could retire and get social security!",nooneuknow42,e9g6mnt,conservative
[deleted],,e9gbdim,conservative
"As a minor, you can file for emancipation.  Not sure the reverse exists.

Edit: The reverse does exist (Guardian Ad Litem), but it's not what the guy wants.",ammoprofit,e9gbztq,conservative
Subscribe ,skarface6,e9glvo8,conservative
"“The net effect of the GOP lawsuit, therefore, does not appear to block any votes in Maricopa County, and should expand the overall number of votes counted statewide.”

I’m confused is this not a good outcome? No votes blocked and more votes counted state wide? I just fail to see how that’s a bad thing. ",snpchaat,e9f667a,conservative
"I just don't get why the Secretary of State just does not say they won't accept those votes due to irregularity, and certify the election as is, end of story.  The local county people are treated like they have way to much say in these matters, same with FL.  It is the Secretary of State who is in charge and makes the final determination, not local corrupt officials.",nixfu,e9f7m5h,conservative
Keep moving. Nothing to see here.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9f16ox,conservative
[deleted],,e9f45yq,conservative
"The blackpill here is that they’ve gotten away with it before. They know that they can. 

If these people steal multiple states, what is the course of action going forward? I know what the Founders would say - they did not take kindly to being denied their representation. ",OldHickoryNTLSM,e9f3bzm,conservative
"What happened to the story yesterday about the state whutting this down?
",FreeSpeechRocks,e9fb4vd,conservative
These fraudsters should be tried for treason.,mattcruise,e9fvcju,conservative
This election needs be invalidated and a new election should take place under guard!,CulpeppperInaMinute,e9fbj54,conservative
"I live in Arizona... all I can say is this is shady as hell and they better do signature matching of mail-in ballots. Seriously, the sigs better damn well match or invalid, and even moreso, investigated as to why.

Arizona is such a mess of a state. Right before our very eyes. I elected Trump in the hopes that this in your face corruption would be dealt with and the one thing that no one has touched is vote corruption on the left. I was excited when he was putting together that commission, only to hear it got decommissioned within a month or two. Trump's gonna learn the hard way that Republicans are a bunch of pussies, and he made the mistake not immediately executive ordering ballot standardizations across the country for all federal elections, as well as fraud investigations.

If the Dems can so easily steal elections, it doesn't matter how good the message is or the policies getting implemented. I firmly believe the main reason Trump even won this last election was because everyone just assumed it was a landslide for Hillary that the Democrats didn't cheat enough to ensure their normal margins. Even if they did, his win in Florida was by such a high margin they couldn't fabricate that many votes in Broward or Miami-Dade.

This has been one of the most frustrating things for me to see in years. It makes me lose hope for our country. Trump gave me hope. I still had hope on Tuesday with the Senate gains. I am losing my hope if the Dems successfully steal these seats.",GeneticsGuy,e9h5rz4,conservative
"Change how the rules are interpreted in one political party stronghold but not the other political party’s area.  That way people who don’t follow the rules and don’t make the effort to vote in a timely fashion get to have their votes counted while the other party is left not getting their votes counted because they weren’t allowed to vote by the rules. You don’t see how that may cause an unfair or illegitimate result?

Put another way, it’s a high turnout so let’s have one party vote more than the other party in their strongest supporters districts. ",swanspank,e9f7hx1,conservative
If legal it's fine. If illegal...wtf.,PeeMud,e9f6q9x,conservative
"What if I want to vote today? Should my vote be counted? No, it’s not a good outcome just to have more votes counted without qualification. Some votes are illegal. Some votes came in after the deadline. Counting those votes disenfranchises legal, valid votes that were submitted by diluting their impact. All legal, valid votes that were submitted on time should be counted. All illegal, invalid votes that were submitted after the deadline should not be.",hello_japan,e9faffa,conservative
[removed],,e9f8mdc,conservative
"Casting out votes because of ""irregularities"" would be a kind of election fraud as well. ",SeanRamey,e9f9t6q,conservative
"That would be the Saturday and Monday before, not after, election day. I don't love it either, but no, they didn't reopen polls today.",pharmermummles,e9f4if0,conservative
What's it like to get mad before understanding what you're mad about,efficientenzyme,e9gdpb1,conservative
"Whoops not enough missing ballots. 


Uh anyone else want to vote? Congress does not sit until January. If you move here before December 31st and even if you voted in another state you never voted here you can vote.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9f4ih8,conservative
"This legit made me laugh. 

“I am losing! So this one doesn’t count!”

Come on. This is so childish.  ",AcknowledgeableYuman,e9fg0hr,conservative
You’re delusional if you only think one side is doing shady stuff when it comes to voting. We need better voting laws and procedures nationwide. Trump has failed to do anything on this.,DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hd4qn,conservative
Can we just declare it a national holiday already?  This is getting more and more absurd every election. ,Falkamper,e9faysp,conservative
No I definitely do see that. It’s just at this point do we fuck over voters who likely had no idea that they were participating in a time period that was illegitimate. I get the frustration I just know that I would be very upset if my vote didn’t count because an election official screwed up. Sure you can say those voters should’ve voted in a timely fashion but it’s difficult to say that those voters wouldn’t have voted on Election Day without the extended early voting period. Difficult situation to remedy after the fact so I would default to allowing those votes to be counted. ,snpchaat,e9fm591,conservative
I don’t love the idea that polls were kept open after the early voting deadline but the idea that voters would be punished because of some fuckery by voting officials isn’t something I’d want to see happen either. But it’s hard to know the whole story just from this one article. ,snpchaat,e9f7cuo,conservative
"It’s only the early voting ballots, which were casted before Election Day- therefore they are not illegal votes. However, whether or not they should be counted is a completely different matter.",waveduality,e9fcw7s,conservative
I would say breaking several state election laws in their process in that county would be plenty of proof of irregularities.,nixfu,e9f9xhd,conservative
[deleted],,e9gg9u6,conservative
"I agree with you, up until a few counties that are not following the states constitution on how the election is supposed to be handled. Then they deny the press access to the counting areas even though they are supposed to be able to see. Then there is gross incompetence on how these provisional ballots keep showing up, where was the chain of custody on these ballots? Miami just found a huge stack of boxes of ballots sitting in a USPS warehouse. 

This makes the election in Florida look invalid, and if this is happening there how about everywhere else? I don't think a do over is a good idea, but even both sides of the political spectrum should see this and be afraid, maybe next time the Reps might try to pull some shenanigans. 

https://www.miaminewtimes.com/news/miami-ballots-are-still-inside-opa-locka-post-office-10899192

https://www.local10.com/news/elections/emergency-hearing-to-be-held-after-rick-scott-files-lawsuit-against-broward-elections-supervisor

https://www.palmbeachpost.com/news/20181109/palm-beach-elections-supervisor-bans-cameras-from-public-ballot-counting

",Havebaconwilltravel,e9fpfj4,conservative
"With early voting and absentee voting available everyone can vote with some effort. But a national holiday every 2 years doesn’t seem like a great burden either especially if it gets more participation from the voters. 

I have voted in every national election except 1 since 1978. That one I missed was no one’s fault except mine. Same with my spouse. My dad is in his mid eighties and he even managed to vote after changing states this year.",swanspank,e9go3nr,conservative
"That doesn’t help anyone who normally works on national holiday, unless you think hospitals should just close and let everyone die on Election Day.",Masterjason13,e9ggc5p,conservative
"> we fuck over voters who likely had no idea that they were participating in a time period that was illegitimate

No WE don't. The officials who mismanaged the election did. Send them to prison for interfering with people's right to vote but them behaving poorly does not force others to suffer the consequences.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9fra65,conservative
So who’s rights are infringed? The vast majority that followed the rules or the few that did not.  The ones getting fucked over is by their own actions. Not knowing the rules doesn’t mean you can change them after the contest has ended for a few people and not giving others the same opportunity. Casting a ballot and casting a ballot past the deadline is not the same. While you say count all votes I agree. Those that were cast according to the rules. Otherwise let’s just give Republicans strongholds an extra week to vote but not the Democrats strongholds. That’s not really just is it. ,swanspank,e9gn818,conservative
I could understand it if turnout was underestimated. I’d hope they just withhold the ballots cast on those days unless they’re needed because the race is still tight after mail-in and other provisional ballots are counted.,waveduality,e9fcoyp,conservative
"None of our opinions should matter, what's the law? That is all that should determine what votes are counted and which are not. If your vote wasn't counted because your local elected election official broke the law, maybe you should vote out the nitwit. ",PeeMud,e9fab0u,conservative
"Some of them are illegal. Some of them are marked improperly, or are from people out of the district, or whatever. The point is that the “all votes should be counted” mantra is wrong. All legal, valid votes submitted before the deadline should be counted.",hello_japan,e9fdxpf,conservative
"Oh let me explain it slowly. 

You said voter fraud and used reopening polls illegally as a rationale.

They didn't reopen polls illegally.

You're mad but why?",efficientenzyme,e9ggug2,conservative
"Don't be so negative, there's no perfect solution, but why attack a good idea?",Falkamper,e9gj80k,conservative
Wait are you disagreeing with me? Those voters shouldn’t have to suffer the consequences of poor election mismanagement,snpchaat,e9frmap,conservative
How can you vote out the nitwit if they won't count your vote? ,gregbst10,e9fbsbe,conservative
I’m speaking only of the early votes casted after the state defined deadline.,waveduality,e9fe7y4,conservative
And that is exactly what is happening. There is no late voting going on.,DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hd02w,conservative
[deleted],,e9ghr7j,conservative
It's a conundrum the people who continually voted in the nitwit must face. My pity is limited for them even if it costs the Republicans a senate seat. Count all legal votes because that is the law. ,PeeMud,e9fm7bf,conservative
"No, it’s [not](https://hotair.com/archives/2018/11/10/whoops-hilarious-mix-rejected-valid-ballots-broward/) exactly what’s happening. Snipes has already admitted to mixing in invalid ballots with valid ballots. In one small random sampling that they did (that Snipes resisted) they found that approximately 10% of the ballots were invalid.",hello_japan,e9hdfxr,conservative
Why are you so against people voting? Seems rather un-American. And who are you to say there was no emergency for all those folks?,DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hcv5r,conservative
"Interesting, source?",DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hdk0k,conservative
[deleted],,e9hd3ar,conservative
"https://hotair.com/archives/2018/11/10/whoops-hilarious-mix-rejected-valid-ballots-broward/

20 invalid ballots out of 205, approximately 10%.",hello_japan,e9hdlkr,conservative
"Congrats, there is no Broward County in Arizona. Try reading.",DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hdfzf,conservative
"This is Florida, this post is about Arizona. ",DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hdud9,conservative
[deleted],,e9hdmx2,conservative
"I know, I was speaking in general about the entire situation and why the “count every vote” mantra is insufficient without qualification. But fair enough.",hello_japan,e9hecbx,conservative
"Ok I will. Your argument is they didn’t define what an emergency was, and you ramble on from there, lamenting that it was all illegal because of this.

Your statement that they never defined what an emergency is is false. The definition, [here](https://www.azleg.gov/viewdocument/?docName=https://www.azleg.gov/ars/16/00542.htm), is “any unforeseen circumstances that would prevent the elector from voting at the polls”. It is less of a life/death emergency and more of a “I can’t make it Tuesday and would be unable to exercise my right to vote” emergency.",DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hegvp,conservative
"Thanks for clearing it up. I agree to some extent, I hope we see some serious reform when it comes to voting in this country. No one should win due to technicalities, on either side.",DONALD_FUCKING_TRUMP,e9hevuf,conservative
And calling everyone you disagree with a racist is ‘classic liberal privilege’.,Kutepov,e9g1rva,conservative
"Calling everyone who disagrees with you a ""white-supremacist"" is dumb.",Azul19,e9gopk4,conservative
Stupidity isn’t a race. ,mods_blow_goats,e9g26ef,conservative
"""Equality"": treating black adults like helpless babies who need to be protected at all times.

&nbsp;

How insulting. And these middle-aged white ladies will never realize how condescending they actually are.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9giqay,conservative
"Empty insults involving claims of racism and white supremacy are hollow, they're insults levied by progressives to halt criticism and divert attention from the central argument. Independent of actual verifiable evidence concluding someone is a racist or white supremacist, the words are meaningless. Too many political conversations lead into labeling anyone discordant with progressive ideology as a Nazi, racist, or white supremacist. Even people who are [not white](https://www.thedailybeast.com/why-young-men-of-color-are-joining-white-supremacist-groups)... They're blurring the meaning of words and utilizing fearmongering to drum up emotional hatred for ratings and votes. This is how perverse their level of corruption is now.",mordrom,e9gpcsq,conservative
She got fucking stupid the day she left Fox and went to CNN.  Classic libtard.,Saltydogusn,e9g3w2q,conservative
"So, black people are too delicate to say their questions can be dumb?",skarface6,e9gqgsk,conservative
"If it's the reports in thinking of it's clear she was hired because if her ""agressive"" questioning at the administration and not her intellect, probably in part to enable just this kind of defense/smear.",wmansir,e9gbxjt,conservative
[deleted],,e9go0jj,conservative
Gotta help our little brown brothers. ^^^^^/s,skarface6,e9gqhyq,conservative
"https://imgur.com/a/MWU8Mxe

https://www.spartareport.com/2017/08/idiot-of-the-day-maxine-waters/",mods_blow_goats,e9god5z,conservative
Your examples all lack intelligence.,Dorian_v25,e9gppfy,conservative
"So when Trump calls somebody stupid and that person is black why is it assumed to be racist? Can't they just be a dumb person? Using your other example can't somebody be an Irish drunk and it not be racially motivated? Can't they just be an actual drunk?

You realize this mentality is textbook soft bigotry of low expectations right? Somebody sees something said or happen and instead of treating both parties like equal human beings with individual flaws, they draw conclusions from the race of the person being talked to and the person doing the talking.

Maxine Waters being stupid has nothing to do with her race and everything to do with who she is as an individual. Stop judging people on inherent characteristics they have no control over. We used to call that racism and it's abhorrent.

This protected class bullshit is the reason this racism shit will never go away. Get a bunch of dudes of all races together and let them drink some beers and bitch about life and bust each other's balls. Unite under one's nation not one's race. It's irrelevant.",Slickford_IV,e9gptdt,conservative
Well.. you chose two horrible horrible choices. If you want to pick smart blacks go with Michael Jordan and condi rice.  Maxine is stupid as fuck and barely speaks normal English and Lebron can’t read or write above 8th grade level. I’d take an IQ test against either for my entire portfolio ,mods_blow_goats,e9go5nd,conservative
then why does he attack acosta? are minorities not allowed to be criticized? ,flaamed,e9go895,conservative
What are you basing that claim about Lebron on? ,DACRQQKED,e9go8f4,conservative
"Are you trolling or are you just that simple? Just because a stereotype is applied to a group doesn’t mean that the same trait can’t be attributed to someone outside the group...

For example, if I consistently make derogatory comments about Irish people being alcoholics, I’m not suddenly NOT racist because I say a black persons drinks too much too...",DACRQQKED,e9gofff,conservative
https://imgur.com/a/MWU8Mxe,mods_blow_goats,e9goe8k,conservative
Wow. You really don’t know do you? I think half the people who post here are liberals. No one who can read and make an intelligent decision wouldn’t be a conservative ,mods_blow_goats,e9gohq3,conservative
"So when trump criticizes a black person it is because he is racist, but when he criticizes a white person its just an insult?",flaamed,e9gojsh,conservative
ignore the troll,flaamed,e9gpbt5,conservative
"To the few acting like Jim ""look at me I'm Jim Acosta"" Acosta assaulted someone...stop.  Is he a terrible journalist, sure.  Should he have white house privileges stripped, maybe.  But did he act against that woman with overt aggression, NO.",dmpdulux3,e9feurv,conservative
I am no fan of CNN but are you guys serious? A reported trying to hang on to a mic to squeeze in extra time for questions is now considered ‘touching’ a woman and offense serious enough for a ban.,xxx_asdf,e9f6ju7,conservative
"It wasn't great but let's not over blow it. He kinda sorta brushed off an aide attempting to take the microphone. Him acting like a whiny little child for 24 straight months is reason enough to take his press pass.

This will be revisited tenfold if anybody remotely touches a left leaning person from here on out.",greatatdrinking,e9f7dxx,conservative
The guys a dick. He didn't break any laws but keeping him out of official press conferences shouldn't even be up for debat. The guy simply ruins the event for everyone. He talks over every question and answer and acts like a 5 year old. ,PeacefullyFighting,e9g40tc,conservative
"As Shapiro says, it's not like he did anything grossly inappropriate with the aide, however Acosta is a douche so he deserves all the criticism he's getting.",Sexy-Ken,e9fckr2,conservative
"Wasn’t CNN also the first one screaming liar liar pants on fire about a doctored video 

Edit: hello Chinese bots",i_floop_the_pig,e9f5krd,conservative
"CNN edited the footage to not show what Jim did, how convenient for them.",PapaGeorgio23,e9fasfk,conservative
"When *BuzzFeed* disagrees with you on opposing the right, you *might* just be wrong. ",Shaadowmaaster,e9fpdmn,conservative
"Taking his press pass was the culmination of his long standing terrible behavior. But he somewhat got what he wanted too. (Martyrdom?). This could all have been avoided so easily. Let him come, Day after day. The whole White House should have just “frozen him out”",keepitreal51,e9fbgbw,conservative
"Give him his press back, but don’t answer him.",Chastethrow316420,e9h5wup,conservative
"He's not a cabinet secretary, he's a reporter, it's not his job to argue policy with the President.
",lodger238,e9fskk6,conservative
[removed],,e9f7gmd,conservative
"Aside from being rude and out of line, he made a downward movement with his arm and made contact with her arm.  Insignificant? Sure, but as minor and a nothing urger as it is, he made contact.

Look at it this way, if Trump had made these EXACT motions against anyone, the media outcry and declaration of assault would be deafening.",Geosage,e9fqs4a,conservative
He should be banned. The press privileges are for journalists. ,AgrosLastRide,e9fi7jd,conservative
"A White House intern came to remove the microphone from him, he stopped her three times, and he laid hands on her.  That's too far as far as I'm concerned.  When the journo gets told it's someone else's turn to ask questions and they do this, they need to go.",Yes_Your_President,e9g40s7,conservative
"Did he harm her?  No.  But he did knowingly prevent her from doing her job.  He knew she was coming for that mic and he showed great disrespect (as he always does).  He absolutely should be barred from the White House until he apologizes for misleading the people and simply being an ass.  There have been several high-profile meetings with world leaders where he acted like an ass.  We The People should demand better representation than him in front of the worldview.

Edit:  read the fucking statement first retards.  I’m on your side.  ",Pizzabungalow,e9fhous,conservative
"Cool, then why did CNN edit it?",orangeeyedunicorn,e9frtjj,conservative
"overt aggression, enough to pull her body forward and make her lose balance as he jolted the mic away from her. I would say his intention was to keep her from getting the mic at all costs which resulted in physical force being used.",billswinthesuperbowl,e9g7m4y,conservative
I didn't know aggression needed to be overt to be considered assault,Toriganator,e9fr38f,conservative
"He clearly did touch her.  I agree with you that it isn't a big deal but that's not really an excuse to lie about it and edit the video to exclude the only part in question, especially considering they're accusing the president's press secretary of doing something similar.

And technically speaking, the ban was for Acosta's other conduct as well.  ",xOxOqTbByGrLxOxO,e9f7i6y,conservative
Acosta knows the rules. When the intern requested the microphone it was to be surrendered. Instead he used his arm to block the intern to force a confrontation with an intern.  Just look at the body language of Acosta and the intern. Acosta knew he was being confrontational with the intern. The reporter may think he is entitled to hold the microphone and continue questions because he is special but that is not the way the press conference are conducted. ,swanspank,e9f8s08,conservative
Acosta's privileges are being removed because this is the umpteenth time he's done something like this.,regollyek,e9f6qwq,conservative
"I think it's more the culmination of his bullshit over the last couple years. The intern tried to retrieve the mic after he was told to give it to another reporter, and he refused and kept the intern's arms away from it with his own arms. He had already had a lot of ""questions"" answered, and he wanted to be the news story rebuking the President with assertions rather than questions. He got his wish, and became the story, and now he can let a more respectable journalist from CNN be part of the white house press group.",varemia,e9f6wlz,conservative
"Yeah the whole “assault”/“laid hands on” accusations are stupid and virtually untrue, but this is the latest in a long line of instances of Jim acting like an asswipe. I’m just shocked it took them this long to revoke his credentials.",lion27,e9f8s7h,conservative
"I think he should have been thrown out for interrupting Trump and Kim's signing event, a major public display of diplomatic goodwill ",elosoloco,e9g913i,conservative
"I’d have banned him for far less. There’s a respect to the office of President, regardless of who is in office that should be upheld. Jim Acosta makes the WH press corps look like a Jerry Springer re-run.",Fetzore,e9fdtot,conservative
"That’s assault brotha.

In all seriousness though, people get aggravated because of the double standards. If this had been a conservative reporter and a Democrat president we would have never heard the end of this. ",rjohnson99,e9fjheh,conservative
"Yes, not giving up the microphone in a professional and orderly fashion after asking an excess number of questions should absolutely result in a ban from fucking Whitehouse press conferences.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9frj5y,conservative
"He didn't lay her out with a punch, but he acted aggressively.

If you were at work and one co-worker handled another the way Acosta handled her, you would likely find it to be wrong and out of place.",Telineye,e9g1lbz,conservative
We already went through the right-wing version of this with Cory Lewandowski and Michelle Fields. So this is us revisiting that tenfold. Make them live up to their own standards.,hello_japan,e9fawbg,conservative
"Personally, I think all the people trying to talk about whether or not he touched her are kind of missing the forest through the trees. It has little to nothing to do with him kicked from the White House. He was kicked for one simple reason: being a self-aggrandizing blowhard with a somewhat ironic last name. ",TheModernDaVinci,e9f8y1i,conservative
They don’t even need visual evidence of a Republican touching a woman. They make it up on their own.,8K12,e9flixl,conservative
"I disagree with Ben.  I'd pose him these two scenarios:

> At a DailyWire meeting, Ben instructs a male employee of his to pass a file down to him, as they are all sitting at a large table and are not withing reaching distance of each other.  The employee refuses, for whatever reason.  After an awkward silence, a female employee walks over to the man and reaches for the file.  The male employee hands it to her, and she brings it to Ben.

And then:

> At a DailyWire meeting, Ben instructs a male employee of his to pass a file down to him, as they are all sitting at a large table and are not withing reaching distance of each other.  The employee refuses, for whatever reason.  After an awkward silence, a female employee walks over to the man and reaches for the file.  The male employee refuses to hand over the file, pushes the woman's arm away from him, and yanks it back to himself because he doesn't want to give it up.

Are we really supposed to believe that Ben would find no difference in severity between these two scenarios?  Take the belligerence of not giving the file (microphone) up when asked to out of the equation, and the introduction of any kind of forceful resistance, even how minor it was, immediately and obviously makes it much worse.",Telineye,e9g2ecz,conservative
Yep. Because it was zoomed in slightly.,Taoutes,e9f5twt,conservative
"Attack him because you disagree with him? I don’t like Acosta either, but the solution is not to attack someone because you disagree with them and their tactics. Advocating as such makes you as bad as the violent left that you regularly attack based on your post history. Conservatism is about upholding moral standards, and advocating for attacking someone is only harming Conservatives.",mistamosh,e9fcxhn,conservative
Corey lewandowski,ExpensiveMention,e9gd5fd,conservative
"Agreed he's a disrespectful ass, but the tweets of ""we now have more evidence of Acosta assaulting someone than Kavanaugh"" and stuff is just factually wrong, devisive, and easy points for the left.  ",dmpdulux3,e9fjd2w,conservative
"That’s my thing. He physically refused to give up the mic. No one got hurt, but everyone has to follow the rules.",spacepunker,e9fbsx6,conservative
This is the correct answer,lwhite1,e9fc4v0,conservative
"> The intern tried to retrieve the mic after he was told to give it to another reporter, and he refused and kept the intern's arms away from it with his own arms.

Exactly. He could've held it over his head and play ""can't touch this""- would've been just as unprofessional.

The contact is not the issue, it's the intent.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9ffjbq,conservative
">  respectable journalist from CNN

Good luck with finding one.",rusty890,e9fjrwx,conservative
I would prefer we cool it off for now. I don't think we need to claim that Jim Acosta is karate chopping White House staffers. Just acknowledge it for what it was. Poor behavior. This was a straw that broke the camel's back. Not a hefty log,greatatdrinking,e9fcg5q,conservative
"I actually agree with making them live with their own standards, but don't try and say this is on the lewandowski level. What he did was much worse. I agree on your other points though",TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9fk4rb,conservative
">It has little to nothing to do with him kicked from the White House.

https://twitter.com/PressSec/status/1060374680991883265

That's not what the administration would have you believe.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9ff2gx,conservative
I thought it was because the video was slightly sped up?,el_jay_sea,e9f6tt7,conservative
You do realize the first clip they show is not zoomed in right? ,RKilbane20,e9gnema,conservative
"""We now have more evidence of Acosta assaulting someone than Kavanaugh"" is a joke. I think you need to lighten up. I don't think Acosta assaulted the aide, but I think that joke is funny as hell.

",super_ag,e9gdwnm,conservative
I think that is more of a slam against the Kavanaugh accusations. It is an intentional exaggeration of Acosta to show that simply making contact with a woman is more than Brett ever did.  ,8K12,e9flb2u,conservative
"Except for the fact that we at least have a video showing something, whereas with Kavanaugh, there was literally absolutely nothing.",Jesterslore,e9h2a81,conservative
No that's a literal fact. Words have meanings. ,orangeeyedunicorn,e9frrwg,conservative
"The point is, conservatives are tired of being held to higher standards. If this same scenario happened on the left, we wouldn't hear the end of it. I actually don't mind that we are holding them to their standards. 

Another point is that obviously it was enough that CNN didn't want people to see the contact that they would edit it out of the video, which is telling.",TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9fkfvu,conservative
"Divisive for some, hopefully an eye-opener for others.  Don’t forget they were ready to hang Kavanaugh over what was later found to be blatant lies.  It was like the Salem Witch Trials all over again.  People forget history and sometimes the only way to remind them is to hold up a mirror so they can see themselves.

Agreed those tweets were hammed up, but still hilarious.  If someone falsely accuses me of something or daily bashed me with lies about my character, I’m not ashamed to say I’d have a little fun at their expense.  Is it how I’d like to see the country right now?  No.  But if someone throws sand at me, they can expect it to be returned.  ",Pizzabungalow,e9fjz0s,conservative
"Anderson Cooper? , granted I have not watched him in about 2-3 years.",5_yr_lurker,e9fxp2o,conservative
"I agree with you that it wasn’t the end of the world and that there are plenty of other things that justify his removal, but I don’t have to make them live up to my standards. I have to make them live up to their own standards, as they are the ones subjecting the country to their standards and using their media megaphone to broadcast and apply their standards to anyone right of Mao. They are the ones that pushed for Lewandowski to be fired after he put his hands on Michelle Fields in a very similar and possibly even more benign way. It is far worse to allow them to apply their standards unevenly than to insist that they be held to their own standards. In fact, it is the only way to get them to realize that their standards are bad and wrong and eventually change them.",hello_japan,e9fdrax,conservative
"Maybe it was worse. Much worse is a little far. They are comparable in my opinion. Neither were assault, they both put their hands on a woman when they shouldn’t have, both were blown out of proportion but the media treated both incidents entirely differently. Do you think Cory assaulted her or something?",hello_japan,e9fknpy,conservative
After being slightly slowed down.,LrdCheesterBear,e9f720g,conservative
"Who are you referring to as ""they""?",Taoutes,e9gng3a,conservative
"Its actually true

We have more evidence against acosta than kavanaugh

Acosta: video of him possibly hitting her. Definitely touching

Kavanaugh: 0 evidence. 5 witnesses say it never happened. 1 accuser admits she lied.
Ford was discredited

Speaking of are we gonna ignore that cnn (supposedly news) doctored video more than sarah Sanders (allegedly) did?",ExpensiveMention,e9g9cil,conservative
Is there a second Acosta Assault that we have evidence about?,OMGorilla,e9h1ufq,conservative
Speaking of are we gonna ignore that cnn (supposedly news) doctored video more than sarah Sanders (allegedly) did?,ExpensiveMention,e9g9hg2,conservative
"If this was a republican who did the same thing theyed be talking about how he assaulted her

Corey lewandawski resigned over the same thing

Stop defending liberals",ExpensiveMention,e9fk4qg,conservative
"I kind of look at it like, do I really want these to be the standards moving forward? I'd way rather appeal to people's common sensibility about these kinds of things than try to actually apply them to the opposition.

Am I willing to point out their incredible hypocrisy? Yes. Do I want to engage in their hypocrisy to prove a point? No",greatatdrinking,e9fdza3,conservative
">they both put their hands on a woman when they shouldn’t have

Acosta literally did not touch the intern with his hands.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9gh6fe,conservative
Meanwhile cnn also doctored a video of trump feeding fish,ExpensiveMention,e9f897a,conservative
"They as in The White House clip on Sara Sanders twitter. Look at the Fox News clip of it, it’s the same. You can put these two clips on top of each other, they line up perfectly. It’s not zoomed in until later replays. ",RKilbane20,e9go5mk,conservative
"You're exactly right, and the post about Sanders was top of r/politics. The CNN one is nowhere to be found.",TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9ga047,conservative
Did you read what I wrote?  I never defend liberals.  ,Pizzabungalow,e9flazg,conservative
"I disagree that it’s engaging in their hypocrisy to make them live up to their own standards. I’m not pretending that they are my standards. I’m pointing out that these are the standards that they themselves insist on applying to others—mainly their political opposition—and so it’s only fair that those standards are applied to themselves. I think what you have to realize is that these already are the standards moving forward. The way to change those standards moving forward is to make them realize their own bad behavior, which they will only do when they suffer the negative consequences of it.",hello_japan,e9ffbz6,conservative
"Is the ridge of your palm not a part of your hand? Yes, he literally did.",hello_japan,e9h086b,conservative
“¡¡BUt mUh fREEdUm oF pREsS!!”,eagan2028,e9f9o8k,conservative
"*shrugs* All I'm saying is what I saw was the beef from CNN. I support the WH decision 100%, but feel Acosta should have lost his creds months ago after all the shit he pulled.",Taoutes,e9go7p3,conservative
"https://twitter.com/PressSec/status/1060374680991883265

No, he literally did not.",ElonMuskForPrison,e9h872b,conservative
That’s fine. Show the clip CNN but Trump said yesterday “it wasn’t doctored it was zoomed in”. ,RKilbane20,e9gol42,conservative
"Are you blind? Yes, he literally [did](https://i.imgur.com/3m35djd.jpg). Again, the ridge of your palm is a part of your hand. I hope your financial analysis skills are better than your eyesight or knowledge of anatomy.

",hello_japan,e9h92i3,conservative
I like how the frame that you picked has his hand covered with someone else's hand.,ElonMuskForPrison,e9h9fap,conservative
"Can you really not tell that the ridge of his palm makes contact with her arm or are you just trolling me? No troll pls, let’s just short TSLA together. I will be your eyes if you need someone to look at a chart for you since you clearly have some visual impairment.",hello_japan,e9h9mgg,conservative
This is like a horror movie. Just when you think the bad guys defeated...,link_ganon,e9g9oq8,conservative
I would too if I knew my party was going to rewrite the results of the election for me.,VirulentVoid,e9gwks6,conservative
"Thank God Ron DeSantis will be Governor of Florida.  I was worried about the election, but the Citizens of Florida made the right choice.  Gillum would have been a socialist big spender raising taxes and giving out more free handouts.  Ron DeSantis will lead our state well.  He’s awesome.",Neanderthalbastard,e9gm53g,conservative
how much longer will you accept this malfeasance?,BeachCruisin22,e9guwsv,conservative
*if he wins in the end,JMB_was_a_god,e9gzhc7,conservative
"A recount shouldn't change anything. The final count showed. GOP still won both races   No chance in hell, barring fraud, that the machines counted tens of thousands of votes wrong. ",MaddSim,e9fjw20,conservative
Who is counting them?,mlmack,e9fzj4z,conservative
This is stupid. More votes for Scott and desantis!,sharkman100,e9fuxsf,conservative
I hope Scott never concedes.  Is there a legal defense fund set up for his use?  I'm sick of this leftist BS.,GMU1993,e9fmwqc,conservative
Arent Democrats more likely to vote via the post? And thats where there are more votes coming in,CHiiNKYD,e9fxlvu,conservative
"How do we know if Broward never reported their total  vote count?

Also how about thousands of provisional ballots which some how became valid over 72 hours with little to know investigation.

",KnocDown,e9fr7ho,conservative
The Agriculture Secretary flip will hurt unless the military ballots save Matt Caldwell. ,YankeeBlues21,e9fk5d2,conservative
"No, the 'recount' will 'discover' additional ballots that weren't counted.  Mysteriously, all of these ballots will be marked 'D'.  

Republicans will make noise for a while, but nothing will happen, and the Democrats will thereby steal the election.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fkgdc,conservative
"The error rate on the ballot scanners is extreamly low, but it does happen, the results should be within the statistical margin of error, OR there is major fuckery that happened and the poll is too tainted to count as valid at all. ",ozric101,e9fk5w5,conservative
No it’s just  it did not count thousands of votes that got left behind at a school or community center or some guys truck.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9fk6tl,conservative
it is irrelevant. absentee ballots are required by law to be counted and reported no later than 30 minutes after polls close on election day,Mastermind521,e9ggboi,conservative
The error rate should occur at a roughly equal rate for both sides though. Nothing should change by any significant value.,orangeeyedunicorn,e9fs41z,conservative
"Well would you not think thats unfair for the people who have voted via post? Its not their fault

Bit undemocratic to count every vote",CHiiNKYD,e9h1crz,conservative
no. you receive absentee ballots weeks before the election and you are instructed to mail it back so that it arrives before election day,Mastermind521,e9h9c0j,conservative
"Certainly there are many Christians who are conservatives, but to those conservatives who aren't Christians, please understand this kind of suppression affects you too. ",triggernaut,e9fbut2,conservative
All she did was abstain.  She didn't even vote against it...,mcbobboreddit,e9fmbph,conservative
"No one should be rejected for believing in god. as long as the person is being respectful, there's no reason to be upset. No one should be rejected for not believing either. I'm a Christian, and I feel like people deserve to find their own path",qmber,e9fcqh3,conservative
"Ever notice how programs of ""inclusivity"" and ""diversity"" have no problem being rigidly exclusive and enforced with totalitarian conformity?

*1984* written today would be an interesting book.  We have adopted a contemporary Newspeak.
",nited_states,e9ftbqx,conservative
Leftist “tolerance” at work.,Kutepov,e9fx5sv,conservative
She needs to revert,HowRememberAll,e9gkcnx,conservative
And the student paper won't even let her explain her position.,PubliusVA,e9fnz8i,conservative
"Totally agree. 

Side note: God should be capitalized.",KraZii-,e9g7yvd,conservative
Newspeak that has been integrated seamlessly into our political landscape.,goldrotmgonly,e9g6hxa,conservative
How is this POS Snipes allowed anywhere near a ballot box is beyond even Florida man.,GlenGanges,e9hbhvc,conservative
The leftists don't care about anyone but those who they can exploit for votes.,mlmack,e9g9ckj,conservative
"Well they haven't called Young Kim as the winner, expect shenanigans there.  ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9geqg9,conservative
"Good news, everyone!  We just found an additional 13,000 ballots in a bathroom.  /s",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fo1yj,conservative
Does this include overseas votes? Should favor republicans?,hipsterdufus84,e9fmwen,conservative
So is this final. Gop is still good? ,molon-labe7,e9fmykx,conservative
"So does this mean the election is done...?

Rick Scott wins...?",Bigbluebuttonman,e9g6vgq,conservative
"So the recount will not include all the, um, *icky* ballots they took it upon themselves to fix in private when nobody was looking?",I_am_really_shocked,e9fvbyv,conservative
"Recount unlikely to change results. In 2000 it was much less votes to begin with, but you never know.",ReaganTroll,e9fo3u6,conservative
At what point do we just wash our hands of this and say none of Broward's votes will count until they get their act together?,weetchex,e9gefp4,conservative
"My biggest hope for all of this is that after the recounts are done (assuming they don't move the needle much - which they shouldn't), Nelson and Gillum concede and walk away.  It's looking unlikely though.

Considering how divided this country already is, we can ill afford another court battle over election results that tears everyone apart.  It's looking now like Sinema won Arizona, so we have to eat that one, hopefully the Dems will do the same in Florida.",joozian_,e9hemqh,conservative
*results may vary ,GlenGanges,e9hbu9q,conservative
One of them has an emergency stash they forgot they buried in the backyard.,Mattamaticus,e9foldz,conservative
"I found one in the Janitors Closet with about 8,000 votes in it. All Gillum!

/s",Sideswipe0009,e9fy1jr,conservative
"Overwhelmingly. 

Mostly military and citizens overseas break Republican. 

The game is up. Today, in front of a judge, Nelson and Gillum objected to a ballot being thrown out even though the voter is not a citizen. ",tm1087,e9fso6r,conservative
Nope. Those are the only outstanding ballots,YankeeBlues21,e9fomkm,conservative
"It doesn't. But yes, should favor republicans before recounts (automatic for DeSantis, manual for Scott).",ReaganTroll,e9fn223,conservative
"No, it’s not final, there will be a machine recount likely followed by a hand recount likely followed by people bickering over voter intent. Broward County will once again be the joke of the nation just like 2000.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9fnecn,conservative
GOP is good.  Recounts only tip the scales if there's like a few hundred vote difference.  ,tja_1478,e9frpkc,conservative
And there I was counting a box of tainted provisoal ballots... /s ,ozric101,e9fzbes,conservative
">  Today, in front of a judge, Nelson and Gillum objected to a ballot being thrown out even though the voter is not a citizen.

Have a source? I would love to see it. No way to defend that.",5_yr_lurker,e9fyfsz,conservative
"> Mostly military and citizens overseas break Republican.

Military yes, but civilians living abroad? Do you have a source on partisan affiliation of civilian ex-pats? The ones in Canada are overwhelmingly Democrats.",0ttervonBismarck,e9h1q0n,conservative
Well that should add extra r vote when they are counted. ,hipsterdufus84,e9fovkb,conservative
When do they get counted?,hipsterdufus84,e9g8vx2,conservative
"I was hearing stories of people circling the name or using an arrow vice filling in the circle.   If you are that fucking simple that you can’t follow instructions like that, then you aren’t able bodied to vote ",DPistola,e9fs7h6,conservative
Chad strikes again,Delta_25,e9fojvg,conservative
"Gillum, Nelson Lawyers Fight To Allow Non-Citizen's Vote To Count http://www.dailywire.com/node/38208",jedichric,e9fzvkb,conservative
Thank you. How does a non citizen even get a ballot in the first place?,5_yr_lurker,e9g26wp,conservative
[deleted],,e9g4cr6,conservative
"Something, something, no Voter ID laws.",jedichric,e9g51yh,conservative
"I thought you had to have a SSN to get a DL in Florida. And I thought only citizens get SSNs.

Edit: I was wrong.",5_yr_lurker,e9ga4bf,conservative
"Every person working in the US needs SSN. It's only the matter of proving at SSA that your employment is legal e.g. proper visa and a letter from the employer. Otherwise the employer won't be able to pay you, at least legally. ",yarpen_z,e9ggi44,conservative
So what exactly is the point of a recount when illegal ballots have already been mixed with valid ballots?,hello_japan,e9fyotl,conservative
Can we just do Broward Megathread? At least somebody promise me the next thread posted will be about Snipes' arrest at an airport attempting to flee the country with an uncounted ballotbox and some stolen county funds. ,triggernaut,e9fj78p,conservative
"Why would she flee? She is protected by corrput democrat politicians in the county, including the sheriff.

The State Courts need to rule to reject ALL ballots where the chain of custody was lost.

And some of these people need to be tried on Federal Charges where the local cronies can not protect them from Justice.  It it time to charge the DNC under RICO. ",ozric101,e9fjyfe,conservative
Amen. There must be accountability.,R-M-Renfield,e9fpvv6,conservative
">n Katy Perry’s case, she called Trump “absolutely heartless” for daring to point out that state authorities’ gross mismanagement of forests is to blame for three large fires in California.

No, she called Trump ""absolutely heartless"" for threatening to withold federal funds because of assumed mismanagement.


",Da_Kahuna,e9h9xhc,conservative
"I mean it is though. By not allowing any controlled burns and logging, anytime there is a forest fire it is magnified because of the increased foliage to burn. This results in having to spend even more money to fix these unfortunate and terrible events.

Why are federal dollars continuing to support these bad practices that have been shown to be ineffective.",WebSliceGallery123,e9hehwe,conservative
"Fuck Steve King. Terrible representative of our party and its values. I almost wish a Democrat would have beaten him because what's one more seat in the House when we aren't going to control it anyway, and that area of Iowa is so conservative that whoever defeated him would only have served one term anyway. ",soxfan90,e9hfkc2,conservative
"Dems picked up seats in Iowa, yet unfortunately couldn’t get rid of king.  Probably the only time I’d actually support the democrat over republican.",XMAGA_1776X,e9hfx99,conservative
"I’m going to make some vague normative statements here, because I don’t believe this kind of article is something we should be celebrating. Call me a concern troll all you want, but this kind of rhetoric is, in my opinion actually dangerous to American politics. No American is the President’s enemy. He is an elected civil servant who is supposed to work for the betterment of all of his constituents, not just those who agree with him. This authoritarian rhetoric of “purging NeverTrumpers” and fighting back against Democrats is not what America is about. No American is our enemy. Matthew 22:39.",roberttylerlee,e9hkqz3,conservative
">No American is our enemy

It’s figurative speech. Furthermore, my American political enemy ceases being my enemy at all when an outsider tries to threaten our way of life—ie, September 11, 2001. 

It’s like the police. The police are each other’s own worst enemies when it comes to intra-departmental bullshit and especially at promotion time. But you will never see a scumbag come between two boys in blue—ever. That’s when the differences are put aside. 

",mikeygio,e9intq7,conservative
"... until he is.  The way the press and a significant part of the Democratic party is behaving cannot be perceived otherwise.

Politics is a contact sport - if you do not want to win, you do not enter the ring.",farkuf,e9hlml0,conservative
There’s never been a better time to go out and buy a firearm to protect yourself. ,LightShieldRBLX,e9fij0s,conservative
If they are masked they should be arrested on sight,searanger62,e9f3l06,conservative
"I really was considering running for public office as a libertarian but honestly with all of the events unfolding and the bitter hatred between anyone not part of this increasingly sectionalized and polarized narrative, I just can’t do it.  I am a veteran and I was less uncomfortable deploying into harms way than I would be painting a target on my home by speaking for liberty and rule of law rather than socialism and identity based emotional outrage. ",steelallz,e9f8xy1,conservative
"There was damage to property. Names should have been taken, even if there were no arrests at the time. (The police probably reacted with one or two officers and backup at night is more problematic depending on manning.)",MattamyPursuit,e9f6d4r,conservative
If you're masked and on private property expect to get shot in fly over states. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9f6pvk,conservative
They look like a bunch of devil worshiping cowboys!,989x4000,e9ggbh1,conservative
this is unfortunately exactly the goal they are shooting for. Totalitarianism at its finest.  ,MonkeyWrench,e9fbdv3,conservative
"Where I’m from it’s grounds for taking lives , not taking names.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9gga6i,conservative
"It’s working I believe.  I’m not one to scare easy but now with a family, and children, I can’t endanger them over political disagreement.  Because if this were me and it were my house, the headline would read “mass shooting in DC” and my son would grow up with a father in prison. ",steelallz,e9fbkm1,conservative
"Handful of years ago I had to deal with anti-meat/SJWs where I worked with. I had a lot of online interactions and what not and had to back away because they were showing up at our workplace and posturing at coworkers for their involvement. I have a wife and son and he was young then so I completely understand where you are coming from.  
  
The left is becoming more and more unhinged and worse than that, they are being emboldened by the lack of rule of law being applied to them. ",MonkeyWrench,e9fbqgr,conservative
"Man, I’m sorry to hear that.  I still feel the need to act and I have this gut feeling urging me to do something to help the rest of us normal folk trying to live and work by the American Dream.  I’m at a bit of a loss and standstill ",steelallz,e9fddhx,conservative
"They have the backing of the establishment which has me convinced that we will be living in a communist/socialist government here in the United States within our lifetime. Anyone who disagrees is simply going to be intimidated into silence, jailed, or killed and there's nothing anyone can do about it. It's very sad and I'm just trying to enjoy my life while I can. ",angethedude,e9fgh5k,conservative
I don’t know if I can accept that ,steelallz,e9fjs3d,conservative
It's a shame all my guns and ammo went down with the boat.......,unibuckeye,e9gcun1,conservative
Explain? Lol,steelallz,e9gcy90,conservative
It's an inside joke about the proper response to a LEO coming to ask where your guns are.,unibuckeye,e9ghg92,conservative
Lol fair.  Who downvoted that?!? I was genuinely curious fuckers! ,steelallz,e9gjj5u,conservative
So even middle of the road left outlets are calling it fishy. Either a big rift in the left is opening up or they know shuts hitting the fan and distancing now. Because it’s tellibg when politico says something is wrong with it.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9f9k8m,conservative
"This isn't a rift in the left. Objective incompetence of this level is insane, especially at this level. Broward Schools and the Broward Sheriff's office are also incredibly incompetent, but it's a special kind of incompetence when the election office for this joke of a county (and I saw this as someone who grew up in Broward) is causing 20 million Floridians to not be able to trust in the results and integrity of their elections. ",Faraday314,e9g6hlr,conservative
"Violent leftist, imagine that.  ",ozric101,e9eqjwj,conservative
THE TOLERANT LEFT STRIKE AGAIN,sandstonexray,e9eqwdx,conservative
Who is George Lopez?,bartonsmart,e9et81e,conservative
"Not even surprised. Have fun paying your lawyer, puto. ",dan4daniel,e9f3atd,conservative
The TDS is real with the Hollywood c list actors. ,archaic_outlaw,e9f51cv,conservative
Fuck these people. ,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9f15i6,conservative
"Congratulations, George, you’re relevant again.  ",budado-head,e9fb0ii,conservative
George Lopez frantically tries to be relevant again. ,HydroponicGirrafe,e9fcafq,conservative
"Videos funny as hell.

&#x200B;

Dude's just like, ""Ma boi Lopez is commin, yey!"" and Lopez proceeded to put him into a headlock while people around them freak out and tell Lopez to stop and grow up haha.

&#x200B;

Dude's just letting it happen like I do when my little brother tries to fight me.",Swarlos8888,e9f7b5c,conservative
Joke thief.,s4mu8l,e9g2bv9,conservative
"While George shouldn't have threatened the guy, the guy fucking with him shouldn't have been doing that either. It's immature and George was just trying to eat. It should be a general rule of thumb that you shouldn't follow people around and harass them in public.",grooseisloose,e9gcse8,conservative
"Violence, never the answer no matter where you lay politically.",goldrotmgonly,e9ge0zb,conservative
"His biggest crime?

You guessed it, being an unfunny comedian. ",The_Night-Man_Cometh,e9fs8xr,conservative
"He is one of the most racist guys out there.  But he's from the left, so he isn't racist, I guess.",R0binSage,e9fflms,conservative
"""I got thiiiis"".....Well apparently he don't.",3pic4rtisan,e9k90wj,conservative
[deleted],,e9f0ir9,conservative
His show was unbearably cynical and bitter.,MisterMouser,e9fg3u3,conservative
"You guys misunderstood George Lopez, he was just trying to beat some tolerance in that pro-Trump person. /s",PapaGeorgio23,e9faqh3,conservative
"Most are

 https://imgur.com/sZGvbc9.jpg https://imgur.com/sZGvbc9.jpg 

Source: attacksontrumpsupporters.com",ExpensiveMention,e9f8i7j,conservative
[deleted],,e9f2vod,conservative
A man with a large head ,N5tp4nts,e9fki36,conservative
"https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WhZljqLfGhc

Just swap the names around.",rationalhuckleberry,e9fr9yr,conservative
"Cinco cinco cinco, cinco cinco cinco cinco",lipidsly,e9f3wzu,conservative
he was born in america tho,n1cksxtn,e9h39gn,conservative
Hard to trust a graph that looks like that,TheEsophagus,e9fqkf3,conservative
That's a silly graphic,Okchud,e9fbh5k,conservative
How dare you insult nick cannon that way,lipidsly,e9f3waj,conservative
Not even relatable. Although his comedy leans more towards the Hispanic community George Lopez is a million times a funnier comedian than Nick Cannon.,theemptycrowd,e9facs1,conservative
"Naw, nick cannon is alright.

Lopez is just Mexican guy trying to be funny.",SuperFunMonkey,e9fhddg,conservative
He's a Hispanic version of Sinbad.,989x4000,e9gg71i,conservative
Abogados!,do_you_know_doug,e9f71qz,conservative
Who even wasted time making that lmao.,Zac1245,e9g1k64,conservative
Not really. U disagreeing with it doesnt make it silly,ExpensiveMention,e9fbqjb,conservative
Do he got good dick doe???,SonOfSite,e9fadxu,conservative
[Accidentes!](https://dd2d9j2i66w9u.cloudfront.net/wp-content/uploads/2016/05/24230100/DOMINGUEZ.png),SullyDuggs,e9ffj1y,conservative
I think it’s silly because of the blue background and the typo but okay,RedFauux,e9ff22e,conservative
"It's silly because it looks like something a kid made in MSpaint and doesn't have sources.

I already believe the left are the more violent ones. Dumb graphics made to confuses granma's don't tell me that.",Okchud,e9hrowy,conservative
And zero sourcing. ,TheKillector,e9fikub,conservative
Its got sourcing. ,ExpensiveMention,e9fk151,conservative
Thank god trump honored them today in the blistering weather he had to endure. ,Scientist78,e9g5agc,conservative
I leave for boot camp on the 26th. OH SHIT,TheKingBrycen,e9finms,conservative
Oorah! Semper Fi from the other side of the world America. ,bls6799,e9ewao0,conservative
"Watch this video for the bday... it’s pretty awesome

https://youtu.be/AWDdC-D68Uo",kotov9syndrome,e9fo39w,conservative
"Dear sweet youngsters, the grandfather of the US military, the National guard, still loves you. You may be Uncle Sam's misguided children but we are his father who helped give birth to him. In all seriousness, that is awsome. I appreciate all that the Marines have done and still do. Meanwhile I sit in my home town and work on helicopters that our government hasn't chosen to call up for a deployment since 2006. Even though we proved to be the most effective, as far as maintenance goes at least, National Guard Apache unit in the nation. A fact that helped prevent the regular Army from taking Apache's from the entire National Guard.",rheajr86,e9frplb,conservative
I have all you can eat crayons for any Marine ,Delta_25,e9fbcw1,conservative
But fuck that marine that killed all those people in California. Not a true marine. Just a terrorist. A fucking home grown terrorist. ,NoThanksRandy,e9g08qz,conservative
"A Sailor walks into a public restroom to use the head; upon entering, he see's a Marine zip up, turn away from doing his business, and walk out of the restroom.  The Sailor shakes his head in disgust, conducts his business, washes up and exits; seeing the Marine nearby, the Sailor approaches him:

Sailor; ""In the Navy, they teach us to wash our hands after we use the head.""

Marine; ""In the Marines, they teach us not to piss on our hands.""",Jizzlobber42,e9fv0up,conservative
Thanks for choosing to serve when others like myself don’t ,kotov9syndrome,e9fo4he,conservative
Do well and thank you!,neemarita,e9g3b2j,conservative
When you step off the bus you have to do a Ric Flair “Woo!” ,SoJackedBro,e9gosyr,conservative
If it’s Parris Island I have a few buddies from the DEP that have the same ship date.,PMMEYOURDOGGO1776,e9l56fu,conservative
Nice!,chabanais,e9fppwh,conservative
"""In the Army, we call for artillery and charlie mike"" ",Delta_25,e9g1qow,conservative
"San Diego for me, friend",TheKingBrycen,e9l57cr,conservative
"So when he says Arizona is gone, are we just supposed to sit on our asses and say oh well? I can't believe this crap. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9f8m9q,conservative
"Yes, but they'll all unite when it comes time to pass Democrat priorities like gun control, single-payer health care, and maybe even UBI.  

Sure, there's internal division, but the Democrats manage to wrangle all of their votes when it matters.  You can't say the same for Republicans, as evidenced by their signature 2016 campaign item the ACA repeal.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fk4d1,conservative
Can’t wait for the 2020 primaries,AJcraig28,e9f6on5,conservative
"I'm seeing it on Facebook now.  Hardcore progressives are pushing for their agenda, ""every Dem is owned by corporations"",  ""conservatives are evil rascists"", ""don't conflate Democrats and progressives"", and then interchanging Republican and Democratic.",tehForce,e9fyge5,conservative
"I'm looking forward to the fireworks in the house. No question it's going to backfire and if you thought there was a split between the establishment and Berniecrats in 2016, 2019 is going to be a whole new level.",Glsbnewt,e9hyc2p,conservative
"Love Rush, but the capitalization of this title is obnoxious.",LibertyTerp,e9flp1f,conservative
I certainly hope so ,steelallz,e9fnne4,conservative
"The AZ GOP did sue didn't they?

&#x200B;",c6fe26,e9fc6mc,conservative
Every state will flip like this due to demographic shift. Our country was given away through illegal and legal immigration.,Dorian_v25,e9fvugg,conservative
[deleted],,e9g1n35,conservative
Its going to be worse than the 1924 Democratic convention ,Dank_Cartographer,e9f8ztl,conservative
"> ""don't conflate Democrats and progressives"", and then interchanging Republican and Democratic.

That's great. Let these hard left ""progressives"" dismiss the DNC as the old-fashioned corporate establishment party.

Fingers crossed for an independent Sanders run.",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9gjjo1,conservative
"They did, but later agreed to letting the count go on till the 15th of November, just enough time to stuff the box without too much suspicion. We are getting bamboozled. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9fcbpe,conservative
"In this case, I think their own hate is our best friend. The leftist coalition is bunch of blocks that actually hate each other. The gays and Muslims don't exactly get along, neither do a lot of ethnic groups. Compare to the right which views everyone as human, and doesn't incentivize this spite by making blocks compete for their place in a social justice pecking order. 

This is why the left preaches so much ""coexist"" and ""love everyone"", despite having no stomach for contrarian thought. What they mean by ""coexist"" is actually ""Guys, get along for a bit while we get some shit done"". Their leadership wants them to coexist with each other, not us. 

So, as nasty as it sounds, I think that dumming up their hate to a whole next level could actually work for us. We've seen ANTIFA and BLM come to blows before. If we can make a lot more of that happen, then their coalition will collapse due to infighting. And on top of that, more than a few leftists will eventually realize that we're not the bigots here! 

In short, we essentially need trolling and meme magic to beat them. ",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9gkdkq,conservative
"For those that don't know, that was the 'klanbake.'

https://thefederalistpapers.org/us/the-1924-klanbake-dem-convention-sheds-light-on-democratic-party-history",ngoni,e9fg9qd,conservative
r/hatecrimehoaxes,witch-wife,e9f9fg4,conservative
How empty are the lives of these miserable bastards.,optionhome,e9f8o04,conservative
Unhinged politically AND in Chicago?  yOU DonT sAy?!!!1,booblitchutz,e9fggxq,conservative
"> Even if words like “colonization” have a different context off-world, on somewhere like Mars, it’s still not OK to use those narratives, because it erases the history of colonization here on our own planet.

This is straight up NewSpeak from 1984. It is literally destroying language precision in the pursuit of political correctness.  

> I’m not a historian, but I’ll tell you that there probably isn’t a perfectly starched, unblemished narrative that you can draw from. 

""I have no idea what I'm talking about, but I'm going to blather on about PC-speak because feelings."" 

> I think the other [problematic word] is “settlement.” That comes up a lot and obviously has a lot of connotations for folks about conflict in the Middle East. I think that’s one that people often turn to when they mean “inhabitation” or “humans living off-world.”

*screams*

> I do find “frontier” to be problematic. The implication is not exactly the same for somewhere like space as it is for here, but it similarly draws on the same kinds of narratives that are all based around European settlement.

*continues screaming, but air is running out*

> If there’s going to be a really inclusive effort to go beyond Earth, it has to start here on Earth. It can’t just be a tokenization of what the first crew might look like. It really has to be that people from a wider range of experiences and backgrounds—whether that means socioeconomic, racial, gender, whatever—are included in STEM in general.

*passes out from lack of O2*

Alright dumbass, look. Space is a very unforgiving environment.  One screw-up with your radiation shielding, CO2 scrubbers, propulsion guidance, or even re-entry angle will kill you.  This is not the same sort of place as, say, a Gender Studies classroom.  Quality and qualification *matter* in aerospace-related sciences.  I don't want a perfectly representative team of scientists and 'scientists', I want the best team possible and I could give two shits about what that team looks like or identifies as.  Anything else is introducing unacceptable risk into the planning, development, and operations aspects of space exploration.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9hscux,conservative
"""space colony"" could evoke the thought of an ant colony living underground.

[Colonization of temperate grassland by ants] (https://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1439179104000854)",MisterMouser,e9ht6eo,conservative
r/TumblrInAction,soxfan90,e9im1tz,conservative
"This article is clearly written by some social justice dunce. They have No background in space, in history, or in actual international relations. It contributes as much to space exploration as your typical teenage Tumblr post. Why do newspapers and magazines keep hiring these morons?",bartoksic,e9i99pt,conservative
"We will start a new plantation on Mars, one where men and girls will live under God's holy laws. ",SickofInternetProgs,e9i1kwf,conservative
"Did she or did she not though lol, its not defamation to get called out xD",KingCervie,e9heq0o,conservative
"And yet she supports an immigration policy that imports, into Sweden, men from backward countries whose attitudes toward women make Jordan Peterson look like Gloria Steinem.",kanhawk,e9gkc7j,conservative
The anti-intellectualism of the left strikes again.  And misses again.,BrighamYoung,e9gp1bs,conservative
"Peterson opposed Kavanaugh. As far as I'm concerned, he can go crawl under the nearest rock. ",Glsbnewt,e9hyi3a,conservative
You can't fix stupid...,Terra_green2,e9gvyl8,conservative
What does this say about what the 2020 election will be like? ,triggernaut,e9gdeo2,conservative
[removed],,e9g8qde,conservative
Imagine being so insecure about your political beliefs that you have to go onto a conservative subreddit to try and make a joke ,jtreyn,e9g93ce,conservative
"Because fraudulent votes are very american! glad you're here to defend broward county obviously breaking the law of voting. 

When are the states going to get smart and say if you don't contact the state to get an extension with accurate numbers about the amount of ballots left to be counted, and your locations' votes aren't counted yet, they just don't get counted? If your county fucks up your votes, that's their problem, not the state.",xJownage,e9g9aw4,conservative
"Every vote, including the fake ones made up by Snipes.",Telineye,e9ga1cs,conservative
I find it interesting how some of these primary candidates that really did not like Trump at all are realizing what he’s been talking about all along.,BlakeAJ83,e9fvlb0,conservative
Im a big rubio guy. Glad he is fighting to protect voters. ,hipsterdufus84,e9fa9ra,conservative
"I don't agree with Trump all of the time, but overall I think his influence on the Republican party has been extremely positive as he taught the party to fight back. The Democrats have been nasty for years, and its about damn time Republican politicians started hitting back. ",Faraday314,e9g7h2s,conservative
Or the sugar Lobby is on his ass... want to know more? Ask ,Str8DonLemon,e9gv8xc,conservative
Tweets won't save the democracy ,cornshelltortilla,e9hd8ir,conservative
Indeed. ,trelium06,e9g2j4h,conservative
Did we trust them before? ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9fu9bo,conservative
"We put up with their bullshit, that’s for sure. Now that some of the Republican Party has found a spine, we are not going to put up with Franken-style election theft without a fight.",hello_japan,e9fzqy2,conservative
"The GOP always takes the high road and always arrives at the crime scene long after it is spoiled and the evidence corrupted. 

You think they would know better by now,,, 

Democrats are lawless criminals who should never be trusted or taken at their word. 

The deocrats feel the same way about us and act accordindly, we never learn. ",ozric101,e9fznme,conservative
Yet to be seen all ive heard is talkso far.  While the Dems are moving forward as planned ,slappypappyj,e9if446,conservative
Welp. Better luck next time. But boy is this country a changin’. ,link_ganon,e9gbt2y,conservative
"Sinema is the worst kind of leftist. She pretends to be moderate but will not think twice marching with the ""resist movement"". ",ConservativeChicano,e9gu0e1,conservative
This makes me sick. This country has problems ,YankeeBlues21,e9gfeuk,conservative
Cheaters gonna cheat,jina100,e9gbtk6,conservative
Are people in Arizona accepting this attack on your democracy? They are cheating and you are all doing absolutely nothing.,mayocide-when,e9ggk0s,conservative
"Well, I guess Arizona wants to be flooded with millions of dirt poor, illiterate , unskilled illegals, because that's just what they voted for.",kanhawk,e9gkkxc,conservative
AZ barely a red state anymore. Looks like they will elected a democrat Secretary of State and education as well. ,Zac1245,e9gbwps,conservative
"indeed it does. and we ain't doing shit about it. the only organizations out there doing a fucking thing are YAF and TPUSA. 

you would think we'd be out in poor and ethnic communities teaching people about our philosophy. you would think we would be finding ways to give scholarships to graduate students who lean conservative so that we could get them into university teaching positions. you would think we would fund conservative screenwriters, directors, producers, musicians, etc. to help them make their first movies and records. 

nope. we're doing nothing. we're not teaching the young about our message and why it matters. we're not teaching people of color why conservatism isn't just for white people. we're not working to take back the academy. we're not doing a fucking thing.",SKWM3000,e9gqgxg,conservative
"I’m from NH. Like AZ, We used to be competitive. That’s laughable now. It’s just kinda tragic how many Americans are drinking the socialist snake oil. 

",link_ganon,e9gc6br,conservative
"To be fair McCain and Flake were both pretty purple.  Megan is on the View, isn't she?  I wonder who she voted for...",mcbobboreddit,e9h3y22,conservative
I am not too fanilar with arizona.  How did the rep governor win by so much?,hipsterdufus84,e9gc06g,conservative
"I agree, but also, why should *we* have to do all the leg work? Hasn’t the left gone too far? Shouldn’t their policies and antagonism to American values and history have automatically disqualified them in the hearts and minds of 90% of Americans? Why is there apparently no such thing as too far left for the average American? What about the Dems makes them the null vote for America, in spite of everything they do, and it’s on us to reach out to everyone? 

The economy is booming, we’re in the most peaceful period since the late ‘90s, 
and we’d been making progress across the board...and the American people are giving us the finger in favor of socialists, Marxists, and people who want to “fundamentally change” something they allegedly love. Is such a citizenry even worth fighting for at this point? 
",YankeeBlues21,e9gqta1,conservative
You're being invaded by Massholes.,severeneckpain,e9ge4sy,conservative
Is the state gov conservative there?,Zac1245,e9gcoaz,conservative
McCain was center-right. Flake not really: https://puu.sh/C05tg/c793129a93.png,ReaganTroll,e9hyows,conservative
His opponent was a socialist basically. Whereas Sinema ran a blue dog democrat. Despite her super lefty history. ,Zac1245,e9gc41h,conservative
"one reason why: because no one else is going to do it for us.

second reason why: because people are not rational actors.

third reason why: because the left has tainted history and civics education.

fourth reason why: because truth and liberty are worth defending.",SKWM3000,e9hgimo,conservative
"Governor is a Republican. Republicans lost their majorities in the House, Senate, and Executive Council. ",heyitsme06,e9gf7er,conservative
I’m amazed how many people who abhor far left policies fall for blue dog bullshit.,the-divine-comedy,e9gc8mh,conservative
"I’m just feeling really down after these midterms (moreso with Arizona’s news), like we’re going to lose this fight no matter what. We can fight a lot of things, but a citizenry that shrugs at economic growth, liberty, and the philosophical inheritance from our founders and goes running into the arms of cultural Marxists promising socialized everything is insurmountable. And those people don’t deserve what america was made to provide in the first place. If that’s our modern populace, then they’ll kill the American experiment and what made us exceptional. ",YankeeBlues21,e9i1cds,conservative
Wow that’s awful. Guess they are all gonna be pushing for gun control soon. ,Zac1245,e9gfezv,conservative
Yeah AZ isn’t far enough along to elect a Bernie type but looks like “moderate” Dems can make the cut now. ,Zac1245,e9gcb1j,conservative
"> We can fight a lot of things, but a citizenry that shrugs at economic growth, liberty, and the philosophical inheritance from our founders and goes running into the arms of cultural Marxists promising socialized everything is insurmountable

we have to recognize that everybody is selfish. americans consistently want lower taxes and more benefits. americans want your rights diminished and their rights expanded. it's hard to convince people to turn down ""free stuff,"" because the promise of immediate gain is much more tantalizing than generalized prosperity that i can't see with my own eyes.

in addition, we stopped fighting a long time ago. who allowed education to be taken over by the left? who let them teach howard zinn in history class? why don't our students understand civics? WE let that happen. we ceded culture, entertainment, and education to the left. now we're reaping the results.

the only way we're going to turn this around is if we mount a challenge. not just a political challenge. we have to start educating people again.",SKWM3000,e9i4awc,conservative
"Only good part is that Gov. Sununu will probably veto their legislation since they don't have supermajorities. There are such wild swings in elections here, especially in the House because there's 400 reps. ",heyitsme06,e9gfx2c,conservative
You have 400 reps in the state House for a state of 1.3 mil. Holy shit lol,Zac1245,e9ggm7x,conservative
">If she can’t vote because of that monster, why should he be allowed to register to vote? 

Because legally he's innocent until proven guilty (i.e., convicted) in a court of law.",PubliusVA,e9g8gmg,conservative
"If a person cannot be trusted to vote, hold a gun, or exercise any other right guaranteed by the constitution, they should never be let out of prison.

If they aren't in prison and have served their time, they should have their rights.

If the court cannot justify holding the person for the crime, they should never be able to abort their status and rights as a citizen. ",Lobo0084,e9hii8i,conservative
I agree let’s not become democrats. Innocent until proven guilty by a court of law. ,Subvet98,e9g8qqf,conservative
Democrat here: I agree. Innocent until proven guilty.,JoahTheProtozoa,e9hnkor,conservative
Delusion ,rugby_shirt,e9hkast,conservative
(X) to doubt ,Dank_Cartographer,e9hm6ok,conservative
Does he ever tell the truth?,SickofInternetProgs,e9hp239,conservative
Well they are on course to win over 40 seats in house and picked up some valuable senate seats so he actually isn’t wrong. ,the-divine-comedy,e9hpw6c,conservative
About as often as a stopped clock gets it right.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9j5wwk,conservative
They lost a net of 3 senate seats which protects from Collins and Murkowski torpedoing everything.  So yea he is wrong.,tja_1478,e9hrfuo,conservative
"Clinton 1994 -54 reps, -9 senators             
Obama 2010 -64 reps, -6 senators             

He is wrong.         ",tau_decay,e9hrvdx,conservative
This is the question of the decade. I lay the current unrest and division at their feet. ,Terra_green2,e9gw0hf,conservative
We haven’t had journalism in this country for at least 50 years,JMB_was_a_god,e9gls3f,conservative
And they'll tell you that as they're warning and banning you.,DBG1998,e9flwo1,conservative
That sub is a Leftist shithole. ,WooPig45,e9g0it0,conservative
just more fake news.,cons_NC,e9gfzgs,conservative
r/politics should probably being renamed to r/liberal.,Azul19,e9gpexm,conservative
One of the biggest echo chambers on reddit,CanIShowYouMyDick,e9gogyf,conservative
Besides r/latestagecapitalism of course,LilDebbo,e9h80kv,conservative
Well that explains why he was so quick to let Hillary off the hook,BeachCruisin22,e9f7pma,conservative
"If it included classified material, than he needs to be arrested and charged.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9fccwq,conservative
Hillary's gonna have a cell mate...,tenshon,e9f57vj,conservative
This is why there was an incredible puckering when Trump threatened to release emails and text messages. These people know they were discussing classified on unclassified systems but the normal redactions can't happen because then they're publicly admitting to doing it. It's a wonderful catch 22 and it is great watching them squirm.,ngoni,e9fgm23,conservative
That would require a DOJ that was actually willing to prosecute criminals with a (D) next to their name. ,iwasthebeaver,e9f9x7d,conservative
Let’s hope a Sessions-free DOJ will do something. ,LegionOfDeplorables,e9fk1cm,conservative
Is there anything citizens can do about it? I'm new to politics but it's got me really scared. Dems are always talking about Trump's unconstitutional policies but this seems illegal. Am I just being paranoid...?,qmber,e9fckpz,conservative
"One step further on the road to a (hopefully peaceful) Balkanization of the nation.  

When elections can't be relied upon to be fair anymore, we aren't a Republic and we certainly aren't a Democracy.  We are, at best, an oligarchy.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fkabv,conservative
I’m open to the idea most of these races aren’t cheating if anyone can show me one....just one case where a Dem ended the night ahead and ballot counting after the fact crowned the Rebublican. It never happens. Even the most partisan should at least raise an eyebrow.,the-divine-comedy,e9fc6yj,conservative
Today i learned that counting all the votes is stealing :'),CHiiNKYD,e9fxxbx,conservative
You should be freaking out. This is how democracy dies,Isredditreal2009,e9frc91,conservative
They're breaking too many rules for any reasonable person to not be suspicious.  It's like the Mafia is running the elections office in Broward County. ,BudrickBundy,e9fcc7s,conservative
"They were filling out ballots, unsupervised, to replace ""damaged"" ballots. They've done a number of things that were clearly unethical and/or against the rules.",BudrickBundy,e9fy9hh,conservative
"72 hours after polls closed? Even hurricane-hit counties finished. By FL law they have to report counts 30 minutes after close, but won't or they don't know. **That is because they are filling out fraudulent ballots as fast they can.** And for some reason, they are only finding Democrat ballots, go figure. They have also rejected court orders by a judge, showing contempt of court.",Saigunx,e9g00ab,conservative
Saucse on this? An investigations have taken place and no fraud has been found,CHiiNKYD,e9fyubv,conservative
"Sauce? huh?  There was a clear pattern of rule-breaking and refusing to be transparent. 

See [here](http://thefederalist.com/2018/11/09/broward-county-embarrassment-potential-stolen-florida-election-real/) and [here](https://www.dailywire.com/news/38162/rubio-heres-more-evidence-potential-voting-law-james-barrett) for ""sauce"" or ""saucse"". It's clear to anyone who isn't lying to themselves and who isn't some kind of idiot that the Democrats are up to no good here. ",BudrickBundy,e9fzi2x,conservative
Democrats are more likely to vote via post thats where all these extra votes are coming from,CHiiNKYD,e9h0son,conservative
"Shit, that's not what the G stood for?????",BeachCruisin22,e9foy8q,conservative
And now the ACLU is suing the Trump administration. ,Lucius_Funk,e9e8lqo,conservative
"Nobody discusses this much, but I recently read that approximately 80-100 people die trying to cross at unprotected parts of our border from dehydration and other complications. If we can deter them from crossing by letting them know it is not worth the risk, we may have fewer deaths on top of more controlled immigration. 

*correction: 80-100 people die every year, I mean",8K12,e9eeci3,conservative
"lol I’ve even seen r/politics members agreeing with this, so that’s how you know this is a great policy ",JasonJBL,e9e7lum,conservative
"Come legally, what are the arguments against this?",Falkamper,e9elb1i,conservative
"Theres so many people waiting to immigrate to the country doing it the right way.  Why should caravans etc, be able to jump ahead of them?  

All illegals do is make it harder for those who come the right way.  People who will actually work hard, and improve the country rather than make it weaker.",polerize,e9ei5xg,conservative
"1 of two things will occur :

A) The amount of asylum seekers drops drastically, allowing the under-resourced offices the ability to process legitimate asylum claims much more efficiently, helping people genuinely *in need* and greatly reducing the *voluntary* detention period while the claim is investigated.

B) the amount of would-be illegal immigrants headed towards legal border crossings to claim asylum will rise greatly.  I do not think this is likely, as asylum claims have been used as a last-resort when caught crossing illegally to prevent deportation. 

Waiting for the positive headline about Trump helping asylum seekers (won't happen)",Baptism-Of-Fire,e9e17cx,conservative
Liberal judge is Hawaii or wherever will halt this in 3..2..1........................................,kanhawk,e9em702,conservative
Damn him and his desire to protect legal tax paying citizens!!!,Sex-Watcher,e9ep5r5,conservative
"Trump denies asylum

Dems: You can't do that! You can't use Executive Orders to legislate!

Reps: umm, remember DACA and DAPA?

Dems: That was different! 

Reps: lolokbro


In all seriousness, I do hate psuedo-legislation via EO,I hate when Obama did it, and u hate when Trump does it. Trump has a Republican Senate, he should pass actual legislation.",SleekFilet,e9ew2l9,conservative
Why does he need an executive order to enforce existing laws???,Snoochems,e9elyxb,conservative
Awesome ,blizzardice,e9eaipe,conservative
They're not asylum seekers.,wesmanchu,e9evnrs,conservative
Hawaiian judge incoming lol,Saigunx,e9f0v5v,conservative
[removed],,e9eui8d,conservative
Might as well change their name to the HCLU. Because they're not representing the civil liberties of Americans,rob_s_458,e9eb34i,conservative
"ACLU - what a sick organization.  An anti-American, pro communist group posing as something else.  I'm not overstating the case in order to rile people up. This is simply fact --""Guardians of America's freedom"" my ass!

https://townhall.com/columnists/mattbarber/2011/03/25/aclu-communism-is-the-goal-n1167720

https://dailycaller.com/2011/01/04/the-aclu’s-untold-stalinist-heritage/

https://www.conservapedia.com/ACLU",d_42,e9f265m,conservative
"Another major issue is the sexual assault of the women and girls who cross. Like when they pay people to smuggle them over those people can do whatever they want to the immigrants without fear of getting in trouble. The victims don't want to put themselves in the spotlight to get deported.
https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sexual_assault_of_migrants_from_Latin_America_to_the_United_States",Michael6198,e9erl54,conservative
There is not a single bad thing about this executive order. ,Baptism-Of-Fire,e9eehsz,conservative
Orangemadbad.exe has encountered an error ,Baptism-Of-Fire,e9e7z5q,conservative
Confirmed. I'm on r/politics pretty often and I agree with this.,beardedsandflea,e9ep54e,conservative
r/politics should just rebrand to r/Trump Jesus. ,joeysuf,e9eis34,conservative
"I can't even believe any of them would agree with this, that's pretty amazing.",dudeman5445,e9epsgs,conservative
Lmao I actually find that hard to believe. You mean this isn’t racist?!,lepuma,e9eugrc,conservative
"NPC argument: they should just let them stay, who cares that they cane illegally.    
     
Real argument: shouldn't Congress be the one doing this? Not the president",slam9,e9eqzdw,conservative
"ThEY'Re HuMaNS yoU BIGOT. 

Or

We're all citizens of the world. 

Or

America is nothing but immigrants

Or 

Anything to distract from the fact that the majority of the people coming in illegally are a dead weight drain on the economy and commit disproportionately higher crimes.",mkov88,e9eraxp,conservative
President has authority over immigration.,RxCubed,e9eni86,conservative
We are one human race. Hate is not welcome here!,Neverlearned2surf,e9ewplj,conservative
"The government is too inefficient to effectively stop people who want to migrate, and the free market has drastically lowered the price of all forms of travel and transport.",Gyn_Nag,e9erizo,conservative
The caravan's destination is a border checkpoint near San Diego isn't it? They could've gone straight north if their goal was crossing illegally.,AnnualThrowaway,e9ez1dl,conservative
"Australia did a similar thing with ""boat people"" it was really effective in reducing asylum seekers coming by boat.

We know hard line stances like this work, when people know that this method doesn't work they don't attempt the passage.",AnarcrotheAlchemist,e9e7xwt,conservative
How about helping Americans before non Americans.,sjwking,e9e63of,conservative
">helping people genuinely in need 

OF what? There is no systematic genocide, systematic religious persecutions or a regional war going on in South America. These people are not asylum seeker at all, they can get in line with the rest of the people on the Planet who want to come to the USA and are doing so legaly. ",ozric101,e9e4pj3,conservative
"Even if it's B, it's still preferable. Safer. They get their names on the system. No reason to use human smugglers. ",SickofInternetProgs,e9e2w95,conservative
Anything 9th Circuit really...,Moonthrower,e9engat,conservative
"How is he going to pass legislation with just the senate? I don’t like EO’s either, but we are going to be seeing a lot of them from now on, unfortunately.",hello_japan,e9ex2fb,conservative
The existing law says that they have 1 year after crossing to apply for asylum. It's ridiculous and I don't understand why it was that way ,former_Democrat,e9ep0lb,conservative
"Unless ""asylum"" is a funny way to spell ""handouts"".",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9fgefx,conservative
Tell her to shove a pineapple up her azz.  I’m sure it will fit.,RightSideClyde,e9f3qqp,conservative
Why?,tanktakach,e9ew3zj,conservative
[deleted],,e9ep0ds,conservative
What does the H stand for?,KraZii-,e9emwbb,conservative
Which means the left will make up a reason to be against it. ,Pukalo_Reincarnate,e9en2ux,conservative
Except it means people will not even bother with trying to get asylum. Thus they will be more likely to die in the desert.,approject3,e9eiuno,conservative
"the most annoying thing  about r/politics is that they call you a Russian Bot if you disagree with them at all
",JasonJBL,e9e8frj,conservative
"    while(true) {
        if (currentPolicy.getSponsor().equals(“TRUMP”) {
            initVictimStatus();
            initOrangeManBad();
            initAntifaRiot();
            initReeeeeee();
        }
    }

",Pyronot,e9ea5xz,conservative
I just spit my beer out everywhere. Thanks haha,N7_Starkiller,e9ec0ej,conservative
We are *all* Russians on this blessed day.,idontgethejoke,e9esjh1,conservative
Thanks for the link. Looks like a fairly clean sub with all his tweets and press conferences and some news? Can't believe I never even thought to look there. ,former_Democrat,e9eoqbn,conservative
"That is a legitimate concern here.  I have always despised executive orders, and I am conflicted here.  Conservatives still have the house AND the Senate, why is Trump signing executive orders on this that can be signed away at the leisure of whoever comes next.  Executive branch doesnt make the laws, let's keep it that way.",Falkamper,e9eyxm4,conservative
"It is worth noting that this is in direct conflict with the language of the immigration and nationality act, which is the law of the land. Traditionally I oppose executive orders to overrule us laws.",mht03110,e9ewnmw,conservative
"Another NPC argument: No human is illegal!!

That one gets used a lot by the very concerned celebrities. ",Bostonbuckeye,e9eyrmr,conservative
"""Umm, it's called, like, *being a decent human being*?""",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9ffzum,conservative
Where is your background for that ,JohnDaDragon,e9es7gt,conservative
"Could there be a reason to let them in?  I dont feel comfortable allowing only people with STEM degrees in to the country, but at the same time I'm unsure as to what kind of social integration and history of success our asylum program has.",Falkamper,e9ez0jw,conservative
They will spread out and many will try to cross illegally. Watch and see.,GotchaWhereIWantcha,e9f0ug3,conservative
"Australian here.  We had thousands of economic migrants paying people smugglers thousands of dollars each month to come to Australia illegally.  

A prime minister with a pair of balls put an end to that, and an end to all the deaths at sea in shonky boats.

We still have ignorant bleeding hearts far left extremists virtue signaling constantly about how racist we are.  No - these same people would not even want to eat in the same restaurant as these illegal immigrants, but expect the lower/working class people to put up with the degradation of their neighborhoods.",Snoochems,e9em8r2,conservative
Australia just put them in permanent detention on Nauru...,geoff-,e9evgoe,conservative
">How about helping Americans before non Americans.

But this would be considered *Nationalism*, and since Trump is white and Mexicans are brown, it would be *White Nationalism/Supremacy*, racist, and xenophobic.

/s",Sideswipe0009,e9elyf9,conservative
"I mean, you can help foreign asylum seekers and Americans at the same time.",isaaclikeafox,e9esil0,conservative
"Exactly. On the asylum form and withholding of removal form, there is only reasons of persecution. 

Some loser on r/politics tried to tell me you can seek it for economic reasons. Gave me literally twenty cases that had economic struggle *involved* but each one was the direct *RESULT* of persecution. Even at that, courts often decided that it doesn’t prevent them from actually living. 

So many liberals and people who don’t research genuinely believe that a conservative argues that seeking asylum is illegal (which is dumb as hell) or they think you can waltz in because you’re poor. ",nathanaelorange,e9eoc4f,conservative
"I’d hesitate to say that - El Salvador has the highest homicide rate in the world, and Honduras and Brazil aren’t far behind. Peru’s Shining Path and Colombia’s cartels not only produce and ship massive amounts of cocaine, but are responsible for a great deal of violence. Mexico is definitely not great either, considering that 5 of the 10 cities in the world with the highest murder rates are located in Mexico. In fact, all 10 of the worst cities in the world for murder are located in Latin America. I’m not saying the caravan is justified and the fact some people even suggest not turning them away, let alone granting asylum, is insane to me, but there are certainly some legitimate asylum seekers within Latin America.",dhesswfb26,e9edl0r,conservative
"That’s OK, take it all the way to the Supreme Court.  BWAAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAH!",RightSideClyde,e9f3xnd,conservative
"Obviously he still needs the House, but if hold can pass the Senate, then get stuck in the House, he can beat up the House for not cooperating.",SleekFilet,e9f2wtg,conservative
">I don't understand why it was that way

Because liberals

&#x200B;",vampslayer53,e9euw3q,conservative
[removed],,e9ewcim,conservative
"It almost looks like Obama. 

You may be on to something. ",XDG-KEC-QZA-PBU,e9feqk1,conservative
Human. Trudeau might have something to say about it though.,airforcefalco,e9ex2hs,conservative
Hispanic?,Neverlearned2surf,e9ewp74,conservative
Honduran,liquidsnakex,e9f35zu,conservative
Hillary?,AnnualThrowaway,e9eyyeq,conservative
Hispanic.,hayastanempire,e9ezwwd,conservative
Let me take a wild guess: racism.,Buce-Nudo,e9ex290,conservative
Don't wander into a desert?,Buddha_Punch,e9ekekz,conservative
"Well, there's a very simple solution to avoid that issue:    
  
Don't enter America illegally",diehardgiraffe,e9eoeg3,conservative
So don't invade our sovereign nation. I have no sympathy for those who hurt themselves during the commission of a crime. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9eq3ri,conservative
"The amount of things blamed on Russia is crazy. Russia is not Hydra, Umbrella Corp, or Cobra Command and sitting behind every bad thing that happens in the U.S. The messed up things that happen here, those are all on the people that did them. ",Zylo_001,e9efny9,conservative
"That’s how it is with most subs these days, not just that one. ",Lucius_Funk,e9e8mpl,conservative
That’s just what a Russian bot would say. ,A_WildStory_Appeared,e9ey0uc,conservative
"It’s not much different here honestly. Disagree, and you get hit with Orangemanbad, NPC, REEEE, etc...",zombiechicken379,e9f2rj6,conservative
[removed],,e9eas3n,conservative
God I hate that phrase. I can be a decent human being and still not want illegals coming in and taking advantage of our system.,heartless_13,e9is4uj,conservative
">We still have ignorant bleeding hearts far left extremists virtue signaling constantly about how racist we are.  No - these same people would not even want to eat in the same restaurant as these illegal immigrants, but expect the lower/working class people to put up with the degradation of their neighborhoods.

Unfortunately for us, those sorts of extremists just gained control of the House here.
",soylent_absinthe,e9ezjr8,conservative
U fkin Nazi. Don't care u dare consider your own people before non-americans you shit Lord,223slash556,e9eo6cs,conservative
Sure what's another 20T in debt?,ngoni,e9f16hh,conservative
"That is fine they can get asylum in another South American nation, claiming asylum was never meant to be a fast track or free pass to be admitted to the US and by-pass vetting. ",ozric101,e9ehyc2,conservative
"Meanwhile, we have an invasion from the south.  And yes, a group of people carrying foreign flags trying to bust through our boarders is an invasion.",RightSideClyde,e9f3vfy,conservative
"The Statue of Liberty resides on Liberty Island right next to Ellis Island where immigrants were processed. Trump is pushing for immigration through legal ports of entry. This is in line with what the Statue of Liberty represents.

Edit: I just wanted to point out how the real name of the statue is 'Liberty Enlightening the World.' There certainly is a nationalist angle to that title but it is friendly.",Buce-Nudo,e9excio,conservative
"A statue dictates policy?  Are we a nation built of ***illegal*** immigrants?

No",PerceivedShift,e9eww3t,conservative
My peers beat me to the punch. But theres your answer. ,tanktakach,e9exjq9,conservative
"Here in Canada, we prefer the term Hupeople.",Varg_Burzum_666,e9fdwxh,conservative
PCLU,2402a7b7f239666e4079,e9f04th,conservative
"Not just the human, but the huwomen and huchildren, too. ",Lucius_Funk,e9f9ops,conservative
Honduran is what I was thinking when I posted it.,rob_s_458,e9gkgam,conservative
Now that's just crazy talk.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9fftzm,conservative
-	Adolf Hitler,farbenreichwulf,e9fg3da,conservative
I was just pointing out that OP made a bad argument.,approject3,e9eofw4,conservative
"On the other hand China, laying low and making moves in Africa...",convicious,e9eoull,conservative
"> Russia is not Hydra, Umbrella Corp, or Cobra Command and sitting behind every bad thing that happens in the U.S

What's really crazy is that buying into the premise that they are some sophisticated superpower is exactly what Putin would love for us to believe. They have nukes but they don't have a high functioning economy. They are still reeling from the decay caused during the Soviet Union. Sowing discord in the US is their big weapon against the big stick holding them off from eastern Europe. 

Putin is ex-KGB. How do people not get that he's playing mind games? Read some of the stuff from the cold war era. The proof is in the pudding",greatatdrinking,e9f3tu1,conservative
"Leftist subs, yes.",RxCubed,e9enfce,conservative
"Fair, though imo it’s less hostile here but more smug",JasonJBL,e9f52z6,conservative
"Not really, Russia is an oligarchy at best, that's a very collectivist idea. That's not very right wing or individualist oriented.",McDrMuffinMan,e9eoonw,conservative
[removed],,e9encnm,conservative
"Ok, but they say every right wing opinion is a bot",JasonJBL,e9ecjmc,conservative
/s = sarcasm ,PerceivedShift,e9ewx2b,conservative
"Most of America's debt is [owed to ourselves](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/National_debt_of_the_United_States) for social security, retirement and military funds. The asylum seekers will cost money, but our debt has very little to do with them.

My main point has little to do with money, I mostly wanted to point out that the idea of ""let's solve our problems before thiers"" is kinda dumb on a national scale. We're always gonna have problems, big problems, so if we take that stance we would never do anything for anyone that isn't American.",isaaclikeafox,e9i9pb6,conservative
"There’s nothing saying that other Latin American countries aren’t taking in asylum seekers. But why would US news agencies talk about that in any case?

Asylum seekers are on no path to US citizenship by default, and must live here for at least a full year after being granted asylum before beginning to seek out a lawful permanent resident status. Asylum seekers generally come and stay until the situation in their home country improves.

It’s not an easy process by any means, the essentially live in poverty here until they learn enough English to work. The current asylum system was assembled after the world realized how turning away asylum seekers during WWII turned out for those groups. 

[Facts about Asylum in the US](https://www.americanimmigrationcouncil.org/research/asylum-united-states) ",robislove,e9ey3t6,conservative
Statue / statute,faint-smile,e9fgdcd,conservative
It's more inclusive.,TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9ffru9,conservative
Nailed it!,liquidsnakex,e9h7080,conservative
I'm just pointing out that you made a bad counter-argument,diehardgiraffe,e9eoy5d,conservative
"China is doing what is in it's best interest. Might not be what's in Africa's best interest; however, that is between China/Africa to figure out. ",Zylo_001,e9et1e8,conservative
China really is making some moves in Africa. I don't even think of it as sinister particularly. Just China being China. Kind of predatory loan behavior though,greatatdrinking,e9eqz2b,conservative
You forget the sly genocide of the Uighur as well. ,DecievedRTS,e9er211,conservative
"In other words, most subs.",hello_japan,e9ewuds,conservative
Yeah. You might be right about that. ,zombiechicken379,e9f592t,conservative
[removed],,e9eovwq,conservative
There is no US law that allows illegals into the country.,PerceivedShift,e9fybio,conservative
"👋👋👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏👏

YES INDEED WE LIKE BEING INCLUSIVE EVEN IF THAT MEAN WE NEED TO CHANGE OUR LANGUAGE AND STOP PEOPLE FROM USING CERTAIN WORDS THAT HURT OUR FEELINGS AND MAKE US VERY VERY UPSET.",xsladex,e9fnd7o,conservative
"That's not what capitalism is. If you have trouble in the future. Just think of it like this. ""Free trade between individuals""",McDrMuffinMan,e9epkgs,conservative
It was a joke,faint-smile,e9fym1w,conservative
[removed],,e9epnxa,conservative
"Once again, that's not how capitalism works. If the government is involved in forcing or regulating transactions it doesn't meet the definition, basically what you're doing is blaming the free market for regulation.

In the late 1800's there was some of both. If you mean ""robber barons"" I think you should study that period in history a bit more. There was a great expanse in productivity and goods and certainly a greater demand for labor than supply provided. 

Regardless its a more complex situation Than the buzzword bingo you're making it out to be. 

And how would corporations not count as capitalism? You are freely exchanging goods and transacting with them voluntarily are you not?",McDrMuffinMan,e9epwfn,conservative
[removed],,e9eq7t5,conservative
"A voluntary group is different from a mandated collective. So a mob is a collective. A family is a group. A business is a voluntary group.

The difference comes from where are rights derived. In a collective, the health of the collective is what gives individuals their rights. Therefore they can be revoked at any time. For an individual, their rights are derived innately by virtue of existence, thus they can never be revoked.

You have to remember, a business is made up of many individuals doing different jobs. You're not buying an IPhone from Tim Cook himself. You're buying it from the sales department from Bob, who Sheila in accounting pays to interact with the customer using the money generated from the sale and raised by investor Todd. They all operate under the banner know as ""Apple"". They are still individuals.

Oligarchs by virtue of their position wield non voluntary power. That exchange is therefore not free in what defines a capitistic transaction.",McDrMuffinMan,e9eqg9z,conservative
Really don’t want to hear the Dems complain about foreign interference in our elections...,YankeeBlues21,e9fwzaa,conservative
"""It's not the people who vote that count. It's the people who count the votes."" -Joseph Stalin",R-M-Renfield,e9fy7ne,conservative
Only if they were cast for them I would assume. ,ozric101,e9fth8b,conservative
The fact that they feel good about going to the court to ask for confirmation on breaking the law says something.  Judges don't get the final say the consitutuon does why's isn't anyone talking about this and letting them control the narrative.  WHAT DOES THE CONSTITUTION SAY END IF STORY. while the Republicans in charge a sitting there running crying to the courts while they have the authority and law enforcement to do something about it,slappypappyj,e9iezcc,conservative
Say it with me: NON-CITIZENS CAN'T VOTE!,heartless_13,e9isdse,conservative
That fact was well known before Stalin was around. ,ozric101,e9fz81d,conservative
"Uh, does it matter? They’re not citizens, therefore they aren’t allowed to vote. ",justhere2havefun,e9fugm4,conservative
Time to investigate and throw some Democrats in prison before they turn this into another khakistocracy banana republic. They need to be taught that this shit will not be tolerated.,PhilosoGuido,e9gac95,conservative
New rule for Florida: nobody reports their numbers until Broward county does their final numbers that way they don’t have a number to shoot for when stuffing the ballot box.,Racheakt,e9ictvv,conservative
"This has done more to destroy my faith in fair elections than any Russia garbage we've heard about the last two years. This process has been a disgrace. 
",Bhangus,e9g0lsj,conservative
"And yet the Meuller ""investigation"" continues...",wynhdo,e9g62ti,conservative
"No voter ID.

Provisional ballots

Not transparent ballot counting



Should the UN send election observers in places where election fraud is rampant?",sjwking,e9esak9,conservative
"I still need an explanation on how in the world this woman still has this position after her past screw ups? How in the hell has she not been fired yet?  She needs to be thrown from this position, and literally. And then charged. ",MaddSim,e9ek5oy,conservative
"You know, I had no idea people down there were pissed. Pissed enough to be protesting.  Yet the main stream press isnt showing this. Of course not.  The only protests they support are leftists.    
Im glad people are out there pissed off.   
",MaddSim,e9ejy8m,conservative
\#oops,YankeeBlues21,e9ejrgs,conservative
Oopsie.,hello_japan,e9ex3s3,conservative
"Blegh, I've been hesitant to believe they were actually trying to outright steal the election, I figured they were just hoping they could find something...anything to give them the election, but now it seems clear she was intentionally trying to rig this. She needs to go to Prison, and the ballots need to be checked out of state.",Notalent13,e9ev4zd,conservative
This type of nonsense makes me question whether or not my own vote was properly recorded. No one really questions the totals since it’s such a one sided registration edge the Dems have here in Philly. I sometimes wonder what a recount or any level of real scrutiny would reveal. Already had family that live to the north of us say their votes were changed to Dem before leaving the voting booth. They caught it in time and had it corrected.,FuriousChef,e9f3qva,conservative
"she needs to rot in jail, or worse",BeachCruisin22,e9f0l27,conservative
Do you think any of this stuff would have taken place if Gillam and Nelson would have came out ahead on election night? Not a freaking chance!,phrazel,e9f6gj7,conservative
"This kind of nonsense should be classified as a form of treason.

They should really make an example out of her. But the left will most definitely cry ""racism!!!""",mikecx79,e9fb2y0,conservative
"""Whoops"" give me a break. ",knotaredditor,e9f6w9p,conservative
Wonder how many of the people who work there are her relatives!!,retired-vet,e9fqmfw,conservative
"Pretty sad state of affairs, TBH. ",ozric101,e9eu3xq,conservative
They should.  Last I heard the UN said our elections are much below their standards.,GoldenGonzo,e9f5k1g,conservative
"Broward is a Dem craphole where we couldn’t even manage a GOP challenger against her

We’re Cook county with less murder",YankeeBlues21,e9ek8kc,conservative
Jeff Sessions pretty much refused to touch amything that would give the appearance of targeting the political opposition. Everything for the last 2 years was just sweot completely under the rug,iwasthebeaver,e9elrs3,conservative
It's a Democratic area.  They're fine with her cheating to get Democrats elected.  Why would they want a Republican there to run an honest election if it causes them to lose?,Im_an_expert_on_this,e9elwqm,conservative
"Either Rick Scott is in on it, he's an idiot, or he's incompetent.  I'm not sure which is worse.  The duty fell on him to fire her.",GoldenGonzo,e9f4g9e,conservative
"Because apathy in general voters and misinformation on the media.

&#x200B;

The causes aren't anything magical here... same shit we've seen just people are apathetic as fuck when they need to be grabbing their god damned pitch forks.",Swarlos8888,e9f7lh5,conservative
[deleted],,e9exg81,conservative
There are demonstrations all weekend. They were out there all day today (with Gillum people antagonizing them trying to get them to lash out on camera and do something stupid. ,YankeeBlues21,e9ek6u7,conservative
\#jail,GFZDW,e9f3uim,conservative
"Voting via the computer thingy?  Check out the Texas votes changed news.  Supposedly some or maybe all of PA uses the same machines.  It's some issue with the UI, check boxes are still checkable when it doesn't seem they should be or if you go too fast or something.  Nothing crooked, just typical awful government tech.",DeadWater27,e9fahl4,conservative
assuming the UN has standards...,JobieWanKenobi,e9fbyd4,conservative
"But shes already been told before she broke the law. At some point, she should've been literally pulled from that position. ",MaddSim,e9emz6p,conservative
"Damn, as a chicagoan that hits deep haha",sheffieldandwaveland,e9fhvvu,conservative
Funny because that was the reasoning to vote early by some. They didn’t trust the computer on same day.,icecreamdude97,e9f3ikp,conservative
Idiots... This ain't Portland or D.C. They're liable to get shot if they cross the line and attack someone with a CWFL. I always carry where I legally can.,mastaxn,e9eoskm,conservative
Talking more about confidence in the system. ,FuriousChef,e9faxbw,conservative
You’re preaching to the converted. But if you accuse her of anything here the media and local powers that be just say you’re a racist conspiracy theorist. ,YankeeBlues21,e9end08,conservative
Yeah they definitely don't want to be swinging bike locks at Floridians.,CondoPresident,e9f7akw,conservative
Oh I gotcha.  My rural polling place was an unorganized cluster and it didn't inspire any confidence with the wife or I (who both had better experiences voting in even more rural areas many years ago).  ,DeadWater27,e9fc446,conservative
Let her tell that to the Judge.... sorry but you simply can not have criminal bureaucrats rigging elections.    ,ozric101,e9etwc4,conservative
"> sorry but you simply can not have criminal bureaucrats rigging elections.

We can and we do.  Ask yourself if you were this law breaking slime that has never suffered any consequences from previously breaking the law, why the fuck would she fear consequences now.  As conservatives we should not be surprised.  Once you allow leftists to escape justice it only enables them.",optionhome,e9f3e8v,conservative
"Bad timing. The most recent shooter was parroting this embittered nonsense. And now Cuomo is off perpetuating it more.

It's just in bad taste.",MisterMouser,e9ffzlp,conservative
Isn't that exactly what the shooter thought?,unityrootts,e9fko6e,conservative
Wouldn't have expected better over at CNN,dudeman5445,e9fhgv6,conservative
I would love to kick him in the dick,rharravs,e9g38c7,conservative
You would have to find it first.,unibuckeye,e9g9uzb,conservative
"Ah yes, yet another ""Trump is unpopular and will never win unless he does ..."" article",wharris2001,e9hc8x8,conservative
Hahaha,cornshelltortilla,e9hde7n,conservative
He had a coalition?,justhere2havefun,e9hb7bd,conservative
The United States Constitution ,BeachCruisin22,e9gvv5c,conservative
Plunder and deceit by Mark Levin  ,Chapka69,e9gnovq,conservative
"Maybe it was just because of my already rooted conservative thinking, but Evicted by Matthew Desmond profoundly reassured my thoughts around cause and effect and people being responsible for their own actions; thus making their own lives into what they will become.",cons_NC,e9glehw,conservative
"I had a macroeconomics professor have us read Stossel's ""Why individuals succeed and governments fail""

For me, I was always Right-leaning, but never really knew why. After reading it, I left college a Libertarian.",zuul99,e9h0b36,conservative
Goldwater's book for sure. The Conscience of a Conservative. ,Dunkeliness,e9gsvqn,conservative
"The Moon is a Harsh Mistress by Robert Heinlein. 

Citizen of the Galaxy by Robert Heinlein. 

The Last Centurion by John Ringo.

Atlad Shrugged by Ayn Rand.

Capitalism: The Unknown Ideal by Ayn Rand.",Hillary_For_Prison,e9h7j9u,conservative
"[https://www.amazon.com/Great-Debate-Edmund-Burke-Thomas/dp/0465062989/ref=sr\_1\_1?ie=UTF8&qid=1541906992&sr=8-1&keywords=the+great+debate+yuval+levin](https://www.amazon.com/Great-Debate-Edmund-Burke-Thomas/dp/0465062989/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&qid=1541906992&sr=8-1&keywords=the+great+debate+yuval+levin)

&#x200B;

This is a fantastic exploration of liberalism and conservatism (which are compared from a Burkean conservative perspective). Though it is basically about political thought, it is quite accessible. This would make the fellow see that conservatism, and liberalism too for that matter, is much more than a set of campaign talking points. The two philosophies are based off of fundamental differences in how you view human nature, the purpose of politics, and the possibilities of the law.",Sola__Fide,e9gn161,conservative
"You aren't going to find many that aren't automatic turn-offs for the brainless Left.

What you can do, sometimes, is use their thimble deep understanding of events, to turn them to conservative literature.

Good examples:  Plenty of them listen to Hamilton, but don't know much beyond the lyrics of songs that are interpreted in a radical way;  introduce them to the Ron Chernow book that inspired the musical, and that is one of the more conservative retrospective histories of the last decade. 

A 60s Fan?    Sell them on Radical Son, as the story of a son of communists grows up, goes to college in the 60s, and encounters the Black Panthers and others on their fellow travels through that generation.   ",ErieHog,e9gpwqf,conservative
"Challenge them to listen to Tucker Carlson and Ben Shapiro for a month with an open mind, then get back to you.
ETA: Also Dave Rubin.",Terra_green2,e9gvr0y,conservative
"Love Levin, I’ll check it out.",gster50,e9gpqyx,conservative
"I’ll give it a look, a disbelief in personal responsibility is central to most liberals thought I find.

It’s the philosophy of victim hood.",gster50,e9gpuzh,conservative
"I also recommend liberty and tyranny, by Levin as well.",Savant_PSU,e9h8081,conservative
I think that book was written for situation like this ,Chapka69,e9h4i9i,conservative
"*and the US.

In his statement about a EU army, he said it was to defend against Russia, China and the US",JMB_was_a_god,e9glqsm,conservative
I just inherited a French rifle from WWII.  It's in great condition.  Never fired and only dropped once.,tehForce,e9gkbwy,conservative
"Obviously the *and US part is insulting, but it's high time they stop depending on us to keep Russia from taking them over. They are free riders.",Glsbnewt,e9hymu6,conservative
"Trump: Pay more for NATO, you slackers! China and Russia are yuge threats!!1

France (accented English): We are not *in* NATO and shall pay for a European Army to defend against Russia and China.

Trump: !!! Are you sure? Since when?",jayman419,e9glyzu,conservative
An EU army is inevitable. ,triggernaut,e9gklee,conservative
"Yep that is the part the ticked Trump off... 

Time to bring the troops back home and let the world go to shit again, I guess. 
We will be bailing their dumbasses out again sooner or later if we have not been overrun with dumbasses oursleves before then.    ",ozric101,e9gnvlz,conservative
Lmao ,Chapka69,e9gnt11,conservative
"It's inevitable they will never pay for it.

The European military condition, especially Western Europe, is in laughable condition.",searanger62,e9gl8fw,conservative
Lol. No ,SickofInternetProgs,e9hf71l,conservative
We need the troops here because our own country is going too shit too damn fast,JMB_was_a_god,e9go6k2,conservative
"> The European military condition, especially Western Europe, it in laughable condition.

excatly this 

https://www.businessinsider.com/german-military-fighters-jets-not-ready-for-combat-2018-5/

https://www.theguardian.com/uk/2012/nov/15/astute-hunter-killer-submarines-doomed

https://southfront.org/germany-is-unable-to-fulfill-trumps-requirements-on-defense-die-zeit/

https://www.theguardian.com/uk-news/2016/sep/17/uk-armed-forces-could-not-withstand-attack-by-major-power-like-russia

https://www.mirror.co.uk/news/world-news/western-europe-unable-defend-against-4117974

",Delta_25,e9gucml,conservative
It’s well known and nothing new that totalitarian leftists generally don’t like anything that limit their right to use the state to dominate all aspects of people’s lives.,Kutepov,e9euedt,conservative
It’s always the system that’s the problem when they lose. ,justhere2havefun,e9f2uq0,conservative
"This has been clear for years. Obama was on record before he got elected pretty much stating the Constitution was a hindrance (he meant it in a negative way). The left is a ends justify the means movement, and the constitution makes it very difficult for them to impose their ends on the masses. Thus they whole heartedly support judicial activism as it is their means of subverting the Rule of Law.

",ultimis,e9fexdv,conservative
RealClearPolitics I thought was a fairly leftward site. Good to see them posting this. ,valmeister,e9fcv90,conservative
They tolerate it as long as it doesnt get in there way. But ehen it does they freak,ExpensiveMention,e9f8lld,conservative
https://mediabiasfactcheck.com/real-clear-politics/,Sideswipe0009,e9fxyjo,conservative
They only tolerate it as long as they can’t get away with abolishing it all together.,Kutepov,e9f8u3f,conservative
"Id say we need to post to r/politics as well! Its not just for libs! There are lots of people who go there and dont comment, but see the articles. They get brainwashed very quickly because of the one sidedness. 

And honestly, not everything on r/politics is wrong or completely biased, and not all people on there are illogical. If we want to change things, we must debate them. And we must be humble and accept if they prove us wrong here and there. 

Its the start to getting the USA (and the world) back in top shape. We must destroy the bullshit information from people's minds,the right way. Its not easy, and it takes time and patience, but it will work. ",SeanRamey,e9fvqui,conservative
Why is there near universal negative public reception of American conservative ideas?,Falkamper,e9foai9,conservative
Willing and able. I just know it'll be ban-city for most of us.,cons_NC,e9gg3hs,conservative
Go to 4chan. You have a voice there and won’t be downvoted into oblivion ,Tmblackflag,e9gozvv,conservative
"All those subs are ruled by 3rd party bots, paid mods and sharia blue. Their job is to ""correct the record"".",sjwking,e9fq2jd,conservative
"it's only Reddit.  American conservative ideas do incredibly well overall, just look at how elections turnout despite the fact that the schools/media/hollywood act as an arm of the democrat party indoctrinating people 24-7 and the democrats consistently engage in voter fraud.",BeachCruisin22,e9fox17,conservative
Are they doing well though? Vote totals seem to be very much indicative of a lack of conservative enthusiasm at a national level from upcoming age groups and in denser urban centers.  Conservatives appear to be losing a war of attrition as population density increases.  ,Falkamper,e9fsar8,conservative
Most of the world responds this way to the ideals,phantomcut3,e9g80oz,conservative
"I live in Chicago and you'd lose your reputation at work, school, social life if you come out in support of republicans. Especially among young age groups. ",1248163264128,e9ft28f,conservative
"There was no blue wave, the GOP is still in a very good position. ",ozric101,e9fteqb,conservative
"That's the feeling I am getting.  I work in a predominantly conservative company, but from what I can see it's a HUGE culture shock to our interns.  How can we re-balance the perception, it wasn't that long ago that you could say you were a conservative and it was okay.",Falkamper,e9fu73s,conservative
"They've shamed anyone not carrying the progressive agenda into silence, except at the voting booth.  They've made it socially illegal not to mimic the talking points, hopefully it will be their undoing.",BeachCruisin22,e9fubz3,conservative
"They push tolerance but actually they want you to accept everything they're about. Was discussing candidates and I said one was ""pro-abortion"" and I got a bunch of people say ""how dare you? no one is pro-abortion what a terrible thing to say""",1248163264128,e9fxbap,conservative
"Yes it does appear that way.  The company I work for has none of these problems as it is heavily conservative and a liberal person would stigmatize themselves if they spoke out like the more extreme ones do.  It's a large company as well. 

 I guess what I'm trying to figure out is how do we reclaim a fair seat at the table?  What's the move that starts to balance things out?  What policy can we compromise on that might actually be beneficial to everyone without destroying what conservatives stand for?  I dont think the answer lies in the ""dont give them an inch"" mentality here, that's not working and it's a PR disaster right now.",Falkamper,e9fup8l,conservative
"It seems as though conservatives have to become a grassroots type situation now.  I think the votes show that there are still a large number of quietly right populace.  It's just that fear of being Barred or Tuckered means we have to keep that hidden until the privacy of the voting booth.  Unless someone finds a way to shut down the ridiculous shaming, it's a matter of quietly spreading the message and being the silent majority.",I_am_really_shocked,e9fvvs9,conservative
"I'm in the opposite boat as you.  I work for an SJW-entrenched company and subjected to diversity emailed 3x a day (no lie).  My company openly and obviously hires and promotes based upon race, gender and sexual orientation.

Compromise doesn't work, because the other side never does.  At that point you are only bidding against yourself.  The greatest thing to ever happen to the ""conservative"" movement is Trump.  A pushback, in a big way, was needed.  That's just what we got.  Another Jeb! would have been very similar to more of Obama, just with a nod to the religious right.

This is a fight, make no mistake.  The other side is not playing fair and will cheat to win.  Expect it and plan accordingly.",BeachCruisin22,e9fv4u2,conservative
"Kansas just elected Democrats, nationally they have been conservative, but I am not assured of a conservative silent majority in any way.",Falkamper,e9fwj93,conservative
"Let's talk about options there, where can conservatives reasonably strike and win?  Come January Mitch McConnel proposing legalization of marijuana, end of civil asset forfeiture programs, and perhaps a law recognizing net neutrality.

Those three issues would not subvert conservative ideals and would score HUGE points in terms of national media affirmation.  It would basically sweep the legs out of a liberal youth movement and garner massive support from a group the conservatives have struggled to make inroads with.  

What do you think of a plan like that? Is it feasible? ",Falkamper,e9fwaij,conservative
"Kansas had been destroyed by a couple terms of that lunatic Brownback, who made conservatives look insane and intransigent.  I don't think it will be too long until they start trying to put the genie back in that bottle.",I_am_really_shocked,e9fxg2m,conservative
"Oh legalizing weed should be a #1 priority, in 2019.  It's happening no matter what, so you might as well take credit. Also, who the fuck cares?  We let people drink, smoke cigarettes and jump out of airplanes for fun.  Legalize it, note the risks, tax it, move on.

Civil asset forfeiture should be killed, no doubt.  Unfortunately, it isn't an issue that resonates with most ""normies"".  They should do it anyway, but don't expect it to move the needle.

Net neutrality, nah.  I don't trust any issue pushed by the oligarchs of the internet.",BeachCruisin22,e9fzcl9,conservative
"That makes sense, was there no way to rein him in at the party level given the damage he was doing?  I live in New England, our politicians don't get as extreme as other regions, and Kansas might as well be another country for how often it appears in our news cycle. Most stories we see involve our reporters being incredulous at the positions taken by people in the mid west.   The perception of the bible belt is rather.... negative up here. ",Falkamper,e9fxw7e,conservative
"Then let's get behind the first point for the masses, get behind the second point for the informed moderates, and push the third point because stifling free speech has occured before and it should be codified in law that all have equal access to the web",Falkamper,e9g2poi,conservative
"Not liberals, leftists.  Liberals actually support free speech, including all three of them that are remaining.",BrighamYoung,e9gp72h,conservative
[removed],,e9g8y2u,conservative
It is though.,LobsterWithAnOpinion,e9g9jcz,conservative
I guess freedom of the press doesn’t apply for elections in Democratic counties.,r777m,e9em8rv,conservative
What in the HELL is going on down there?  Is this the democrats long term strategy to take Florida permanently along with all other democrats strongholds?  ,PerceivedShift,e9ex6bq,conservative
"I don't think they can do that, can they?",LobsterWithAnOpinion,e9eiwbe,conservative
Don't worry. Hillarys law firm Perkins Coie has just arrived in Florida to cover it all up.,spitefulspear,e9f0vqr,conservative
"Question is, how much longer are the people going to just take this?",BeachCruisin22,e9f0m1i,conservative
It's an invasion of privacy to record election fraud.,RightSideClyde,e9f6aj7,conservative
"Let me guess, having a camera would be racist somehow?",DanReach,e9f3neu,conservative
I don’t think they understand what “public” means.,hello_japan,e9foogg,conservative
"I would think the only legal standing they would have is that while the election is public, the individual votes are not. 

They can really only hide behind ballots being in a camera shot with a person's name attached.

Not exactly difficult to work around.",Sideswipe0009,e9fy80t,conservative
"""Silencing the free press"" only applies to temper tantrum Jim Acosta getting his precious microphone taken away.",nited_states,e9ersak,conservative
"> in Democratic counties.

Why is it always? 

Can one lefty actually confront this reality?",orangeeyedunicorn,e9euy2v,conservative
Yes.  They're actively trying to Chicago your Florida.  ,MojoHand052,e9f5ktm,conservative
The NBC lawyer got into it with them saying it was illegal but I guess she was arguing with a brick wall,Kovics_Kool_Klan,e9ejpj8,conservative
Who is going to stop them?,PaulRyansEvilTwin,e9ejycu,conservative
"""It creates an environment in which people feel unsafe.""",TRUMP-PENCE-2020,e9fgzp4,conservative
"Leftist here. I find this act wholly unconstitutional. Freedom of the press is as essential to our democratic process as the right to vote itself.

I understand one concern here: protecting voter signatures. But the county and the press should be working in tandem to come to a resolution on how best to document the counting of these ballots — hell, through smoked glass or with Vaseline-covered lenses, for all I care. Extraordinary circumstances require extraordinary measures.

The integrity of our election process has been deeply compromised since at least 2016 (that we know of), from outside interference to what is increasingly looking like internal dubiousness, to put it mildly. Now is the time for us to restore faith in this process, and we’re blowing it.

If there’s one thing I hope all of us on either side can agree on in this moment is that the press — one of the entities branded as “fake news” — is vital, and that even though they sometimes have their biases, they are largely in pursuit of the truth. I hope we can at least acknowledge that effort — if not as extremely as I’m putting it, than in this particular instance.",letterheadless,e9f6hva,conservative
Fox and NBC are suing them.,JMB_was_a_god,e9em7w8,conservative
"A rational person who happens to disagree politically who is coming to another subreddit to politely and respectfully comment their opinion? Wow, you win the “most reasonable person” award",baileyculp,e9f6v3d,conservative
 I've never signed a ballot in my life. Is this common?  The only ID on mine is a number the election official writes ,SgtWhiskeyj4ck,e9f8vky,conservative
"Thanks. :) It’s nice to be welcomed to have genuine conversation about these things. It’s all of our country — not the right’s, not the left’s. We’re not supposed to be at war with one another, and I refuse now to demonize everyone who doesn’t agree with me as I had been conditioned to in the past (as is the habit of members of both sides).

I’m only a recent subscriber to this subreddit, but I’ve found it immensely illuminating, so again, thanks to everyone who raises issues like this one to the top.

That said, I accept the incoming downvotes for what I’m going to say next... I’m still not a fan of Trump; I find his priorities misguided, his rhetoric alarming, and the people he surrounds himself with dangerous to a free and secular society.

But I have also come to recognize that Trump doesn’t necessarily speak for all of your views, but he may speak to enough of them — same as any politician I might back. Both parties have a lot to learn from another, if we’ll only listen to one another.",letterheadless,e9flxg4,conservative
">As Times White House reporter Julie Davis tweeted on Thursday, “@Acosta's behavior here, like it or not, does not disqualify him from the First Amendment-protected freedom to ask questions. Otherwise, how are we different from a place that has no freedom of the press at all?”

So everyone is just ignoring that Acosta ""asked"" about 5 questions regarding the caravan, only to try and shift the line of questioning to collusion **after** he'd been told he was not allowed to ask more questions?",Sideswipe0009,e9g0ewk,conservative
"So women first as long as they are liberal.  Men are evil unless they're liberal. 

Do they even know they're hypocrites?",gab907,e9ffczn,conservative
Wasn’t expressing his first amendment rights what got Willie in trouble?,yeroldpappy,e9fgfhh,conservative
I got a first amendment to pop him in the nose if it had been me.,Intimidator94,e9fdorm,conservative
Calling them hypocrites is racist you Nazii,hello_japan,e9fovud,conservative
It seems they found the concept of hypocrisy unbearably restrictive and an impediment to doublethink. ,MisterMouser,e9fgc5i,conservative
Scalia the GOAT,Jfowl56,e9gnpy8,conservative
We’ve put men on the moon and yet still can’t figure out how to count the ballots cast in an election...,Pyronot,e9eiu4n,conservative
"What's messed up is that we are now in the evening of November 9th, and we still don't even know how many people voted in this God-forsaken county.

Seriously, nowhere in the media seems to know or be reporting on it, nor are they even remotely curious about this uncomfortable fact.",nited_states,e9ee6rf,conservative
"Do mail in ballots like CO and OR. Seems like they have no issues every year, vote tally’s are calculated quickly, and voter participation is higher on average then other states. Plus with a mail in ballot you have time to research the different ballot initiatives before selecting. ",Poops_with_force,e9f6ggo,conservative
"Democrats be accusing Republicans of trying to steal the election, and Republicans be trying to accuse Democrats of the same. 

What's the solution here? ",GorathThorgath,e9eopf4,conservative
"The only thing to do is toss out the votes from those two counties, let those local officials deal with the mob of disenfranchised voters they fucked over.",ozric101,e9eikd2,conservative
"So this is happening in Florida, Georgia, Arizona and now California.  Weird, no Republican areas are still counting...",BeachCruisin22,e9f1jv5,conservative
"Project veritas showed the lengths they would go to to steal elections before 2016. Their justification in those videos? Republicans ""are probably doing the same, so it's fair"". No evidence, post modernists false equivalency.",ultimis,e9ffcwz,conservative
"Of course they are.  Not the first time, unfortunately I doubt it will be the last time.",Im_an_expert_on_this,e9efwoh,conservative
And Arizona.,hexagon-173,e9eo13r,conservative
and they did steal Michigan Minnesota Montana and Wisconsin https://www.detroitnews.com/story/news/politics/2016/12/12/records-many-votes-detroits-precincts/95363314/,starlight777,e9ey3te,conservative
I feel like you could say that every 2 years.,Watchmaker-2112,e9f60uu,conservative
[removed],,e9esg06,conservative
[removed],,e9ek6no,conservative
Voted Id laws would be fine if voter registration was free or automatic.,TheJerkku,e9f8dqe,conservative
"To be fair, it wasn't Broward County that put men on the moon.",jd_porter,e9ep24k,conservative
"I'm sure it can be done, but then how will people tamper with it? They'd only have electioneering, smear campaigns, and ...actually doing their job left. 

",GladysCravesRitz,e9exowm,conservative
"They just ""found"" another box of mail-in ballots in Miami county as well today. This is getting so incredibly out of hand. ",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9etdu0,conservative
But muh Russian interference,hello_japan,e9ew456,conservative
"What are you talking about? We do know the amount of ballots left...it's equivalent to the total number of votes the republicans are ahead + 1, hopefully enough to put the blue side over the edge!",mp-,e9es0bh,conservative
Literally every county in Florida other than this one did things the current way with no problem,soxfan90,e9f73bp,conservative
The solution is not to buy into stupid equivalency arguments that are meant to desperately distract from what is obviously happening. ,hello_japan,e9ew6jj,conservative
"> Democrats be accusing Republicans of trying to steal the election, and Republicans be trying to accuse Democrats of the same

Which side wants more stringent voter verification?",orangeeyedunicorn,e9ev6o1,conservative
"Run elections like literally every other country.... I've never had to line up more than 5 minutes in Australia. Lots of polling places, paper ballots, plus compulsory voting and the vote on a Saturday. ",RogueDice,e9epxgd,conservative
"Election reform. 

Then nobody can cheat. I've said it before, I'm sure republicans *have* cheated but all I've personally experienced is democrats cheating. So, election reform. ",GladysCravesRitz,e9exrfb,conservative
Possible new election. Troublesome counties given oversight. Election officials should be removed from office/impeached.,ultimis,e9ffw2j,conservative
"Senator Rubio said it best, FL election law is clear on this. As usual, both sides complain but conservatives have the law on our side.",1wjl1,e9fhns6,conservative
One side has evidence. The other doesn’t.,LittleDickDurbin,e9etnd9,conservative
Monarchy in America.,HappyHound,e9esuzi,conservative
I’m ok with kicking Florida out of the union entirely at this point...,on_an_island,e9en72q,conservative
"Well put Indiana on the list, they just flipped some seats when they magically found 22000 overlooked votes.",Havebaconwilltravel,e9f4zjc,conservative
"It’s from the Federalist, you drooling moron.",hello_japan,e9eykrd,conservative
"Nobody thinks the article is true just because it's posted in /r/The_Donald, you're having an imaginary argument with yourself. We believe it's true because it describes what's actually happening in reality.",Hrendo,e9exp1j,conservative
"Their failure to count everyone's vote is what kicked this off, but feel free stick with that absurd talking point. ",ElbowWhisper,e9emgfc,conservative
">Damn them for ~~counting~~ *invalidating* ~~everyone's~~ *every republican's* vote *by creating fraudulent ballots and destroying the republican ones*.

",PrawnsAreOk,e9emdpi,conservative
[deleted],,e9eminj,conservative
"We need to ""find"" more ballots in NW Florida.",WIlf_Brim,e9f3ti1,conservative
"Agreed. If they had any foresight though, they should have setup this up in such a way that the ballots they're finding now are legitimate.. ""oh, we found a box of almost entirely Republican votes"", to throw everyone off. They've been doing so much election fuckery in Broward for so long they've become over confident and sloppy.",fingerpickin88,e9eufjw,conservative
"Oh I agree that Broward is screwed up, just bringing up some states have much better processes in place. 

Example I live in VA 10th, votes are paper ballot that are fed into a scan machine that uploads the results of each machine when the polls close. If something is wrong with the machine you can always count the paper ballots and there’s none of that hanging chad shit. 

We also require a valid ID to vote and have for years. 

",Poops_with_force,e9f7ycg,conservative
"Yes. Some clown told me that since republicans did not help when the democrats rigged the primary, we should just let this happen. Which is shortsighted at best and IMO enabling traitors. I protested voter fraud every way I could.  ",GladysCravesRitz,e9exvhi,conservative
[removed],,e9f5ot1,conservative
[removed],,e9f1216,conservative
Compulsory voting is a no dog. As an American it's my God-given/natural law right not to vote. ,HappyHound,e9eswli,conservative
"> compulsory voting

Haha go to hell statist.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9ev605,conservative
You were doing so well and then lost me at compulsory.  ,dan4daniel,e9f35ws,conservative
Why would you want more uninformed and uninterested people voting? That sounds like a horrendously stupid idea. You make populism based rhetoric even more dominant.,ultimis,e9fg3le,conservative
"Compulsory voting is a absolutely terrible idea. No reasonable person would want this. We have far too many morons voting already. If anything, we need fewer people voting. Raising the voting age to 25 would be a good step in the right direction. ",BudrickBundy,e9fddgu,conservative
"Florida has been the deciding factor in elections, without it you may not get president Trump.",J-Mosc,e9eqq5o,conservative
[deleted],,e9ewyog,conservative
This needs to be the #1 story coming from Trump until this shit stops.  People won't accept this for long.,BeachCruisin22,e9f7e4q,conservative
Didn’t you hear? Committing fraud and selectively counting votes that favor your party is actually just true democracy you Naziz. ,latotokyo123,e9en58v,conservative
"> Which side wants voter verification in areas where people people who vote against them would fail stringent voter verification?

Yes, our dead must continue to vote!",nmj95123,e9f8jqw,conservative
"Yes, absolutely. Did you hear about North Carolina (i believe) passing a requirement for ID when voting? ",SeanRamey,e9f1hzz,conservative
You don’t have to vote. You just have to show up and tell them your name. ,RogueDice,e9et46a,conservative
Why?,RogueDice,e9ey4jg,conservative
They already are their own state. ,NoleSean,e9f0o3h,conservative
[removed],,e9f17rn,conservative
"> Yes, our dead must continue to vote!

Lol remind me how often that happens again?",ineedmorealts,e9f8qnl,conservative
[removed],,e9f1l3f,conservative
Or else what?,LittleDickDurbin,e9etmrc,conservative
Wow what an incredibly stupid idea. ,Hrendo,e9exkte,conservative
"Ignore the comment about going to hell...but Americans dont want the government telling us what to do, which is where the defensiveness comes from. ",fluffyfluffyheadd,e9f3yuj,conservative
I value freedom of choice. ,HawkeyeFan321,e9f2knk,conservative
[removed],,e9f4lkm,conservative
"It [absolutely](https://denver.cbslocal.com/2016/09/22/cbs4-investigation-finds-dead-voters-casting-ballots-in-colorado/) happens. Remember kids, election integrity is important, but not enough, to, you know, actually make sure that a person voting is who they say they are! ",nmj95123,e9f9nae,conservative
"Nation-wide voter ID can help combat fraud. Maybe not this kind of fraud, but look at the parent comment. They’re talking about fraud in general, not just this fraud situation.",Escenze,e9f2jie,conservative
"Well, did Brower county require an ID at the polls? Ive heard they didnt.",SeanRamey,e9f9nk9,conservative
$20 fine.,RogueDice,e9etnuz,conservative
Why? Aren't you willing to introduce it to improve the representativeness of your democracy? Australia had 91% turnout for the last federal election.,RogueDice,e9ey41g,conservative
[removed],,e9f5sn8,conservative
But isn't that a bit naïve. Government always tell people some things that they have to do - conscription being an obvious example. Being forced (through the threat of a really small fine) to undertake your democratic responsibility doesn't sound like the arrival of the fourth reich to me. And I can guarantee to you that Australia is just as free as the US is.,RogueDice,e9g5tz2,conservative
This might be one of the most ironic comments I've ever read.,Pavulox,e9f4uwd,conservative
[removed],,e9fazug,conservative
"The accusations are that election officials are adding fake ballots, removing ballots that voted for GOP members, or some combination of those two. 

How does a voter ID law affect that in any way?",cetamega,e9fl9cj,conservative
"Because I don’t want people voting whose only motivation to vote is to avoid a fine. I’d rather those people stay home. They’re not going to put serious thought into the candidates or issues. They’re going to be low information voters who make bad choices. I want everyone to have the opportunity to vote, heck I do want everyone to vote, but I don’t want anyone compelled to vote.
",jordanmc,e9f0sep,conservative
"> Aren't you willing to introduce it to improve the representativeness of your democracy? 

Effective democracy also relies on educated decisions. Someone that can't be bothered to vote unless you force them certainly isn't going to bother to do research on candidates or their positions, so I'd rather they just stay home.",nmj95123,e9f8vec,conservative
Reducing how informed voters are on average by using the state to compel an activity doesn't sound great.         ,tau_decay,e9f1f6n,conservative
More turnout doesnt equal better representatives. ,fluffyfluffyheadd,e9f3uz0,conservative
"Oh you mean like canada? Where you can be fined or worse in certain places for not calling a tranny Xer? Yup that's super free. Or maybe the UK where you can land yourself in prison for ""contempt of court"" while trying to report on islamic gang rapists but also you can't send memes or carry a knife? Man you are right they have so much more liberty. Or Australia, where the government forced the citizens to surrender their firearms and it had no real effect other that removing the ability of people to defend themselves. No wait you must mean some of the places in Central and South America where people are choosing to march thousands of miles to esvape the SHITHOLE countries they live in. Or do you mean Scandinavian countries where their small populations are almost entirely ethnically homogeneousand pay astronomical taxes and implement semi socialist policies that could only work in a country that small and undiverse. Please please remind me which countr6 out there is objectively more free than the US",The_Mighty_Rex,e9fcyie,conservative
[removed],,e9f5kmc,conservative
"Yes, a single limited review by a news organization doesn't show it's pervasive, so we definitely shouldn't verify people's identity prior to voting. I mean, that would mean liberals might have to figure out how to get an ID, and god knows that's way too confusing for them.",nmj95123,e9fbkee,conservative
"Well, i was hoping they would have a much harder time with fake ballots if they needed an ID but you make a good point. ",SeanRamey,e9fndob,conservative
"How do you define ""low information voters""? Because if you start discouraging voters depending on their knowledge it could be quite dangerous.",RogueDice,e9g6395,conservative
"Compulsory voting has been shown to increase voting awareness as people see it as more of a responsibility to vote knowing that they will have to, if they didn't have to vote they wouldn't care at all and the apathy would increase.",RogueDice,e9g5ycc,conservative
"Fundamentally if you're talking about the health of your democracy - a country with less divisiveness and political polarisation - you should introduce compulsory voting because it could reintroduce some actual compromise into your politics.

Compulsory voting has the effect that both sides know that their base is going to show up to the vote, meaning that they are both competing for the moderates. This inevitably will lead to a slight reversion to the centre for both sides.",RogueDice,e9g68zl,conservative
">Or Australia, where the government forced the citizens to surrender their firearms and it had no real effect other that removing the ability of people to defend themselves

Australia hasn't had a single mass shooting since the Port Arthur massacre in 1996. Murders using firearms are way down. Suicides using firearms are way down. They had around 1 or 2 a year every year prior to that. Don't you consider that a success?",RogueDice,e9g5nzk,conservative
"Back to the issue at hand, I believe people's votes should be counted, but right now aren't they violating Florida law requiring that all vote-by-mail and absentee ballots be accounted for within 30 minutes of the polls closing, and the state constitution and the states public records act by not allowing officials to observe what's happening in Broward and Palm Beach?

All this by counties and election supervisors with a history of questionable actions during elections.

If you and others believe the state law and constitution are hindering what you would believe is fair, then sure, the laws and constitution can be changed in the legislature and by vote.  I think the way these 2 counties operate should be updated to a proper standard, but they continue to not do that. ",Pavulox,e9f6nno,conservative
I don’t want anyone discouraged. I don’t want people compelled who otherwise wouldn’t care.,jordanmc,e9g971u,conservative
"> Compulsory voting has been shown to increase voting awareness

Does ""awareness"" equate to an educated voter making informed decisions?

> if they didn't have to vote they wouldn't care at all and the apathy would increase

..And? If you're too lazy to go to the polls, why should I care whether you vote or not?",nmj95123,e9g6vaq,conservative
"America isn't a democracy first of all. Secondly, it's just fundamentally unamerican to force people to vote. That's the opposite of freedom. Our ancestors left Europe to come here and be left alone.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e9iyh40,conservative
"Mass shootings, and violent crime as a whole are also way down in the US over the past 30 years. Gun ownership is also way up. Everything is just politicised and spread via social media now.",fluffyfluffyheadd,e9iyaxh,conservative
[removed],,e9faxk0,conservative
">Educated voter making informed decisions.

How do you define educated voter? Because I assume that I have beliefs that you think are misinformed and you have beliefs that I think are misinformed. ",RogueDice,e9g92dn,conservative
"Still much higher relative to other countries. Depends if you think a lot of innocent people dying is worth you being able to own an assault rifle (""assault rifle"" not ""defence rifle""). Those are weapons of war and shouldn't be available to everyone.",RogueDice,e9iyg1k,conservative
"You can act like it's voter suppression and like you advocate for a democratic process when right now one party is actively breaking law and subverting the democratic process, that's fine and pretty much expected, but it's against the law.

Election laws should be updated, and creating a system with proper voter identification would benefit us all greatly.  It's obvious there is an issue. ",Pavulox,e9fbjnv,conservative
"> How do you define educated voter?

Someone that's done actual research in to the candidates and measures they're voting for and has a basic understanding of how government works, as opposed to... [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=26-c4lZLPZc).

> Because I assume that I have beliefs that you think are misinformed and you have beliefs that I think are misinformed.

There's a difference between disagreeing on policy and being uneducated. If you can intelligently  discuss the positions of candidates and why you support one person's policies over another, you should vote. If all you can do is parrot what you've seen on political ads, I'd rather you not vote.",nmj95123,e9g9nbp,conservative
[removed],,e9fci8p,conservative
"Well in that case you’d be stopping a large proportion of the US population from voting.

Would denying climate change also be disqualifying in your opinion? Since you could argue that it is an uninformed opinion. ",RogueDice,e9ga7s7,conservative
"Putting the voter suppression red herring fallacy aside, currently in Broward and Palm Beach, the Florida state constitution is being violated, and Florida election law is being broken.  Please try to stay in topic, and focus on the fact that laws are being broken.  Whether you agree with laws or not is not a pretense to follow them. ",Pavulox,e9fczht,conservative
"> Well in that case you’d be stopping a large proportion of the US population from voting.

And?

> Would denying climate change also be disqualifying in your opinion? Since you could argue that it is an uninformed opinion.

Again... It's about knowing how basic government works and what being able to discuss the policies a candidate represents, not declaring a voter uninformed because they world view differs from your own.",nmj95123,e9gak9k,conservative
[removed],,e9fedyi,conservative
"Don’t you think they’d be a democratic deficit if the majority of the population doesn’t vote? At what point would the US cease to be a democracy if it no longer represents the people. 

If such a large amount of people lack a basic understanding of the civics of the US should your priority be to increase knowledge of it? Since it doesn’t seem to have increased in the last 50 years, maybe forcing people to undertake their democratic responsibility might encourage them to do the research themselves and advocate for policies which may benefit them and the country as a whole. ",RogueDice,e9gaurt,conservative
"A court did decide the Florida constitution is being violated and public record laws are being violated, yet the Broward County and Palm Beach election supervisors are actively defying the court.

And to acknowledge yet another distraction from the discussion, if he is indicted, then he is indicted.  I doubt that will happen, but yes, let the courts decide. ",Pavulox,e9ff1eh,conservative
"> Don’t you think they’d be a democratic deficit if the majority of the population doesn’t vote? 

If the majority of the population doesn't vote because they can't be bothered to educate themselves and drag themselves to the polls, good riddance. 

> If such a large amount of people lack a basic understanding of the civics of the US should your priority be to increase knowledge of it? 

Civics is a part of every public school curriculum I'm aware of. You can lead a horse to water, but you can't make them drink.

> maybe forcing people to undertake their democratic responsibility might encourage them to do the research themselves and advocate for policies which may benefit them and the country as a whole.

Maybe hell will freeze over.",nmj95123,e9gb4e5,conservative
"Hasn’t frozen over in Australia. 

Whatever, I’m glad that our discussion has been civil, but I feel like we’re not getting anywhere. 

Have a good day man!",RogueDice,e9gbec4,conservative
"Whose going to over see this?
",the-divine-comedy,e9fs9e1,conservative
"Literally anyone can join proud boys, they just oppose the lefts narrative and act like a bunch of guys would making fun of each other, drinking and fighting. ",a93818,e9gyn71,conservative
"Antifa shows up and beats on anyone to the right of Stalin.

&#x200B;

Proud Boys shows up and beats on Antifa. 

&#x200B;

Most people have mixed feelings about them -- opposing Antifa is great, but sometimes it seems like there's this group of people spoiling for a fight and antifa-vs-proud-boys gives them an excuse to scrap. ",wharris2001,e9h1ud0,conservative
They oppose Antifa in Washington state. They are also not afraid to get physical with them apparently and according to youtube.,cons_NC,e9gxi2g,conservative
Antifa counter protestors that are to the center right/center ,JMB_was_a_god,e9gzde4,conservative
"From what I understand, they're simply a group who show up to counter-protest Antifa and such. ",GuitarWizard90,e9gwx52,conservative
"They're not ""looking for a fight"", they're just the only ones to punch back. ",JimJones4Ever,e9h1xpa,conservative
I really have no idea.  They're not a Conservative group.,StraightNewt,e9gxci3,conservative
"They show up and only respond to any violence. I believe they're general idea is they wont start the fight but they'll end it.

From what I've seen, it's a lot of middle class workers and vets tired of antifa groups and the lack of action.",gab907,e9gxgpi,conservative
"Let antifa make asses of themselves. They are a walking advertisement for Trump. He couldn't buy that kind of publicity. 

Getting into the streets to fight them doesn't help.",SickofInternetProgs,e9heu95,conservative
They are more conservative then Antifa.  ,ozric101,e9h0oio,conservative
"[Just a lost a seat in WA to this bullshit](https://www.reddit.com/r/The_Donald/comments/9vs341/election_rigging_in_wa_election_night_count_went/)

Anyone wonder why in all these tight races, all the ""late ballots"" tend to always favor the Dem?  Like what a damn coincidence.  Everytime it's the other way around (Dem slightly ahead), it literally never happens.  I'm actually scared that our democracy is at risk, with all the shenanigans in Florida, AZ, (Montana), and all these House races.",SwimmingJunky,e9eosas,conservative
This country does not have fair and transparent elections. This past week has more than proven that.,Cr0nq,e9facky,conservative
We don’t have legitimate elections anymore. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9fdv4z,conservative
"Of course they are.

I worked for Mimi Walters back in the day. Wonderful lady but vehemently hated. They will do all they can to kick her out. CA-45 used to be solidly red but Orange County in general is shifting purple.",neemarita,e9fuqw0,conservative
"This is probably going to get downvoted, but I'd like to put in my two cents as a CA-45 voter.

&#x200B;

[https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#vote-by-mail](https://www.sos.ca.gov/elections/voter-registration/vote-mail/#vote-by-mail)

CA rules: you are allowed to mail your ballot the day of the election, and it will be counted as long as it arrives within three days.

In OC, the Republican camp is made of older folks and suburban businesspeople. They either have the time to vote in person or are more timely in mailing their ballots. Therefore Mimi Walters took the early lead. Democrat-leaning voters (e.g. college students, working class) tend to cut it close. The CA mail-in vote democrat-bonus is not a coincidence, but also not a conspiracy.

Background info, Mimi used to have a solid red seat (she won by 17% in 2016). The fact that she was *barely* leading by \~2% this year was a warning bell. I also know lots of OC republicans were pissy because she voted yes on a bill that ended up raising taxes (Rohrabacher voted no the same one so it wasn't entirely a party line thing).

&#x200B;

I genuinely don't think Mimi's getting anything stolen from her. However, I do agree that what's going down in FL is bullshit. If you're going to worry about democracy, spend your energy on blatant ""misplacing votes"" crap and not the slow vote count of CA, which always happens.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;

Full disclosure: I'm probably a liberal compared to you guys, though I think of myself as more ""conservative on some stuff, liberal on others"". I try to vote by policy not party. I fully admit that I prefer HW Bush to Trump. I checked out r/Libertarian and I think I fit in with them best.

I understand if you think I'm completely misguided or crazy, but at the same time I hope the extra perspective from an outsider helps.",boomvroomshroom,e9etyoa,conservative
So any loss of your candidate is voter fraud? There is no evidence in that post just vote totals. You're clearly not critically thinking.,howcaniuseallthisroo,e9f6f2v,conservative
"It’s completely insane. The Founders rebelled over less than this. The Dems are going to keep pushing until decent, peaceful people feel like they’re forced to push back in large numbers. At least we’re seeing demonstrations against it in Broward beginning. ",YankeeBlues21,e9eqa7c,conservative
Thank you for an unbiased perspective on this. I think there is a lot of jumping to conclusions going on in this sub in the aftermath of the midterms so it is hard to distinguish between perception and reality.,Kemaro,e9f6fd6,conservative
"I tend to agree with you. It sucks that these votes are all favoring Democrats, and some fraud could certainly be happening. But the fact that the late rallies favor Democrats is not proof of the latter, and shouldn't surprise anyone. More urban districts are democratic, and tend to take longer to count. Much of this could be done better, but sometimes government is inefficient and/or incompetent.",pharmermummles,e9f4uxv,conservative
"But still: why do we never see these ""late ballots"" if the Democrat wins?",ExpensiveMention,e9f9vjf,conservative
Because Republicans are responsible adults that vote early and/or on time.,Kemaro,e9fcnn3,conservative
"""one way to improve X part of government. find a way to put more democrats in.""",SKWM3000,e9ikx5v,conservative
" >This could help foster bipartisanship and compromise, as members of different parties would need to work together on behalf of their district’s voters.

This says it all. The founding fathers incorporated gridlock by design. We have enough laws being passed now as it is. We don’t need people working together, churning out law after law, instilling more and more tyranny at a faster rate than what we currently have. ",mikeygio,e9ik5w8,conservative
"The article addresses this. Yeah, right now structural factors in the house benefit Republicans relative to their vote share. But this wasn't always the case, and probably won't be the case forever. If a system is under-representing a political party you don't like, is that a reason to allow the under-representation to continue? ",GrabsackTurnankoff,e9im12f,conservative
"The founding fathers also didn't intend the strong two-party system we have today. They thought the system they had designed would restrain the growth of party spirit, but that didn't work out too well. I'd trade multi-member districts in the House for a repeal of the 17th Amendment for the Senate.",PubliusVA,e9itxex,conservative
"What's the underlying logic here? Are biased political institutions ok, so long as it means gridlock? Would you be ok with the electoral college permanently favoring democrats, if the house favored republicans? That would certainly decrease the legislative output of congress...",GrabsackTurnankoff,e9imas7,conservative
">the 17th Amendment for the Senate.

Thanks for bringing that up. This was a move that was made out of pure disdain for the Constitution and its limits on power. It should be repealed unconditionally. ",mikeygio,e9iunpo,conservative
"Conceptually, I don't really get the ""repeal the 17th"" stance. Selection of senators by state legislators was a notoriously corrupt process. Why should the people be so far removed from their representation in a chamber of congress that has roughly as much power as the House?",GrabsackTurnankoff,e9j2mey,conservative
">Are biased political institutions ok, so long as it means gridlock? 

Yes",mikeygio,e9imn82,conservative
">Why should the people be so far removed from their representation in a chamber of congress that has roughly as much power as the House?

Because it isn't *supposed* to be *their* representation. The House is their representation. The Senate is supposed to represent the states. This confusion of the purposes of the two houses of Congress has thrown the whole federal system created by Congress out of whack.",PubliusVA,e9j959t,conservative
"To what extent? Isn't this contrary to most democratic principles? If a majority of people want change, should that change not happen, merely because it's a change?

On a different note, I'd like to point out that the house isn't biased against change -- it's biased against Democrats. This means bias against passing legislation when Democrats are in power in the other two branches, but a bias *towards* passing legislation when Republicans control the other two branches.",GrabsackTurnankoff,e9inntx,conservative
">If a majority of people want change, should that change not happen, merely because it's a change?

No. The gridlock was built-in to prevent EXACTLY this. The current system protects the minority. They didn’t want some populist uprising forcing the issue-of-the-day down the throats of the people without a check. 

And if you think Trump, who some would argue is a populist, is forcing his agenda down the throats of the people with control of all government branches, I would say that’s incorrect. Sure he’s gotten a lot done, but nowhere near what he could have gotten done if we had a different system. ",mikeygio,e9ioq3u,conservative
"So how do you construct a system that always disproportionately favors the gridlock? Again, the current US Federal Government doesn't do that, at least not through house redistricting.

More importantly, doesn't the constitution guard against quick change in other ways? The constitution is remarkably hard to amend, and a president's veto is remarkably hard to overcome. Yet gerrymandering is an entirely different issue. It was never foreseen or addressed by the founding fathers (at least not that I'm aware of) and its rapid acceleration is a very modern phenomenon.

I guess what I'm trying to say is that changing the way representatives are chosen doesn't necessarily lead to more legislation being passed and the current system doesn't really lead to less legislation being passed. But fairness in institutions is important. If Wyoming democrats and Rhode Island republicans have no voice in one branch of government, what's the point, from their view, of representative government in the first place? ",GrabsackTurnankoff,e9ipqjh,conservative
">If Wyoming democrats and Rhode Island republicans have no voice in one branch of government, what's the point, from their view, of representative government in the first place?

Get your message across in a manner that’s more appealing to that specific region. I live in NJ. Though we got obliterated in the mid-terms, we just had a 2-term Republican Governor and a good portion of the congressional delegation. 

It’s not impossible. Implement voter ID and see where both parties stand after about 6 years. 

Upending the entire system because a particular party’s message doesn’t resonate across vast swaths of the country reeks of sour grapes. This piece in the NYT would have never been published if Democrats were in power. Democrats are the only ones who kick and scream about the “fairness” of the Constitution’s original construct when their popular majority doesn’t get their way. ",mikeygio,e9iu76r,conservative
"I don't think the point is so much about a specific party in a specific place, it's more about how winner-take-all elections with First Past the Post tend to essentially disenfranchise people who don't hold views in line with the 2 major parties. Libertarians are a kind of famous example of this: the libertarian party currently holds 0 congressional seats. Do you really think 0% of Americans hold views in line with the libertarian party platform? The fact that Gary Johnson received over 3% of the vote in a presidential contest just two years ago should signal that that's not the case.

There will always be a minority with no voice under single-member FPTP districts. That's precisely the problem. You shouldn't have to be the first choice of an absolute majority of a district in order to have any representation whatsoever.

I'd also like to point out that the ""constitution's original construct"" doesn't really apply here. The constitution says little about how precisely representatives are to be chosen, and multi-member districts were very common in the early US.",GrabsackTurnankoff,e9j2gxk,conservative
">I'd also like to point out that the ""constitution's original construct"" doesn't really apply here. The constitution says little about how precisely representatives are to be chosen, and multi-member districts were very common in the early US.

The Democrat Party is only interested in the founding when it benefits them. Otherwise, the founding “doesn’t apply to 2018”, or “our founding fathers never could have foreseen ‘X’”

>That's precisely the problem. You shouldn't have to be the first choice of an absolute majority of a district in order to have any representation whatsoever.

You do have equal and fair representation. It’s called the United States Senate. The concept of the House is inherently UNFAIR. It’s based on population. Delaware does not have the same influence as Texas, nor should it. This concept of “fairness” was addressed at the Constitutional Convention. 


",mikeygio,e9jojvo,conservative
"Jim we are leaving. Come on Jim, we are done. LOL.",Kemaro,e9dkgtp,conservative
"Jim shouting during the North Korea meeting, they should have gotten rid of him then.",Herschey,e9dm8xa,conservative
That shhhhh is hilarious!,justhere2havefun,e9ddq1r,conservative
Stunned it's only 6 minutes long.,FelixFuckfurter,e9dh3wm,conservative
"This guy isn't a journalist, he's an activist with a press pass. He's literally creating the news, not reporting it.",mordrom,e9dpz2d,conservative
Can we cross post this to r/politcs. 90% of that sub right now is people complaining about Acosta getting booted.,Zeppelin415,e9dsgvg,conservative
"Man, this shit is infuriating to watch. I can't believe he didn't get the boot months ago.",allsystemscrash,e9dh2p0,conservative
What a sleazy person ,Dmfconrad,e9dgfbj,conservative
Calling him a journalist is a fucking joke. I would be irate if I were there trying to actually do my job as a white house correspondent and he behaved like that. ,Finfan90,e9domgv,conservative
"He's basically a troll, and CNN is doing this purposefully. Acosta constantly acts like a retard and then whines when he's shut off. It's pathetic. CNN is pathetic.",turvassa,e9dxyxf,conservative
Jim is 5. ,tangohunter8071,e9dgat8,conservative
Kim even wanted to strap Jim to a rocket and see if it could reach Japan. ,QuinticusS,e9dgtvz,conservative
Remember when they were all fairly polite and Helen Thomas was as bad as it got?,aboardthegravyboat,e9djx9e,conservative
"He's a Narcissist isn't he?  I fear even more so than Trump.

The difference is that Trump was chosen by the people to do more of what he's been doing.  What are Jim's votes?  CNN's viewership?

&#x200B;",markcocjin,e9dlrzs,conservative
"I wanna know what Trumps actually doing when he slowly walks to the side. Jim gets right the fuck in his place when he does that.

&#x200B;

If that's like the first warning, then Trump should have done that once. Just once. He did it twice, or more. Should of done whatever strike 2 is. Just seems odd to me. Trump's a tough guy then he just lets Acosta act like a child...

&#x200B;

At least Acosta will hopefully lose his stupid ass job and CNN will continue to plummet in ratings.",Swarlos8888,e9dkxyz,conservative
"Jim Acosta is the most uncivilized ""journalist"" I've ever seen. I don't care what organization you work for or what party the president sides with, you are talking to the president of the United States and the position deserves respect. If someone was to act in this manner to the previous presidents then they would have their passes revoked too (probably even faster than his was).

It's disgusting that anyone would consider this childish behavior acceptable.",PHNX_xRapTor,e9dzz6s,conservative
"Wow, I knew Acosta was hated but didn't realize he was this much of a twat. Well-deserved. Watching him get BTFO by Trump and his administration is so fucking hilarious.",UniversalFist,e9dzxc1,conservative
Lol Trump actually deserves quite a bit of credit for not losing his shit on this guy,Nawchill,e9e2010,conservative
"Disgusting fellow. I'm willing to overlook Trump's tantrums and tweets since he actually implements decent conservative policy and moves America forward, but nothing vindicates the childishness and arrogance of Jim Acosta. Nothing.

Trump is right: Acosta is a rude, terrible person, and he deserved to have his press pass revoked. If you want to enter the White House, show some respect for the President of the United States. I would say this even for Barack Obama and other liberal presidents I disagree with -- if you can't show basic respect to the President, stay out of the press briefings.",asphaltcement123,e9dspvd,conservative
"Him arguing with trump lol what a couple of morons, neither of them have a clue how to act towards those they dislike. ",BoXLegend,e9g4o8y,conservative
"I'm amused.  Acosta is obnoxious and partisan.  I'd be happy to not have him interrupting coverage of the POTUS or hearing him at all.  

&#x200B;",Ted-the-Pirate,e9e7rog,conservative
"You know I certainly don't agree with his posturing, but I am happy that at least the press and the White House are at odds. The press is responsible to continue to critique what the White House is doing and provide some public accountability. The press was really doing the nation of the service when they were so cozy with White House previously.",clay830,e9dkc2h,conservative
"Jim Acosta is rude and its good hes being punished but the nartative that ""he laid hands"" on the girl is bullshit. ",RenegadeEagle,e9e31l1,conservative
I'm Jim Acosta! Look at me! I can stand on my hands and clap my feet and wiggle my ears look at me! I'm Jim Acosta!,LumpyWumpus,e9eaxyp,conservative
I wonder what other reporters think about him. Id love to hear some honest answers from other WH press. ,mikelarue1,e9ebprv,conservative
He doesn’t shut the fuck up ,Tilt23Degrees,e9dqf5l,conservative
I was on the left’s side on this one until I saw this video. He actually behaves like a child,SaltyBigBoi,e9dzk0c,conservative
What a loud little bitchwimp.,TheComedianGLP,e9nrnl9,conservative
"What a dick! I was so fuming at the level of self importance. Sorry America, you deserve better, than what CNN has to offer. ",mab2t,e9dobfl,conservative
"""Jim, let's go Jim, Jim, come on Jim"" and he's like ""but mommy 5 more minutes""",The-Swat-team,e9ehc23,conservative
"I still don't understand how leftards think trump is in the wrong in these situations. I understand they may not like his tweets (shame) or his policies, but Acosta is behaving so disrespectfully here that Trump has to call him out as rude. One journalist should not be able to hijack the whole session. As a teacher, I can say any behaviour like Acosta's in my class would certainly warrant an after school detention and a phone call to mummy and daddy. ",SuperiorThor90,e9e8df7,conservative
"He doesn't want the news, he wants to be the news",Tantalus4200,e9du7yc,conservative
"Another doctored video I see!  Look its cut together of multiple videos, its rendered down from the original resolution, its not the full source,  and its most likely missing a frame or 2, and if you change it to a 15 fps gif, it will even be more doctored! /s


",IronWolve,e9dzdqp,conservative
Fuck this guy ,NightFreak87,e9eafz4,conservative
Quite possibly the best thing I have seen all week.,lalo1313,e9elfa3,conservative
Acosta is a total piece of shit.  He greatly contributes to the leftest disruptive agenda. ,squirreltoot,e9dv6eg,conservative
other journalists don't like this fucking guy. I wish they'd say so. I wish they'd point out that he was a complete knob these past couple years,greatatdrinking,e9dzd37,conservative
attention whore unfortunately got what he wanted,shytorturer,e9e3e7h,conservative
"Jeez, just shut the fuck up jim holy shit. Learn when enough is enough.

Edit; 4:10 lol damn that was satisfying to listen to",INTP36,e9e3w3w,conservative
"What a fucking dick.

Also, Wolf's face doesn't change AT ALL day to day. I wonder if he practices that stone cold face in the mirror.",ryph,e9e75hk,conservative
I wish folks at r/moderatepolitics would watch this,LazyGoron,e9e8nft,conservative
He cries like a baby lol,StruggleSnug69,e9dojl9,conservative
"Wow. I can't fathom being in the white house with the president and acting like a 2 year old. How embarrassing.

Heck, who treats anyone like that? Good lord Jim. ",VeganMcVeganface,e9e4enr,conservative
Some of these don't even look doctored!,Disposable_disaster,e9e3wcz,conservative
"""BuT trUmP iS taKInG hIs 1sT AmeNdMenT rIgHTs aWaY omG""

..a lot of people who like acosta do not realize that he lost his *privilige* to attend these events. Nobody has a right to be there for those, especially when they are as disruptive as Acosta.

Trump is not taking his 1st amendment rights. This is not fascist. A fascist would have Acosta silenced and removed from society.",Griffb4ll,e9fj0bo,conservative
Can someone explain the Siberia pun to me? I think I didn’t get it.,xsladex,e9fnqre,conservative
"this is why he lost his press pass.  He should've been gone a loong time ago.

&#x200B;",castlein09,e9nd7mv,conservative
"I wish sarah would just say ""Jim Shut the hell up. stop acting like a baby""",castlein09,e9ndavz,conservative
"Seeing that CNN issued a lawsuit today, this would be used as evidence that he has a history of being disruptive and lacking decorum. He is clearly rude and even in Brady Press Room, there was a collective eye roll when he spoke.",zuul99,e9o3cy0,conservative
"Is this how we excuse the President of the United States faking video as a pretense to strip rights away from a citizen? ""We don't like the questions he asked so it's okay""?  


Yeah first of all, answer the questions, they're legit. Second of all, even if they weren't, you don't get to release obvious fake video.",it_mf_a,e9ept1b,conservative
"Poor Donald can't handle any real questions now can he, what a disgrace.",St3vojt,e9ee4yt,conservative
"You know, I watched this knowing it would piss me off, and it did. I should've just moved on. The guy is slime and he should not be given back any privileges. Maybe that will teach him something. Now I'm moving on and I never want to hear anything about this self righteous slime ever again.",Qualiafreak,e9eai7m,conservative
Jim is a heckler and it's high time that he loses his ability to cover the Whitehouse.  CNN needs to become a legitimate news organization again.,Neanderthalbastard,e9dv0as,conservative
Unprofessional and unhinged. He’s mentally unstable and has no place in a civilized room. ,MissKatieMae15,e9ea5t6,conservative
"I hope he's never allowed back into the White House, and I can't think of one good reason that he would be allowed back. He made a fatal error in strong arming that female intern right in front of everyone. That's it. You're done here. Forever. Goodbye. ",nhlroyalty,e9etw5h,conservative
Thank you so much for this.,Natanyul,e9e9sd5,conservative
This was beautiful. ,xavier_a,e9ea5oa,conservative
This guy thinks he's some sort of hero of the people. Funny how they'll talk trash about Trump all day but when he turns it around on them suddenly it's not kosher.,donttreadonmytendies,e9eigg8,conservative
"He's an activist. Just because your job title is ""journalist"" doesn't mean you get free reign over press conferences. ",NeonSignsRain,e9eigmp,conservative
Should have included the North Korean debacle.  Otherwise it’s awesome! ,savtaytex,e9eoi8z,conservative
He's a paid protestor. Not a journalist. ,not_me_but_still,e9erk23,conservative
What an ass. I’m surprised it took him this long to get his credentials yanked. ,AgentSkidMarks,e9esphi,conservative
"This guy really doesn't get it. Grow up, report neutrally and he'll be more respected than any other journalist. But noo, he wants to join other journalists in the street to protest not being allowed to be rude, childish dumbasses.",Escenze,e9exarp,conservative
"Speak out of turn, get ejected from the room. That's how it would be",QuarterNip,e9f6yaj,conservative
What a loser. Good riddance Jimbo.,PigsAndCats,e9ew3pc,conservative
Downloadable link?,ExpensiveMention,e9dua2m,conservative
Kim Jong-un looks [over.](https://youtu.be/JMw1GmJzF6A),Cheapys_Pizza,e9dwhmd,conservative
Jim chan just wants to be noticed by senpai Trump. ,JAK4189,e9ewm0i,conservative
"But, that's not why they got rid of him, right? ",randomsubguy,e9f1wbj,conservative
PAY ATTENTION TO ME,Mungus_Plop,e9f8t6w,conservative
"Oh my fucking god, that last clip where Trump steps out from behind the podium and Acosta just sits down. Ho Lee shit",heck_you_science,e9feyti,conservative
"JIIIM come on, this was the best. Like a mother talking to her child...",soywars,e9dnqz4,conservative
For someone so awfully concerned about his colleagues he interrupts them a lot.,doggo_to_the_rescue,e9e6dfm,conservative
"I didn't realize it then but yesterday I learned he used a megaphone or something to amp his voice, what a total dbag. ",HeavensNight,e9e5fyk,conservative
They didn't show the part when he was screaming to Trump and Kim Jung Un about Otto Warmbier. \~cringe\~ Doesn't take much to piss off the Korean president. Acosta is missing some vital brain cells. ,Dada2fish,e9e7zj4,conservative
He is literally the most scumbag new personality/journalist in America by tenfold right now. And this is even considering Rachel Maddow is currently here too.,OKResident93,e9echcp,conservative
Trump shouts all the time dumb fuck ,SpOnGeBoBnO,e9jh6e2,conservative
"I couldn’t stop laughing. Can someone post this r/politicalhumor ? I know it probably won’t actually get a lot of upvotes, but they keep saying they tolerate anything politically funny even, even if it is right leaning. So I wanted to put it to the test.",AlterAlias1,e9dw3j1,conservative
I laughed so hard at Stephen Miller ruining his shit.,FelixFuckfurter,e9dhkvt,conservative
This guy is a child in a grown mans body,TerribleC0mment,e9dod93,conservative
I was thinking the same thing 😂😂,littlebit90_,e9dfgy3,conservative
[It pretty much sums him up](https://imgur.com/a/KeBQ77a),lion27,e9ebjv9,conservative
Wouldn't be if you had to deal with him. I (most)  would lose my patience quickly with that arrogant ass. ,painterbrw,e9dowfw,conservative
My favorite part too.,8K12,e9dnylz,conservative
"The exact type of person why Trump called ""Journalists"" like him ""Enemy of the people"".",SimonJ57,e9e3z74,conservative
"You can be an activist and a journalist. I'd rather that Amy Goodman have a WH press pass than Acosta. He's just trying to stir the pot and draw attention to his ""brand"" more than anything.",senatorpjt,e9e7dr1,conservative
"He sounds more like paparazzi. Talking over his peers in the press but some of his peers give him a pass because he is asking the ""tough questions.""

He gets a chance to ask his question but feels like he gets to ask endless follow-up questions? Also asking questions at inappropriate times.",j0sephl,e9eoj7t,conservative
I actually found out about this sub from people complaining that r/conservative was insane to not defend him,mcbobboreddit,e9e4hrw,conservative
Not surprising a majority of reddit is not American and young.,NotThePwner,e9emnz6,conservative
"Gonna crosspost it right now. Wish me luck!

Edit: Nevermind. They don't allow video crossposts. The fuck kind of rule is that?",gavinbear,e9enz1a,conservative
I knew he was a narcissistic tool but you’re right just watching it made my skin crawl.,mikebets,e9fq54a,conservative
Yep. Piece of trash. ,Rednick19,e9donkc,conservative
"I have 0 issue with the press holding the president accountable and even ""acting up"" if it means answers. The issue is that when it's a Democrat they are too busy on their knees blowing vs asking tough questions.

If Trump does something stupid every reporter should be demanding answers, but when Obama was fucking up the press was his apology wing.",-deteled-,e9enle9,conservative
"Dan Rather made his bones being the a-hole in the press pool. It's nothing new.

https://www.history.com/news/presidents-relationship-with-press",ngoni,e9emdhw,conservative
"I completely believe that his role with cnn is to be an antagonist.

Look at the clip (around 3:00) where he keeps going on with SHS... spot the difference with him and the other reporters? 

",rcharliesam,e9dp1et,conservative
"Narcissist? Jim “look at me, I’m Jim Acosta” Acosta? Never!",skarface6,e9dpebp,conservative
CNN doesn’t have viewers other than people stuck at airports ,treebeard72,e9f5v8f,conservative
Lose his job? CNN is happy that he got his pass revoked. He and CNN can now go on a crying campaign calling Trump a tyrant. The sheep will love it. ,diagramoftruth,e9dmn5c,conservative
I think it’s more to gain composure and not tell  Costa to fuck off and kick him out forcefully as I bet anyone would have done. Costa acting like a fucking child and speaking over his peers like he thinks he is better than them. ,garcicus,e9dqwu4,conservative
"He should have stepped to the side and waited for him to hand over the mic, casually looking at his watch.",mcbobboreddit,e9e4dnq,conservative
"Trump let him continue to act like a child so everybody would see his ridiculous behavior. He let the man get the rope, tie the noose and pull the damn lever all on his own. Conveniently, Acosta decided to assault a white house intern which was the perfect opportunity to throw him the fuck out, and right after the midterms as well, so no backlash. Beautiful fucking timing if you ask me.

&#x200B;

Also, I bet Jim thought Trump was going to get up in his face. First thing that went through my mind when he stepped to the side. That would be the absolute last thing Acosta would want to happen. ",Krieger117,e9enb7o,conservative
"I really liked what Huckabee said last night ""Jim, if you want to set policy in this country, get off your butt, get on the ballot and start winning elections!""",mcbobboreddit,e9e4fzt,conservative
"Scott Adams made the point today on his podcast that Jim is trying to enter into the 'theatre' realm of politics that Trump has somewhat created and currently rules over. I'm fairly sympathetic to that assessment, I would bet my life that CNN bigwigs have told Acosta to try and goad Trump into losing his temper, and Jim is certainly game for it. Everyone I've heard speak of his booting from the WH assumes for some reason its just because of this latest episode, but as we see here, he's been an asshole for some time. ",BigVeinyThrobber,e9e5dl5,conservative
This!! The POTUS as a position in the government should hold more respect than the man currently holding said position. Show some freaking respect for your country!!!,HalfBakedPotato27,e9e23ly,conservative
"I agree to a point... they are responsible for encouraging accountability, but they also have a responsibility to cover the news and not focus too much on their opinions and their ""homeboys"".",Mewster1818,e9dlhur,conservative
"If the press equally applied this level of scrutiny to Republicans **and** Democrats I'd be a happy man.  
  
",diehardgiraffe,e9e0fna,conservative
It’s nothing to be happy about when they only fulfill their responsibility to critique and provide public accountability when a Republican is in office.,hello_japan,e9drnp7,conservative
"Yeah, I have zero issue with people asking hard questions. But there needs to be some level of decorum for how you act at these White House press conferences. These are suppose to be professional people, yet if any normal person acted this way in a meeting you'd be fired in a heartbeat.

I'm personally sick of the press acting like children and hiding behind the laurels that prior news generations worked hard to establish. They have no standards themselves today, but when that gets pointed out all of a sudden it's ""The press is a noble institution! An institution, I say! How dare you criticize this institution!""
",synn89,e9ds2eu,conservative
"To be fair, that *does* sound damn impressive. ",PM_ME_YOUR_SPICIEST,e9enw1d,conservative
He has diarrhea of the mouth. ,zer0fuksg1v3n,e9exu4b,conservative
He is a Westworld reject. ,DJBell1986,e9ewho5,conservative
He doesn’t have a right to a press pass. Since I’m a citizen do I have a right to walk through the front doors of the White House and take a dump in the Oval Office?,JAK4189,e9ewpx7,conservative
I don’t know why this would piss you off. It’s fecking hilarious.,JAK4189,e9ewrya,conservative
"Here's the original video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=b4qGtEiEh4A

There are many tools out there to download videos, but I've been using this [site](https://www.tubeninja.net/) lately when I need to archive.
",MooMooCudChew,e9eh17v,conservative
"I still think we need to ban v.reddit

It memory holes so many great videos since its impossible to download them.

We need to be able to share these things and v.reddit is designed to prevent that",ExpensiveMention,e9f9r43,conservative
"Shut the fuck up, how the hell did he bring that in LMAO

I didn’t know he could shove anything up that tight ass",Prince_P,e9eplw4,conservative
Is Kim Jong Un really technically a president?,Natanyul,e9e9xwz,conservative
"They should have added that. You can even hear a reporter next to him telling him to be quiet. Yet, he continued to shout.",Herschey,e9egtxm,conservative
Suck more dick you Democrat queen.,TheComedianGLP,e9nrswd,conservative
"Be his opinions what they may, how is being an activist something bad, even worse, being an ""enemy of the people""?",DB-3,e9eumn2,conservative
And have never seen Acosta at a press conference.,johnsonman1,e9et5zq,conservative
"You just have to realize that most of those people with press passes are from democrat owned news organizations.

And you still get people here on reddit blaming fox for ""fake news"" while ignoring that almost all the the news and media they consume is owned by democrats.

The media IS the DNC.

It's like monopoly they bought out all the railroads but instead of railroads it's media companies.

",lulshitpost,e9etho9,conservative
I predict he'll have his own prime time show in six months. ,LonelyMachines,e9e2n5r,conservative
The next protest to happen,callthereaper64,e9e12an,conservative
"I love how the left wing media calls him a tyrant while conveniently ignoring how many journalists and leakers Obama actually locked up.

Even if it's sad how many people fall for this nonsense in another sense it is reassuring how many people see through the bullshit. Heck, even here in Canada where we have near zero sensible news organizations and a state ran media outlet who spews propaganda there are still a sizable amount of people who can see through it all.",OKResident93,e9ecli3,conservative
CNN's popularity will not end until  Reddit and waiting rooms no longer exist. ,RCjohn-1,e9eh83u,conservative
He’s that dude from college who got a job at one the big banks and constantly drops hints that the deals smaller banks do are “middle market” and calls his friends in non-deals roles “back office” people. ,PatsFever,e9e2kqv,conservative
Just can't stand the guy.,Qualiafreak,e9kjibb,conservative
Yeah it's almost like it's Facebook all over again,soywars,e9fbd5j,conservative
"""His ass is not as tight as you might imagine"" - Anderson Cooper",TheComedianGLP,e9nrq9o,conservative
"https://www.amazon.com/Amplifier-Portable-Teachers-Presentations-Costumes/dp/B00875VR4S

It's not like he had an actual megaphone.

Noticed the sarcasm a little late.





",lulshitpost,e9esy9u,conservative
They call him Supreme Leader. Not sure what the difference is. ,Dada2fish,e9ebl51,conservative
"Because he cares little for facts, only to stroke his own ego.",SimonJ57,e9evw7c,conservative
Deliberately spreading misinformation or twisting the facts to push your own agenda is about as close to it as you can get as an organization that is supposed to inform the people. As for Jim Acosta personally though I just think he’s a dunce. Calling Jim Acosta an enemy of the people is giving him too much credit 😂 ,JAK4189,e9ewj80,conservative
"When you create the narrative you can potentially control the people, it's a chain reaction. CNN (who no one watches)runs a bs story with either misleading information or straight up lies then msnbc picks it up and then abc and then vox and buzzfeed and kther leftist online news sources and before you know it the entire 90% leftist controlled media is telling youba story that isn't even based in fact painting the president or one of his secretaries as an evil vile person. That in turn encourages the antifa scumbag types to harass and attack people and break down doors chanting ""we know where you sleep at night"". You can absolutely directly blame of those types of actions and violence on people like Jim Acosta. ",The_Mighty_Rex,e9fdszb,conservative
[deleted],,e9mt5os,conservative
But who would notice?,MaxPeq,e9n1f8x,conservative
"hopefully on CNNHN, then we'll never hear from him again",gizmo78,e9emufi,conservative
And airports.,ngoni,e9em9yq,conservative
I still think he brought an old-school megaphone just for the challenge of getting it up his ass.,johnsonman1,e9et38q,conservative
"The president is a person that we elected to preside over the application of our laws. 

The supreme leader is someone you follow without thought. ",BeezDragon,e9enlcg,conservative
Certainly nothing exclusive to Acosta.,DB-3,e9ewrjt,conservative
"I don't know, I just think the ""enemy of the people""-rhetoric is a bit scary from someone supposed to act as a president of a democracy/republic/whatever.",DB-3,e9ewszg,conservative
"99.999% of them have never seen one of the press conferences, let alone the many times he has interrupted and talked over both SHS and the POTUS. 

Well, a lot of them are high school/ early 20s liberals. Their world view is not shaped by experience, but by other people. ",johnsonman1,e9mvl8d,conservative
"All 12 of their viewers.

""Tonight at 8:00, the Jim Acosta Show, because we've run out of footage of Anthony Bourdain.  On his panel:  that lady from the Bernie Sanders campaign who finds everything racist, a shrill millennial who runs an anti-Trump blog with 1200 followers, and John Kasich, because he's desperate for someone to *please notice him.*  Also, Adam Schiff.""",LonelyMachines,e9n9y1p,conservative
"The supreme leader is the law.

",lulshitpost,e9et53g,conservative
Sadly true...,SimonJ57,e9ex9b9,conservative
Good. It should be scary. These people will lie and distort anything in the pursuit of money. People should distrust the media,jelyjiggler,e9eyazi,conservative
"Unless you're a Democrat, then it's Karl Marx.",TheComedianGLP,e9nrrs0,conservative
Thats completely normal when you have nothing to hide. ,iwasthebeaver,e9f9mxp,conservative
"Whistle blowers are good, nobody should be fucking with free elections. ",ozric101,e9dpeou,conservative
All this stuff stinks. Why was she fired? ,RigsbyQuist,e9dql7q,conservative
"If Six Flags can make fingerprint scans work for entry, why can’t we make it work for voting? ",Dammit_Banned_Again,e9dxjk5,conservative
We are finding out that the Kavanagh confirmation controversy was created by out right lies of the left.  Now this...  It seems the Democrats will lie and cheat to win or get what they want now.  Is this what we have to deal with now? ,TommySawyer,e9dsv4c,conservative
At this point does the government have the authority to hold a new election in a month and have federal employees overseeing each site?,Falkamper,e9e9zvt,conservative
"Just for those of you that don't read the article, this is still relevant to Broward County but it is talking about the 2016 election.

#Published: Nov 4, **2016**",_SkeletonJelly,e9dydyv,conservative
"I don’t know who did what at this point or what to believe. All I know is Florida seriously needs to get its shit together. This is a bipartisan issue, whether you vote democrat or republican or for the Vader/Palpatine ticket. Is it too much to ask for a free and fair election with no funny business and the legit winner actually winning? Whoever wins i just want it to be fair and square for fuck’s sake.",on_an_island,e9en55r,conservative
"All the documents were the same SIZE! That didn't come out of a fax machine!

THEY WERE CREATING FAKE BALLOTS - STUFFING THE BALLOT BOX.",StephenScherer1,e9efc2m,conservative
"My favorite thing about this is the immediate “IT’S A BIPARTISAN THING!!1!!!” whereas if it had been a republican doing this, you bet your ass it’d be “an attack on our democracy by trump”",hopoffZ,e9efs8d,conservative
r/politics sure doesn’t report on this ,tangoshotz,e9eq6ag,conservative
"B-but it's in the name of anti-fascism! At that point anything is justifyable, right?? /s",Natanyul,e9eaj7p,conservative
Obama would have had them arrested.,SpeZDumpster,e9dw8tp,conservative
Because darkness hates the light.,rf-engineer,e9efvnn,conservative
"Because they have an incentive to make the system work.

Only half (barely) of this country have any incentive to actually have fraud-less and secure elections.",IndefinitePresent,e9dz5cs,conservative
Six Flags has a fingerprint database?,mlmack,e9e1a88,conservative
something something POLL TAX something something RACIST.,shatter321,e9ejqbr,conservative
"We're dealing with an opponent that doesn't believe truth exists, so why think they'd have any problem with ""lying"" (whatever that even means in the absence of truth)?

All truth is power, and power can be attained by any means necessary.
",nited_states,e9dv39k,conservative
"Yes.  Welcome, cryogenically frozen former caveman.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9e2shh,conservative
yep thats what happens when they alienate their own voters and start losing elections,Portlandblazer07,e9e4k4l,conservative
They've already proven they'll go to the extent to destroy a man's life through false accusations and go after others who don't abide by the ideology by attacking their family at their home. The left are corrupt and are slowly showing their communist ways as time goes on.,Mr_Hyde_,e9eotma,conservative
Do you think anything about Broward has changed for the better since then?,IndefinitePresent,e9dzcsn,conservative
"Fair point, right there. ",Dammit_Banned_Again,e9e085z,conservative
Yup. Linked to your account & everything. ,Dammit_Banned_Again,e9e3hbt,conservative
You know it's always funny how the left always says having voter ID laws and stuff are racist but it would actually make the vote count that much more if it was secure. ,Straight_Ace,e9ex9jo,conservative
[removed],,e9ebkfd,conservative
Gonna have community gatherings like Mao's Cultural Revolution... Where they ridicule you with a dunce hat and shit. ,TommySawyer,e9epj6e,conservative
court records would point to the fact that it has not.,aCreditGuru,e9e6nil,conservative
"Disney has similar shit. Maybe no fingerprint? But everyone who goes is logged, known, and accounted for.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9euwk2,conservative
"Well, I'm not a postmodernist, so I guess whatever they say about me is wrong.",nited_states,e9ecui8,conservative
">  Both sides say the same shit about each other.

wow underneath political affiliations people are fundamentally similar to each other?!?! I am SHOCKED by this revelation.",shatter321,e9ejp35,conservative
"Except for one side has it right. I will go with the side that believes outright murder is wrong every time.. if you are an advocate for the mass murder of babies, lying is nothing.",Jonbonnet,e9eetfu,conservative
"Isn't it though?  It's like two people standing next to each other, each wearing an ""I'm with stupid"" t-shirt with an arrow pointing at the other person.  Apparently you're either a libtard or a fascist and there's no in between.",Disektor,e9edu64,conservative
When I was at disney world in Oct they took your print as well. ,PerceivedShift,e9ew1a9,conservative
[removed],,e9ee2a4,conservative
"> Apparently you're either a libtard or a fascist

*communist or a fascist ",GoldenGonzo,e9ez2d8,conservative
"That is exactly what they want, and they've got it. Divide and conquer.",sonicbhoc,e9eemsl,conservative
"Call me when the tea party breaks down jim acostas door

Call me when a trump supporter opens fire on a feild of democrat congressmen

Call me when tea partiers are looting stores and violently shutting down liveral speakers

Lemme know when conservative politicians actively endorse it

Lemme know when theres a right wing equivalent of don lemons racism

Lemme know when fox doctors video fakes protests and lies constantly

Then well talk about ""both side""",ExpensiveMention,e9efvet,conservative
"Dont forget Farrakahn and his racism and anti semitism and the  left's love of it

Or Al Sharpton responsible burning down the business in New York",hundycougar,e9eku5v,conservative
"> Then well talk about ""both side""

A liar calls a truth teller a liar. Ergo both sides are equal.

Yeah no. Facts speak for themselves. Great points brought up here.",orangeeyedunicorn,e9euutu,conservative
[removed],,e9egqpk,conservative
"> Call me when the tea party breaks down jim acostas door -trump supporter ramming a vehicle into crowd.

Bad dude, but not Tea Party.

> Call me when a trump supporter opens fire on a feild of democrat congressmen -multiple bombs sent to left wing supporters/leaders

Yeah, sorry, those were fake. A mentally ill guy with a history of making bomb threats back to 2004 decided to pull a hoax.

> Lemme know when theres a right wing equivalent of don lemons racism. -glen beck?

Lies. Try evidence.

> Lemme know when fox doctors video fakes protests and lies constantly The White House legit just doctored a video making the “karate chop” look violent.

Again, lies. Those claims were baseless and proven to be false.

> Then well talk about ""both side"" -did I do enough?

You definitely did enough to prove his point.",kaioto,e9eiu5l,conservative
"Also not the same

He wasnt a trump supporter either. He was a guy scared for his life and didnt attack a journolist

Tge fact that the ONLY example the left has is this random non trump supporter accidentally hitting a protestor with his car when he was trying to escape is exactly the point


None of those ""bombs"" were bombs.



Glen beck doesnt attack black ppl like don lemon attacks White

1) fox didnt doctor anything if it was sent by the wgitehouse

2) those videos were 100% unedited. Liberals just call EVERYTHING they dont like ""fake news""",ExpensiveMention,e9exp5q,conservative
"> All the while, attorneys on both sides are flying complaints at the  courts and authorities.  With all these indiscretions and  disgruntlement, it is hard to imagine a resolution that would instill  Floridians with confidence in their voting process; and that's the  greatest tragedy of all.

I'm very tempted to move at this point.",xJownage,e9gmhlj,conservative
Now we just make some minor adjustments to the wall and it's a win-win.,glockedup1,e9fk8tp,conservative
Reconquista!,BeachCruisin22,e9forox,conservative
Maybe they can live in the charred remains of some lefty millionaire's homes.  Probably would still beat whatever hellhole they're leaving behind.,GMU1993,e9fmqvf,conservative
California can have them. ,soxfan90,e9fttih,conservative
"Specifically, up along the Nevada border and then jogging over west at the Oregon border?",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fo3e4,conservative
"Not unless we wall off California first.  These people may enter in CA, but once inside they can go anywhere. ",Hillary_For_Prison,e9g9s61,conservative
Deal. ,soxfan90,e9ga7gm,conservative
♪ Welcome to the Hotel California ♬,ThePoliticalHat,e9gj6aa,conservative
You can check in any time you like but you can never leave.,Hillary_For_Prison,e9gn20i,conservative
I need to check my storage shed for a few boxes of R votes,DPistola,e9fsgur,conservative
"Same, same.",jina100,e9ft0gb,conservative
"I honestly think that if Zuckerberg wanted to run for President, he would win in a walk.  Imagine if he just turned the world's largest social media network into a propoganda tool for himself?

Hell, even just the data he possesses must be enough to do the most targeted voter outreach in history.",nited_states,e9eik04,conservative
"You all must leave FB. Your info is the commodity they deal in...and they are making lots of money for themselves.
I switched to MeWe...and I couldn't be happier!",Bubbacat7,e9efp2f,conservative
Not to mention the dirt he has on so many people. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9eq06n,conservative
"Libertarians think this is freedom

""If we effectively have a one party country with Republicans having no voice whatsoever on 90% of communication platforms and therefore no say in how our country is run thats akchtually freedom because its there right to cheat as a king- sorry ""private company""""",ExpensiveMention,e9fa729,conservative
"I'll check MeWe out, been considering an alternative",ConservativeBrit,e9erfml,conservative
"""I don't mind hanging as long as the executioner is a private contractor.""

Lenin was right: capitalists would inevitably sell their souls for a dollar, and they'd sell out to communists.",nited_states,e9fq3c5,conservative
"The alternative is nothing. Social media is unhealthy, on individual, community and society levels.

It has almost no redeeming qualities whatsoever.",Piestrio,e9f85md,conservative
"This is absolutely true. With social media, people become envious, self-absorbed, and forget friendships are stronger face-to-face.  ",8K12,e9fnvo2,conservative
Like reddit.,igor_otsky,e9fluz9,conservative
Yes,Piestrio,e9fnzad,conservative
Oh look it climbed. Now 24k,Enzo_SAWFT,e9g8sev,conservative
What the fuck happened to Arizona? ,CASunDevil24,e9g4drk,conservative
"Let’s have a run off and see if the 47,000 libertarians put their vote with McSally. My bets are on McSally",chilikarnkarny1,e9g1b56,conservative
Having the hardest time believing AZ elected this lady. Are there more votes to count?,the-divine-comedy,e9g27vk,conservative
Final count? ,molon-labe7,e9fw7lt,conservative
So is this it?,link_ganon,e9fx8fn,conservative
"Looks bleak in Arizona. Truly outrageous that they elected a conservative governor to lead their own state while sending a hard-left Senator to make laws that effect the entire country. 

&#x200B;

What SHOULD have happened was this. In 2012, they should have elected a solid conservative Republican who would be able to run for reelection in 2018. Instead, they sent us Jeff Flake, who was instead forced to pack his bags and go back to Snowflake AZ where he came from (a town which also fits his character quite nicely). ",Sola__Fide,e9fwltc,conservative
"Nothing says ""own Trump"" like electing

1. A Senator who accepted bribes and vacations from a guy who defrauded medicare and medicaid. Also may have slept with underage prostitutes. (Menendez)
2. An Attorney General who beat his girlfriend and emotionally abused her. (Ellison)
3. A congresswoman who called her own state a meth lab, said she didn't care if people wanted to join the Taliban, and generally portrays herself as a moderate when she has no consistent history of being one. (Sinema)
4. A congresswoman who exploited a shooting in Las Vegas for her own political stock. (Rosen)

I could laugh if I wasn't so absolutely disgusted. They literally believe that our whole democratic process, our congress and our lawmakers, should be decided essentially as if they were proxies for whoever is President. Civics who? This is exactly what Washington warned about, and we're finally following tribal party politics to its inevitable destructive conclusion.",ZeroTheCat,e9gkwnh,conservative
Call Enterprise rent a truck and check the mileage. I bet it adds up to a trip from Miami.,seat_shop,e9g35yt,conservative
F\*\^&$ Arizona! If they want this commie asshole that spits in their faces to represent then in the Senate then to hell with them.,mayargo7,e9ggo4j,conservative
You mean Green Party?,ReaganTroll,e9g40um,conservative
Yuma I think?,ReaganTroll,e9g437c,conservative
"200,000 votes left to count ",Zac1245,e9gc7q3,conservative
I don't think so.,ReaganTroll,e9fwdvd,conservative
"200,000 votes left to count ",Zac1245,e9gc80a,conservative
Yet most of the votes breaking for Sinema. Yet on election night most went for McSally. Is it the county?,the-divine-comedy,e9gg7e0,conservative
"It has been this way for a long while now.  Romney called attention to it in 2012 and predictably got REEEEE'd at by the media, but he wasn't wrong to do so.  

Our Republic is dying because a huge chunk of the electorate has absolutely no stake in anything.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9fk72m,conservative
This is literally voting for higher taxes to (potentially) get other people's money. It needs to be fixed asap. People who do not pay Federal taxes should not be allowed to vote on Federal taxation issues. And I'm saying this as someone who thinks that some social safety net would be available for people truly in need who aren't gaming the system.,Terra_green2,e9frr5x,conservative
Well that's not sustainable at all.,mtimjones,e9fh6ny,conservative
No representation without taxation.,PhilosoGuido,e9fkp9d,conservative
"As conservatives we wonder how can sane people vote for democrats.  And here is your answer.  If you have no skin in the game you vote for idiots promising you free shit, because you pay nothing for the free shit.  Most elections start with us at -45%.  And if we don't come out in mass for the republican we lose.  Democrats only need to get 6% of those who actually pay fucking taxes to vote for them.  And there are enough rich or upper class liberals who gladly do.",optionhome,e9f96um,conservative
Same with having children.  Look at the leaders of Europe.  Most are childless.  Which may explain their willingness to flush their cultures down the toilet.,Snoochems,e9g03rh,conservative
We need to tie voting rights to taxation.   No general franchise. ,Hillary_For_Prison,e9g9xzd,conservative
"How do they manage this? Is it by claiming a zillion deductions? I pay federal tax on net (not just SS taxes etc.) and I make less than a lot of them if it's 45% of households. Granted, I don't pay *much*, but it still takes a bite out of the paycheck and I don't get it all back.

Everyone should be paying something. I get why for the poorest it makes sense to tax them only a little bit. But it should never be zero or negative, because then a lot of people have no short-term incentive to keep taxing and spending under control. And short-term is unfortunately a bigger pull than long-term for much of America.",ZarahCobalt,e9geyn8,conservative
[removed],,e9fggz3,conservative
Great points.  All conservatives believe in a temporary safety net.  Not a life time on the dole.  And though we know it will never happen those who pay no effective taxes should not be able to vote.  Imagine what our country would look like if that was the case.,optionhome,e9g24qq,conservative
"> Well that's not sustainable at all.

The leftists talk about a disparity of income.  The disparity is the 51% who work And Pay Taxes supporting the 49% who don't.  ",optionhome,e9g1xqk,conservative
"> Same with having children.

I am old enough to remember when people (even without all the birth control methods of today and back when abortions were illegal) didn't have fucking kids if they couldn't afford them.  I still laugh at schools providing lunches.  If you can't provide a lunch for your kid to take to school or give them enough money to buy one there, why the fuck are you having kids.",optionhome,e9g2crz,conservative
"> They pay payroll and sales taxes

Sales taxes are state taxes. Irrelevant to the Federal government. Payroll taxes fund their future benefits from those programs (SS/Medicare), from which most eventually take way more in benefits than they ever put in. ",PhilosoGuido,e9fl4i0,conservative
"I think it would be very difficult to do this though, because the MSM will cry out that Republicans are disenfranchising the poor, even if it's just that ONE issue. Would also be tough to implement I think.

The entire voting system is very wobbly, as Florida is proving. I'd be grateful if they at least implement a Federal voting ID, linked to one's passport/U.S. citizenship, to ensure that only citizens vote. The racism card the left pulls on this issue is absolutely absurd. Even if someone can't vote in one election they always have 2 years after this to get a valid ID... and then 2 more years... and then 2 more years... if you haven't been able to prove that you're a citizen by then you probably aren't.",Terra_green2,e9gh7fr,conservative
"> because the MSM will cry out that Republicans are disenfranchising the poor

I think this is the old style of looking at the MSN.  If you want to look at them objectively today you have to view them as the Ministry of Propaganda for the DNC.  In fact they set the tone for the DNC, not the other way around.  So to think that they will not condemn anything that hurts the leftist agenda is naive.  You have to say in spite of the fact that they are going to lie to the useful idiots we should do the right thing.",optionhome,e9h4a3t,conservative
No I absolutely agree. I say to do it regardless of the MSM narrative.,Terra_green2,e9hywal,conservative
"Hmmm... maybe we should start treating the 15th Amendment like it isn't sacrosanct.  Since, you know, apparently amendments and rights that ""matter"" to the left are just cherry picked for arbitrary reasons.

Let's negotiate.  I'll start walking your way.  You start walking mine.  The 2nd for the 15th.  Let's make a deal.",DevonWeeks,e9ev8mb,conservative
"Too bad for him, it is.",rojindahar,e9etybl,conservative
"Lemon, Maddow, Acosta, Ryan- activists not journalists. ",triggernaut,e9evf4q,conservative
"Okay, Lemon, let’s get rid of the 1st Amendment first since it must not be either. At least go in order if you’re bent on destroying the rights of free people. ",justhere2havefun,e9f2tn3,conservative
"If they outlawed guns, it would just be war in the streets. I dont know a single gun owner who would just give them up. ",a93818,e9ev1bm,conservative
Lol,quietidiot,e9etmsz,conservative
"Don Lemon is, as my buddy urinatingtree would call it, a lolcow.",xJownage,e9eu9p2,conservative
"I guess the 17th isn't either. Good, I look forward to the return of federalism.",sir_fenwick,e9f4ang,conservative
"Don lemon, stop pretending you’re an objective news journalist ",phantomcut3,e9fc4qy,conservative
Who's pretending?,drmeeseekslookatme,e9fc4wp,conservative
"Right to bear arms goes beyond politics just like free speech. I wouldn't tell some leftist he can't arm himself to the teeth. 

God given right Lemonhead!",kayfabelife,e9ex8cm,conservative
"Anyone that does not agree with their racist shit posting is a racist shit poster.

*REEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE*",KKN0PP,e9g77g7,conservative
LMAO,neville_bartos666,e9e9fzw,conservative
I thought liberals were against fracking.,project769,e9dyggi,conservative
Think of the house. ,LookmaReddit,e9dzfo2,conservative
lol poor beta,VoinaYMir,e9dxy0z,conservative
THAT'S what it is. Couldn't figure it out.,XYZ-Wing,e9e4k50,conservative
"I live in Austin Texas. I realize it’s satire, but it’s satire that falls flat. Liberals view the senate race as a positive, showing that the supposed blue wave is real.

In the end Beto lost because he had very little appeal to blacks and Hispanics, scoring mostly with under 40 mostly educated whites. 

Had the senate race occurred in a presidential race with an Obama like candidate, Cruz would have lost. I bet even Cruz would tell you that.

And this is coming from a redditor that gets tagged with a right wing label quite frequently.",waveduality,e9fdszu,conservative
Love the shoutout to Abrams at the bottom. ,DrudgeBreitbart,e9eg1hl,conservative
😂😂😂,littlebit90_,e9e3xwf,conservative
"Ya I felt this in my house for sure, ",dudeman5445,e9eptmg,conservative
"I lived in Austin and am from Texas my whole life. Only people that like Beto or sanders. Are the educated white people. There just so happens to be lots of them in Austin, Dallas and Houston. 

The other appeal is poor white people.",petered92,e9fvifs,conservative
Wasn't there an exit poll (granted exit polls tend to be everywhere in terms of accuracy) that showed native Texans voting for Beto and outsiders voting for Cruz?,poppy_92,e9g7rxt,conservative
Yeah from Communist News Network. That’s a odd stat to me. ,petered92,e9g951x,conservative
"How does this person even have a job, with a record like that?

Mind blown WTF is going on down there? ",ozric101,e9e4dub,conservative
Lmao it’s Bush v. Gore all over again.,paulbrevik,e9e74ap,conservative
LOCK HER UP!!,Moonthrower,e9enkjl,conservative
"Entire nations have fallen in recent years, the start of their fall can be blamed on election fraud.  

No, not Russia or ""foreign influence"", fraud is always domestic in nature.  ",PerceivedShift,e9ex2o1,conservative
"Like I said in another thread, in broward we elect anything with a D next to it. There is a single R seat (a state rep along the NE coast of the county, outgoing Republican George Moraitis to incoming Republican Chip LaMarca) in the entire county (above the nonpartisan local races). 

Aside from that, the school board is all D, the sheriff is a D (the infamous Israel), the 9 county commissioners are Ds (LaMarca was the 1 R, before running for state house and being replaced by a D), all 3 congressmen (Deutch, Wasserman-Schultz, and Hastings) are Ds, all administrative positions like supervisor of elections, clerk of courts, etc are Ds. And we’ll elect Ds over Rs when the Ds are corrupt shitbags like Hastings, who was impeached and removed as a federal judge for bribery before being elected to Congress just two years later (where he remains after a quarter century). 

Broward is a corrupt leftist cesspool...and the majority of voters *like it that way*. ",YankeeBlues21,e9e77sk,conservative
The Dems are stealing the election with voter fraud.  That's what's going on.,StraightNewt,e9e6173,conservative
Dude I’m kinda young and I can tell that’s exactly what’s happening.,BearFootR,e9fc1a3,conservative
As my Father says on occasion it was all about country mouse/city mouse when he was a child I guess not much has changed.  ,ozric101,e9e875t,conservative
"I think there's a strong case that a county like Broward is run like a criminal organization.  If the entire county is organized around operations such as, oh,  I don't know, electoral fraud, then they definitely qualify for a RICO investigation.

I think that's the only way to bust up these Democrat ""strongholds."" Somebody will have to grow a pair, ignore the *optics,* and start putting people in prison.

&#x200B;",MojoHand052,e9f69lx,conservative
I am so sorry ,steelallz,e9f88ge,conservative
And yet the internet saves everything. Amateur. ,cons_NC,e9czyl0,conservative
"This same guy wrote an article for Vox where he talked about how watching the birth of his child made him even more confident that abortion on demand was acceptable.

Dude is a sociopath.  ",puddboy,e9d6f4l,conservative
"Attempted home invasions are now a justifiable protest ""strategy"" against conservatives. There is no moral hedging for this logic. This is just pure evil.",MyWifeDontKnowItsMe,e9d0qv0,conservative
"Well obviously this Vox employee is a far right wing Trump supporter if he’s condoning violence, right?",justhere2havefun,e9d0hsp,conservative
"It seems his account is back. Probably just turned off temporarily. The top post is now:

>A bunch of conservatives were dog piling @mattyglesias yesterday and they doxed him right in a reply with his address. I reported it to @jack and they said it didn't violate their rules. Doxing doesn't violate Twitter's rules? WTF?

Oh poor baby. He celebrates Tucker being doxxed, but then whines when it happens to him? Maybe that's why that kind of behavior should be unacceptable?",TangoFoxtr0t,e9dahjj,conservative
"Jim Acosta gets the boot for acting like a child and gets wall to wall sympathy.  

""Protestors"" try to beat down the door of Tucker Carlson's house, and not a peep.

But there's no double standard. ",LonelyMachines,e9d89ut,conservative
"He clearly thinks that behavior is ok, as he's basically making excuses for those losers that attacked Tucker's home. 

Disgusting. ",Jagoff86,e9daggx,conservative
"Holy fuck just imagine if a mob showed up at Maxine Waters house. MSM would blow its top.

I cannot belive there's not a single post on the front page about this mob. Too bad Mrs Carlson didn't shoot through her back door and take a few down. Then they would report it.

But they would be heros or something. ",VeganMcVeganface,e9dfrbo,conservative
#MobsNotJobs,Username4418,e9d90r2,conservative
This is the same person who said that [Hitler had a few good ideas](https://twitchy.com/loriz-3139/2013/01/23/matt-yglesias-joke-falls-flat-hitler-did-have-some-good-ideas/),djent_illini,e9dxmea,conservative
SJW x1000000,Aceyxo,e9e5itv,conservative
Destruction of evidence..  Tisk tisk that's illegal too Vox.  ,CommaCazes,e9e6l76,conservative
In 2016 they canned an editor who called for Trump's murder. Maybe it's time the FBI investigated everyone associated with Vox. ,MDMCrab,e9ec0f2,conservative
"And then people are mad the dude got doxxed.

&#x200B;

That's the problem with making targeted attacks on someone's property acceptable, once you've thrown caution to the wind and started doing things BY ANY MEANS NECESSARY, you make it equally acceptable, if not encouraged for other people to do it to you.

&#x200B;

&#x200B;",atomic1fire,e9djy2l,conservative
"Matt got Doxxed right back and then he went into ""digital hiding"" and the left went over the top saying how shameful it was... sooo when the shoe's on the other foot? ",plastiqmanb,e9dmd3m,conservative
Guy is a hyper partisan piece of shit. ,theinfamousjosh,e9dk17l,conservative
"Matt Yglesias is the embodiment of everything that progressives like him claim to hate about ""privileged"" people on the right. He's a mediocre writer with awful opinions whose entire career is built on the success of his father and grandfather. Without them he'd be teaching creative writing at a community college instead of firing off half-baked, inarticulate, viral-ready drivel on Twitter.",jaykyew,e9dku09,conservative
"Just out ofcuriosity, at what point is someone able to defend themselves and their family? If they are cracking your front door, that constitutes attempted invasion right? Like if you let off a 12 gauge round or two through the door, that wouldn't be unreasonable. So the is so dangerous. It seems like putting your hand in a crocodiles mouth. I don't know. Just seems like this is taking it to a whole other level.",Dast_Kook,e9dn249,conservative
These mobs are an example of why people should be allowed to own an AR-15.,NightFreak87,e9deh9r,conservative
Do we have archives? Please tell me they have been archived...,anonymau5,e9dcfgo,conservative
"What a piece of shit. 

It's all great watching the mob destroy your enemies isn't it? Until they come for you, that is. ",Javatex,e9dlo4t,conservative
unapologetic vox employee immediately creates burner while dealing with personal fallout. Proceeds to like and retweet all this incendiary BS again. It's like I can see inside their heads,greatatdrinking,e9ddmux,conservative
Are the deleted tweets accessible anywhere?  Can we get them?,kevinkarma,e9dvbpl,conservative
Not just an employee - one of the cofounders! He's really insufferable in general.,some_q,e9dh3fp,conservative
What a fucking dildo ,ETHNJCB,e9dlpr4,conservative
"What a coward. If you're going to pull a stunt like this own up to it. He is already a hero with the Left, and it isn't like he is in any chance of getting in trouble for this. First anti-Trump judge that sits the case will toss it out.",PrecookedDonkey,e9dmzpt,conservative
"Guarantee you Vox will do nothing about it even if we show the tweets. So many double standards for us it’s starting to piss me off
",tangoshotz,e9dov5c,conservative
"Chickenshits.

The lot of them.

The kids who were either beaten up in school, or should have been.",TheComedianGLP,e9dbdof,conservative
Its Germany 1930s all over again ….,lawless68,e9dgt3h,conservative
"Exactly who are Tucker Carlson's ""victims"" according to [Matthew Yglasias?](https://lukeford.net/blog/wp-content/uploads/2018/11/Drfn_cOWkAIgvRx.jpg). Lunatics like him really do want to take away even our speech and thought, don't they?

With the left becoming so violent lately, I'm even more glad than usual for the second amendment. If it weren't for that, they might have put us in FDR camps already.",DukeMaximum,e9dn1d8,conservative
"I've followed him for a while.  Not that I agree with anything he says, but his stuff is so out there it's fascinating.  He had/has a pretty big following too.

Sort of always thought of him as the political version of a shock jock radio show.  ",Roez,e9ds36u,conservative
This certainly wont make news,railforte,e9dtecp,conservative
Typical coward.,PapaGeorgio23,e9dh5r5,conservative
 Matt Tardglesias,chabanais,e9dhgiu,conservative
LOL THIS TASTES SWEET,GeeTheCurious,e9dkj2s,conservative
"Do not forget that these people want you broke, dead, your kids raped and brainwashed, and they think it's funny.",Silicon_Avatar,e9dkz0h,conservative
Crazy people suck. I wish they just wouldn't.,UterusTim,e9druld,conservative
They didn't crack the door though. They just knocked on it...,ogyneXPlA,e9dzjz3,conservative
After he was doxxed. Someone tweeted his address out to get at him for simply saying he doesn't feel sympathetic towards Tucker or his wife. That's like swatting someone because they said they don't care about the victims of a tragedy. One thing is worse than the other. ,WizardyoureaHarry,e9e3dka,conservative
"I wish. I haven't been able to find any kind of Twitter archive or mirror. Even the Wayback Machine only captures tweets at weekly intervals, so it misses a lot. The only way to guarantee a Twitter account is archived is to run your own service that scraps the site or converts it to RSS and saves all content remotely.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9daaz7,conservative
What the hell... that's deeply disturbing. ,Mewster1818,e9dag06,conservative
"He's actually one of the senior editors and co-founders of Vox. He IS Vox, he should not be classed as just a writer for Vox, or an employee.",fatt_maddison,e9dvkdr,conservative
Psychopath ,appolo11,e9dq2yc,conservative
Sauce?,Marky512,e9dtt13,conservative
lol thank God vox is garbage in the firstplace,FreddHansom,e9e34rd,conservative
"How could anyone bring a kid into the world, watch it be born, hold this tiny human in your arms and still think it's ok to kill them?",Straight_Ace,e9do2lm,conservative
Now that's a Demoncrat!,StephenScherer1,e9dm84z,conservative
Funny most normal people the exact opposite happens. ,ladyspatch,e9dyxob,conservative
Maybe he should have gotten one. ,amsterdam_pro,e9dsm6g,conservative
The people supporting mob home invasions are the same people who want to take your guns away.  What a weird coincidence.  ,FelixFuckfurter,e9d18sw,conservative
Someone's going to get killed when they do this to the wrong door and honestly I don't think I'll care one bit.,anuser999,e9dc34x,conservative
"No no no, it's not a home invasion,  it's a ""convoy"". - Jim acosta ",partime1,e9dihpo,conservative
Maxine Waters approves and encourages.,ParticipashunTrophy,e9dosvl,conservative
And there are *still* conservatives out there who think we should be gentlemanly with these people as if there's some value to that. That's the most mind boggling part to me. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9dkpjy,conservative
And this is why we need the second amendment.,grdlock,e9drk2u,conservative
They should try it somewhere in the south or out west. It'll go poorly. Really poorly. Probably a reason why they never do. ,archetype776,e9e6yd5,conservative
"I consider myself mostly liberal. Violence and the defense or rationalization of violence is despicable. Please remember that the majority of people on both sides of the current liberal/conservative divide behave mostly morally. It's those at the extremes who make the rest look bad. 

Disagreement in a society is healthy; disrespect, hatred and violence are not.

",doctorzoom,e9dnkc5,conservative
No you don't understand. To them what they're doing is not violence but 'self defense'. So any form of violence is then acceptable as long as it doesn't make them look bad to their supporters.,Dyeredit,e9d8v8t,conservative
He's one of the co-founders of Vox actually.  ,Roez,e9dsf3i,conservative
"they literally believe tucker Carlson is a white supremacist. they are fine with ""punching nazis"" and more. ",meow-to-you,e9dey30,conservative
[removed],,e9dd42k,conservative
"If the didn't have double standards, they'd have no standards at all.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9db9le,conservative
It's stuff like that that's making me more and more convinced that the split between the two sides and their value sets has grown too far for us to share a country anymore.  At this point the only questions left in my mind is when the split finally happens and whether it's peaceful or violent.,anuser999,e9dcc0y,conservative
">Acosta wasn't acting like a child, he was just trying to ask hard questions. Trump got upset and told him to sit down.

This is their line of thinking. Are we watching the same thing?",Sideswipe0009,e9dumhz,conservative
"Tucker said he's been hearing from people on both sides supporting him. Now that is to him personally. Not public statements of support from the left. That shows just how effective their tactics are. Even reporters are afraid of their own mob. Look at the responses to Colbert who said that it wasn't right to go to his house like that. 

The liberal elites think they can control the mobs they are creating. It's going to be a bad day when they find out they can be victims of their own monster too.",allnamesaretaken45,e9dfsxb,conservative
[removed],,e9dyny9,conservative
This was my main thought. She should have unloaded at them through the door when they were trying to bash it down. Self defense. ,Aceyxo,e9e5pcq,conservative
"Turns out being a piece of shit pays well, he lives in a 1.5 million dollar house.",thetompain,e9dsg9d,conservative
"Not in DC though.

Then again a WaPo reporter, years ago (90s maybe) shot some kid in his pool one night with a handgun. I believe he got off. Nevermind, he was with the press.",billyjoedupree,e9dw7e1,conservative
">Like if you let off a 12 gauge round or two through the door, that wouldn't be unreasonable

Don't fucking do that, Buckshot Biden. Wait until they're in the house. Funnel of death.",richardguy,e9e39h2,conservative
So you're saying I should polish up my Docs.,anuser999,e9e0xm8,conservative
Nice bait,big--willy,e9e456l,conservative
"Use archive.is: http://archive.is/R8WGX;

and then deleted: http://archive.is/gctch",cons_NC,e9dar25,conservative
"http://archive.fo/https://twitter.com/mattyglesias/*

According to archive.fo there are about 2900 twitter urls from this guy that was archived. A good chunk of his tweets have been safely archived. ",PrestoPesto1,e9djgwn,conservative
Poor kid,molon-labe7,e9dbwii,conservative
">**7 things becoming a parent taught me I was right about all along**

>*4) Women should be able to get abortions*

>After watching my wife gestate my son for nine months, I am 100 percent certain people who go into pregnancy with anti-abortion ethical priors come out of it with the strength of their convictions increased tenfold. I went into it with different priors and have come out with my own pro-choice convictions increased tenfold.

>A beloved baby is a miraculous thing, but pregnancy is at times a truly agonizing and awful one. It's a small price to pay for something a woman truly wants, but an enormous amount to pay for other people's questionable metaphysical notions about personhood. In a decent society it would be both safe and convenient for women of all socioeconomic backgrounds to terminate an early stage pregnancy on demand without facing judgment and hassles.

https://www.vox.com/2015/3/24/8277827/7-things-becoming-a-parent-taught-me-i-was-right-about-all-along",Buce-Nudo,e9eypan,conservative
"""No no no. Don't say the word mob!""

CNN",sjwking,e9d4o2g,conservative
"Reminds me of a quote from Ida B. Wells,""A Winchester rifle should have a place of honor in every black home"".

Edit: missing a word",KingJonStarkgeryan1,e9dokp5,conservative
[removed],,e9doa6w,conservative
"I mean, it’s not ok to do home invasions, and it’s not ok to send bombs through the mail. Party affiliation shouldn’t matter. There are morons and radicals on both sides. 

Also, very few people want to take away guns entirely. Just increase the amount of security it takes to get one. ",Adiustio,e9e02xu,conservative
"You should care. 

It will be a sign of the escalation. Another rung in a ladder that leads to destruction. 

So a bunch of protestors show up and the home owner kills one. Do you think these insane masked lunatics, high on the perceived righteousness of their “anti-fascist” victimhood, will *stop*?

No. It starts with punching their enemies. But then it became blunt weapons. Then it will be worse. 

Each “protest” will end in death. And they will escalate. 

We need to radically change the conversation and fast or this will only get so much worse. And it doesn’t take much of a change from homeostasis to have the entire system collapse. ",YeOldeVertiformCity,e9dewb5,conservative
You actually should care because ethen it would lead to likely gun control legislation passed in record numbers. The Democrats are goading us to defend ourselves with our weapons so they can make a case for why we shouldn't have them. ,uniquecannon,e9dk3zv,conservative
"Appeasement doesn't and has never worked.  Every time we acquiesce to these people's demands all they do is turn around and demand more.  Why people still refuse to understand that I don't know.

Honestly I think it's because they simply don't want to come to terms with the fact that these people *don't* share are values and must be treated like hostile outsiders.  Coming to grips with the fact that the ideal of America is dead and gone is difficult, especially for people who are on the more patriotic side.",anuser999,e9e0dq9,conservative
"If a violent mob were to invade my house and threaten my family, I would definitely be gentlemanly with them. I'd make sure they all got proper burials. Hell, I'd even help with the funeral arrangements. ",GuitarWizard90,e9dnjfc,conservative
Do we need to repost all of the quotes from democratic leaders in the past year inciting violence against conservatives? I'm sure you've seen it by now but we can if you absolutely are going to deny there is outright endorsement on your side,SpezTheSpaz,e9e7151,conservative
"Unfortunately for you and those like you, until I see the leaders of your side start condemning, disavowing, and working against the ""extremes"" and the non-extremes at gatherings start pushing them out and forcing them away I'm going to go ahead and take a page out of your side's playbook and view silence as agreement.  

Considering that your political and leadership media go beyond that to outright encouragement of this stuff and, sorry, I don't have any reason to think anyone who willingly associates with them isn't in full agreement.",anuser999,e9e0lsn,conservative
"Except they're taking preemptive action. That would be like someone murdering another person and saying ""I was acting in self defense, they could hurt me"" ",molon-labe7,e9dbvcw,conservative
"To anyone who doubts your comment, just go and look at the replies to this dude's archived twitter posts. There are several people saying exactly what you just stated ",Thrice_the_Milk,e9dcs1e,conservative
"these people saw Minority Report, and got excited about the future of law-enforcement.",spunkush,e9dru2n,conservative
"Come on, man, don't post the link.",Rinscher,e9drk4w,conservative
"I really feel the same way. Pro life isn't an opinion anymore, it's hate speech. hate speech has to be eradicated, by violence if necessary. Having a differing opinion on something is ""violence"" and can be met with violence. If you don't believe trans gender ""theory"" then you're doing violence and responsible for suicide and killing kids. And they can respond to that with violence. killing someone who openly against trans gender ideology could safe trans kids lives, according to them. Everything is just too far gone now. There are two radically different viewpoints in the country and I don't think there is anything we can do to fix it. The left has no concept or interest in appeasing the right. Their idea is to drag conservatives into the ""future"" ""even if they're screaming and kicking"". 

I really think civil war is inevitable. ",meow-to-you,e9dfg78,conservative
[deleted],,e9drddr,conservative
Europa has always been at war with Oceana. ,LonelyMachines,e9e232c,conservative
"Yep, the idiots in the media have been screaming racist, fascist, Nazis, end of democracy, etc., etc. ad nauseam and now they clutch their pearls when people follow their guidance.",rjohnson99,e9dikhy,conservative
I’ve watched both the videos side by side and they look the exact same aside from some compression and zoom.,i_floop_the_pig,e9e0uln,conservative
"Oh, how this gets tiresome.

Exactly what ""fake news"" did the White House create?  Acosta has been acting like a disruptive child for months.  That's his whole bit.

I also invite you to quote the part of my post in which I stated or implied that Carlson's treatment was condoned. ",LonelyMachines,e9e20a3,conservative
"He's a trust fund kid, his dad is a fairly successful novelist and screenwriter. ",-Davezilla-,e9du0q6,conservative
Good job!,DontMakeMeDownvote,e9dhgda,conservative
I doubt it’s really his ,Rabidraccoon76,e9dcxkl,conservative
"I don't normally believe in divorce(personally), but I would not condemn anyone for divorcing if their spouse not only said that, but then published it....

I don't think I would ever be able to look at my husband the same way again, let alone raise my children around him. Then again, my husband is conservative and pro-life and would never betray our family in such a disgusting manner.",Mewster1818,e9dcio3,conservative
"""However, it's perfectly acceptable to call Tucker a xenophobic misogynistic white supremacist.""

CNN",TangoFoxtr0t,e9db6t7,conservative
"The M word, sir!",PapaGeorgio23,e9dh4qz,conservative
"Although in the modern era it needs to be updated to ""an AR-15"".  Winchesters have gotten pretty expensive, a good basic AR is only ~$400.",anuser999,e9dzwf6,conservative
[removed],,e9dzbev,conservative
">Also, very few people want to take away guns entirely. Just increase the amount of security it takes to get one.

I think you'd be surprised.  John Paul Stevens says in the *New York Times* [""Repeal the Second Amendment.""](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/03/27/opinion/john-paul-stevens-repeal-second-amendment.html)  The New Republic published an article called [""It's Time to Ban Guns. Yes, All of Them.""](https://newrepublic.com/article/125498/its-time-ban-guns-yes-them) (This was of course particularly stupid since it was in response to the Islamic terrorist attack in San Bernardino, and Islamic terrorists have plenty of ways to commit atrocities that don't involve guns.)

&#x200B;

There are of course people like you describe who don't want to ban guns but just want more stringent regulations (though they generally haven't thought through their positions).  But on the extreme Left end of the political spectrum you have people like Ocasio-Cortez who understand that she can't impose socialist tyranny on a nation with 15 million AR-15s, and Antifa thugs who want to beat the shit out of Tucker Carlson but want to make sure he's not armed before they do it.

&#x200B;",FelixFuckfurter,e9e0tbc,conservative
Mods staying busy today with trolls like this dildo,SpezTheSpaz,e9e24kn,conservative
"I don't want this pants-on head stupidity escalating, but I have **ZERO** sympathy for one of these idiots if they get shot doing this to someone. If a masked mob showed up to my door and terrified my wife and kids and were attempting to break down the door they'd be met with buckshot. I don't care what your political affiliation is or your reason for doing it, it's completely unacceptable, and they get whatever's coming to them. Maybe seeing there are actual consequences to their actions might make some of them think twice.",rjohnson99,e9diafh,conservative
"The protests will not stop, but the dead guy won't be kicking in any more doors.",Fleafleeper,e9e1gqd,conservative
"I'm past the point of thinking the Union stays together.  At this point I just want the splitting to get started already so that we can get past this and form the new nations with populations with similar values.  

I still hold out hope we can manage a peaceful split, but I don't see us staying unified.  The only thing that forcing populations with radically different value sets together achieves is friction and the value sets between the left and right have become almost completely different with virtually no overlap.  What we're seeing today is completely expected, unfortunately.",anuser999,e9dfgyf,conservative
"And how ""worse"" can it get when they've demanded the government take away all their guns and we still have ours....",WolfeBane84,e9doksd,conservative
"Who's going to be upset that a homeowner shoot a person that illegally broke into their home? Even most Democrats would probably be okay with that. In fact, it may even help, because it shows how guns are usually used for defence not offence.",Robo1p,e9en1n7,conservative
"To them, they're always under attack. Hence, whenever they lash out, it's in self-defence. *taps forehead*",GenJuanitoPequeno,e9dg0he,conservative
"No, we attacked them with *mean words and fascist thoughts* so therefore, they are reacting defensive to our Nazism",dicaparly,e9dkjhj,conservative
It was literally on the first page of results when I Googled his name + Washington DC address. Anyone who wants to actually harm this dude is not gonna be thwarted by me not posting it. Everybody needs to realize that your address is an easily accessible public record if you're a homeowner.,Publix_Deli,e9dxahn,conservative
"Agreed.  Best thing to do is arm up and keep practicing.  When it all blows up we need to be ready and capable.

e: Also, if you aren't already, start working on your physical fitness, especially cardio.  Those tactifats you see at every gun show are going to be some of the first to fail when shit actually hits the fan.",anuser999,e9dfkh7,conservative
The difference between the mainstream right and mainstream left for me is that the mainstream right regularly disavows and casts out the extremists whereas the mainstream left is silent at best if not giving them dogwhistle (or even bullhorn) approval. ,anuser999,e9drxw4,conservative
I'm not following...,Sideswipe0009,e9e2kyc,conservative
And then get shocked when they get attacked too. Stephen Colbert had to be dumbfounded at the response he got. He thinks he has the left eating out of the palm of his hand and that he is their pied piper. He found out that the monster has a mind of it's own and it's Abbey Normal.,allnamesaretaken45,e9ds8c6,conservative
[removed],,e9e2t4s,conservative
"Seriously, archive ***everything***",Kilo914,e9e557n,conservative
Well the kid is black so...,cokernoodle,e9df6yo,conservative
"Yeah, I agree with you. I don't like divorce, but if you look at a child and think, ""abortion is a good thing"" the first time you are holding them, youre a sick person. ",molon-labe7,e9dco0h,conservative
"But you didn't make a counter-argument, your just insulting. He's saying people who want gun-control want people burglarized without protection. I font think you take anyone with an opposing view seriously.",Bad_Demon,e9dzqag,conservative
"Oh thank fucking god some good arguments. It’s been so long.  Not to diminish your position(if you are a conservative). 

I read both articles, and I’m seeing your point. It does seem to be a fairly popular opinion. 
That being said, I’m starting to see their point. Not the part about cops having their guns taken away, that poses some obvious problems. 
I care about being right, not thinking that I’m right, so I’m going to outline a potential argument below. 

Getting rid of guns would make it more dangerous for people to protect themselves from people that acquired illegal weapons. 
 I’d like to be convinced either way. I feel I’m too uncertain, and you can make a decent argument without insulting anyone, so I’ll give you the opportunity to prove me wrong. Use facts and studies, not news articles, unless they describe other’s opinions, like you did with the ones above. ",Adiustio,e9e1lb3,conservative
"The problem is that the liberals all live in the cities and the conservatives don't, so any attempt at a split is going to be hell. ",DraconianDebate,e9dile2,conservative
"I get the frustration, and yeah we are generations away from the Civil war... but maybe we should remember the level of destruction, lives lost, and blood shed involved before we talk about it so casually.  I know we're all hyped and angry.",polycarpgyarados,e9dhlfi,conservative
"What.... we have here, is... failure to communicate",srThoits,e9dltcb,conservative
"This cannot happen. We cannot become a divided nation and stay on top of the world stage. We need to rout the loud minority of Socialists/Globalists with extreme force or else we’re just going to end up China, Russia or the UN’s bitch.  America wasn’t founded for the world’s population to take advantage of and it seems the world needs reminding. ",James_Camerons_Sub,e9dhx8t,conservative
Split is declaration of surrender. You will be divided and conquered until nothing left for you. These are the wettest Russian and Chinese dreams. ,OlofPalmeBurnInHell,e9dg1m9,conservative
[removed],,e9dpcc1,conservative
"You obviously don't pay attention to many liberal countries, where self-defense can actually land you in jail, with potential prison time. Out in Europe, there are cases anywhere from a girl being arrested for using pepper spray to stop a guy from raping her, to a single mother being lectured by the police for waving her kitchen knife at some teens stalking around her house. ",uniquecannon,e9entsv,conservative
"I think people have forgotten that the WhitePages still exist in this day and age. I remember a time when anyone can just whip out a white phone book and look up anyone else's phone number and address at the touch of their finger tips.

Well, just for fun, I looked up his name + DC (literally his name and his city) in the white pages and up pops his address, phone number(s), and family associations. If this is what people considers to be doxxing, then boy did I dox a lot of my neighborhood friends back in the 90's when I needed to call them to ask questions.",PrestoPesto1,e9dxtlp,conservative
"Sure they won’t be stopped by not posting it, but you don’t have to roll out the red carpet either. Maybe I’m overreacting. ",Rinscher,e9e5o23,conservative
"I like Abbey Normal, she was a swell girl.",billyjoedupree,e9dwjos,conservative
"The supposedly ""doctored"" video is indistinguishable from the initial footage I saw *on CNN.*

> you were implying that liberals condone the Carlson issue

Again, please point out where I said that.  But hey, as long as we're going down that road, sure.  This situation is symptomatic of the narrative that conservatives are evil and that they deserve to suffer. ",LonelyMachines,e9e4cfm,conservative
"Liberalism is the ideology of racism hate and violence

Headcount:

Don lemon calls white people terrorists

Doubles down

Don lemon defends antifa

Vox calls for violence

Cnn says maybe jared kushner should die

Cnn calls cop shooter brave

Obama instigates shootings

*Add more below*",ExpensiveMention,e9du89i,conservative
"Exactly, I'd rather take my chances as a single mother than with someone that heartless.",Mewster1818,e9dcycl,conservative
"It's gross even if you replace abortion with some other pet political cause (though of course it's uniquely gross when it's abortion in this circumstance).  
  
Like your wife is giving birth to this new human who is half you, half your wife . . . and you're thinking about politics?  That's some fucking Soviet Union shit.",FelixFuckfurter,e9dqi88,conservative
"> Getting rid of guns would make it more dangerous for people to protect themselves from people that acquired illegal weapons.

In the US something like 13% of home burglaries are ""hot,"" meaning the residents are home at the time of the burglary.  In the UK it's over 50%.  This is because in the US there's a far higher chance you're going to get blown away when you walk into someone's house.  
  
",FelixFuckfurter,e9e33y7,conservative
Ignore this guy he is a troll,SpezTheSpaz,e9e27hj,conservative
"We don't have the regional coordination for a civil war like the last one.  We wouldn't have two countries fighting one another, it would be neighbor on neighbor chaos.  Even my rural Indiana small town had a few old ladies holding up anti-Trump signs by the courthouse yesterday(I found it amusing).  The economy would instantly stop, utilities would be cut off.  Our economy and daily life is heavily dependent on easily disrupted logistical networks.  It will be worse in the cities, but everything will have to be retooled and adjusted precisely when it becomes really hard.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9dlmne,conservative
"Oh indeed, indeed.  We'd be looking at probably moving huge portions of the populations of Chicago, Denver, Detroit, and Atlanta (at least) to the coastal regions that split off and moving lots of the ""upstate"" folks from those coastal areas inwards.  Lots of disruption, but still preferable to bullets flying and cities getting besieged and/or burned.",anuser999,e9dj70n,conservative
"> We cannot become a divided nation and stay on top of the world stage.

Ok, so we back off from the world stage.  Why is it our responsibility to lead the rest of the world, again?  Hell, all we seem to do is catch flack for it so I see no problem with letting the rest of the world take care of itself.

It's kind of ironic that you talk about rooting out the globalists and justify it with globalist views.",anuser999,e9di3lm,conservative
"> We cannot become a divided nation and stay on top of the world stage.

The nation is already divided, and maybe it's time to stop bringing ""democracy"" to backwards nations that arnt ready for it, and start dealing with those in our own country who have problems with a free system of government.",Silicon_Avatar,e9dksl8,conservative
"If anything that was probably their intention when they did try to sway elections, not so much pick a side, but make us out to be vulnerable.",polycarpgyarados,e9dhnkg,conservative
">ou gonna just start shooting? Kill everyone?
 
They are not a disciplined drilled unit of soldiers, they're a bunch of fat weirdos who spend their free time on twitter or popping SSRIs and xanax to for their 'ptsd'. When bullets start flying they would scatter.",FMERCURY,e9durc8,conservative
">I think people have forgotten that the WhitePages still exist in this day and age.

Lol yeah. I had the same thought. ""Doxxing"" is supposed to refer to someone revealing the IRL identity and contact info of an anonymous user on the internet. Everyone seems to have forgotten that it's still incredibly easy to find a person's phone number and address when you already know their real name and the city they live in.",Publix_Deli,e9dynbe,conservative
Becareful using the word liberalism. It’s been bastardized by the left.,Nerzana,e9dzpfg,conservative
"

When will obama disavow?


When will jim acosta disavow?

When will kamala disavow?

When will vox stop calling for violence?

When will biden disavow and stop calling for violence?


When will maxine disavow and stop calling for violence?

When will the view disavow and stop calling for violence?

When will slate disavow and stop calling for violence?

When will don lemo disavow and stop calling for violence?

Liberalism is tye ideology of hate violence and racism
",ExpensiveMention,e9duq1k,conservative
"I can't remember the details, but I remember something like that on Twitter a little while ago. There are these two media figures on Twitter who are brothers, and douches. I think their name starts with a V, but I'm not sure, they are known for saying stupid things. Anyway, one of them tweeted about how his daughter would be born soon, and in honor of her, everyone should either double down on the Kavanaugh hysterics or vote for Democrats, I don't remember which.",wolfman1911,e9dsmit,conservative
"That’s a good point. Are more residents killed in a home burglary in the UK, or is it pretty much the same?",Adiustio,e9e403o,conservative
"Yup.  There wouldn't be a clean secession, and it would end up looking more like the Rwandan genocide than the first American Civil War.  That's why I favor a peaceful split before we get to that point - if we don't we'll make the body count from all our previous wars combined look downright small.",anuser999,e9e0257,conservative
"Partly because the US with 4% of the world's population uses 20% of the world's resources? And that the rest of the world would love to increase their share? 

The US does not exactly want to take care of the world. It wants to take care of the Status Quo. It does so because the status quo was essentially set post WW2 in terms that were very favorable to the US. ",popfreq,e9dnwl1,conservative
Exactly.,MisterMouser,e9dvdd9,conservative
"https://youtu.be/m_q_Y0U1QcI

Milton Friedman said it best (20 min mark)",i_floop_the_pig,e9e0lt0,conservative
Is this meant for my comment?,Mewster1818,e9dy8hk,conservative
"Even if the residents aren't killed, you have a right to defend your property. ",chasemuss,e9e950z,conservative
"US is also 30% of the world GDP.

https://tradingeconomics.com/united-states/gdp

",ngoni,e9en7ub,conservative
"Good point. But doesn’t that endanger people that weren’t doing anything more that accidental trespassing? I agree that people should be able to defend their property, but should it be with lethal force?",Adiustio,e9e9yz6,conservative
You don't accidentally walk into people's homes ,chasemuss,e9eafcx,conservative
This shit right here is why atheists and anti-theists have such a horrible reputation.,Strait409,e9ghxaq,conservative
"Did sarah sanders “doctor” the video herself? No.

Was it doctored? Yes, obviously as any idiot can tell from a brief comparison with the original footage. 

I mean its from Infowars, who are of course well known as a bastion of honesty /s

Sarah Sanders is lying through her teeth. ",Veyron2000,e9m7lfo,conservative
Even more boxes of unattended ballots found by random people. Absolute clown show. ,YankeeBlues21,e9ffzxo,conservative
"The vote count is down to a 13K vote in our favor. This is a fucking joke.  I’m livid, Democrats are attempting to steal this election from us.",Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9fg7z5,conservative
"At some point, she needs to be forcefully removed. I think we are at that point. ",MaddSim,e9e6k9s,conservative
She's probably busy destroying the evidence as we speak.,Crusader_1096_2,e9e7og8,conservative
JAIL NOW!,scrubking,e9e6gr9,conservative
"Have. Her. Dragged. Out. And. Thrown. In. Jail. 

Prove we’re done playing with these leftists. ",YankeeBlues21,e9e6j9j,conservative
"Counts have to be submitted by Noon tomorrow.  Who else is expecting a 20,000 vote swing at 11:59AM tomorrow?",r777m,e9e8hlg,conservative
Arrest her now,BeachCruisin22,e9eccgp,conservative
"Won't the recount clear some of this up, or will the recount (for the county at least) be handled by her also?",justhere2havefun,e9en1yp,conservative
"Keep an eye on those garbage and recycling bins and don't let anyone collect them till this is all resolved.
This situation keeps getting more and more shady.",MooMooCudChew,e9e9by9,conservative
I'd bet on it. ,AddictedToGlue,e9e8jb8,conservative
"That would look bad. The left would have a field trip with that. We need more time, more shade to be exposed. We need more justification, just to be sure.",lancerelliott,e9ep875,conservative
"Investigators should be looking at dump sites, potential dump sites, and trash cans like you said within 5 miles of all county polling stations. They probably don't have enough personnel to do it though. ",Crusader_1096_2,e9e9ivd,conservative
She blatantly ignored the court order to turn over the ballots by 7pm. She is in contempt of court and should be treated just like any other criminal who ignores court orders.. throw her in jail and show everyone how seriously this should be taken.,habsfan102,e9eqrlq,conservative
No thanks. More time is all they ever need,JdPat04,e9f3dst,conservative
She also violated the law previously by destroying ballots involved in an investigation after being court ordered not to. She should've been in jail years ago,RAZRBCK08,e9f29cc,conservative
"“No, it’s cool. We found these ballots in a storage locker. We than transported them via private car to an undisclosed location. We’ll tell you how many votes we need. I mean get.”",_TheConsumer_,e9d7s1t,conservative
"Those who count the 20,000 ballots Brenda Snipes just found in her trunk decide everything. ",FelixFuckfurter,e9d7hct,conservative
"Adding mysterious ballots from out of nowhere after a loss is imminent and claiming “We must count all votes!” is “third world country stuff”.

They STILL don’t know how many ballots are left! There is no chain of custody for any of the “new” boxes. Discrepancies are being dealt with and are not allowing witnesses.  THAT IS NOT NORMAL. 

If we are going to use paper ballots, EVERY ballot needs to be accounted for at the time of poll closing. The boxes need to sealed with tamper proof seals signed by representatives of both parties to be delivered to the counting location. Every box needs to be logged in a log of ballots. Witnesses from both sides need to be present for this entire process.",r777m,e9de1nv,conservative
Couldn't be truer in Connecticut,zeile33,e9d6gn9,conservative
And they wonder why people don't want to vote. ,MountainsMan55,e9d4pst,conservative
how do you counter voter subversion/fraud?,mayorofcarmel,e9dbcbz,conservative
[removed],,e9drxel,conservative
"“fool me once, shame on you; fool me twice, shame on me” ... this is on the gop.  Should have anticipated that there was going to be an issue given that county’s history.",gt2xs,e9dt3mx,conservative
"AZ is like this rn, no real winner at the senate level. Our state treasurer “won” but the dem candidate is down a lot of votes but won’t forfeit until every last vote. She is sure she’ll win.",Jabronies96,e9deu7t,conservative
"What the fuck is going on? I'm not a fan of what the Republicans did in North Dakota (making it hard for Native Americans without normal street addresses to register to vote), but Democrats actually seem to be trying to steal the election in Florida and Arizona. Why can't we just have fair elections? It feels like we're turning into a third world country.",warner_bros_515,e9e51lr,conservative
"The State Department to a South Vietnamese President: Paraphrased: ""Please don't mess to much with the election"". He ""won"" with 98%. ",Fry_Philip_J,e9dr239,conservative
How come these recounts never help Republicans? ,VeganMcVeganface,e9dg46j,conservative
"Not that I disagree with the spirit of the post, but did Stalin actually say this?",for_the_meme_watch,e9doboz,conservative
"Stalin was the master of manipulating an internally democrat system. While the USSR itself wasn't democrat, until Stalin it still democratically chose members of the Secretariat, Central Committee, Congress, etc.. among party members. Stalin slowly took control of each administrative organ and put cronies in charge until he was able to manipulate votes.",JIDF-Shill,e9fazaw,conservative
[removed],,e9dykcl,conservative
[removed],,e9dnyow,conservative
I don't understand what this is.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9dg2za,conservative
"We shouldn’t keep allowing people who have staunch Democratic ties to keep counting the votes of every liberal, conservative, and independent.",DocMilk,e9dktzr,conservative
When did Stalin care about vote counting?,KaiserGrant,e9emieo,conservative
[removed],,e9dw6v4,conservative
This is an actual reason to protest. What are arizonians doing? ,11-Eleven-11,e9dvhz0,conservative
"This is rich,  considering that the Republicans are doing most, if not all, of the voting suppression. The majority of conservatives are Republicans.

I hope that you guys are proud of yourselves.",el_choclo,e9dbpoz,conservative
Tfw a communist dictator gets more right than the Democrats.,ATR2004,e9dopu0,conservative
[removed],,e9df8jd,conservative
"So, what happens now? Do those seats stay vacated next year, or do the Dems that currently hold them keep them? ",uniquecannon,e9dkfs3,conservative
"And the boxes were sealed.  But nobody recorded, at the time, the numbers of the seals.  And there were bags of seals just sitting around.  And the boxes were transported in private cars.

(With the implication being it would be stupid easy to grab some extra seals, take the box where you had stashed ballots marked as you wanted, then replace the ballots in the box with the ballots you had marked, and put another seal on.  Nobody is the wiser).",WIlf_Brim,e9df8bp,conservative
Well that's exactly how Al Franken got elected literally.  And they tried but failed with Al Gore.,LaLongueCarabine,e9dgd6k,conservative
Pretty much.,guanaco55,e9d7viz,conservative
"Makes me even wonder the votes that have been ""counted"" so far.

We need a better system",callthereaper64,e9dnjy4,conservative
Is this the 2000 election?,DB-3,e9ewyvs,conservative
Florida is run by Republicans. Aren’t they responsible for the ballots handling?,Alaska_Bound379,e9ddbph,conservative
"My state has voters feed their paper ballots through a scanner, except for absentees of course. The lack of a voter-created, timestamped, electronic record makes absentees the usual focus of these unnecessary crises.",eeeeeeeeeepc,e9ekxp8,conservative
It's 2018. The only reason to prefer paper ballots over digital is the chance of pulling these sorts of shenanigans.,Grond19,e9dt5yt,conservative
I’m kinda pissed Stefanowski didn’t fight it harder ,hulk_hogans_alt,e9e0qhv,conservative
or Georgia ,rapiddash,e9d7po2,conservative
"Automatic voter registration, making all electronic voting machines illegal etc.",aukust,e9dcx11,conservative
"Transparency, mandatory picture id, paper ballots, exit polls. ",GladysCravesRitz,e9ej4z0,conservative
"Arizona has become a farce and it's time we start re-thinking this early voting, mail-in stuff.  This is way too easy to corrupt.

Call me a traditionalist, but you should show up and vote on election day unless you have a compelling reason not to (ie. military service).  Open more polling stations to accomodate this if necessary.",nited_states,e9dm8qc,conservative
They gave them a month warning and informed them how to get an assigned address. There's a history of fraud in the area and they're trying to crack down on it. How did Native Americans get mail before this month? They never got any? They had plenty of time to reconcile this. The government informed them. There's no problem there.,noiwontsharemyfries,e9e6236,conservative
[removed],,e9dkov3,conservative
"Because two reasons: 

Democrats can't vote right. Seriously. I've seen some odd the random shit they circle on ballots during the MN groper recount. 

Second, fraud. Manufactured ballots. ",Moonthrower,e9e35x0,conservative
[removed],,e9dhlf7,conservative
"In Florida, a lot of it is counting ballots that are provisional, which tends to mean that the voter was too stupid to follow all the directions when they voted so now someone has to figure out if it's still a valid ballot even though the machine can't read/count it for some reason.

Who do you think will be less likely to follow written instructions between Republicans and Democrats? ",tmmroy,e9dtyy7,conservative
"\[...\] according to Bazhanov, was uttered in 1923 by Stalin in reference to a vote in the Central Committee of the Communist Party of the Soviet Union, was this:

“I consider it completely unimportant who in the party will vote, or how; but what is extraordinarily important is this — who will count the votes, and how.”

The quote is a rough match for the words commonly attributed to Stalin, with the notable difference that the context is quite specific. Stalin wasn’t speaking of elections and voting in general. He was speaking of a particular vote by a particular body.

While it would be a bit of a stretch to assert (given the vagaries of translation, the unreliability of memory, and the existence of earlier examples) that the sentiment “The people who cast the votes decide nothing; the people who count the votes decide everything” originated with Stalin, there is at least some evidence that he once said something like it.

[https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/stalin-vote-count-quote/](https://www.snopes.com/fact-check/stalin-vote-count-quote/)

P.S. [Snopes](https://www.snopes.com/) is an excellent website for checking facts as it tends to go in depth and link sources.",CryptoReindeer,e9dr9vq,conservative
That’s exactly the point. This is the type of man who subverts democracy.,hulk_hogans_alt,e9e0wt7,conservative
Apparently he 'counted' the ballots...,guanaco55,e9dqmjy,conservative
"Are you unable to look past the surface level of this quote and apply it to the current situation in Broward county?   
  
No one here is in support of Stalin, they're showing how similar this quote is to our current situation.  
  
",diehardgiraffe,e9dy34w,conservative
What’s next? Pol Pot or Hitler quotes?,iamstarkov,e9do4dv,conservative
"Whoa what's wrong with imprisoning citizens? That's how laws work. Let's not get all high and mighty about torture and killing either, lest we make ourselves look bad by comparison. ",RealWakandaDPRK,e9dv31q,conservative
Who are you talking about?,stehekin,e9dumyi,conservative
"I see that your level of debate rhetoric boils down to ""no u.""",diehardgiraffe,e9dy90b,conservative
Voter suppression...please share with the class,GodzRebirth,e9dem30,conservative
It's sad how intentionally ignorant you guys are. Extremely sad,Ledcookey,e9dfne8,conservative
"I'm so scared! QAQ There's no way just us armed Kulaks, military, and police can beat the neckbeards and their army of screaming feminists!",Rytho,e9dkrkh,conservative
Why would we trust Florida with anything having to do with elections at this point? They are terrible in Broward and Miami dade and they are terrible every damn time.,ChuanFaFist,e9dx3v5,conservative
Such compromised ballots should just be burned.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9dsiuj,conservative
"I don't think they had the process perfected in 2000, nor the corruption infrastructure in place at County level.

2000 Florida is likely what caused them to create, perfect, and spread the process. ",thatsnotminesir,e9dxnuh,conservative
"No.  Elections in Florida are run by the counties.  And Broward county is run, top to bottom, but Democrats.  And the election commissioner has already be sanctioned by the courts for illegal behavior (destroying ballots which were part of an ongoing investigation)",WIlf_Brim,e9dfb9x,conservative
"*Every* city and county is ""controlled by Republicans?""
",chabanais,e9ddjdc,conservative
"Nah, broward and Miami dade are Democrats. Debbie washerman Schultz is from there",ChuanFaFist,e9dx5xh,conservative
"I live in Florida, and that's exactly what I did.",JeremiahKassin,e9f659r,conservative
Digital could be manipulated too. Even high level encryption can have exploits.,hulk_hogans_alt,e9e0pl4,conservative
"To be honest, I am not really that upset with that. Do I think they skirted around the laws with the non-registered voters in line?  Yeah, but at the same time, most of the controversy was over people actually trying to vote.  I don't have a problem with that.  Before I went to bed around 1AM, I looked at which precincts hadn't reported, and how many they had left, and I was pretty sure that I was going to wake up with Lamont as the winner, so I am not as worried about the wet ballots either.

We are a pretty blue state.  I was hoping that he would somehow win because there was no real tight battles with our congress representatives, and combine that with Lamont being Malloy 2.0, I was hopeful.  But none of this is that surprising.

Florida is a completely different animal IMO.  ",r777m,e9efxl1,conservative
"Did they suddenly find ballot boxes in utility rooms?
",chabanais,e9d8k0f,conservative
"> or Georgia

Classic Whataboutism. Let alone that there's been no evidence of election fraud in Georgia, whereas there's clear evidence of it happening right now in Florida. The Dems are cheating and projecting their behavior onto the GOP as a deflection..",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9d9omd,conservative
I had to travel this year for work on Election Day. The mail in ballot allowed me to vote. I don’t know why that’s an issue. ,Found_My_Nietzsche,e9egdqa,conservative
"There's a pretty easy solution to voter fraud:  Fill out your ballot electronically, it's printed out, you sign and finger print it and drop it in the box.  Recounts consist of comparing the paper ballots to the electronic ones.  If they don't match, then you have fraud.  Scan the finger prints along with the paper ballots to look for people who voted multiple times.",StraightNewt,e9dqnj9,conservative
So if you go on vacation in November you lose your right to vote?,StephsGrandpaShoes,e9dy4xc,conservative
"Is [this](https://www.kfyrtv.com/content/news/Dozens-of-people-voted-with-false-addresses-committing-voter-fraud-435701893.html) what you're talking about? The article talks about voter fraud, but it seems like all that happened is that some people registered with post offices as their address because they don't have a regular address. I'm not saying it's a bad idea to require verification that people actually live there, but this policy change was made at the last minute (yes, a month before the election is last minute), and tribal leaders had to scramble to make sure people were able to register.

As far as how these people got mail before this election? They used a P.O. box. That's why they were previously using their P.O. box as the address to register to vote.",warner_bros_515,e9e6sv5,conservative
"How did they help him? He was ahead before the recounts, he was ahead after the recounts, and he was still ahead when the courts finally stopped the endless counting.",hello_japan,e9drzu6,conservative
That's not true. You shouldn't lie. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9dkhey,conservative
I don't know. Hopefully information will come out after this election.,VeganMcVeganface,e9dwmrp,conservative
"I'm always dubious about some of the quotes attributed to Stalin. I know that he never actually said, ""One death is a tragedy, a million is a statistic"" for a fact.",aivan021,e9dy6va,conservative
Chocolates’ over there is drinking the kook-aid,GlenGanges,e9dhun9,conservative
[removed],,e9dv49u,conservative
Is QAQ an appeal to the godly Qanon?,SeanTheAnarchist,e9do30h,conservative
">Florida is a completely different animal IMO.

Very true. Though I also was holding out hope that CT voters would get their heads out of their asses. Oh well.",hulk_hogans_alt,e9eixgh,conservative
The person counting the votes was running... ,rapiddash,e9d9msd,conservative
[removed],,e9dwgeo,conservative
"This was the case for nearly the entirety of the American republic.  If you prioritize booking a vacation for the election period, I guess you've made your choice.

Some states still do not allow early voting unless you have a valid reason.  Nobody's rights are being denied there.",nited_states,e9dyc5s,conservative
"Yeah I’m sure the legacy media will be totally non biased in their reporting of this.

In fact, the front page of reddit has nothing on the subject. CNN seems more interested in Jim Acosta and Stormy Daniels. Sadly, no one cares unless it affects their team ",hulk_hogans_alt,e9e0up5,conservative
"[Real quote 1](https://i2.wp.com/www.innovativewealth.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/10/Einstein-quote1.jpg?ssl=1)

[Real quote 2](https://i2.wp.com/www.innovativewealth.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/10/quote-abraham-lincoln-quote-internet-fake.jpg?ssl=1)

[Real quote 3](https://i1.wp.com/www.innovativewealth.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/10/use-the-force-harry.png?ssl=1)",CryptoReindeer,e9e1myo,conservative
"Wow! A Vox article?! I’m completely convinced and a hardcore liberal now! Gee, thanks mister!",MrPitman123,e9dxdrj,conservative
No detective it's a crying face,Rytho,e9do77w,conservative
He resigned yesterday. ,hisverbisdictis,e9dcb87,conservative
I thought there was a department filled with lots of people in charge of that.  You mean the candidate counted every vote himself?,chabanais,e9d9rgh,conservative
"Every vote not claimed 30 minutes after the election is illegitimate.

Not tabulated... just accounted for. Easy shit to say.

""This many votes are collected. Now we'll count the tally.""

To not report the total number collected right off the machine's 30 minutes after is to allow manufactured ballots. ",Moonthrower,e9e30g7,conservative
[removed],,e9e1a0y,conservative
Must be a millennial thing,SeanTheAnarchist,e9dwy4w,conservative
After the election,cucumba_water,e9dlnsk,conservative
Yes. That is what I am saying. ,rapiddash,e9d9uxc,conservative
"Typically something like Reuters I find to be ok. My issue with the specific arrival you posted is that they initially state that long lines are a scheme by Republicans to suppress voters, but I see nothing legitimate about that, I had things to do but I stood in the long early voting lines here in N.C. with no issue and nobody was leaving because it was “too long.” Another thing is them saying that requiring a free voter id us suppression witch is stupid because of the idiotic idea that it’s somehow more difficult for certain groups to obtain them. And they also complain that states like Texas don’t accept a student id for voting, but the author clearly didn’t think about the fact that you don’t have to be a citizen to have a student id, anyone from anywhere can get a student id  as long as they attend a university in the US.",MrPitman123,e9e8tnf,conservative
My Chinese friends keep using it and I end up forgetting it's not common here,Rytho,e9dyb2e,conservative
"I don't think he's personally counting anything.  There's actually an entire department in charge of doing that.
",chabanais,e9da668,conservative
Ya think?,rapiddash,e9daas0,conservative
"Yes, I do. You should try it sometime.",chabanais,e9dage4,conservative
You should stop being a snarky dick. ,ConsistentlyRight,e9dleom,conservative
Do we stil have Santa Anna's prosthetic leg? ,ozric101,e9fklwi,conservative
"Maybe if Graham keeps this tone and votes and acts the way he talks, he'll find himself running for POTUS in 2024. ",triggernaut,e9e0lts,conservative
"Just like what happened with Graham during Kavanaugh, Rubio seems to have finally had enough as well",tmv4,e9e5fxx,conservative
Fuck yeah Lindsey ,rharravs,e9e2bio,conservative
I fucking **LOVE** Graham!!! ,molon-labe7,e9dwoi3,conservative
He is like a new man. I think Trump instilled some courage in him. I would support him in 2024.,RexDoom,e9e4h8d,conservative
"I always wanted Rand Paul for President, but if Graham runs best believe I'm fucking voting for him.",cons_NC,e9e4oje,conservative
"I truly cannot believe how thoroughly my opinion of Lindsay Graham has changed over the past 3 years or so. I really used to dislike him, but he’s genuinely been a voice of reason in Washington recently. ",xavier_a,e9eanxg,conservative
"tell it like it is, Lindsey!",Terra_green2,e9e3zeg,conservative
"Go get them, Graham!!!",heartless_13,e9ggyuh,conservative
[removed],,e9eazv7,conservative
"Eh.  Maybe, but I think he burned too many bridges with the hardcore Trump supporters.",FelixFuckfurter,e9e1gs3,conservative
"He can talk all he wants, and while I appreciate his new tone, if he doesn't change his mind on immigration and take a hard line stance, I'm not voting for him. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9epxxd,conservative
He’s not potus material. ,Str8DonLemon,e9emegd,conservative
He is weak on immigration and wants amnesty.,JMB_was_a_god,e9ejuiy,conservative
"They finally realize the left isn't playing the same game by the same rules.  They never were, at least not since they began their cultural revolution 50 years ago.
",nited_states,e9e92ol,conservative
Best upgrade ever. ,TheMongoose101,e9ee0ca,conservative
"Which of the claims do you find credible? 4 out of 5 of the accuser's have recanted their story. Ford got a million dollar book deal. What a liar, just like Anita Hill. ",KrimsonStorm,e9ee6kq,conservative
">He claimed to have never drank or had sex in high school, and then classmates from high school came forward claiming that he was a wild partier

So their claims are more valid than his? How is this not just a he said, she said?",iluvfuckingfruitbats,e9eegd1,conservative
"Come on now, you're supposed to overlook that. ",nkn_19,e9eby4q,conservative
I think he rebuilt them with the kavanaugh hearings,shaqbiff,e9e3l2k,conservative
Agreed. I do think he’d be a legit contender as a running mate for someone who is though. He could absolutely be the Pence to someone like Nikki Haley or John James (a young minority type candidate). ,YankeeBlues21,e9emzq3,conservative
If this is what it takes to get them going... Then good! ,KrimsonStorm,e9ed20v,conservative
"As I said a few weeks ago, ""playing nice"" and ""compromising"" isn't getting the GOP anywhere. Kavanaugh was as ""establishment"" as you could get, and the Left tried to destroy him. 

Either conservatives hang together, or we all hang separately.  ",psstein,e9eevp9,conservative
Always install your updates. You never know what’ll happen.,JAK4189,e9ek6tb,conservative
[removed],,e9efjsr,conservative
[removed],,e9ecvgd,conservative
"He needs to support nullifing any votes counted after the turnover deadline.

Force the dems to comply",ExpensiveMention,e9efzih,conservative
Nicky Haley would be awesome ,steelallz,e9f967e,conservative
"Again, what makes their claims (which were not given under oath and are at best hearsay) more credible? If I used the same tactics and went around asking people if he was a party guy and X number said no then would they cancel out one for one? If not then what would be a fair and equal legal standard we could apply to perjury cases going forward?",iluvfuckingfruitbats,e9egaa4,conservative
You have to provide concrete evidence. Simply using hearsay doesn't cut it in any court. ,psstein,e9eeyr5,conservative
[removed],,e9eg8pd,conservative
Aaaand your credibility is shot.,smokejaguar,e9egfl5,conservative
Which he claimed to be flatulence. Quit your trolling. ,psstein,e9egxao,conservative
[removed],,e9eitpn,conservative
Urban Dictionary isn't an acceptable source. ,psstein,e9ekg62,conservative
[removed],,e9ekhu9,conservative
You using the WayBack machine to pull up UrbanDictionary from 1983?,jina100,e9eq7km,conservative
[removed],,e9eqkio,conservative
They did ask someone who did exist back then what it meant and the answer was it was a reference to farting. Now piss off with your leftist talking points since that's all you've been programmed with. Another mindless NPC.,PhilosoGuido,e9f7yvk,conservative
"I think the issue is that his public persona is odious.  He says some of the dumbest or easily contradicted stuff about minor issues and the media pounce on it and point to it as a black mark.  Some of the stuff he has done is great, but then the next day we have to read about some tedious life that the media uses to overshadow the issue.  

For example, Firing Sessions was fantastic, he was a black mark from a bygone era.  Next day I have to read that he denies ever knowing Whitaker, which is easily proved false.  Just stick to the truth and stop with the verbal obfuscation.",Falkamper,e9fovsp,conservative
I love trump,wpgcyan777,e9fm0zc,conservative
"I am never compelled to defend him, he defends himself well enough. People are too close minded to listen to what he says because of TDS.",Delta_25,e9g1mrb,conservative
There are a lot of things to criticize her for. This isn't one of them. ,BuboTitan,e9f9lhm,conservative
I'm not mocking her for this,aboardthegravyboat,e9f1gs6,conservative
Why doesn’t she “just pay for it”?,idabuti,e9elldp,conservative
As someone from the area DMV real estate is stupidly expensive not her fault on that front. She should do what her fellow millennials are doing and get a roommate or three,Twogunkid,e9emues,conservative
"I won't mock her for being poor, but that bitch sure is an idiot.",BrighamYoung,e9efct2,conservative
Can’t afford a place or not willing to live in a certain area she can afford,billswinthesuperbowl,e9emri7,conservative
Maybe she thought they were free.,Largo1954,e9ee96w,conservative
"Let her constituents create a gofundme page and collectively support her, isnt that what she ran on anyway",MonkeyWrench,e9eho87,conservative
We elected Trump because elitist filled Washington. She I dont agree with anything about this lady but it proves the point of Washington filled with rich elites.,Nonsenseism,e9f3yt3,conservative
She's going to be a Rep until she's as old as Maxine Waters. That's crazy to think about. ,SickofInternetProgs,e9eoz67,conservative
Soros will find her a place. ,oldschool54,e9ehdmv,conservative
[deleted],,e9eo6an,conservative
Bernie should let her crash with him. He can even share his pudding!,Rabidraccoon76,e9ei3jo,conservative
And she's about to make more than double what I make. Amazing. ,soxfan90,e9ej3zx,conservative
"They are now trying to play this off as a ""joke"".",justhere2havefun,e9en4rv,conservative
"There's about 40 congressmen (mostly men, mostly republican, but some women and some democrats) that sleep in their offices. Seems prudent, unless you're planning on living in DC full-stop and ignoring your constituency.

There was an NPR article about it a few years ago, but now the news and Democrats have taken a hard stance against it. I guess because fuck republicans and anything they do. ",haplogreenleaf,e9f3q73,conservative
"I got a job as a public servant in NYC, moved to the 5 boroughs from out of state. Got to work my first day to find out our first paychecks wouldnt be coming for a month and a half. The next day we were forced to pay for $1,000 worth of required equipment. I spent more money in rent, gas, moving, and the essentials for this new job than I made in my first 3 months. This girl had months to prepare her finances, maybe she should re-evaluate the type of apartment she’s looking to live in. If she wants to represent the “working class” maybe she should live like us. ",rpm3311,e9eotc7,conservative
The left is touting this as the millennial struggle.,R0binSage,e9ekdqo,conservative
"She could probably set up a ""GoFundMe"" and she would have the funds within 24 hours. Not sure how that would work, but  her followers would probably do that. ",powpowbang,e9fg205,conservative
"No shame in living outside of DC. No shame in riding the Metro to work. Ride and walk among the people, Cortez. This will humble your stupid ass enough to make you wonder whose side you are really on",ENEB1487,e9fzkfy,conservative
Government paycheck = taxpayer funded paycheck. Reality check for us...we are literally paying for her to be in office.,cons_NC,e9eo1iy,conservative
Yeah you cant knock her for not having the resources but we can mock the fact she wants policies that will hurt the rest of us without having any way to pay for it. She knows nothing but talking points. How on earth does she have a degree.,KaiserGrant,e9epreg,conservative
"Surely some loyal supporter of hers would house her until she gets her first paycheck. I'm sure they would consider it an honor.

edit: I'm curious, why the downvotes?",MisterMouser,e9ehz8q,conservative
"How the hell did someone this stupid ever get a government position? They hate Trump but Trump was successful outside of politics. This woman knows nothing and has a poor understanding of basic economics. Her federal guarantee of a job is the most laughable proposition. She is aged 29 and can’t afford three months rent ($6,000)? This is an absolute joke. Now she’ll be making $174,000 to basically come up with fairytale ideas. “You just pay for it.” Sadly, we will be paying for your stupidity, indeed. ",KingFlashBolt,e9eq96j,conservative
I’m curious what she did for a living before the election.,MyCustomUsername,e9en660,conservative
"Come on Alexandria, ""You just pay for it.""",Odoacer476CE,e9g417r,conservative
She literally can’t even,booblitchutz,e9fgkg9,conservative
"A quick scan of DC Craigslist reveals plenty of rentals available for under $500 a month within range of metro public transport. What, she's too good to live in College Park? ",Trucker_with_a_cat,e9f3weh,conservative
"Typical Democrat, doesn't save money for six months living expenses. Sell your $3500 pant suit, fraud.",BrigGenMordecaiGist,e9f69th,conservative
Of course it is. Can't she sleep in her office like the Speaker of the House and not whine about not being able to afford some fancy apartment? ,BudrickBundy,e9f9srb,conservative
"She cant find a ""suitable"" apartment, meaning she doesnt want to slum it like the rest of us when we cant afford things",notviolence,e9f1xw2,conservative
You make fun of her but YOU will just pay it.,sjwking,e9ewr80,conservative
ayyyye... *this* comment ,nateclineo,e9eorei,conservative
"She’s from  WestChester, I don’t feel bad for her. Just another Champagne socialist. ",teddyrooseveltsfist,e9ei6vh,conservative
"I'll mock her for being poor while also being a Socialist, because you know she has a poor work ethic and is just sitting around waiting for handouts.  At least a poor Capitalist is trying to participate in the best known system to raise people out of poverty.

She'll get a GoFundMe if she doesn't have one already and take more money from people.",Telineye,e9enzpe,conservative
Ding ding ding! We have a winner!,ngoni,e9eof53,conservative
Whining about it publicly was most likely her way of asking some rich Democrat party ~~suckers~~ donors to foot the bill. ,BudrickBundy,e9eeb2m,conservative
"Which is pretty hilarious, seeing as charity is the opposite of socialism. ",skarface6,e9f5325,conservative
[deleted],,e9ehqvs,conservative
"You realize virtually all photo shoots are done with clothes provided by the agency, right? She didn’t purchase those. ",iamamountaingoat,e9eu7kw,conservative
I’m already cringing at Ben’s impression from reading that.,MyCustomUsername,e9en72y,conservative
"I could run for office like she did, win, and take 1 year's salary to pay off all my debt, buy a house, and still have some left over. All for convincing a few thousand people she'd be better than a guy with actual experience.",justhere2havefun,e9en4ax,conservative
She will use her campaign contributions ala bernie ,Isredditreal2009,e9eqax7,conservative
We're literally paying for 535 members of Congress to be in office...,bigpappabagel,e9ew361,conservative
"Most of them proposing legislation contrary to our interests and then making us pay the bill.

It's one thing if government just wastes our money, but another when they spend it against what we want and then require us to pay for its expansion year after year instead of addressing our needs.",joey_diaz_wings,e9f0zk7,conservative
"Yes you can. She graduated college in 2011. She has worked for several non profits and politcal activist groups. That means she has connections and resources. Yet she whines about 3 months rent. Yeah, 3 months rent in a nice neighborhood. She has options she she isn't willing to take because she's a lazy socialist that expects handouts. ",Rightquercusalba,e9f042j,conservative
"She's a woman of color, and her entire district was willing to cut loose the 3rd most powerful Democrat in the country just to get rid of a white male. ",grewapair,e9esiks,conservative
"I think it was waiting on tables, university before that iirc",ConservativeBrit,e9err1y,conservative
"Apartments there are really expensive.

Some in congress have roommates so hopefully she does that.",highonstress,e9f8fsd,conservative
There are no affordable places in DC. It is absurd. Freaking government leaches have driven up costs super high. Trump needs to drain that swamp.,Nonsenseism,e9f43yh,conservative
Ever seen a horse bite a carrot?,MacTCarnage,e9ei5ti,conservative
Crowder’s impression is even worse. His Bernie sounds like Gilbert Gottfried. ,Ravens1112003,e9f0d07,conservative
Plus whoever used to be in office. They have a nice retirement plan. ,skarface6,e9f56p4,conservative
"They call that ""progress"" because it is anti-majority, which is an important part of their platform.

Whatever the majority prefers must be destroyed and replaced with its opposite. It's a slow revolution gradually adopting third-world levels of civilization.",joey_diaz_wings,e9f143w,conservative
Lol man around the capital beltway there are a number of options that are sub 1500 a month. ,Penuwana,e9fjals,conservative
I seriously spit out my coffee laughing at that,vash4884,e9eo1ju,conservative
He does that on purpose. ,skarface6,e9f54a2,conservative
That’s the point,i_floop_the_pig,e9f0h7b,conservative
"She has to maintain a residence in home district as well and she’s from NYC.

I wouldn’t want to pay $3000+ a month in housing just to live in a 1 bedroom.",highonstress,e9fl1gu,conservative
Is it? I don’t listen to him all the time but it makes more sense if that’s what he’s going for. I’m always wondering why he’s doing a Gilbert Gottfried impression but then I find out it’s actually his Bernie impression. ,Ravens1112003,e9f0m45,conservative
"Most of NY-14 is a shithole. There's plenty of cheap for NYC  rentals to be had in Jackson Heights, East Elmhurst, or Parkchester.",Odoacer476CE,e9g4roy,conservative
That's what the pardon power is for. How is this a problem?,Odoacer476CE,e9g54jk,conservative
"In my opinion, a sheriff who intentionally refuses a detainee request for an illegal immigrant should be prosecuted for negligence if that illegal goes on to commit a crime.",searanger62,e9e10e5,conservative
"""But it's ok because some illegals only drink and drive""- The Left",orangeeyedunicorn,e9e3sr0,conservative
"The families should sue the city, the police, the mayor, and anyone else they can.  I will donate to their legal fund.",FelixFuckfurter,e9e1dpe,conservative
"There's a channel I like watching on Youtube that's called Police Activity.  While morbidly entertaining, it shows the public just how dangerous a policeman's life is and how necessary it is for them to be highly prepared for anything.  


[It's a job where there's a high chance you'll get shot at by people who turn out to be criminals.](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Hw5XeHRG864)  


I would love to have ICE release bodycam footage of their operations.",markcocjin,e9egydl,conservative
I'm sick of the dem's line that undocumented immigrants commit fewer crimes than the average community. Every illegal immigrant (barring very small children or people being trafficked) committed a crime by coming here illegally. It's basically a 99% crime rate and every other crime they commit just adds on top of it. These stories are not *supposed* to happen because illegal immigrants are not *supposed* to be here.,greatatdrinking,e9et5p9,conservative
Another proud moment for the Democrats ,TomahawkSuppository,e9fzbtu,conservative
Yup. And the families need to file suit against the relevant depts/agencies. Those murders were completely preventable and they're culpable. ,WPWeasel,e9e1gj9,conservative
"Most of our losses came in the midwestern suburbs and the SW (AZ, NV, Orange County). There’s some kind of demographic issue where suburban voters stopped caring about the economy the moment we fixed it and prioritized not having to defend Trump to their weekend golf friends. 

The biggest policy failure was healthcare. McCain screwed us and prevented us from proving we had a better solution. The Dems maintain a significant advantage in polling when it comes to which party is trusted on that issue. 

Besides that, it seems that most people just don’t have the stomach to draw a line in the culture and constitution and go to war with the left for a decade or two. It’s why “moderates” allow themselves to be dragged left by the fringes, because they’re afraid or unwilling to stand in front of the left and yell “stop!” They’d rather a far left media/academia/entertainment/etc and some peace & quiet than have the Republicans punching back for lost ground every waking moment. The left did a damn good job of inculcating that sense of hysteria and crisis amidst one of the most successful periods in history. 

I don’t have a good solution...",YankeeBlues21,e9g0fvl,conservative
"No, we're smarter than that.
We know that the dumocrats have been putting roadblocks in his way for the past 1 1/2 years.
Two can play it that way...",Bubbacat7,e9fzoen,conservative
"So if Mexico is willing to help, why are they refusing?",cons_NC,e9gwzhd,conservative
">There are proponents of an Article V convention on the left who see it as a possible way to overturn the Citizens United campaign finance decision, pass the Equal Rights Amendment and otherwise address what they see as a stacked deck that has helped the GOP get an unfair advantage. **But with more red states than blue ones, it seems an unlikely path to abolishing the Electoral College, reengineering apportionment of the Senate or otherwise devising a democracy *they* believe is more reflective of the American public's views.**  

Honest admission (in bold above).",Clatsop,e9f58ys,conservative
"Why is it always fucking Florida??

&#x200B;",Qwawn72,e9e0a5p,conservative
"Snipes....""we don't care about no stinking constitution.""  What a disgrace and she will retain her job at $170K and never be held criminally responsible.",optionhome,e9e0gc4,conservative
He quickly does this article get deleted on r/politics?,R0binSage,e9ebqta,conservative
"Thank. God. 
If there's any justice in this world Snipes will be out of office by the end of next week.",xJownage,e9dx8hs,conservative
What makes you think the Dems care about the Constitution?,Snoochems,e9e4pks,conservative
You would think that she would comply with court orders.  If there’s nothing to hide.,Neanderthalbastard,e9e5n57,conservative
Why is it always fucking Broward County??,Orego,e9ebhp1,conservative
"I know people associate the Deep State with the Justice Dept and other federal departments, but it also identifies state workers like this- someone at the state level responsible for activities affecting their own state and others. This is why a massive overhaul in rules about hiring, monitoring, evaluating, and firing state and federal workers is long overdue. ",triggernaut,e9e0xjv,conservative
2 minutes.  The answer is 2 minutes.,R0binSage,e9eeb2u,conservative
"> out of office by the end of next week.

Out of office? How about behind bars.",optionhome,e9e0cos,conservative
But....we all know what isn't being said.  She has some undeserved clout.,rsroot,e9ebvme,conservative
"Why is it that these last minute boxes of ballots in unmarked envelopes always skew more Democrat than expected and more Democrat than the county average?
",nited_states,e9eje0x,conservative
I'm sorry,Okchud,e9eg4in,conservative
"I know,right.",Qwawn72,e9fc3fb,conservative
That’s insane ,jhayes8,e9ekfgs,conservative
"We did this already with Alcee Hastings. He was removed from his judicial seat by the federal government and Broward elected him to Congress 2 years later (where he’s sat for 26 years). 
",YankeeBlues21,e9e1309,conservative
Tastes like oppression with a hint of gulag.,GMU1993,e9fn23p,conservative
I see you've discovered Leninade.,DogBeersHadOne,e9frvtw,conservative
the only choice of a new generation,SKWM3000,e9gsoeb,conservative
This is full blown anarchy.,scrubking,e9eanxk,conservative
"So the question is why did the State or the GOP not have observers in place?
Both of these counties have a long history of voting irregularities.   
    
Seems to me, they are abjectly dysfunctional and, Marco Rubio said they are already in violation of Florida voting laws.      ",ozric101,e9eiugn,conservative
Russians and Republicans are the actual ones rigging elections /s,tmv4,e9edqsd,conservative
"The opposite, no?",King6of6the6retards,e9f2h9k,conservative
[removed],,e9dkkpq,conservative
Freaking Meuller publish your results already and end this clown show.,Terra_green2,e9dgv65,conservative
"I like what Shapiro said today. Donald Trump should fire Donald Trump, so that leftists would protest his removal from office.",Hayes_for_days,e9dvqdb,conservative
I saw a similar tweets from Nancy Pelosi going around on FB,kingdomchaser,e9dieb6,conservative
Honest question but do people still think Mueller is going to find anything? Like it's been 2 years...,Emperor_Aurelian,e9dpdua,conservative
Resigning = Firing?,Lives_With_His_Mom,e9dy02z,conservative
"What is a petition going to do?  If they were worried about an independent investigation, they wouldn't have chosen Mueller to run the thing in the first place",mlmack,e9djxyr,conservative
This is how they play the game,anonymau5,e9dkea8,conservative
Twitter remembers all......,squirreltoot,e9dw793,conservative
"WTF, I love Jeff Sessions now! ",TomToonami93,e9f3fbb,conservative
We must triangulate our thoughts and reframe them for the latest tweet!,JFGFNY,e9dujol,conservative
Your arguments are getting weaker by the day,mr_mcmanface,e9ekim2,conservative
To be fair she must have at least 10 different personalities. It’s hard to keep track of them all.,McFreedomWithCheese,e9emlr6,conservative
"True, but if he ""should have resigned months ago"", there should be no problem in him resigning now.",unityrootts,e9dsgma,conservative
Saving it to mess with the 2020 election. ,Emperor_Aurelian,e9dpfka,conservative
"If they don't like Trump/Pence, wait until they see Pence/Cruz.
",nited_states,e9e07xe,conservative
I think that's a huge oversimplifation. It's not hard to imagine (a) Sessions being a poor politician and (b) him getting fired for unjust reasons unrelated to point a. Which is exactly what we're seeing. ,Bilxor,e9ecwib,conservative
And no real leaks ,i_floop_the_pig,e9dqfgw,conservative
"“At your request, I am submitting my resignation.”

Sounds like a firing. ",cetamega,e9f1jn6,conservative
"I think the problem isn't Jeff Sessions resigning, but who he was replaced with, so they want the investigation protected. For what it's worth. ",Fastbreak99,e9dwv6j,conservative
I don't see any other answer than this to be honest. It's been two years and nothing has happened.,mcal24,e9edc7r,conservative
Issa joke,Hayes_for_days,e9ehkt9,conservative
Exactly. I'm not sure why this sub can't use common sense about this. The investigation should have been left alone. If there's nothing to hide (which I don't think there is) then the investigation should be allowed to go.,TheBarberOfFleetSt,e9e3pfu,conservative
So they get what they wanted but are unhappy with the result of getting exactly what they want? Thats called being a child.,Bejeweled_Bird,e9egnom,conservative
"The ""investigation"" is pure political theater and is an affront to America, Americans and every idea of American justice.",Odoacer476CE,e9e6wq5,conservative
[removed],,e9ej00q,conservative
"The ""nothing to hide"" argument is garbage. I believe the investigation should continue, but saying it should continue if he has nothing to hide is  a shitty argument and I don't think we should accept it, here or on a leftist subreddit. 

Either the investigation has enough credence and justification that it should continue, or there isn't enough to meet that threshold level and we should stop spending money on it. It's not about whether the guy has something to hide, it's about whether we should spend millions of dollars trying to uncover whether or not he has something to hide.",Downvotes_Everybody,e9e53xm,conservative
Has something affected the investigation? Or is this projection? ,8K12,e9edlmr,conservative
"I think there was a miscommunication here... What they want is the investigation protected after someone who is very adamantly against the investigation was appointed as AG. Sessions resigning was just a step to get to this point, not what they are protesting around.",Fastbreak99,e9eh7oh,conservative
How many of those charges were related to anything in 2016. The Manafort charge was from like 2007.,RAZRBCK08,e9f2kux,conservative
"So what did they expect if he stepped down exactly, one of them would be put in charge?",Bejeweled_Bird,e9eheir,conservative
"Does that discount them as crimes? Clinton didn’t end up going down for impeachment because of what was originally investigated, it was almost completely unrelated to the initial investigation. (Perjury for lying about the affair with Lewinsky was not related to the original scope of whitewater, the original scope was investigating Hillary and Bill’s real estate deals.) So I think it’s entirely fair to probe any crimes he (Mueller) might uncover during the investigation, and not shout down the line to end the investigation when it’s clearly bearing fruit.",failSafePotato,e9fh6ki,conservative
"Uh oh, he's about to get the Ye treatment.",project769,e9d48s5,conservative
He’s actually quite conservative and I don’t think people give him enough credit.,imabeautifuluglymess,e9eka86,conservative
"And yet, once again, they voted overwhelmingly for the Democrats. ",YankeeBlues21,e9d5m3t,conservative
What a racist comment. /s,anonFAFA1,e9ep2kl,conservative
"Black communities are being displaced wholesale in Texas by Hispanics. Education, political office, employment, businesses, you name it.  They have voted reliable Democrat for 50 years, and now this will sound harsh, but all they'll have left to show for it institutionally is a high representation in municipal jobs. 

Meanwhile Hispanic populations exploding under a booming economy in the private-public sector through construction and manufacturing. 

> https://schools.texastribune.org/districts/fort-worth-isd/


The fact the AA community voted 98% for Beto in Texas is the very definition of voting against the best interests of your people. 
",,e9d7fod,conservative
"Well considering that improving economic conditions of folks leads to a decreased birthrate. It then follows that by improving the economic condition of African-Americans, Trump is really attempting to commit genocide and population reduction. Just more proof that Trump is a white supremacist. /s

#This was sarcasm",Herr_Rambler,e9dm4n7,conservative
It'll be going down as one of the greatest economies in our recent history,MountainsMan55,e9d71bg,conservative
"Uncle Tom

/libtards",TheComedianGLP,e9dd9ym,conservative
Robert Johnson is an interesting person.  https://money.cnn.com/galleries/2007/biz2/0705/gallery.contrarians.biz2/7.html,turboderek,e9e1ykn,conservative
"No doubt. Pelosi thinks it was a sign that people don't want tax cuts that she has labeled as 'crumbs'. Not to mention the lefts love of importing illegal immigrant slave labor for votes, which affects the black community more that anywhere else. Get ready for the Democrats to start slowing down the economy.",MadLordPunt,e9dfvqc,conservative
"But they will eventually change their minds this time /s 

[Truth about Americas survival Demographics](https://youtu.be/GN_FOCF3vIQ) 

[Heritability of political views](https://youtu.be/3J2V2vnrEz0) ",EmperorBigly,e9fcbvh,conservative
"Its gonna take a long time to correct years of culture.

Honestly if Ben Carson became higer in the cabinet, it would move faster.",SuperFunMonkey,e9ej07h,conservative
"Might say something about the percentage of them that work, ya?",anuser999,e9dhp4w,conservative
"Yeah, as a party Republicans need to do a lot more to show black communities how their economic policies benefit them in the long run. ",BrosephStalin45,e9dgkf6,conservative
"Tbf our recent history includes the great recession, so it may not be 100% accurate to say that. The economy is still great though. ",BrosephStalin45,e9dgd3s,conservative
"First of all, not a very high bar. Second of all, the economy is cyclical. The fact that it's up during the Trump presidency has fuck-all to do with Trump himself. Especially considering the upswing started in late 2014 early 2015.",ERJAK123,e9euavg,conservative
And then voters will blame economic stagnation on Trump. ,YankeeBlues21,e9dgw2s,conservative
She assumes people would prefer nothing to crumbs.,indrid_colder,e9diqg6,conservative
"how would you say that republican economic policies help the black community? honest question, because I’m not sure they would help. ",addy_g,e9enx5x,conservative
That is such an infuriating thought.,Natanyul,e9dt5lm,conservative
No. Voters will just compare first 2 years of Republican control with last 2 year with Dem house.  Spot the difference,KaiserGrant,e9enzvc,conservative
"Sorry i didn't see your comment earlier, but encouraging job creation in lower skill areas is the best way to ensure economic growth in lower income communities. Once people gain steady employment, even if low paying, more and more opportunities open themselves up for people to take raises, switch jobs, and get an education. Until the problem of low skill jobs only being part time service jobs is fixed, people will continue to stay in poverty. ",BrosephStalin45,e9ju1g8,conservative
"Not to be blunt, but isn't the title of this article the answer to your question?",AManHasNoFear,e9eqbwr,conservative
And yet you know it’ll happen because the media will hammer that line home ,YankeeBlues21,e9dtghl,conservative
"They can’t view trump objectively at this point. We just saw suburban women flip to the Dems in the midterms because “muh temperament”, while America as a whole forgot the economy was even an electoral issue in large part due to unified GOP government actually improving it. ",YankeeBlues21,e9eok2k,conservative
"They arent lost. Trump has been the media most reviled target since 2015. They have called him everything and accused him of crazy shit. Hes been called unfit. We were told for the last year that the midterns will be the time voters correct the course. They will realize what a mistake they made. A blue wave was coming. Well after all that talk, threats and accusations from Dems/media, no such thing occured. In fact, the GOP gained seats and nobody can deny that was because of Trump. GOP won governorships due to Trump.  Yes Dems won the House. Iys amazing thats all they won. Obama lost 63 seats in 2010 and won handily in 2012. Different factors come into play when the presidency is on the ticket.",KaiserGrant,e9eqagd,conservative
You mean this ISN'T real? 😂,heartless_13,e9dq23k,conservative
Find yourself somebody that loves you like Jim Acosta loves Jim Acosta,ripinpeppers,e9dt06v,conservative
\*smugly\*,anonymau5,e9do8fr,conservative
"Kinda tired of hearing about this guy, that push was questionable enough that CNN will keep him on for a bit, then quietly fade him away. ",PatsFever,e9e4l2j,conservative
First thing on the internet today that actually made me laugh lol.,INTP36,e9e4k0s,conservative
Why is this news?,nukalurk,e9eq4kq,conservative
Babylon is 100x better than The Onion ,sasquatch_pants,e9esm0k,conservative
Can we stop clogging this sub up with these babylonbee articles? They were funny at first now they’re just annoying. ,rpm3311,e9ec069,conservative
May literally be impossible.,soylent_absinthe,e9dtwpa,conservative
"Nah, Acosta has been around for ages before thos and he will remain on for ages after. Does Acosta look like the kind of guy who wants to fade away?",n0rdic,e9e698w,conservative
"If you disagree just downvote. There's not that many offtopic posts on this sub, babylon bee is a rare exception. I know in RES there's a way to filter out flairs so you can filter out ""SATIRE"" if you wish. ",Glochidiate,e9etjmf,conservative
"Its not that rare, it was rare when BB first started now its getting annoying. ",rpm3311,e9eu3i0,conservative
"[Here's something that will help.](https://www.reddit.com/r/Enhancement/comments/2shv9g/is_there_any_way_blockhide_all_posts_of_certain/cnpo5aa/) You can block certain flairs on specific subs. I do it all the time for politics in subs not related to politics because it's usually awful. Just type the flair ""SATIRE"" into the sub and make the sub ""r\conservative""

Hope this helps.",Glochidiate,e9eu87k,conservative
"I have to admit, he's a tier one level troll.  ",jedichric,e9dc9hc,conservative
">Russian Facebook accounts advocating for both sides

Definitely election hacking

>Fabricating and destroying votes

Of no concern",unityrootts,e9di8ou,conservative
In the Donald they asked why they only find liberal votes and never Republican. This is definitely sketchy,MountainsMan55,e9ddcf1,conservative
[Reminder that the left were legitimately pushing this *before* the fucking midterms even happened.](https://imgur.com/a/J6nmjOC),JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dlfro,conservative
"CNN in a few hours: ""Trump racistly admits Russia hacked midterm elections!""",XYZ-Wing,e9dn9sp,conservative
Trump on fire. lol. ,Terra_green2,e9dh3tr,conservative
"Mr president, i love your shitposting.",realtsuke,e9e07b0,conservative
"The man's a shitposter now.

And to think he couldn't get any better.",JeantheDragon,e9e9dvr,conservative
"LVL9000 BOSS TROLL.

Love it!",TheComedianGLP,e9dhclc,conservative
Democrats are in the process of cooking the books in their favor. They don't want 'Russian meddling' to taint their fraudulent results.,ngoni,e9dz4sn,conservative
He's making an excellent point.,chabanais,e9dd9ze,conservative
"Actually in the Gore/Bush debacle, didn't they get a lot more republican votes after the recount? So Bush won by even more than he did the first time.",JobieWanKenobi,e9dsy87,conservative
"Putin WANTS us to be divided and fight over the midterm election results. That's why we should just Count Every Vote™ and Accept The Results© so he won't have his way. Are you suggesting we endanger our democracy by securing the voice of every voter? - (D) shill, probably.",toxeia,e9dros6,conservative
"Almost worse, from NPR: [As Florida Races Narrow, Trump And Scott Spread Claims Of Fraud Without Evidence](https://www.npr.org/2018/11/09/666018707/trump-scott-spread-claims-of-voter-fraud-as-florida-race-narrows)",Gizortnik,e9ewm0m,conservative
"Agreed, but the level of troll on this is just epic. ",jedichric,e9ddik6,conservative
"Different groups got different results depending on who did the recount. One of the problems of having a subjective interpretation of the ballot is that people disagree on what it means when a chad is hanging, dimpled, pregnant, or whatever. Did a voter try to push the stylus through and fail to make it all the way? Or did the voter start to puncture the chad and then change his mind and decide not to vote for that candidate? No way to tell after the fact.",Martbell,e9dwqtl,conservative
He knows how to effectively be sarcastic.,chabanais,e9ddoa9,conservative
"> Or did the voter start to puncture the chad and then change his mind and decide not to vote for that candidate? No way to tell after the fact.

This is why I don't get the reason people are 100% for paper ballots.  Democrats would have a much harder time ""shipping in"" ballots if they were made of bits and bytes.  Surely we can use voter ID laws and block-chain cryptography to near eliminate voter fraud and election tampering.  

Sorry leftist, Russia buying a few facebook ads is not election tampering.  If it is, I hope you go after facebook itself for election tampering due GOP page purge.  You know, so you show you are consistent and stuff.  ",PerceivedShift,e9exrdj,conservative
"I can't wait for Ben Shapiro to say ""How dare the President say something like this.""  The GOP backed Trump because he fought back and did things like this.  ",jedichric,e9de3dq,conservative
I'd actually make you a $5 charity bet that he laughs at it.,FelixFuckfurter,e9df9e3,conservative
How dare someone have their own opinion.  ,stopher_dude,e9dg1kg,conservative
Ben Tardpiro.,chabanais,e9de6qa,conservative
I'll pass because I'm probably wrong.,jedichric,e9dmc1g,conservative
"He will say ""its just not helpful""",KaiserGrant,e9eo29n,conservative
"Oh, I assume you've never criticized anyone over their opinion then.",shatter321,e9dg4e2,conservative
Ben “white knight” Shapiro. ,Zac1245,e9dh9vb,conservative
What do have against Ben?,elcuban27,e9dh46c,conservative
"Episode is up now, will let you know.",FelixFuckfurter,e9dmy32,conservative
"That wasn't a criticism over his opinion, it was a criticism over something he never even said.  It's also good not to agree with everything Trump says and does, and to lambast someone for criticizing what he doesn't agree with is fool hardy.  ",stopher_dude,e9dm7u0,conservative
The white knighting is BS. He behaves like he's the only person who knows what real conservatism is and protects the hell out of the establishment GOP,Jswill16,e9drkl8,conservative
"People don’t forget that he didn’t vote for Trump in 2016 (even though he says he’d probably vote for him now and that it was an easy choice because he voted in California). Ben Shapiro is fairly positive towards Trump these days, but only when it’s warranted. 

Plus his forecasts were wrong about the Kavanaugh situation, which I think Shapiro owned up to. 
",skarface6,e9dp1de,conservative
"He makes himself sound like a moron when he imitates Trump on his podcast.
",chabanais,e9dhbl6,conservative
... So was he wrong?,HighLatencyRaptor,e9eb0eq,conservative
">That wasn't a criticism over his opinion

>How dare someone have their own opinion.

🤔 

Nobody said you had to agree with everything he says. We're saying it's foolish for Shapiro to *constantly* rag on Trump for not being ""presidential"" when that's precisely what got him elected.",shatter321,e9ejg4m,conservative
"Someone here a while back described him as conservatism's self-appointed hall monitor. I think that describes him perfectly. Overall I'm a fan of him, but he can get a little annoying, especially in regard to Trump.",GuitarWizard90,e9dyoc7,conservative
The second part is so true. I just hate white knighters. Like my biggest pet peeve in The whole world. Plus women generally don’t even like them anymore than just a friend. Which is the hilarious part. ,Zac1245,e9drtf7,conservative
His Trump impression is ok.  Not the best.  Good thing he is a political commentator and not a comedian whose whole act is impressions.,elcuban27,e9dk6ma,conservative
It didn't come up.,FelixFuckfurter,e9gw32m,conservative
"Not to pile on Shapiro (overall I like him), but today he touched on one of the things that bugs me about him. He claims that young people, otherwise open to voting Republican, *hate* Trump and that the president poisons the brand for them. 

....so, what’s his solution? Trump is the first person to genuinely take the cultural and political fight to the left’s territory in my lifetime (I’m 25, well within this group that’s supposed to hate him). I opposed him in the primary, and was skeptical at best after that. But he’s proven to be a champion against a left wing that’s tearing away at the social fabric of America. Sure, sometimes he shoots himself in the foot, but at least he shoots. If people are turned off by belligerence, how does the left keep winning and moving the Overton Window their way? Ben offers very few workable solutions when he criticizes his allies on the right. ",YankeeBlues21,e9ec29n,conservative
"Too bad it undermines his commentary though. 

I also find his ads dumb. Just run a regular ad don't try and make it sound like you give too shits about term life insurance or survival food or bed sheets or whatever.

",chabanais,e9dkptb,conservative
Ah.,HighLatencyRaptor,e9gycbz,conservative
"He doesn't realize that they would feel the same way about any Republican president. The hatred really started ramping up during George W. Bush's presidency, and a lot of younger people have been conditioned to hate Republicans and conservatives. They've been taught that we're the enemy of science, minorities, women, and only care about helping rich people. This hatred and hysteria would still be happening if Ted Cruz were president. To an extent, it would probably be happening even to a centrist like John Kasich. If you don't align with the left on every single issue, you'll be targeted by them.

Ben is targeted by crazy leftists on a daily basis. You'd think he'd have a better understanding of what's going on. ",GuitarWizard90,e9ecmr1,conservative
"No harm in a little respectable hustle... regardless of if he cares about those things or not he has staff to pay and a family to provide for, it's a silly sticking point to have.",Mewster1818,e9dlb9s,conservative
The ads are every 10 minutes or so.  Just run regular ads like every other broadcast.,chabanais,e9dlw23,conservative
Is it just those things that you don’t like? What’s are your thoughts on his actual opinions? ,Dux-,e9dsca4,conservative
"I think he's a great analytical thinker.  He has a very factual based approach to refute Leftist talking points.  I think he's fair when he says things like Trump's personal life isn't an issue because people knew what they were getting when they voted for him.  He does use the phrase, ""baked into the cake"" too much, though.  I think he uses the same standards when judging Left and Right.

So these things, I like.

I think he relies too much on facts and statistics to make his point.  I think he speaks like he's stabbing someone and he should slow down.  

I listen to Tucker Carlson's show most days but I only listen to Shapiro's sometimes because, at the end of the day, Shapiro is more science than art and Tucker is more art than science and that appeals to me more.

Analyzing Trump requires more than cold, hard facts and an unwavering standard and that's why I think Shapiro kind of misses on him.

Would you rather listen to Spock or McCoy?  For me, it's the later.",chabanais,e9dtshd,conservative
"Spicer implicated of destroying opponents ballots in 2016... but still honest enough for 2018

#DISGUSTING",lax714,e9ebmcw,conservative
"Is there fraud? I don't know. But I must say this. This is two important races in the same damn term, that had decent leads reversed..... Days later. There are supposed to be guidelines and processes to prevent this sort of thing from happening right? We should be counting friggin votes days later.... Votes that weren't counted yet. This is pathetic. And fraud or no fraud, people should be held accountable ",MaddSim,e9edgnc,conservative
I was willing to give the benefit of the doubt until she refused to comply with the court order amd wont let anybody in. If youre on the up and up you dont pull a move like that. ,iwasthebeaver,e9egj79,conservative
"Bingo, the vote from there is far to likely to be tainted at this point, the only reasonable thing to do is toss them all. ",ozric101,e9ei957,conservative
"And just like that, the main stream press wont be interested in reporting Comey news. ",MaddSim,e9eprj8,conservative
"Oh Jimmy, you corrupt tool",BeachCruisin22,e9f1o0g,conservative
This POS needs to be in an orange jumper,GlenGanges,e9f35oi,conservative
"You can't expect law enforcement to know what the laws are. How would Comey ever know he can't legally discuss sensitive FBI business in personal email?

At worst, his infraction was extremely careless.",joey_diaz_wings,e9f4npz,conservative
"Yeah, I'm sure that they'll get right on that.  

Just kidding, they won't.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9dv404,conservative
She's ignoring the judges order.,StraightNewt,e9e6gft,conservative
"Not yet prevailing, state is just now ordering a county to follow the law. ",molon-labe7,e9dunsq,conservative
"I'm glad something is being done but is it too late? They've had the votes for 3 days now, plenty of time to taint the votes in a manner that is not easy to prove.",nateious,e9ebbyu,conservative
"Are you implying ""Anti""Fa is economically literate?",MarioFanaticXV,e9d3vqf,conservative
"Paul Krugman is a lot of things but branding him as economically illiterate is simply foolish.  I hold a degree in econ from a school with a pretty right/libertarian leaning econ dept, and we used one of his texts in one of my classes.  

You can say he’s an idiot in the things he writes in his *political* columns but I can assure you that as an economist he’s held in pretty much universal high regard.",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9dnagv,conservative
[removed],,e9dfu2l,conservative
"Krugman, LOL  
  
The guy really does need to seek professional medical help.  He's living in a giant mansion, getting paid a fortune to write the same column twice a week, and yet he's LARPing as Winston Smith.",FelixFuckfurter,e9d1a5g,conservative
[removed],,e9dhafl,conservative
[removed],,e9d5pl9,conservative
Krugman should really be swapped with AOC. Only someone like her is so arrogant as to be able to deny her absolute lack of knowledge about a subject. Maybe change it after her inauguration.,PrecookedDonkey,e9dnm71,conservative
I’m stealing the f**k out of this and having a shirt made. This cannot be stopped.,DarthNaseous,e9ersy8,conservative
Flawless.,TheComedianGLP,e9dhj36,conservative
Can we keep this on 69 upvotes lol,an_anime_twat,e9d9qhs,conservative
"LOL, if economic literacy means parading streets and damaging private property, then yes!",goldrotmgonly,e9dc1w6,conservative
The non-socialist Antifa members might be... if there are any.  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9delz4,conservative
[An oldie but a goodie](https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10001424052748703915204575103720332317434),Zeppelin415,e9dtlt6,conservative
I would say Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez works better there.,CreamyRootBeer,e9et8yl,conservative
Same here. Auburn University home of the Ludwig Von Mises Institute. I raise a toast to you.,N7_Starkiller,e9e9qlq,conservative
"There’s always been a regressive undercurrent that pokes its head out from time to time. However, I think the critical difference is that the classical liberalism on which conservatism is based is far more structurally sound that any leftist fantasy unicorn-topia that they think is possible if humans were completely different than they actually are. So, we might have some dumbassery too but at least it’s not foundational. ",gt4674b,e9dihpy,conservative
Because ~70% of the federal budget is entitlements and entitlement reform is a surefire way to lose reelection...The only chance for it is if we win 2020 and have all 3 branches of government.  Or perhaps a convention of states.,SkyrimNewb,e9e0voz,conservative
The problem with this Venn diagram is that Krugman is outside the mental illness circle.,rf-engineer,e9daxwg,conservative
Shameless plug for ContraKrugman. Fuck that guy. ,mkgandkembafan,e9dl54g,conservative
"But...   that has nothing to do with him as an economist.  Nothing.  Krugman writing about politics is kind of like, I dunno, if Stephen Hawking had come out as a super outspoken advocate of gun control.  We could say he’s wrong politically but that wouldn’t make him not be a brilliant scientist anymore.

I happen to hold a degree in economics(from a school w a very right wing/libertarian econ dept) and trust me, Krugman is widely acknowledged as one of the the top of the field.  Doesn’t mean that a single word of his *political* column is worth a damn.  ",mjrmjrmjrmjrmjrmjr,e9dnnn8,conservative
"Bwahahahaha!

LARPing as Winston Smith!

Fucking GOLD!",TheComedianGLP,e9dhmfx,conservative
"Those voices you hear are real, you don't need medication, people who don't believe you are bigots.


Or is this a joke that went over my head?",Dyeredit,e9dqyu3,conservative
[removed],,e9d7djh,conservative
"> keeping as civil as possible gives us a massive upper hand.

Because that's worked out so well the last 50 years...",Silicon_Avatar,e9d5yvh,conservative
"Sit down.

I have news.

You've been in a political coma for 40 years.

Things are different now.",TheComedianGLP,e9dhos9,conservative
"When they go low, we kick them? Right?",Cr8er,e9d5z0o,conservative
">keeping as civil as possible gives us a massive upper hand.

Yeah, not sure there's any evidence to support that unfortunately.

",soylent_absinthe,e9dtke9,conservative
[removed],,e9eao4m,conservative
They caucus with the Jewish Nazis.,TheComedianGLP,e9dhkpx,conservative
Does communist count as non socialist? ,NoFatChiqs,e9diz06,conservative
"I doubt you’ve ever read any type of leftist theory. 


Or any kind of political theory. ",MYAAH,e9dfr9o,conservative
"I agree, they aren’t AS BAD as their left leaning counterparts, however, I do think republicans are a bit silly on social issues. 

I can understand their arguments gassing abortion. At the end of the day it is killing babies. 

But on issues like marijuana, I really don’t understand why we want to waste tax payer money on housing these people in jail, and then ruin any chance of that person getting a stable job due to jail time on their criminal record. Seems pretty counter productive. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9dqahx,conservative
Do you mean like the idea of post scarcity?,mustang23200,e9djpw9,conservative
"You are so correct on that percentage. Many believe that the military is our biggest expenditure, which is completely false. 

Honestly I don’t have much hope. And we are borrowing at an insane rate. Either a) we raise taxes and nuke job/economic growth, or b) we wait for the debt to be so great, we default, and then our economy collapses and millions of people lose their jobs and we fall into one of the worst depressions of all time. 

I don’t see us ever cutting entitlements. So I don’t have much hope. Everyone wants their free bucks and they’ll keep voting for their free bucks. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9e158l,conservative
"Fair, although I tend to agree with the idea that he's a good economist who realized there was more money in being a naked partisan shill.  
  
https://www.forbes.com/sites/timworstall/2015/03/02/paul-krugmans-amazing-about-face-on-the-minimum-wage/#229c99e12583",FelixFuckfurter,e9deu66,conservative
">ContraKrugman

Never head of it before.  Thanks!",FelixFuckfurter,e9dlc1r,conservative
"I mean, he argues vociferously that the national debt is meaningless because we can print more money. So there’s that ",faint-smile,e9eibwo,conservative
"And those mean words make me cry so much.
",chabanais,e9d995x,conservative
[removed],,e9d6abu,conservative
Of course. Both extremities are essentially the same. I think we can agree.,goldrotmgonly,e9ej0su,conservative
"Nope.  I'm sure some people show up to Antifa just to ""bash the fash"" but are disappointed that Antifa is animated by an equally evil ideology.  God gave Americans two middle fingers so we can flip off both communists and fascists.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9djklc,conservative
I read that book Cheetoh Hitler.,chabanais,e9dhn59,conservative
Clinton significantly ramped up the drug war. It's not exactly a partisan issue. ,greatjasoni,e9dxuq8,conservative
[I posted this above. It's old but I think it shows how much of a hack the guy is](https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10001424052748703915204575103720332317434),Zeppelin415,e9dtpwz,conservative
I second this recommendation. Once I listened it immediately became one of my favorite podcasts. ,FreedomFromIgnorance,e9egljp,conservative
"Enjoy :)

Bob Murphy and Tom Woods are gods.",mkgandkembafan,e9dlenu,conservative
">Hello fellow conservatives 

We believe in free speech, so if you don't like something posted, downvote and move on. No one gives a shit about your condescending concern troll opinion. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9d8obu,conservative
"What ""right wing"" shooters? The pipe bombs were sent by crazy leftists, and it's kinda hard to get away from the ""alt right"" when far leftists call anyone right of Bernie Sanders ""alt right"".

There has never been right wing acts of violence. That's all fake news. It's all been coming from the left.",Gamephreak5,e9d74xg,conservative
"> God gave Americans two middle fingers so we can flip off both communists and fascists.

Love this.

&#x200B;",-Kerosun-,e9dq4qi,conservative
"The sequel ""Orange Man Bad"" is pretty deep.",tehForce,e9dr128,conservative
"Yeup. However, in recent years, only blue states have successfully decriminalized marijuana. It’s a very odd thing to lock someone up in jail for. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9dxx9l,conservative
">Former Enron adviser Paul Krugman  
  
Will never stop being funny.",FelixFuckfurter,e9duhsh,conservative
[removed],,e9dgqjk,conservative
[removed],,e9d7dhe,conservative
"I never expected the bad guy to be Russian.
",chabanais,e9drov2,conservative
"I think there are decent arguments for not wanting people to do it. They shouldn't be in jail, but it's not exactly a good thing to have in society. That wouldn't be an issue if our culture didn't encourage drug use and paint it as harmless and cool, but lately it does—largely as a reaction to the anti marijuana laws. ",greatjasoni,e9dzme9,conservative
"It's ok sometimes I think I'm autistic too, let me help you with this. 

That line is reserved for when someone makes a joke (take the venn diagram in the OP for example), and then someone condescendingly shuts it down or explains why technically the joke or meme isn't funny. Maybe it's offensive, or just factually incorrect, but who cares we were just having a little fun, right? So then you say, ""I bet you're fun at parties"" to imply they are acting like some sort of fun police and not letting others enjoy themselves. 

Hope this helps, in which case it sort of illustrates the person you should be applying it to is the poster I was replying to here. .. so maybe it was an accident and that's what you meant. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9dl1ow,conservative
"Regardless of whether or not it’s good for society is irrelevant. a free society should allow anything that is a personal choice, that affects no one else. And I don’t want to spend the billions or dollars policing and jailing people for a personal choice that doesn’t have anything to do with me or anyone else. The amount of damage that the drug war has caused far, far outweighs any cons that come with cannabis use. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9dzv39,conservative
"Ok, you got me. Don't worry, no tickets for you today",salderosan99,e9dmnuc,conservative
Facebook is a crumbling pile of garbage. They’re hemorrhaging active users. The younger generations think it’s old news anyway,IdahoHello,e9e2mtr,conservative
This is big tech play big brother.  The end game is America becomes a one party state where all information is censored and shaped in order to keep the ruling party in power forever.  First Amendment protections need to be extended to social media immediately.,StraightNewt,e9e5r34,conservative
"I understand Facebook is a private business, I know its publicly traded, but anyway it’s frustrating that this happens. 

Democrats control social media and the news media. 

People need to start their own due diligence on subjects, issues and ideas. Developing your beliefs because you saw something on Facebook or on tv is ridiculous. Take what you saw and research it! NOT WITH GOOGLE! ( another bullshit Democratic arm) or if you use google read more than the first few results. 

WAKE UP! 
",Chapka69,e9e2dg6,conservative
"But Facebook is a private business therefore we aren't allowed to criticize any of their practices. It's the same as if you go to Taco Bell and you don't enjoy your food. You can't complain because they are allowed to serve you whatever food they like. It's LEGAL therefore you can't have an opinion on it.

",xtotallynotashillx,e9e5jnb,conservative
"If you get your news from Facebook, you deserve this.",UltraSurvivalist,e9eakr5,conservative
"My wife had mentioned that the conservative groups she follows on Facebook were all shut down, she had to find where they were going and follow new pages, just ridiculous. ",Tenshi11,e9f6v22,conservative
I'm 35. Even my colleagues in their late 20s laughed at me when I asked if they used Facebook.,UltraSurvivalist,e9ealvy,conservative
Yeah my kids call it fakebook and say that only old people use it. ,keepitreal51,e9enbrv,conservative
I actually wrote a column for our school newspaper about that. ,GGtheBoss17,e9elnmk,conservative
and pop culture,Doctor_Dragonblood,e9e7xj1,conservative
Not sure if you are serious. ,Rightquercusalba,e9e8twk,conservative
Nope.  Social media is the equivalent of the town square or any public forum.  To censor it in favor of one political party is pure anti-americanism.,StraightNewt,e9e5nrg,conservative
"That’s another good point. People let these “artists” determine their thought patterns too. 

Because Beyoncé votes democratic, everyone needs to vote democratic. Your “talent” is hiring good agents. You didn’t get where you are because of your economic or political thoughts. 

Therefore I don’t need to listen to you. And if you say something that peaks my interest. I’m gonna do my own homework and research it

People literally walk around with computers in there pockets now a days. ( the way I see it, you have a computer that makes phone calls, not a phone can that use the internet). Swipe open that device and look something up, instead of looking as the same rejects on FB or instagram ",Chapka69,e9e8n9m,conservative
I hope Florida has some system of chain of custody for ballots or this election is already stolen. ,ozric101,e9deop0,conservative
Im glad Trump is getting in on this. It’ll be a most heinous crime for the Dems to steal the senate seat.,Dank_Cartographer,e9deqa0,conservative
Trump certainly has the best lawyers ,crippletown,e9dq8tf,conservative
"Hmm.  I wonder how Justice Kavenaugh will (eventualy) rule on this?  What an awesome Christmas present for the left wing whackos!  

HO HO HO bitches!",Saltydogusn,e9diybf,conservative
Guessing the FBI will take over with federal election and fraud issue.,Ted-the-Pirate,e9dgyor,conservative
"This is totally going to get twisted by the media.  Can see it now.

""Trump is using Russian laywers to expose Floridas corruption funded by Putin, to unfairly give Republicans unjust Senate Seat."" - Acosta",callthereaper64,e9eadll,conservative
No.,chabanais,e9dfdb0,conservative
Always Broward County.,chabanais,e9dfdxc,conservative
"Fortunately they got involved before the Democrats were able to turn the race for the Senate and Governor. Not surprisingly the votes have been pretty much static at .18% and .44% leads for the last 24 hours after Republicans started questioning it. Odd how that worked. They are gaining thousands without witnesses and after witnesses showed up and started scrutinizing the process, the thousand vote jumps stopped.

Unfortunately they were able to steal the agricultural commissioner position before Republicans caught onto the fraud, but at least it looks like they saved the Senate and Governorship.
",r777m,e9dgq5l,conservative
Always FloriDUH as well... ,ozric101,e9dnbjy,conservative
Always Democrat areas.,chabanais,e9dndb1,conservative
"What gets me is this county was already into election fraud trouble back in 2016, how did these people keep their jobs and nobody got convicted of any crimes?       
      
Seems to me this is the major problem, if you let things like that slide you just encourage more criminality.          ",ozric101,e9dnv47,conservative
Rick Scott has always struck me as a somewhat weak guy. I respect the actions he has taken. I'm glad he got on top of it this time. Dicking around with the current governors election was certainly a bold move though.,Blake-bottles,e9do4bn,conservative
Criminals investigating criminals.,chabanais,e9dqn2v,conservative
Isn't that any news outlet??? ,lyciann,e9d78ri,conservative
Change the peacock nose to an NPC nose. ,deathnutz,e9dipil,conservative
I laughed my ass off when I first saw this.,ponmbr,e9cz1fn,conservative
"The lack of symmetry on the magenta feather is bothering me. Also, the face of the animal is in the negative space.",rubncto,e9db6sz,conservative
I'm surprised no one has used it on the PBS logo considering how similar they look,-Shank-,e9d4gqx,conservative
This is fucking hilarious ,TomahawkSuppository,e9e90ck,conservative
Classic,deanbar711,e9ecmpj,conservative
"I prefer PMSNBC, but this one is pretty good too!",Rabidraccoon76,e9cw3e7,conservative
"Not gonna lie, I’m started to get tired of the NPC meme. It’s accurate, don’t get me wrong, but everyone and their dog is using it nowadays and because it’s so overused it’s being turned around on the people using it",i_floop_the_pig,e9d2i0n,conservative
I’m still partial to MSNBS.,GenericTexan117,e9d0vma,conservative
Beep boop.,TheComedianGLP,e9dbagv,conservative
"""A Proud Member of the Democrat Party Propaganda Department"".....",LVDave,e9d11qk,conservative
"""And that's a good thing""",richardguy,e9d5g7y,conservative
Oh my word. Lol greatness i see,steelallz,e9d7cfp,conservative
It never registered to me until now that the MSNBC logo utilized the rainbow,banebridge,e9dij92,conservative
Agreed.,DionysusThree,e9dc40y,conservative
"True, once something right-wing gets effective then it gets very boring. We should throw away anything that gets effective and only stick with ineffective things like trying to win more votes from atheists",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d5ffu,conservative
"Just like an overplayed song, it will come around again. Just hang in there! :)",8K12,e9d59xn,conservative
"""Look, we found just enough ballots in a corrupt county to sway every election in our favor. What a fucking coincidence!""",JGFishe,e9e17zt,conservative
how the fuck are these election officials still working there after the last several times they pulled this stunt?? rick scott had every chance to fire them all and replace them but never did it. ,haterator,e9e3vwx,conservative
"I’m just here to say I give up. We have a nation of cry babies that can’t stand working for anything. They look up to celebrities who sing and dance for a living and literally do nothing else. There’s no hope. Good bye, America. It was a good run. ",PrimateIsPro,e9dpt6e,conservative
They are locally elected positions. Rick Scott has fuck all to do with it. Let's concentrate on solving the problem instead of lamenting your mistaken assumptions. It isn't as if the governor appointed these incompetent idiots. ,TBSportsFan1254,e9ehams,conservative
"There’s nowhere else to go but America. We are the last, best hope, emphasis on the “last.” Giving up isn’t an option. Besides, could you live with yourself after giving up to a bunch of useless cry-babies?",hello_japan,e9dt66c,conservative
"See ya! Bye!

Where you gonna go?",Splickity-Lit,e9dvacg,conservative
Alaska. ,teddyrooseveltsfist,e9dzwaa,conservative
Costa Rica is pretty nice ,PrimateIsPro,e9dtipv,conservative
I never said I was leaving. ,PrimateIsPro,e9dvj0s,conservative
How’s it’s Constitution?,Splickity-Lit,e9dvefz,conservative
Spiders. ,GladysCravesRitz,e9e9l8q,conservative
Is it? Because I could use a back-up plan.,hello_japan,e9dtqo8,conservative
My supervisor has a friend who moved there and he was telling me how his friend loves it down there ,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9dwd0w,conservative
Check it out. A lot of people are considering moving there. ,PrimateIsPro,e9dtxhi,conservative
The man's 72 and still looks just like his B&W high school class picture.,somegaijin42,e9co0rj,conservative
"Huh, didn’t see this coming from the wheel of fortune man. ",dd1zzle,e9cs1ah,conservative
"I mean, I like the joke, but the Tea Party was a thing: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tea_Party_protests

Plenty of protests around the country when conservatives lost key votes (TARP) or to mark special days (tax day was a big one). 

There's nothing inherently unamerican or unpatriotic about protesting. It doesn't mean you have lesser work ethic or values. ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9d0ft4,conservative
[removed],,e9cuy2m,conservative
"This shows great work ethic for conservatives! 

But weren't these latest demonstrations (11/8) about The Attorney resigning (and writing that at ""your"" request, I will resign) after The President was looking to force him out, 

and that the resulting replacement was very much against the *originally* bipartisan probe into The President's affairs?

If I am wrong, I would appreciate hearing what anyone else has to say. ",Bignicky9,e9cvloa,conservative
[removed],,e9cqa5n,conservative
[removed],,e9cwnlf,conservative
Pat Sajak is a national treasure. ,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9csigq,conservative
[removed],,e9ci1nc,conservative
Well I got to work 😎,madnyss001,e9cpjtv,conservative
To be fair we should all do demonstrate if they manage to steal these Senate seats. Unacceptable. Obviously not in pussy hat fashion and harassment mobs. ,latotokyo123,e9cfj8u,conservative
[removed],,e9czw4j,conservative
"My crippling student loan debt and medical bills aren't going to pay themselves, you know",Eazy_DuzIt,e9d351k,conservative
[deleted],,e9cwzu3,conservative
I don't work on Wednesdays though :/,usertoad3,e9cth7e,conservative
I need a Pat Sajak episode of the Ben Shapiro Sunday Special in my life.,GameShowWerewolf,e9d6udc,conservative
Whats that little green doodad on the screen?,AnoK760,e9d82wv,conservative
"In 2014 we had an employee we used to work with desperate to attend a demonstration in downtown LA (2 hours away). There was a political rally of some such nonsense and he could not find anyone that day to cover his shift. He of course did the only reasonable thing, left worked sick and drove to the demonstration. Thing is he submitted sick time for the time lost that shift and plastered his social media with his attendance and participation in said demonstration. Did the company I work for do anything? No. We submitted screenshots of his abuse of sick pay, still no. Infuriating. 

TLDR: Young lib, desperate to attend lib event commits sick time fraud and does not get fired. ",baileysontherocks,e9cy8s4,conservative
"In Wisconsin when Walker won in 2010 the teachers took off of school to protest,  I was in college at the time and TAs cancelled class and told their students to go protest. 


Yet Walker’s the one that hates education. ",blameitonthetetons1,e9d6h89,conservative
He didn't have a button to 'fire AG',Jenetyk,e9d2zpj,conservative
Could you imagine what would happen to the economy if all the actual WORKING people decided to walk out even a day?!,StephenNesbit,e9cvu0r,conservative
Funny thing is democrats won the house and still protested. Can somebody explain that shit?,Mr_Hyde_,e9d6wfw,conservative
Some of those sky-screamers and demonstrators are at work. That's their gig.,dasiba,e9crpsc,conservative
What a great libertarian!!!,appolo11,e9cyz5b,conservative
Somebody has to foot the bill for welfare.  ,Reaching2Hard,e9di60e,conservative
"This sub makes me so happy. When I see posts like this and view the comments, people can use logic to pick apart bad political commentary and don't start shit slinging like in t_d or extreme left wing subs.",rsm927,e9cytwf,conservative
Does the green line mean this was taken from 4chan? Just wondering.,Dyeredit,e9d7bkd,conservative
Not as many mad comments as I expected. Booooooring,poly_atheist,e9cw007,conservative
I never noticed before but damn he does look young. He could totally pass for late 50s.,sob9,e9d0x2w,conservative
Money is a helluva drug,butt-mudd-brooks,e9cxhcw,conservative
I think he's got good surgeons. ,StevoTheMonkey,e9d6pci,conservative
"He’s pretty hard right wing, actually.",RetardedElmo,e9csfcr,conservative
"> I mean, I like the joke, but the Tea Party was a thing

To be fair, most of them were retirees. ",Silicon_Avatar,e9d1zpe,conservative
"Completely peaceful protests that actually made policy points, conducted after Obama massively jacked up spending. They didn't scream at the sky, shout ""Not My President"", or throw trashcans through windows. Those mean evil conservatives even left the mall [cleaner than they found it.](https://www.theatlantic.com/politics/archive/2013/10/there-was-no-trash-glenn-beck-pick-national-mall/309974/) Compare that to leftist protests, that leave [DC on fire.](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/local/wp/2017/01/25/thats-not-somebodys-honda-owner-of-limo-torched-on-inauguration-day-unsure-if-insurance-will-cover-damages/?noredirect=on&utm_term=.7a7e2dc76d73)",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d44io,conservative
of course. democrats have to protect jeff sessions!,realtsuke,e9cw2m2,conservative
"This is cut and paste from the organizers.. BREAKING: PROTESTS CALLED FOR THURSDAY, NOVEMBER 8, 5 PM LOCAL TIME
Donald Trump has installed a crony to oversee the special counsel's Trump-Russia investigation, crossing a red line set to protect the investigation. By replacing Rod Rosenstein with just-named Acting Attorney General Matt Whitaker as special counsel Robert Mueller's boss on the investigation, Trump has undercut the independence of the investigation. Whitaker has publicly outlined strategies to stifle the investigation and cannot be allowed to remain in charge of it. The Nobody Is Above the Law network demands that Whitaker immediately commit not to assume supervision of the investigation. Our hundreds of response events are being launched to demonstrate the public demand for action to correct this injustice. We will update this page as the situation develops.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9d8wp0,conservative
"Keep in mind liberals also protested in the streets when Jeff Sessions was originally hired.

They protest everything which makes the protests lose all meaning",Mormonster,e9d7z5o,conservative
"The whole mass protest call to action was a sham from the beginning. They just want reasons to protest and to give the media pictures. 

Everyone and their mother knew Sessions would be fired after the midterms. Anyone claiming it was a shock is so retarded I would be amazed if they could form a coherent sentence. ",Murican_Freedom1776,e9cyqj5,conservative
[removed],,e9cxk88,conservative
What states would those be?,CCpoc,e9cyzg7,conservative
"This number is so horribly flawed. California pulls in over 40% of the entire welfare capital, 1 state out of 50 shouldnt be pulling in that much. ",Xero03,e9cxdi4,conservative
[removed],,e9cqajt,conservative
"The question, though, was posed in the event of the Republicans losing House majority, which just about everyone saw coming. The kerfuffle in the Senate, though, is something else entirely, and indeed nothing to brush off.",AvdaxNaviganti,e9ck4h9,conservative
"Haven’t the seats been decided? Even Florida is fully counted, right? ",sleepyradio182,e9d22kh,conservative
Right. A proper demonstration is done with tiki torches. ,Lord_Boognish,e9d2dok,conservative
"Actually, I wonder what would happen if a subsection of the right decided it's time to show the left how ridiculous they actually are by doing exactly the same things as them, only with better rhetoric. Imagine hundreds of people standing outside Jim Acosta's house chanting ""we know where you sleep.""",Ed_Radley,e9cpvaf,conservative
"Weekends work best for me-given my full-time job, helping out with kids and my general lack of ambition to stand in a group of people holding signs for work commuters to honk at me because I can’t accept a loss, or just move the fuck on entirely. I was raised not to throw a fit on the floor of the toy store because I didn’t get what I wanted.

Maybe I’ll just go hunting instead.

",_BIG_BEAR_,e9cqag5,conservative
The president (which he said he’ll do) should launch an investigation of AZ and FL if it suddenly turns out the democrats win the senate in those states,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9cstec,conservative
[deleted],,e9d0qia,conservative
Regretting that art degree?,tehForce,e9d8hn2,conservative
Sounds like someone should have made better life choices to avoid these situations.,pbarnett865,e9d8kdo,conservative
[deleted],,e9d0sxt,conservative
It’s a joke.,BigAl265,e9cy665,conservative
"> The problem with socialism is that you eventually run out of other people's money.

Margaret Thatcher",d_42,e9f403h,conservative
Mental Illness,tehForce,e9d8el5,conservative
"Doesn’t it seem like paying people to protest should be illegal?  I’m all for people having the right to *peacefully* protest, but when you start paying people to rise up against the government...that sounds a little like sedition to me.",BigAl265,e9czwb1,conservative
https://crowdsondemand.com/?gclid=Cj0KCQiAoJrfBRC0ARIsANqkS_7lxvnkd6e8bkkjFY_0mfNj-wU22Ra_dj6H_9sdr_zpODhUb_7pGJAaApqpEALw_wcB,d_42,e9f3x0p,conservative
"Yes, but there are several thousand paid leftists who are here to download everything in this sub.",d_42,e9f41oo,conservative
Really? Surprising! Today I learned. ,dd1zzle,e9cstz5,conservative
I didn’t know this either. I’m surprised he still has a job.,bettywhitedidmedirty,e9cuopj,conservative
"In that same vein, most of the liberal protesters are just students. Lots of free time.",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9d2hm5,conservative
"I mean it’s fair to assume that since that makes up the bulk of the Republican Party. However, here’s a suggestion that this might not be entirely true:

https://nypost.com/2009/04/13/tea-parties-real-grassroots/

>	These aren’t the usual semiprofessional protesters who attend antiwar and pro-union marches. These are people with **real jobs;** most have never attended a protest march before.",iamelroberto,e9d2qha,conservative
"Yeah and they weren’t showing up at democrats houses trying to break down the door, banging and clawing at the doors of the Supreme Court, or harassing politicians when they are out with their families. ",Ravens1112003,e9d7lfj,conservative
"Spending is even worse today too. Protesting may not be super effective. I believe calling your congressmen is the best way. That being said, I have no problem with protesting. Its a sign of a free democracy and should be exercised. 

 When Antifa is using scare tactics at people's houses, that is not democracy and they deserve jail. I hope they all are caught and brought to justice. I also remember an alt-right protest last year that killed someone. There are violent idiots on both sides. 

That being said, we have to abandon the ""liberal people need jobs"" when unemployement is this low. Most likely, people are working and using free time to protest which is their American right. This ignores the issue that have people protesting and demonizes them as dead beats. ",goodboihunting,e9d6sis,conservative
[removed],,e9cx2sr,conservative
"They protested Comey investigating the emails, then protest him getting fired by Trump.

Its become such a joke now. ",uniquecannon,e9djncv,conservative
"Knowing he'd be fired or not is irrelevant as the protests are over the fact that Rosenstein is no longer overseeing the investigation and now this new guy can shut it down. The investigation must stay open, regardless of what party you align with.",Mattoosie,e9d44xz,conservative
"Yeah man someone undermining an investigation on themselves is totally fine, nothing to see here, people just want to complain. 

Grow up",TimboSlice96,e9cz4y1,conservative
"Shhhh...don’t look up the word “satire”, you might get triggered.",BigAl265,e9cy9ql,conservative
Throw a dart anywhere in the lower SE quadrant of a U.S. map,ericthedad,e9czad1,conservative
"New Mexico, Kentucky, Mississippi, Alabama, West Virginia, South Carolina, Arizona, Alaska, Montana, Louisiana, Indiana. Ranked from most dependant to least. I called Alaska blue. If not y'all claim the top 11.",phillipjfried,e9czbst,conservative
California is 39th on the list so thank you for your mental gymnastics and fake news Vlad. ,phillipjfried,e9czmpo,conservative
[deleted],,e9cscpi,conservative
?,latotokyo123,e9d54cu,conservative
"The same thing that already happens. The news pushes it as ""right violence"", while ignoring *any* attacks from the left.",Juxen,e9crv2t,conservative
"It would only raise the temperature, and prove to the left that we're just as bad as them, so they would need to be even worse. We gain nothing by adopting their tactics. The right needs to be tough and on point, but stick to its law and order tactics.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d4bn7,conservative
"Dude seriously chill. The world is not like what you see in the vacuum of reddit and television. You're pandering on a sub filled with people who share your views, and it helps nobody. I'll probably be a Democrat til I die and I don't know a single one of my liberal coworkers taking a minute off work to protest. But if they ever do protest, or you ever protest, I'll know that it fucking meant something to them.",dan_rather_dan_me,e9d65qc,conservative
Make better decisions like what exactly? Like deciding to just not go to college? Or deciding to just not get cancer? Take a look at the way you reacted to this by blaming me and the complete lack of empathy it shows,Eazy_DuzIt,e9dcysa,conservative
:^),Kry_S,e9d5s1h,conservative
Paying people to be disorderly is definitely an issue. Illegal? I'm not sure. I really just bring it up because it's fun to needle the left about it. ,dasiba,e9d1csk,conservative
Pat Sajak is as much of an institution as Alex Trebek and Bob Barker. He'll be employed for as long as he wants to be employed.,GorathThorgath,e9degbs,conservative
[removed],,e9cxqwb,conservative
"> I mean, in that same vein most of the liberal protesters are just students. Lots of free time.

I didn't have enough free time in college to be going to ""protests"", getting into street brawls, vandalizing private property, and stalking/intimidating news hosts every other weekend. Then again, I wasn't going for a liberal arts degree, so maybe they just have more time.",Silicon_Avatar,e9d2qcd,conservative
"Yes, conservatives demonstrate through mail! A mail bomb to be exact. (/s)",Fry_Philip_J,e9dbpu5,conservative
[deleted],,e9cyu9s,conservative
"You really think if they found something by now it wouldn't of been ""accidentally"" leaked to the media..like a certain letter.  I think there are people who can only rationalize that Trump was elected by Russia's help and not face the fact Trump was the answer to 8 years or Obama.",callthereaper64,e9d79ob,conservative
"First off the investigation is about Russian interference in the 2016 election. Not about Trump. 

Secondly, how is he undermining the investigation? ",Murican_Freedom1776,e9cz96k,conservative
"The investigation's been going on for ~2.3 years (9 months under Obama, 28 months under Mueller), and it's found nothing regarding Trump. I don't see how anything's being undermined, but what are you afraid of? That they need exactly 2.4 years to find something?

How long does it go on without any results before you'll admit that's it's a partisan fishing expedition?",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3eqc,conservative
"*an investigation dragging on for two and a half years using taxpayer money and uncovering nothing 

Also lol @ the left bitching about the Clinton investigation and then acting like this nonsense is somehow justified ",mnslice,e9d6pdy,conservative
"Are you basing off percentages, actual number of people, or total amount of money spent?",CCpoc,e9d4dbm,conservative
"https://www.hiddendominion.com/50-reasons-why-california-sucks/

sorry heres some help for youre gymnastics.  Please remember cali is perging citizens cause the place is crap. ",Xero03,e9d0ghc,conservative
[removed],,e9ctev1,conservative
"Actually, I heard the unemployment rate is low because everyone has two jobs.",rAlexanderAcosta,e9cvoaj,conservative
"I mean, the WaPo [reported on the antifa mob in front of Tucker Carlson's house](https://www.washingtonpost.com/nation/2018/11/08/they-were-threatening-me-my-family-tucker-carlsons-home-targeted-by-protesters/?utm_term=.16ba6e852eaa), and it's their 2nd most read national piece currently. TIME reports on them being [investigated as hate crime](http://time.com/5449787/fox-news-host-tucker-carlson-hate-crime-protest/). CNN has an opinion piece that protestors [went too far](https://edition.cnn.com/2018/11/08/opinions/protest-at-tucker-carlsons-home-went-too-far-kohn/index.html). CBS reports that the protests [lead to a criminal investigation](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/tucker-carlson-home-protest-criminal-investigation-today-2018-11-08/).  
Even very partisan and liberal news like The Hill reported on [the police investigation](https://thehill.com/homenews/media/415773-police-investigating-protest-at-tucker-carlsons-home-as-possible-hate-crime), and Colbert [condemned the protestors](https://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2018/nov/8/stephen-colbert-antifa-mob-tucker-carlsons-house-s/). Of course you'll have some leftists on reddit, like over on r/ChapTrapHouse, celebrating the protests, but these guys are actual, not-an-insult-but-a-self-description communists.  

I think it's important to not get too stuck up in partisanship. Antifa is not the democratic party, Charlotteville's neo-nazis are not the republican party. Fox news' Shepard Smith has [repeatedly criticized Trump for fearmongering](https://www.youtube.com/watch?time_continue=1&v=zMF7WNyYU2Q), and this sub lauded Jake Tapper for being [very critical of Ocasio-Cortez](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9gxyhq/cnns_jake_tapper_to_ocasiocortez_im_assuming_im/?ref=share&ref_source=link).",reallyspecialdude,e9cu8qc,conservative
"This actually enrages me quite a bit.

There was a shooting during a BLM shooting in Dallas, a few miles from where I have relatives. BLM was chanting ""fry them up like bacon"" in reference to cops.  

6 cops killed, 11 wounded. The guy was caught, his Facebook was all pro-DNC, pro-BLM, anti-white, anti-cop, and this event was barely talked about, and nobody seems to remember it.

Everytime someone circlejerks about Charlottesville I bring it up and they have no idea what I'm talking about.",regollyek,e9cvzfe,conservative
 Exactly,d_42,e9f4bkr,conservative
Kavanaugh: https://crowdsondemand.com/?gclid=Cj0KCQiAoJrfBRC0ARIsANqkS_7lxvnkd6e8bkkjFY_0mfNj-wU22Ra_dj6H_9sdr_zpODhUb_7pGJAaApqpEALw_wcB,d_42,e9f46ws,conservative
"The cancer part sucks. The college part is a choice. Depending on what you majored, a vocational or trade school may actually be a smarter choice.",GodzRebirth,e9df44y,conservative
In Hollywood....we sure hes not a secret scientologist leftist nut?,callthereaper64,e9d6k12,conservative
"WH is a 10-minute walk from my campus. Lots of students are able to find time to protest because of the closeness. I also happen to have a couple kids, am married, and work full-time so I do not have time haha. 

Obviously, the other stuff was tongue in cheek, but I think most people who engage in that definitely have too much free time. ",WonderBlarbleGlarble,e9d31gz,conservative
I have a masters of science degree I got while working full time and would have had plenty of time to protest if I saw fit. Maybe you have poor time management skills? ,Dik_Em,e9d8gn9,conservative
[removed],,e9dc79l,conservative
Protesting gets you extra credit when you're studying for a liberal arts degree. Showing up to those things turns a D+ into a C-  so they can go on to pursuing their dreams of being a secretary of a human resource department of some corporately-owned chain. Maybe get a nice one bedroom apartment only 3 blocks away from a safe neighborhood. Previous apartment required a bus transfer slip to get anywhere near a safe neighborhood.,989x4000,e9diafn,conservative
"Wow, the brigaders are out in force today.  Don't worry about the downvotes, you're right on target.",d_42,e9f3jfz,conservative
Art majors.,tehForce,e9d7t21,conservative
"Do we really have to get into the outlying crazy people? These people actually have mental issues. Did you mean to bring up the liberal lunatic that shot up a baseball practice full of republican senators, almost murdering one as well? Maybe you just forgot about that one. I’m talking about all of the protests all over the news that are covered everyday. ",Ravens1112003,e9dc6mq,conservative
"Yeah, likely.  It’s still important for the process to go through without being silenced.  ",fading_a,e9dehuf,conservative
"They have found things in the investigation and have made multiple indictments. Not sure what you're trying to say here.

What does ""an answer to Obama"" mean? ""Your guy was bad so our guy is going to be way worse! That'll show you!""",Mattoosie,e9d7ku4,conservative
"The guy he’s replacing sessions with has spoken multiple times about how trump should replace sessions with someone who would cut funding so much that the investigation grinds to a halt.

Russian interference, particularly in the trump campaign.



",TimboSlice96,e9czeex,conservative
"""nothing has come out of it""

Except several guilty pleas from people directly involved with the Trump campaign and Trump himself, as well as a guilty conviction and subsequent guilty plea.

You know, aside from that nothing has come out of it.",LegendofDragoon,e9d4vlx,conservative
"Yeah, all those republicans doing this partisan witch hunt. Smh ",Balgur,e9d7p9w,conservative
Well if there's nothing to be afraid why doesn't Trump say with all confidence that he will let it continue cause there is nothing to hide.,doitwrong21,e9d3pvp,conservative
"Haven't 6 people been indicted, including Flynn, Manafort, and Cohen?  And also 13 Russian Nationals?  How is that ""nothing""?",hpw22077,e9dcrmd,conservative
Everything on that list just complains about taxes. California generates revenue for the country. It's not a drain on society like the states I listed earlier. ,phillipjfried,e9d2g83,conservative
So they're voting to end their own subsidies? Sounds like a fuckin hero.,JaXXXuP,e9cue80,conservative
Good old Santa Maria-Pinta-Nina- Cortez xD,callthereaper64,e9d7hi7,conservative
Finally someone who is here to try to bridge the fucking gap and forge a bond between the 2 parties.,ionpies,e9d0vl9,conservative
Thanks for this comment. It's easy to pay attention to the extremes. In real life if course almost all of us know zero people that belong to these extremist groups.,JustAnotherJon,e9d774m,conservative
"You make some really great points. You put some effort and research to add credibility to your post.  Doesn’t happen often. Bravo... seriously. 
 
As a news consumer (junkie tbh) it’s not that these stories aren’t reported. Usually they are. I find often that these are the stories that don’t hit front page, don’t stay on front page but for a moment, aren’t shared by other sites. Yes, we reported on it, mostly because we have learned somebody is out there just waiting to say “gotcha” so we cover our bases, but then we bury it.  Fast. Deep. Protect the bubble. Protect the anger. Protect the division.

Read.. don’t watch political propaganda, read. Read a lot. Be selective. Read the other side, and the alternative, independent,international.... because ALL of them are BIASED and you have to look for the AGENDA and what they are NOT telling you. When you see what has been left OUT and contrast that too their known agendas, you get a much better idea of the TRUTH or at least who the crooks really are.",olafsonoflars,e9d44is,conservative
I would normally agree with you on something like this but how they’re handling a mob at Carlson’s house who threatened him and his family and tried breaking down his front door is pretty weak. Especially when you juxtapose it to how they’re reacting to Acosta’s whole ordeal. One is being treated as a not so great thing with some blurbs the other is being treated as one of the worst moments in our modern political history and gets top of the hour headline news coverage practically.,absentblue,e9cvoxs,conservative
Colbert was condemning the protesters while also calling tucker a 'monster' in the same line. ,Dyeredit,e9d787e,conservative
"There is a large disparity in the shrillness. A couple articles without follow-up mean nothing in comparison to the media blitz happening over Acosta and the doctored video. 

Quite frankly, did Acosta think he could be that big an asshole in the WH press corps indefinitely?

",billyjoedupree,e9cxf48,conservative
I honestly never heard of this!,d_42,e9f4a1t,conservative
"Can you site sources?  I thought those chants were debunked.  And honestly, I’ve heard nothing about 6 cops being killed at a protest.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9d9w3x,conservative
Enough of that Common Sense stuff! This is Reddit!,d_42,e9f4ebd,conservative
The STEM majors would like a word with you.,dominator_98,e9dcr2p,conservative
Looks like you found the 20 Art majors on the conservative Reddit forum! Lol...awesome,d_42,e9f3mlo,conservative
"You:

>  I mean it wasn’t that long ago some looney leftist roundhouse kicked a woman upside the head because he disagreed with her.

Also you:

> Do we really have to get into the outlying crazy people?",jgzman,e9dd0u9,conservative
"More like the PC culture that was pushed and shoved down peoples throats.  Humans tend be reactionary and shift from extreme to another.  So instead of having a PC candidate you get an uncensored vulgar speaking human.  Aka Trump.

So there are multiple indictments for President Trump specifically from the Mueller investigation involving Russia?",callthereaper64,e9d7sql,conservative
"Also, not senate approved.  No ok for any president to do. — Republican or Democrat.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9d90cg,conservative
Has he done it?,Murican_Freedom1776,e9czgnp,conservative
How long should the investigation take?,TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3jbj,conservative
Don't worry he will ignore this comment. Gotta ignore them facts.,LotionButler,e9d6n26,conservative
I wasn't aware Trump pled guilty to anything incriminating himself in Russian collusion. You have a source for that?,bittnerator,e9dcxy4,conservative
I really wish he would just do this.  Just stop talking about it and giving it press time.  Let it run its course and then move on.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9d99dw,conservative
"For the same reason I wouldn’t want police digging into every aspect of my or your life. 

I think it was Stalin or one of his lackeys that said something along the lines of: “you give me the man, I’ll find a crime”. That’s what it’s beginning to feel like more and more. ",tathrowaway666,e9d4ugv,conservative
Because burning taxpayer money for fun isn't a great political move ,mnslice,e9d6r55,conservative
Hard to have when that's not what this sub wants. ,Fgame,e9d1iep,conservative
"I'm not sure I would read [his tweet](https://twitter.com/StephenAtHome/status/1060577331759210497) this way.

> Fighting Tucker Carlson’s ideas is an American right. Targeting his home and terrorizing his family is an act of monstrous cowardice. Obviously don’t do this, but also, take no pleasure in it happening. Feeding monsters just makes more monsters.

To me it seems more like ""feeding monsters"" relates to basking in the discomfort and pain of those you oppose, especially as the sentence before tells people to not take pleasure in it.  
But I do recognize that you also could read ""feeding monsters"" as ""giving Carlson ammunition"".",reallyspecialdude,e9d8div,conservative
"I think you can do both.  There are some public people I absolutely detest - but anyone who threatens needs to be held accountable by law.  Violence or threats are not ok and need to be squashed, I don’t care what fucking side.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9d9pv5,conservative
"https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/2016_shooting_of_Dallas_police_officers

That event was the beginning of the end for BLM.",regollyek,e9dc0k7,conservative
Maybe he’s talking about the Dallas sniper? That was 5 cops I believe. ,ninjamike808,e9dbn43,conservative
Savage!,d_42,e9f3l3g,conservative
"Fair enough, I went back and deleted that part from the post. Crazy people that are denounced by both parties are not protestors and shouldn’t be put in the same category. 

Now we can focus on the groups that are protesting like the ones that I mentioned in that post or we could talk about different ones if you’d rather such as black lives matter or antifa and all of the violence and property damage they are responsible for. ",Ravens1112003,e9deas1,conservative
">So there are multiple indictments for President Trump specifically from the Mueller investigation involving Russia?

Not against President Trump himself, but there's been 35 indictments made in the investigation including Trumps former campaign advisor, his former campaign chair, a campaign aide, his national security adviser, and 26 Russians including a business associate of Manafort (Trumps campaign chair) and Gates (Trumps campaign aide).

Not sure if you know how investigations work, but you can't just figure everything out at once. They take time and organization.",Mattoosie,e9d8to7,conservative
"No, but if it walks like a duck...",TimboSlice96,e9czjg0,conservative
I think you misread what he typed. The people involved with Trumps campaign and trump had plead guilty.   Not Trump himself.,gettingthereisfun,e9de93t,conservative
"You do know Trump isn't the only subject of the investigation, right?

You know it's his entire campaign, right?

And several guilty pleas and verdicts has already arisen from that campaign?

I'll believe Mueller if he says nothing is there, but from the way things are progressing that's not looking likely.

Edit: after reading again I realized this could be an earnest question and not malicious sarcasm. If that is the case, I apologise for my tone.",LegendofDragoon,e9ddl8s,conservative
Trump is making the Dems double down on their Trump is owned by the Russians rhetoric as much as possible so that when Mueller and his team release the findings it is a huge embarrassment to all the Dems that put so much effort into the whole Russia and Trump thing. ,Murican_Freedom1776,e9gr87d,conservative
"Yeah but he's someone who's been elected to the highest position in the world, I would except that to be the case where everything is dug through. ",doitwrong21,e9d7lcr,conservative
Hasn't the Mueller investigation actually resulted in net-positive cash flow from assets seized from the fraud Manafort has been found guilty of?,jrkirby,e9d7ioy,conservative
"that's a terrible excuse, [since the investigation is more than paying for itself](https://www.cnbc.com/2018/09/17/mueller-probe-could-turn-a-profit-thanks-to-manafort-assets.html). also rings hollow when [trump is putting millions of taxpayer dollars into his own pockets with his absurd amount of golfing](https://trumpgolfcount.com/)",manny_crumpetfoot,e9d7t4x,conservative
"Even if you discount the other person's point about the asset seizure, it should not matter the cost to uphold the rule of law and to say that it's for fun is also stupid a stupid point as Mueller has indicated many people relating to Trump.  ",doitwrong21,e9d7u8i,conservative
"Im all for diversity of thought and respectful debate. The people I have a problem with are those who are dumb enough to say ""if you arent in my party, you're unamerican"" or the equivalent bullshit.",ionpies,e9d58ub,conservative
"So you're protesting something that may or may not ever happen? 

Like I said. A sham. ",Murican_Freedom1776,e9cznxz,conservative
"Yep, it walks like a duck alright. A partisan-witchhunt-shaped duck.

https://thehill.com/hilltv/rising/406881-lisa-page-bombshell-fbi-couldnt-prove-trump-russia-collusion-before-mueller

>""With that statement, Page acknowledged a momentous fact: After nine months of using some of the most awesome surveillance powers afforded to U.S. intelligence, the FBI still had not made a case connecting Trump or his campaign to Russia’s election meddling.
>
>""Page opined further, acknowledging “it still existed in the scope of possibility that there would be literally nothing” to connect Trump and Russia, no matter what Mueller or the FBI did.""",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3nlz,conservative
"I’d like it to be dug through too, but finding a crime could be very easily done if trump didn’t know the exactitude of every law related to every business transaction he’s taken part in. I don’t know, it might be unpopular but I don’t think anyone should be subjected to have their entire life dug through to potentially find a crime. Investigate where it’s warranted, sure, but don’t go beyond the scope of the investigation. That’s just asking for politically biased prosecutors (or prosecutors trying to make a name for themselves) to abuse down the line. ",tathrowaway666,e9de6ct,conservative
"With that logic pushing back against gun stricter gun control is also a sham - they’re not trying to take our guns, just “stricter control” - it’s called a deterrent ",TimboSlice96,e9czt9l,conservative
We protest the stricter control when it's called for or actively being pursued. ,Murican_Freedom1776,e9czxp8,conservative
The left has said they want to ban all gun ownership. Trump has *not* said that he wants to end the investigation to hide collusion.,TangoFoxtr0t,e9d3v3o,conservative
"If you don’t consider appointing the guy who has been pretty vocal about getting in the way of the investigation (literally, “trump should appoint someone who would cut funding so much that the investigation grinds to a halt”) pursuing then you’re a moron. ",TimboSlice96,e9d049z,conservative
"He has, multiple times.  He hasn’t said to “hide collusion”, but he’s called for it to end.  I mean I want it to end to - one way or another.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9d95bp,conservative
Shoutout to Ben Shapiro for [already having compared gender to age](https://youtu.be/Qv81zIIeHw0?t=132) to point out the ridiculousness that is the notion you are what you say you are.,xJownage,e9eta17,conservative
And so the slippery slope descends,unityrootts,e9f2cle,conservative
Why should a government or reality be able to judge how old someone is when a person is empowered to decide that for themselves based on their daily whims?,joey_diaz_wings,e9f5iq4,conservative
Immutible legal characteristics. Age? Not one of them.,_xanderkrews_,e9et3tj,conservative
"I'm curious if this will happen. If a legal precedent gets established, how long will it be before an adult ""changes their age"" to pursue a sexual relationship with a minor consequence-free?",TruthfulTrolling,e9g90d6,conservative
Been Shapiro is my hero. ,WooPig45,e9fb374,conservative
She isn’t even American. Who cares? Play some Kid Rock or a supporters music. ,mods_blow_goats,e9f4occ,conservative
Hypocrisy. How is refusing to have her music played at a Trump event different to a baker refusing to make a cake for a gay wedding?,tenshon,e9f4aw1,conservative
"Aw man! Oh wait, I don’t care. ",justhere2havefun,e9fdqyt,conservative
See it’s an inconvenience to the right boy the left. The former is allowed and encouraged the latter is bad.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9f4lt0,conservative
"Because trump is using the music as a soundtrack to influence millions of people. Whereas a baker not baking a cake affects far far less people. 
You’re right it’s still kinda the same but also very different..",FlurMusic,e9gb1hm,conservative
No they don't. ,CuckSlayer1984,e9ep5kb,conservative
Islam reject everything that is not Islam.,ozric101,e9etrhv,conservative
Taqiya,sjwking,e9ewoe0,conservative
"LIAR. You've just been publicly exposed by Milano so you're doing public damage control since for once it's a high-profile person from the left exposing you so the media can't ignore it. Until now your anti-semitic garbage self was given free reign so you kept going. Which you still will, perhaps on a lower scale to your terrorist friends.",Terra_green2,e9fsjjs,conservative
Exactly ,GlenGanges,e9f3h1p,conservative
"Media is claiming that a GIF of the incident is ""doctored"" because they don't understand how GIFs work.",StraightNewt,e9e801t,conservative
"I watched it live, it happened. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9e9zg9,conservative
How hard is this to prove or disapprove? Just put the original right over the gif.,AddictedToGlue,e9e8hi2,conservative
They did. There's an area that's choppy and makes the gif look like Acosta moved his arm fast. Buy they're treating a MAX 15fps gif like a 30fps film. Of course it's fucking choppy.,S_D_W_2,e9eqtp7,conservative
how many times does this same stupid image have to be posted here?,SKWM3000,e9gspp4,conservative
K. How do you feel about the Colorado baker? ,justhere2havefun,e9fuegh,conservative
Report it.  What this guy is advocating isn’t conservatism.,XMAGA_1776X,e9hgfhq,conservative
"Until people stop bitching ""wahh this isn’t conservatism!"" and realize that we have to deal with these tech company monopolies skirting the law and censoring conservative speech.",PrawnsAreOk,e9idsxk,conservative
Didn't know that baker had a monopoly and had special exemptions to content publisher laws. ,CAGUnion404,e9fv1ay,conservative
"i agree with you that this is not a conservative message; however, i think people on the right are starting to warm up to the idea.",SKWM3000,e9hgnym,conservative
"inviting the expansion of government when it serves our interests, and rejecting it when it doesn't, is not how a person with actual principles behaves. if you actually believe in limited government, act like it.",SKWM3000,e9ikpye,conservative
Didn’t know people are forced by law to use Facebook over any other social media platform. ,justhere2havefun,e9fvqa5,conservative
So you're just ignoring the content publishing laws?,bartoksic,e9gni4x,conservative
"eh, it's pretty much a monopoly on speech in it's sphere",BeachCruisin22,e9g0sbq,conservative
"Thats were Libertarians fail

They dont see ANY business as a problem and ONLY think the govt is bad

In reality these Corporations can force u to use them more than the govt can

They can create an economy were ur at a disadvantage if u dont

The govt cant really force u because the govt is bound by the Constitution (essentially a ""Regulation"" on govt. Maybe Libertarians should oppose it?)

Corporations**are not** bound by the Constitution",ExpensiveMention,e9g4szl,conservative
Whatever.  The word no longer means anything.,BrighamYoung,e9f4dzx,conservative
"Criminal incompetence has nothing to do with race. 
This Lady should have been in Prison for what happened in 2016.     ",ozric101,e9etu6y,conservative
"At the very least, removed from that position ",Meatball2112,e9f0ih0,conservative
"This is getting scary.  This and Arizona.  Thousands of ballots just ""Found?""  That, and the video in Broward county of ballots being split up amongst private vehicles and an Enterprise truck in the middle of the night.  There really needs to be a federal injunction here.  They need to stop this right now!  ",jdizzle161,e9cxg25,conservative
"It's always Broward County, FL. Something should be done about that massive swamp already.",Millero15,e9d405v,conservative
"How low can you go? If Snipes was caught doing something similar prior to this incident, why is she still allow to remain in this capacity?

Shouldn't the FBI get involved? Here we were worrying about Russia interference? Try a little closer to home!",JFGFNY,e9d99s6,conservative
"If she returns it right away, they'll probably still count it! As long as she casts it for the right candidates, at least.",PubliusVA,e9cwgp4,conservative
"""There isn't any election rigging!"" - The Ctrl-Left

""Russian's are rigging the Elections!!!"" - Also the Ctrl-Left

""It's not meddling if we do it, it's our 'Patriotic' duty!"" - Also the Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9d1dla,conservative
Since when did voting in America become this unjust. It almost sounds like Russian voting. Outrageous.,goldrotmgonly,e9dc6vx,conservative
"How did she get the envelope in minnesota? it has an ""unable to forward"" sticker on it...",niakarad,e9dn7p0,conservative
"If nothing else, it shows Broward county's reputation of incompetence is well deserved.",MrSparkle86,e9dqyka,conservative
Let's wait to we see concrete evidence before getting the pitchforks out. Let's not be the same as the left,dial4matic,e9eper2,conservative
"Because it's totally ridiculous to imagine that someone might be living in Minnesota temporarily but still want to vote in Florida. You can do that, e.g. if you're a college student. You of course just can't vote in both places. ",Glsbnewt,e9drpxj,conservative
"The Arizona stuff is a different situation. Arizona always takes this long to count ballots that’s why it’s never actually called got a few days. Also Arizona has total numbers of votes left to be counted. The Secretary of State in AZ who oversees the vote counts and is the one holding pess conferences is a republican. He has no reason to fudge the number. 

Now Broward County Florida. They are hiding shit and breaking state law. ",Zac1245,e9d1h11,conservative
"Agreed, this has been going on for days, and something is up. At some point, we just need to say that the votes already counted are the only votes that count, and call it. 

We should also investigate every single one of these late or ""newly-found"" votes for fraud.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9d85kb,conservative
I reckon we could get by with 66 counties.,robotoverlordz,e9dm98x,conservative
"> Ctrl-Left

Flawless.",TheComedianGLP,e9di8v4,conservative
The ends justify any means.  These people have no principles.,timbowen,e9d6ssk,conservative
What does the “Ctrl” in Ctrl-Left stand for?,Strange_Item,e9ec7ik,conservative
"The article mentions she moved away 5 years ago, in which case their voter registration list is remarkably screwed up.",nited_states,e9e0gxb,conservative
"I shouldn't be surprised, but I amazed that the press hasn't been showing the video of them splitting up the ballots.  Guess that shows how ""objective"" they really are.  They are more obsessed with the Acosta video than voter fraud.",jdizzle161,e9d27f4,conservative
Control,OneImportantQuestion,e9edmop,conservative
"My point is yes, they are stealing the election, but they're doing it by creating fake ballots; they're not trying to get 10,000 fake ballots in the mail. ",Glsbnewt,e9e7c6z,conservative
"Yeah if you go to my post history I posted a link with the votes to be counted in AZ. They have complete numbers. Around 550,000. The AZ Secretary of State is holding a press conference every night at 5pm until it’s complete. It’s way more transparent and open than whatever shit Florida is pulling in Broward. ",Zac1245,e9d2osg,conservative
I don’t get it.,Strange_Item,e9ef1tc,conservative
"Yes, but deliberately sloppy voter registration lists make it easier to hide fraud.",nited_states,e9e7j2m,conservative
fair enough.,jdizzle161,e9d2qnu,conservative
"Control-Left as the lefty counterpart to Alt-Right

&#x200B;

Keyboard terms. CTRL Key (Control) + Left",OneImportantQuestion,e9f2uod,conservative
And this is why occasional registration purges make sense.,psstein,e9eh3vn,conservative
"Oh lol, thanks!",Strange_Item,e9fcje2,conservative
"ANTIFFA: anti freespeech fascists.  If they can change the definition of words, so can we",BrockLee76,e9dohm7,conservative
They're funded by George Soros and other leftist elites through proxies,VoinaYMir,e9dxeie,conservative
The group that hates ‘fascists’ so much they’ll use fascist measures to stop them,HotDogs19,e9dq8ye,conservative
ANTIFA = Anti First Amendment,mikecx79,e9e7e79,conservative
"Doggy genocide?

What even is PETA anymore? What sinister organization have they morphed into? I mean prioritize the spaying and neutering of pitbulls if you must, but is it really necessary to kill them?",MisterMouser,e9dwtt3,conservative
PETA kills quite a few animals.  They believe domestic pets are categorically bad and tantamount to slavery.,nonamenoslogans2,e9dsqs9,conservative
"As a conservative, and a vegan, I find this absolutely abhorrent. While I agree that animals should be treated ethically I completely disagree with PETA’s methods. In my mind they’re a quasi-terroristic organization. I wasn’t a huge fan of them before and I’m certainly less of a fan now. 

All that being said I’m very libertarian in my views. I’m a gun owner and staunch supporter of individual liberties and the second amendment. 

Also I’m totally ok with hunting and people eating meat and using animal products, etc. It’s just not something I do. That’s my two cents.",TriscuitAverse,e9dt203,conservative
"Wait, read the article. They're killing dogs based on the way they look? 

Racist!",Cr8er,e9dr6k4,conservative
"Dear lore, I expected this to be Babylonbee but this is real. It's beyond disgusting. ",LastationNeoCon,e9efy43,conservative
PETArd.,chabanais,e9e5c0v,conservative
"Seems like with most left wing organizations these days, they are no longer hiding their true intentions.",FannyJane,e9ebqqf,conservative
What the fuck,r3duced2ash,e9e74ig,conservative
You're telling me this ISN'T a babylonbee article?,Dranosh,e9f1du4,conservative
da hell did i just read,PandaMike90,e9dpc1w,conservative
"PETA is absolutely disgusting, I felt revolted just reading this. They guilt people with their sappy commercials, when they're the real monsters. Pit bulls are beautiful, kind dogs. It breaks my heart that they're putting them down.",WarriorArus,e9ecx32,conservative
"Fuck that. Pit Bulls can be awesome pets when raised correctly. They're super loyal to their owners. Yes, there have been a lot of tragic horror stories, but that doesn't mean they all need to be killed. That's barbaric. I've been around a lot of dogs in my lifetime, including Pit Bulls. The absolute meanest dog I've ever encountered was a Doberman. Some breeds can be dangerous if the owners aren't responsible. Maybe owners of dangerous breeds should take some kind of class where they learn how to raise the dog right. That's preferable to mass killing all the dogs. Fuck PETA.",GuitarWizard90,e9e5sd4,conservative
Fucking psychopathic fascist thugs. PETA should not be taken seriously. ,Gam3rGurl13,e9ekv8f,conservative
We need to ban these assault dogs! No one a needs a dog with a bite pressure over 100lbs/in^2.,donttreadonmytendies,e9eia9c,conservative
"A well trained guard dog, is far better home defense than any gun, make up your minds you incoherent lefty idiots. ",ozric101,e9dpw8n,conservative
I think we should stop breeding them. But some are such beautiful dogs and not all are violent. I think if you look at the owners they tend to be a certain kind that would have a hostile dog. Trailer parks for instance. But this seems opposite of what Peta would stand for but I would have to dig a bit to find out how dark they really are.,Jonbonnet,e9e970u,conservative
"https://i.imgur.com/pMPkOXi.jpg

/r/banpitbulls",TRUMPOTUS,e9e8y8l,conservative
And nothing of value would be lost. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9e4mth,conservative
The breed of peace should be wiped out. I do not trust pit bulls or their owners.,Dorian_v25,e9ebv1n,conservative
They’ll have to kill me before they get their hands on my dog,alexdeutsch,e9h01uu,conservative
personally i think there are no bad dogs just bad owners but i have to admit that i am afraid of pitbulls having been rushed several times by aggressive ones with thnakfully no bites to show for it,smartguy360,e9e70j2,conservative
"I'm totally fine with pitbulls being outlawed and/or going extinct.

1. Outlaw pitbull breeding
   A. If caught breeding, pay a hefty fine and have the dog forcibly neu/spayed

2. Government subsidized free pitbull neutering/spaying.",Wolf_Shielded,e9eg6jj,conservative
"Does anyone have the percentage of fatal dog attacks involving Pit Bulls?

EDIT: [Over 65%](https://www.dogsbite.org/dog-bite-statistics-multi-year-fatality-report-2005-2017.php)",-Shank-,e9emmp3,conservative
I never thought I’d say this but PETA is finally doing the right thing for once. ,accountnumber111893,e9dwtqp,conservative
"What?! How is this even possible, even legal? This is just horrible.",EnvironmentalFalcon0,e9eo2wd,conservative
Peta is to animals what Planned Parenthood is to pre-natal care,KaiserGrant,e9epzqz,conservative
"aLL DoGs Bite

ItS tHe OwnErS FauLt

GoLdEn RetRiEvErS BitE MoRe ThaN PiTBuLLs

DacHsuNdS ArE MoRe aggressive ThaN PitBuLLs

PuNiSh tHe dEEd NoT thE BrEEd

He nEvEr bIT aNyOne BeFoRe

PiTbuLL iSnt EveN a ReAL BrEEd, YoU DumBaSS

",kanhawk,e9em1ft,conservative
They’ve always been a dog killing organization,KevinG99,e9e0jsn,conservative
"""Better for them to die with dignity than be kept as slaves!"" - Some PETA idiot, probably.",Revliledpembroke,e9e4sfp,conservative
everyone should check out the Penn and Teller's Bullshit episode on PETA. They fund domestic terror.,shatter321,e9ej5r1,conservative
"I read it was the best friends animal society aka process church of the final judgment that pretend to believe pets are slaves, while using them for profit.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Process_Church_of_the_Final_Judgment",pthylozn,e9e14yz,conservative
"That's the difference between a conservative vegan, and a liberal vegan.",Usmc42fan,e9e3s6t,conservative
Alyssa Milano supports this cause.,tehForce,e9e8084,conservative
You're not the only one.,jj_dynomite,e9egm5v,conservative
"I think the reason we don't see as many stories about dobermans or Rottweilers or any other purebred dog is because they're more expensive, so they weed out a lot shitty owners. Pitbulls are cheap, so they attract a crowd that wants to look cool by owning a tough looking dog, but they also aren't responsible people nor do they work ethic required to take care of a dog.

",severeneckpain,e9efnrk,conservative
"Urban legend. Pit bulls are regular dogs. They have a size appropriate bite force, about as much as a german shepherd and far, far less than e.g. a rottweiler. And if you want proper bite force, look at aksaray malaklisi or bully kutta.
What's dangerous is their gameness, seeing as they are terriers. They're as fierce as e.g. jack russell terriers, just bigger.",redditsuxsobad,e9esfvc,conservative
Holy hell that's a disturbing place.  They really think the dog breed is that bad its the ones trained to be aggressive that are bad and almost any breed can be like that.  That room is full of dog haters. ,Xero03,e9e9nuk,conservative
"I agree. That's reasonable imo, but there's no reason to kill all the existing ones. Who came up with this mass-euthanasia plan and went with it over the sensible, humane option you describe?

I think it goes to show the mentality of these people.",MisterMouser,e9eh7jn,conservative
This. Anyone that supports pitbulls in urban communities should also support tigers in urban communities. Yeah many pitbulls when raised appropriately and have good genes can become decent companion dogs. But have you seen the average millennial? Do you expect them to raise a dog that was bred to take down bulls and wild boars?,sjwking,e9es4y1,conservative
I agree,BlacktasticMcFine,e9eqfif,conservative
You should have gone with your first impulse.,hello_japan,e9dynt4,conservative
Why is this the right thing?  Sounds like punishment for all for the sins of few.  Typical leftists.,tehForce,e9dyrfh,conservative
Also dog stealing. ,skarface6,e9e5qyu,conservative
"No, that's actually what they think. They think that pet ownership, and all human dominion over animals for that matter, is unethical. They believe that animals belong in the wild far away from us, that anything we domesticated, we perverted, and that humans are generally evil. ",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9ej5v0,conservative
This sounds like the set up for a joke,Quantumstinger,e9em2yu,conservative
Who?,Cr8er,e9e8cih,conservative
she is a whore ,donjohn1986,e9eaki7,conservative
Pit bulls do attack at a disproportionate rate. I think it was like over half of all dog attacks while being a minute portion of the dog population. ,Quantumstinger,e9em7jg,conservative
"I didn't have anything about killing existing pitbulls.  I'm not for killing pitbulls.

I'm for neu/spaying them and as time goes they get harder and harder to get leading to the breed dying out.  

Dog pounds and such should have all pitbulls fixed by law.  As for private owners maybe the government can OFFER them $50 to get their pit fixed.",Wolf_Shielded,e9ehksi,conservative
"Because pitbulls are disproportionately violent, murderous dogs and literally nothing of value would be lost if they just disappeared? 

I’d like to be able to take my golden to the dog park without having to worry about it’s face being ripped off by a pit bull. I’d like it if my niece did not have a giant scar on her face from when my retarded brother’s monster tried to kill her.

And don’t come at me with the “it’s just the owner” or “well chihuahuas bite people too” bullshit. Anecdotally my experiences with pitbulls have been nothing short of horrific, and every available statistic backs up my claims on how dangerous they are, more so than all these pitbull defenders who post pictures of their children resting their head on a death machine while talking about how sweet it is. They should be jailed. ",accountnumber111893,e9dz3ep,conservative
"Yep theyve been known to steal dogs out of peoples backyards 


Theyve also supported other anti animal measures",ExpensiveMention,e9ef2ks,conservative
"I was trying to make an accurate prediction of what a PETA idiot would say.

&#x200B;

It's funny because it's TRUE.",Revliledpembroke,e9ejbza,conservative
Approximately 66% of fatal attacks between 2005-2017 while comprising 4-6% of the dog population,-Shank-,e9en8c2,conservative
"I got that. I agree with you, and I disagree with them.",MisterMouser,e9ehvjd,conservative
">Because pitbulls are disproportionately violent, murderous dogs and literally nothing of value 

That's myth.  The pitbulls that are violent are raised to be violent.

You should read this article.  https://www.caninejournal.com/pit-bull-facts/
>86.8 percent of American pit bull terriers have passed their temperament testing according to the American Temperament Test Society, Inc. This is a higher number of American pit bulls to pass their testing than collies, beagles and even #golden retrievers.  good takeaway is: ",tehForce,e9e2djy,conservative
Same with black people. Should we kill them all?,alexdeutsch,e9h01gj,conservative
"Yes, it's funny because it's true. But it's also horrifying. PETA is essentially a cult. I've had the displeasure of dealing with PETA folks a few times. My heart, full of sympathy for how obviously they were being mislead, and my fists, full of anger at their cockiness, were having a battle of wills. Do I show pity for them like a good Christian, or do I let my disdain and natural snark shut them down? It's emotionally tiring trying to deal with actual craziness. Makes me almost appreciate psychologists.",XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9epbrm,conservative
Thanks,Quantumstinger,e9eocq4,conservative
"Awe man, the comment below with all the ""studies"" was deleted, I'll just post my comment here since I wasted time on it.


The ""breed"" of pitbull is a combination of dozens of breeds of dogs all put into one group. Kinda like how the media refers to all pistols as ""glocks"" and all rifles are ""AR15's"" or ""assault rifles"". Unless there are studies that actually differentiate between these breeds and make a definition (AKA one breed) of what a ""pit bull"" is then it's kinda pointless. 

>And the fact that you think the only violent pitbulls are raised to be violent is beyond laughable. They’re all violent, because they were specifically bred to be violent over generations and generations of pitbull.

Which is why these dogs are attacking the trainers who made them violent, right? Wait a second, trainers wouldn't risk training a dog that is just as likely to attack themselves as other things. Thats like hiring a mercenary, but they're just as likely to attack the person hiring them as the person they were paid to attack. Almost like the violent dogs are *trained* to be violent and their build and jaw strength, make them good candidates for people who want to misuse the dogs for fighting. 

I'm not saying that every pit bull, or any dog for that matter, is perfect 100% of the time. But its disingenuous when anti-pit bull people like you try and use studies when there's 15+ breeds going into one group (the pit bulls) and you compare them to 1 specific breed. And what about a pit/lab mix, but looks more like a pit? Wanna take a bet which category that dog would be put into? I'll give you a hint, it's not the lab category. 

>Lastly, fuck your “temperament test”

""Everybody needs to ignore data that suggests I'm wrong because I said so"" ",AManHasNoFear,e9e8a1k,conservative
[removed],,e9e3bxl,conservative
What a retarded counterpoint,accountnumber111893,e9i177w,conservative
"How? Black people commit murder at much higher rates than whites. If you want to judge entire groups on statistics, it doesn't just apply to dogs.",alexdeutsch,e9jeucu,conservative
 No no no. This can’t be right. I was told that voter fraud doesn’t exist. ,SexAddictRecovery,e9duccg,conservative
I don't care how they skewed it. Election fraud is still election fraud.,unityrootts,e9dt1zj,conservative
Were they Russian?  I bet they were Russian.,nooneuknow42,e9ekn6y,conservative
Good. Always a pleasure to see law and order taken seriously.,Mewster1818,e9dsi68,conservative
"I’m always told this doesn’t happen, and if it does it isn’t a big deal. ",runs_in_the_jeans,e9e9t5d,conservative
"Hey, I didn’t see this on CNN? I wonder why?",seat_shop,e9dvdwm,conservative
"lol Yes. ""Felisha Yolanda Rodriguez"" is a very common Russian name. Also, she *definitely* voted Republican. Because blablabla Trump collusion blablabla. ",glassjester,e9f0e26,conservative
"They just “found” another 15,000 ballots? Did somebody just happen to leave them in the bathroom so they could comfortably take a shit? WTF is that??",mikeygio,e9cqaa8,conservative
Im glad to see something being done. ,Isredditreal2009,e9ct2ok,conservative
Can they seize Brenda Snipes while they're at it? ,somegaijin42,e9cvjuo,conservative
Member when Detroit was ballot stuffing all over the place in 2016 and that barely registered in the news?,MackMizzo,e9d02lb,conservative
"Good. This shit has to stop. Both counties results should be considered tainted and set aside until they can be proven clean. I'm not sure if they can do that, but if they can't maybe it's time to come up with a new verifiable way of voting.",nateious,e9cym4f,conservative
"They aren't literally counting every ballot are they?  I fed my ballot into a scanner that I assumed kept track of the votes, is it not like that in Florida?",mlmack,e9d8dh1,conservative
"Something is seriously up in Boward county specificall. Look at the data and there was something like 26000 ballots that voted for governor, but did not vote for the senate seat. 

538 who's modeling issues and bais aside. still has access to good overall data and puts together good analysis of raw data. They had this to say as well; 

>  more Broward County residents voted for the down-ballot constitutional offices of chief financial officer and state agriculture commissioner than U.S. Senate. 

The explanation 538 had was possibly the way the physical ballot was designed in that the Senate race section is in a bottom corner and people maybe skipped over it, but I highly doubt 26,000 people went to the polls and forgot that there was a race for the senate seat going on, especially with how high profile the race was and how much money was spent on it. 

[Here's a good history](https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/opinion/broward-countys-election-division-is-a-national-disgrace-a-history) of the shit show that is Boward county and it's elections. 

I don't buy into the conspiracy thing, historically recounts change the outcome of elections less than one hald of one percent of the time, and if all of a sudden a manual recount changed the election there'd be a high amount of scrutiny from the courts, federal officials, state officials, etc if a recount found 50k+ votes to flip an election as that would be a massive statistical outlier. ",ed_merckx,e9dl1eq,conservative
This is a win win for the democrats. If Scott didn’t do anything they steal the election. Now that he’s doing this I guarantee people will be screaming “Voter Suppression” completely ignoring all the shady shit going on in Broward. ,Uncreative-name12,e9cyybt,conservative
"So legitimate question. There are over 20k ballots in the very blue country that vote for all levels except senator. Literally voted for like... agriculture secretary but not senator.

There is going to be a hand recount. I don't like the idea of those ballots being seized with that huge discrepancy. It could be a computer error. They should be checked shouldn't they?",Beesnectar,e9d8h0h,conservative
"We need strong handed leadership like this, a full investigation into election fraud. Also prosecution, which never seems to happen to democrats.",Jebytu,e9d4wqa,conservative
"This will not go over well...If federal agencies were tasked to provide oversight, we may well have seen some legitimate vote tampering. If this happens, any claims of fraudulent votes will be immediately dismissed as Scott's desperation. ",el_muchacho_loco,e9d175f,conservative
The officials in Broward County need to all be arrested and charged with high crimes and misdemeanors.,DocMilk,e9dm407,conservative
I don't understand how this is still bring allowed to continue. Isn't there someone who can intervene?,Natanyul,e9dt1of,conservative
"Good, now prosecute all people involved in this sham.

&#x200B;

On an unrelated side note, I used to know a guy who I'm thinking may be a distant relative of Rick Scott. His last name was Scott and he looks like a younger version of the FL Governor. Heh.",Terra_green2,e9fstut,conservative
[removed],,e9d8i8c,conservative
Florida is a complete embarassment to the republic. ,VeganMcVeganface,e9dg7ai,conservative
Or you got a bad reading from your machine or a large number of late ballots. ,afrobinsson34,e9do1k5,conservative
The caravans are stealing our election!,Ballsnaps,e9dfrtx,conservative
"You’re kidding me...

Just curious how it takes 3 days to count votes ",,e9cuf7j,conservative
Oh man. There was this box of ballots in the backseat of my car. I don't know how I could've forgotten about it.,DogBirdLizard,e9dbu11,conservative
guaranteed they just happened to find exactly enough to win the election. I mysteriously every one of the Lost ballast will be for a Democrat Democrat,ExpensiveMention,e9cw0vo,conservative
"It's either ballot stuffing, or ballot hiding.",dafunkmonster,e9dk5a5,conservative
"Next thing you know all those 15k conveniently vote Dem.

What a load of horse.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9dclfi,conservative
"I believe you're referring to mail-in and absentee ballots. They were not ""found"". ",imabeautifuluglymess,e9d8g2y,conservative
Me too!,cmiller1225,e9cxb25,conservative
Hopefully something being done means throwing in jail all those fraudsters.,sjwking,e9d4hw1,conservative
Idk how she isn’t in jail already but this hopefully puts her away for a long time,SanduskyTicklers,e9d0yu1,conservative
Not without full Level IV hazmat gear.,TheComedianGLP,e9dbojv,conservative
"I love how the left is saying, ""R's don't want votes counted!"" 

No, we don't want late submissions or fake votes counted.  ",Roez,e9d1zoo,conservative
I member.,blizzardice,e9dcvp8,conservative
I member. ,IWurgency,e9dg01n,conservative
Pepperidge Farm remembers.,unstabletable_,e9dg15p,conservative
"That's the machine vote. Those have already been tabulated and reported. They are now ""finding"" all of the mail-in ballots and counting those. Yet they're not reporting as required by law.",mastaxn,e9dbvgv,conservative
"Honestly, who gives a shit? No matter what Republicans do, they'll be demonized by the media. Lefties will always hate them. The optics will be no worse than any other time.

Republicans need to take control and actually enforce the law. Who cares about a bunch leftist whining? If that's enough to make Republicans puss out and bend over then the country is double-fucked. There's no reason to let biased media optics stop us from enforcing the law and keeping our rightfully-won races. Who cares if they complain? They lost.",diamondeyes18,e9czg76,conservative
"Who cares? Republicans could cure cancer and end world hunger and would be lynched for not doing it fast enough. No matter what the Republicans do, the left will cry foul.",Starky_McStarkface,e9d0xok,conservative
"“All votes must be counted.” And if you don’t count the ones that we’re not turned in when the law requires, or don’t count the ones that magically appeared after the results showed that the other guy won, you must be racist or something. ",justhere2havefun,e9d1mnt,conservative
"Let them scream.

Never try to get a barking rabid dog to play ball.

Just pew pew.",TheComedianGLP,e9dbsur,conservative
"Too bad, as long as we win. ",Slippery____Pete,e9dmm6w,conservative
"I don't care. Right now any claims of voter suppression are outweighed by ability of massive fraud to occur.  If I have to choose one side or another I'd error on the side of potential voter suppression, since that's more easily addressed, fixed and prevented. It shouldn't come to that, ever! But since it seems like it might this is where I stand.",HiGloss,e9dygqi,conservative
"> So legitimate question. There are over 20k ballots in the very blue country that vote for all levels except senator. Literally voted for like... agriculture secretary but not senator.

It's extremely bizarre because the Senate race was the very first box on the ballot and the partisan races are required to be separate from all of the non-partisan and referenda. To have such a large discrepancy between the Gov. and Sen. races with the slow-rolling of vote counts is very suspicious.",mastaxn,e9dbqn4,conservative
"It doesn't matter if it were Scott or Trump and the AG, the media and Dem's would be crying foul.  Screw optics.  Enforce the law.  Remember, Snipes is under a state court order and she's violating FL election laws by not disclosing the number of ballots on hand.  The law states that she has to announce how many ballots she has to count (provisional, mail-in, in person) 30 minutes after the polls close, which was 7:30.  She hasn't done this, AND they continue to find filled out ballots.  And let's not forget that there is no chain of custody on those ballots, so there's no assurance that they are real ballot.  

To summarize, 

1) Violated election law by not disclosing the number of votes by 7:30 pm on Election day

2) No chain of custody

3) Snipes has, in the past, illegally shredded ballots after counting them for Wasserman-Shultz race.

",jedichric,e9d7x5v,conservative
"These are not the ballots from election day. These are the ballots from mail-in and early voting, and provisional ballots. By law, the precinct is required to report how many of these paper ballots they have within 30 minutes of the polls closing. It's been almost 4 days, and Broward County has still refused to provide this information. Instead, they've been sporadically reporting that they ""found"" additional ballots, sometimes thousands at a time. They've refused to allow any Republican election observers into the room where these ballots are being tabulated. We also have seen video evidence that the ballots were transported to a centralized counting location by individual poll workers in their personal vehicles, completely destroying the chain of custody and security of those ballots.",Publix_Deli,e9dc4xp,conservative
Broward was required by law to disclose how many ballots they had left to count the night of the election. They have not.,piper06w,e9d9f77,conservative
I'm all about them needing time to count. What they didn't do is report how many ballots they needed to count. That is the part that makes this all real sketchy feeling. ,Cryptographer,e9ddmkv,conservative
"No, it is *Brenda Snipes'* flippant disregard for *THE LAW* that is unnerving.",dafunkmonster,e9dla3a,conservative
And why is it only that county? Or it least 90% of the outstanding votes are there,SnickersReese,e9cwjd1,conservative
The issue isn’t even counting who the votes were for. They haven’t even reported how many votes were cast in total!,SanduskyTicklers,e9d0wcn,conservative
Must be the the hanging chads. Same counties involved in that fiasco.,Magclin,e9dgs93,conservative
"It takes 2 months to get 25,000 LSAT exams scored... Getting upset that a disparate, out of date, analog system takes more than 8 hours is hilarious.",MorePointsThanShalov,e9cyz9c,conservative
"Yup, hard not to be cynical if Scott losses by 1,000 or 2,000 votes.  Votes that were not mentioned as existing or expected for three days following the election.  ",Roez,e9d22kv,conservative
Why not both,PhilosoGuido,e9dmaw7,conservative
Gerrymandering gets plenty of air time but potential voter fraud gets none. The most basic of voting regulations (Voter ID) gets shouted down. Wonder why.,MackMizzo,e9d23sx,conservative
[removed],,e9d7lgr,conservative
Isn’t it also too late to be counting them?,stanleythemanley44,e9djtw7,conservative
"> They are now ""finding"" all of the fake ballots that a bunch of interns frantically cranked out over the last week and counting those.

FTFY",dafunkmonster,e9dkqja,conservative
">Honestly, who gives a shit? No matter what Republicans do, they'll be demonized by the media. Lefties will always hate them. The optics will be no worse than any other time.

>Republicans need to take control and actually enforce the law. Who cares about a bunch leftist whining? If that's enough to make Republicans puss out and bend over then the country is double-fucked. There's no reason to let biased media optics stop us from enforcing the law and keeping our rightfully-won races. Who cares if they complain? They lost.

Completely agree.  Fuck optics.  Enforce the law and prevent election fraud.  No chain of custody, no count.  Also, Snipes is under court orders from what I understand.  Enforce the laws already in place.  ",jedichric,e9d0t5d,conservative
This is why so many conservatives and libertarians don't consider themselves Republicans. The GOP is so weak and ineffective that they are unable to tackle any sort of meaningful reform despite literally controlling the executive and legislative branches. ,warmabsurdrabbit,e9d8ypj,conservative
"> Honestly, who gives a shit? No matter what Republicans do, they'll be demonized by the media. Lefties will always hate them. The optics will be no worse than any other time.

Bingo.  I'm hoping that the longer they get exposed to Trump the more they will wrap their heads around the fact that the only winning move with the left and its pet media is to just ignore them.  Capitulation only leads to more demands.",anuser999,e9d74vh,conservative
"Seriously. Don’t we know how this game is played by now? They hate us. They will always hate us. They will never treat us fairly. We fight with everything we have or we lose, it’s that simple.",hello_japan,e9d82qj,conservative
">Honestly, who gives a shit?

Ding ding ding. This is the lesson of Trump. Never apologize, always be on the offensive, and when they sick their media dogs on you call them fake news and move on to the next shit you need to get done to run the country. 

",DrowningGods,e9dcrui,conservative
"Enforce the law. If they want a war over that, let them bring it.",jd_porter,e9dci4s,conservative
"Yeah, I'm content to let the leftists scream ""voter suppression"" while democrat election officials go to prison for violating the law.",dafunkmonster,e9dkme4,conservative
"Proposed headlines after Republicans cure cancer:

Republicans Announce Plan to Terminate Millions of Health Care Workers

Cure for Cancer Disproportionately Affects Rich White Americans

How Socialism Cured Cancer

President Obama's Incentives for Curing Cancer Finally Pay Off

Curing Cancer will Increase the National Debt

Why Don't Republicans Care About the Heart Attack Epidemic?",user1492,e9d1zgr,conservative
"Agreed. Trump pushed for and got experimental drug use passed. You know, one of those ways to help with healthcare? Yet the left still claims GOP policy will kill millions somehow. ",justhere2havefun,e9d1j7c,conservative
"Vote counting is important. But we can't count them if they are outside of a chain of custody. Investigate it, for sure, and throw people in jail who failed the chain of custody for those ballots, but you can't count them. ",DrowningGods,e9dcw4p,conservative
"Thank you, and by the way. This isn't a gotcha question. I think the people running this should be fired. But I just am not okay with someone who is actively running in the race to 'sieze' ballots with a VERY odd discrepancy. If they are checked and it is all on the up and up, cool. But they should be checked, and it's within the margin that they will.",Beesnectar,e9dbusg,conservative
"There's no reason to not report the total number of ballots cast unless you're trying to provide cover for ballot stuffing.  There's also no reason to shred ballots after counting unless you're deliberately trying to impede future recount attempts (and the only reason to do that is if you are trying to provide cover for election fraud).

As far as I'm concerned, the woman should be in prison already.",dafunkmonster,e9dl1j5,conservative
Because the election supervisor in this county has a history of violating election law.,dafunkmonster,e9dk7ot,conservative
Also the same county the mail bomber was from. Something funky going on there,BuyChristianSlaves,e9d581l,conservative
All of the counties that were just blasted by a CAT 4 hurricane reported on time. Spare me. ,Natetendo83,e9d01i5,conservative
Every other state manages. Heck the rest of Florida manages. ,,e9czaim,conservative
"Congratulations, this is the stupidest thing I’ve read today.  It’s still early though, but I’m rooting for you!",BigAl265,e9d0s5c,conservative
The rest of the country was able to do it. Spare me with this bullshit. ,steampunker13,e9d1zpy,conservative
Dade county has more than half the pop and votes and yet managed... not a very bright comment there bud.,abuigues,e9d1xzz,conservative
You seriously comparing exams to ballots?,1wjl1,e9d64vi,conservative
The lsat has a clusterfuck of other issues where they have to discard certain questions for being unfair or biased. Don’t act like it’s just a scantron,MegaBlastoise23,e9d5kub,conservative
"If the people that run the Board of elections there didn't have a history of cheating, I could take this post more seriously.",SickofInternetProgs,e9defrw,conservative
"That’s because the data is (probably) sent to a centralized location... checked and rechecked for scan analysis then the whole result set is scrutinized to see if there are any problems.  After that reports are written and they likely have a “fudge window” in case issues do arise.  They’ll have to have meetings about one-off situations like suspicious results in different centers and etc where they hash out what went on.

With elections you just run them and then back check for errors if things are close",Cinnadillo,e9drd0o,conservative
"You're trying to say something moderate in an extremist echo-chamber. God speed. Apparently they think every county in the country should finish counting at the exact same time, because they all have the same number of vote counters, the same equipment, the same number of votes, and definitely nobody ever gets ill or has a family emergency that might slow it down. These things are impossible to even consider.

Edit: I meant this thread is an extremist echo-chamber.. people jumping to conclusions that a delay *must* be a conspiracy to change votes is extremely sensationalist.",Cautemoc,e9d48ff,conservative
Florida does require valid photo ID with signature. This seems like a pretty good test of the effectiveness of voter ID laws. ,BeezDragon,e9d8gn6,conservative
"I was pretty upset over Kavanaugh, and I'm closing in on the same level of frustration now.  

This isn't even marginally acceptable.  What's worse, the D's are screaming the most BS, dishonest excuse trying to cover for it.  ",Roez,e9d2l2s,conservative
And gerrymandering only affects house seats which most braying leftist idiots don’t understand ,merkmerk73,e9djjq5,conservative
You wouldn't.  Your county election officials would.,mlmack,e9d9hze,conservative
"Imagine being dead for 10 years, and then having a ballot cast in your name two days after the election as some election official combs the voter rolls trying to find enough people to justify the car full of fake ballots they hauled in using their personal vehicle.",dafunkmonster,e9dkhve,conservative
Imagine you voted and then you found out someone may have created a fake ballot or altered one that would cancel out your vote.  Why would you be at fault to make your vote null and void?,Roez,e9e9gau,conservative
Then you should be mad enough to replace the incompetent people who are running your local elections,Menhadien,e9db3jr,conservative
"Technically, yes and no.

The early vote was supposed to have been completely counted and put into the election management system the day *before* the election. Those results were then required to be reported no later than 30 minutes after polls closed on election day (7:30pm). Broward has not reported the early vote totals and it's unclear if they're still counting those. But if they are, it seriously calls into question the chain of custody of those ballots since there's no way to know where those ballots came from or when.

Then there are the mail-in ballots. What, I think, the argument being made is that they had significantly more mail-in ballots than expected. But that doesn't make sense to me. Those ballots have been coming in since shortly after the primaries were certified. They should have been tallying those up as they were received. Did tens of thousands of mail-in ballots just suddenly get delivered on election day?

We don't know because Brenda Snipes will not disclose how many ballots were received for early votes or mail-ins, what's been counted, and what remains. She is required by law to report updated results every 45 minutes until counting concludes; she has not done any of that reporting. You can see the problem here... It's impossible to find discrepancies in ballots cast if you don't know how many ballots were requested and submitted. That's why those reporting deadlines are required by law; to prevent exactly the kind of election fraud that we believe is being committed.",mastaxn,e9dpx7s,conservative
"Respectable Conservatives™ conserved absolutely nothing.  We followed the ""but look at the optics!"" mantra to our death.

The left doesn't care about optics; they care about power.  And they've been stealing it while we've been asleep at the wheel.",nited_states,e9doz8a,conservative
"Dems: *steal multiple elections rightfully won by Republican candidates*

Republicans: ""Oh, better not fight this or else we'll look like fascists/racists/etc. We'll just have to tighten our belts and deal with 4 more years of higher taxes and cultural destruction! At least we'll have the moral high ground!""",diamondeyes18,e9dcjt2,conservative
"""Appeasement is feeding the crocodile hoping it eats you last.""
",nited_states,e9dpg7j,conservative
"If only one side plays by the rules, then there are no rules.

NO RULES.",TheComedianGLP,e9dbvks,conservative
\#metoo,diamondeyes18,e9dkz9v,conservative
"Man, I could actually see the third one being a real possibility. Like if the cure for cancer is expensive (because so much money has been poured into finding a cure), the left would cry foul that poor people couldn't immediately afford it. 

They'd completely dismiss the fact that we cured cancer if it's not handed out like Halloween candy.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9d910r,conservative
"Nah it would just be mostly radio silence with some headlines like ""Cancer Cured; Now Let's Cure Racism and Men""",sunder_and_flame,e9d4ilf,conservative
"I can totally get why republicans are pissed about the slow going but charges of fraud are irresponsible. First if there was true voter fraud the number of ballots won’t equal the number of registered voters in person, and the mail in requests.
 
I volunteered in call banks for Democrats and we focused on encouraging people to request mail in ballots. I doesn’t surprise me that a deluge of last minute ballots arrived. Also because it looks like the senate, AG commish, and Governor races were under voted on in relation to that actual turnout. That smells to me of a machine error. Let the votes actually be counted. Both parties have watchdogs in precincts and can report any irregularities. 

Since there is going to be a recount of ALL counties so there is a chance votes for republicans tick upward after all votes are recounted.",afrobinsson34,e9di9r5,conservative
So why are they still in charge of the thing they have prevy messed with?,Tico117,e9dq5hj,conservative
Don't forget it's also the county that allowed a horrific mass shooting to happen because they were too busy faking their youth crime stats to actually do anything about a clear and well-known danger.,anuser999,e9d6k95,conservative
Don’t call him that. It’s just feeding into the media narrative. Call him the mail bomber or anything else. Don’t use their language.,hello_japan,e9d7rin,conservative
Bigger cities in Florida manage.,skarface6,e9d49et,conservative
This is far from the first time this has happened in this same county.,Jared_FogIe_OfficiaI,e9d8uej,conservative
"Awww, you’re so sweet to support that concern troll....",gt4674b,e9d5ojn,conservative
">You're trying to say something moderate in an extremist echo-chamber. 



/r/Conservative is the only subreddit that considers both sides of an argument (which is how most conservatives got to where they are)",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d55a4,conservative
"In that case, wouldn't it make more sense to punish the election officials, and still count the votes? The punishment should be reserved for those who are at fault. ",BeezDragon,e9dl0nt,conservative
"First:
If I'm dead it wouldnt matter.
Second:
How, with Flordia requiring a photo identification to vote, would a dead person file a ballot?",xJBxIceman,e9e0lde,conservative
"Even if no fraud is occurring it still matters since it throws the validity of everything into question. We should never have to question and there should be no opportunity for fraud claims. Unfortunately there has been for a long time and officials haven't done anything to improve the matter, which is questionable itself. At this point, fraud or no fraud, everyone in Broward needs to be let go and an an entirely new system with hard rules and regulations needs to be implemented. They are no longer trusted by the public.",HiGloss,e9dya59,conservative
"[Trump comes along and delivers the GOP their best result in years, completely unexpectedly]

Republicans: ""Meh, he's not a REAL REPUBLICAN like us.  Why, this dolt actually cares about defending American workers from neoliberalism and globalism!  Can you believe it?  I say we reject his agenda and continue to do absolutely nothing until Democrats control all branches of government again.""",nited_states,e9dp62j,conservative
And then those same republicans who back down and don't fight wonder why (and hate) Trump got elected.,HighLatencyRaptor,e9dd74k,conservative
How Slaves Cured Cancer and How Republicans Took Credit for It,BuyChristianSlaves,e9d50j5,conservative
">I can totally get why republicans are pissed about the slow going but charges of fraud are irresponsible. 

Every county is required to disclose how many people submitted ballots by no later than half an hour after the close of the polls (even if they aren't yet counted).

This should be a simple process, as each voter should be checked off the list as he or she votes or has his or her ballot come in.  Every county in Florida complied with this.

Two days after the close of the polls, Broward still didn't even know how many people voted.  This directly defies the law.  This is illegal and this is fraudulent.",nited_states,e9dpt3o,conservative
"It is, in fact, possible to know precisely how many registered voters are in a county, and calculate the number of stuffed ballots to ""find"" based on that number.

The lack of a mismatch between cast votes and registered voters is not evidence refuting the existence of voter fraud.",dafunkmonster,e9dkwue,conservative
"Because she’s a Dem, the sheriff is a Dem, all of our Congressmen are Dems, all but one State seat are Dems, and the entire county commission are Dems (the lone R on the commission just won the aforementioned state house seat and a D replaced him). 

Half of these people run uncontested every cycle because Broward votes >70% D most years. ",YankeeBlues21,e9dqk0i,conservative
"OMG it's that one, didn't even realize that. That place is a mess and probably needs the national guard to come in to keep the peace.",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d6olf,conservative
Perfect thanks I needed another word for him. Edited,BuyChristianSlaves,e9d7t4j,conservative
"The fake mail bomber, none were viable ",BeachCruisin22,e9drsbl,conservative
"It's almost like a small area will have fewer people counting votes, so any illness or family emergency will set them back more than a larger area. But nah, definitely a conspiracy by this one county. That makes more sense.",Cautemoc,e9d52s7,conservative
"I'm saying *this thread* is an extremist echo chamber, I typically refer to this sub as the most balanced source of republican ideals. However, the majority here are 100% sure it's a Democrat conspiracy to change the outcome... how is that considering both sides of an argument? That there's some conspiracy to change the votes being perpetrated by 1 county because of a delay is pretty sensational, it *should* require extraordinary evidence, but people are saying it as fact and drawing all kinds of conclusions from it when there are perfectly banal reasons delays happen. That's not what considering both sides of an argument looks like. Anyone with an open mind won't read through the comments here and see moderate discourse, it's all blame and, frankly, claiming to be victims without there even being a result yet.

Edit: /u/BuyChristianSlaves only has the capacity to reply after he knows I've been banned. Sad.",Cautemoc,e9d5to5,conservative
It’s crazy that statistically those with scientific backgrounds lean liberal by a fair margin. And yet conservatives truly believe they are the only ones who used logic and an objective process to arrive at their beliefs. The egotism and disconnect is astounding ,MorePointsThanShalov,e9d5w0m,conservative
"It would, but I guess in Florida it doesn't make sense.  At some point, you have to say that any votes ""found"" after a certain period of time just won't be counted.  Especially ones that are being loaded into and out of personal vehicles.

We've been voting now for 200+ years, so you would think we would have it figured out by now.",mlmack,e9dlz6h,conservative
"The election official should indeed be punished, but now all the votes are suspect. Why should se count them? ",Wiseheart1,e9dstyv,conservative
"Are you being so obtuse to suggest fraud can't occur?  Have you even looked at the history of this county, and this woman in charge?  

Dude, come on.  The concern is this county has not provided proper accounting of votes cast, where these votes came from, and just as importantly, if votes might have been changed.  Everyone abides by the rules that were in place.  Everyone.  

You can't tell me none of that happened, because no one knows what's going on.  The fact the left is arguing against transparency to substantiate the legitimacy of the election is beyond me.  Not one Republican leader has suggested legitimate votes shouldn't be counted.  Not one.    ",Roez,e9e9nms,conservative
"Stop pretending to be stupid.

> How, with Flordia requiring a photo identification to vote, would a dead person file a ballot?

The corrupt election supervisor counts ballots that weren't submitted in-person by a person who presented a photo ID.",dafunkmonster,e9k7aua,conservative
"It also helps to regularly purge voter records of dead people and people that no longer live there, yet that is another thing the democrats are against.",mlmack,e9dmecd,conservative
[removed],,e9dlu86,conservative
"We were also the home of the 2000 election mess, our previous Dem sheriff went to prison for corruption (and the voters threw out his R replacement in favor of Israel because Blue Team), and we’ve got lovely 3 congressmen: Ted Deutch, the gun grabbing flag bearer of the Parkland movement; DWS, ms corruption herself; and Alcee Hastings, one of the only judges to be impeached and removed by the US Congress for accepting bribes...only to be elected to that same House 2 years later (where he’s remained since 1992)",YankeeBlues21,e9dqzjt,conservative
and they weren't mailed,JobieWanKenobi,e9ds95e,conservative
"The smaller counties, including ones hit by a hurricane a month ago, all managed it. They have no excuse.

Plus, your logic is hilarious. If it's a tiny population then there will be fewer votes to count, thus making it faster.",skarface6,e9d5h58,conservative
"Yes, but smaller counties that were devastated by the hurricane also managed to have their counts done on time...

The only difference is who is running the election in that county. And Broward county is being run by a woman who has already been found guilty of destroying ballots too early and has never been able to get her job done satisfactorily.",Mewster1818,e9d5sfg,conservative
"The county that has been in trouble for shady shit before?

Ya",merkmerk73,e9dj5th,conservative
"It's 12th wealthiest county in Florida, out of 67. The median income there is 62k. Tell me why the really poor counties get it done and this one doesn't? I live in Arkansas and we have digital voting equipment and a fraction of Florida's resources.",jhnmiller84,e9dne59,conservative
"So I guess this just happens to be the smallest county in America and has the most illnesses and family emergencies in the country huh. How convenient and totally logical. Oh wait, I think they just “found” another 20,000 ballots!",Ravens1112003,e9dkhq4,conservative
"> I typically refer to this sub as the most balanced source of republican ideals. However, the majority here are 100% sure it's a Democrat conspiracy to change the outcome... 

Right, this is the most balanced source yet 100% are sure Democrats are changing the outcome. You are kinda arguing that they are justified when you put it this way.",BuyChristianSlaves,e9dbq0a,conservative
">It’s crazy that statistically those with scientific backgrounds lean liberal by a fair margin. 


Not true, where did you hear that? Academics might, because liberals dole out money for guaranteed tenure jobs. But scientists in the private sector are very Republican. Look at how people who make over 100k vote, those are mostly STEM people in the private sector.

",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d60pf,conservative
"Only if you include the social """"""sciences"""""".  With their inability to replicate the findings that they assert are 100% valid on a regular basis I think that it's unfair to the concept of ""science"" to count them.",anuser999,e9d6uyj,conservative
There is a difference between someone who says they believe in science someone who actually follows the tenets of science.  And if you take a look at college professors you will find the greatest percentage of liberals will be in the disciplines the don't actually produce anything whereas in the hard sciences and economics you will find the greatest number of conservatives.,chabanais,e9d7zhm,conservative
Logic and science are entirely separate fields.  That's such a stupid strawman.,Jswill16,e9dcaqm,conservative
"That isn't the voters' problem TBH. Voting is a right, not a privilege. If it's truly impossible to validate the votes -- which seems weird given that Florida has voter ID laws, so they should have a count of valid votes cast in the county -- I guess they'd have to run the election again, or something like that. There's no rush, they've got months to do it. But incompetence on the part of the government doesn't constitute a crisis on the part of the voters. ",BeezDragon,e9dteq3,conservative
"There is no good reason to break the law and refuse to report the total ballot count.

There is no good reason to transport ballots in personal vehicles.

These behaviors are strong indicators of ongoing election fraud.

Is it possible that Brenda Snipes and her staff are just totally moronic and incompetent?  Yes, I suppose.  But it's not likely.",dafunkmonster,e9dmz1v,conservative
He shall now be called the hoax bomber!,BeachCruisin22,e9e2vat,conservative
">The smaller counties, including ones hit by a hurricane a month ago, all managed it. They have no excuse.

Getting hit by a hurricane doesn't mean any of the vote counters were hurt, got ill, or had a family emergency. Disasters happen, and delays happen, both due to circumstances outside of people's control. Maybe a counter got into a traffic accident. Maybe one had a pregnant daughter who went into labor. How could you possibly know what happened any more than you know why someone missed a day of work in another state? Things happen without there being a natural disaster, and a natural disaster doesn't mean someone must have happened to a vote counter.

>If it's a tiny population then there will be fewer votes to count, thus making it faster.

If you have 100 votes per counter in a district with 50 counters, 1 having a problem won't matter as much if you have 90 votes per counter in a district with 10 counter. Even with less votes per counter, having fewer people to spread an absent counter's ballots to would mean the smaller area would take more time.",Cautemoc,e9d6u52,conservative
"Are you familiar with Pew Research Center: A full 52% of Scientists consider themselves Liberal vs. 9% Conservative. http://www.people-press.org/2009/07/09/public-praises-science-scientists-fault-public-media/

>Not True

Let me guess Pew Research is bullshit now for some reason?
LOL this is unreal. You're using anecdotal evidence to support your opinion, the exact thing I see conservatives crying about all the time. ""Facts don't care about your feelings""

Edit: Also you think if you make over $100k that means your in the STEM field? How old are you actually? I have plenty of friends in their late 20s/early 30s making well over $100k in Sales Roles for crying out loud.",MorePointsThanShalov,e9d6yiz,conservative
[removed],,e9d8o93,conservative
[removed],,e9d7s8o,conservative
"Snipes has a terrible record and I’ll admit that as a Democrat. The law however says the ballots must counted and reported by a certain time, not send in whatever ballots you have counted despite knowing there are some uncounted 

Get people in there to count the votes, count them and see who is the winner. My bet is that R hold on to the lead in both races. ",afrobinsson34,e9dnaoi,conservative
The ACME bomber,Buddha_Punch,e9ekt33,conservative
"Florida law requires all counties to report within 30 minutes of polls closing.  65/67 counties did so.  2 took over 40 hrs.  So, it is more like a county with 90 counters had 89 call in sick.",elcuban27,e9d7bn7,conservative
">Are you familiar with Pew Research Center: A full 52% of Scientists consider themselves Liberal vs. 9% Conservative. 

They say in the methodology its only *academic* scientists, so I'm still right: Scientists in the private sector (i.e. 95% of Americans who make over 100k per year) vote overwhelmingly conservative.",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d7lcp,conservative
">Edit: Follow-up. Even if, for some reason, you wanted to use high earners as your metric, they still favor Democrats.

But this chart seems to shows high earners  always go Republican, except for 2012 when they were even with Democrats during the Republicans least popular presidential candidate in recent memory.

>If you look at education levels it's pretty obvious that the higher educated people are, the more they lean Democrat. I'm not arguing that makes them superior but it's important that facts are facts. Republicans need to think about their image because the trend isn't looking great. Source

""Educated"" is not the same as scientists.",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d9m0q,conservative
The only reason to *not* report the total number of ballots to be counted is if you're trying to back-calculate the total number after stuffing or destroying ballots.,dafunkmonster,e9dntx5,conservative
[removed],,e9d7xbw,conservative
[removed],,e9dc1i9,conservative
[removed],,e9d95r7,conservative
Woah...are you talking shit about Bill Nye?,craig80,e9dgrk5,conservative
[removed],,e9daksj,conservative
"[Daily Wire article](https://www.dailywire.com/news/38162/rubio-heres-more-evidence-potential-voting-law-james-barrett) listing tweets by Marco Rubio with his references linked, and an overview.",elcuban27,e9d9c62,conservative
"It’s not to tally the votes 

It’s to count them 

It’s not that hard to follow the law of counting your total ballots 

Tallying is different 

The reason the law is in place is to prevent the obvious vote manufacturing that is going on in broward under a supervisor who has already been caught destroying ballots in the past",merkmerk73,e9dj9o8,conservative
"&#x200B;

[Here's an article talking about how high earning jobs are overwhelmingly STEM jobs](https://www.glassdoor.com/blog/highest-paying-jobs-2018/)



[Here's an article talking about how high earners voted overwhelmingly for Trump](https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2016/nov/09/white-voters-victory-donald-trump-exit-polls)",BuyChristianSlaves,e9dcdq8,conservative
Is this a question?,BuyChristianSlaves,e9d9gst,conservative
"That's where all of the ones that could find jobs are, yeah.

Were you asking a question?",Silicon_Avatar,e9da0gp,conservative
"Haha well he *did* disavow the connections between X,Y chromosomes and gender recently lol",BuyChristianSlaves,e9dh4rq,conservative
"> Come on now, I'm trying to have a discussion in good faith. I'm sure you can see just as well as I can what the trends are.

Funny you mention that when your graph stops at 2012 and doesn't include the popularity Trump and other Republicans have had since that low point.

>2016 they were also tied in the $100k+ category

source?

> I don't believe anyone can definitively prove how scientists vote because it depends on what you define as a scientist and in what discipline, it's a moot point.

So if you're going to shift the goalposts around and then throw up your hands and say no one can know anything then what's the point of starting the discussion?",BuyChristianSlaves,e9dbmua,conservative
"Ooof, they are supposed to report how many they have to count, not the result. They have reported how many are left to count. I just linked it to you. Sorry, this is a nothing-burger.",Cautemoc,e9d9p5k,conservative
nope,justthenicestuff,e9dadkp,conservative
And they hadn't reported like they were supposed to until two days afterward and kept turning in ballot results narrowing republican leads.  Possible something-burger.  What are your thoughts on the video of them illegally transporting ballots?,elcuban27,e9datrv,conservative
"Oh it’s a something burger

They violated the law which can invalidate their manufactured ballots 

There was also a sworn affidavit of a temp who says she saw broward manufacturing ballots in a locked off and closed room from 2016 iirc

Sorry it goes against your narrative but the voter fraud they’re trying to commit isn’t going to fly ",merkmerk73,e9dje1q,conservative
I thought it was funny.,Luke_Flyswatter,e9er5wd,conservative
Anyway to block articles from a specific source? This one to be exact. ,Sashaaa,e9e9axg,conservative
"I thought I was the only one that hated seeing these fake, ""funny"" articles all over the sub.",Random57473838,e9edpdr,conservative
"I’m a big fan of satire when it’s original, but this isn’t funny - just a bunch of rehashed cliches. ",Sashaaa,e9eduwz,conservative
Once they hit the front door like that.. she could feel her life was threatened. She should have went to the 2nd floor and opened fire. You can’t back down from these people. ,mods_blow_goats,e9dumpf,conservative
The group's FB page is still up and deserves to be reported!,BitchesMan,e9evc27,conservative
They're lucky Carlson is not the type of person to leave the door unlocked and just waiting at the end of the dark hallway with a shotgun.,markcocjin,e9f2m6n,conservative
"Talked my girlfriend through the situation last night and she was like ""why didn't she shoot?"" I had to explain to her that, living where they live, they likely aren't part of the blessed few that are deemed worthy to own firearms. I sure hope Tucker jumps through whatever hoops are necessary to protect his family from this day forward.",GFZDW,e9dwpzx,conservative
I’m guessing Fox will get him some guards now,mods_blow_goats,e9e09cg,conservative
Sort of surprised he didn't have at least one security person on staff.,GFZDW,e9e0cee,conservative
Especially considering he doesn’t just have Fox money. He has his own and family wealth. He owns the Daily Caller which has to have some value ,mods_blow_goats,e9e0nmz,conservative
"Everything is tilted against us lads. The sad truth is, we’re fucked. This cancer has already consumed Europe and Canada. We’re the last one standing but I don’t see it lasting much longer. ",TXhorn4life,e9e0vjx,conservative
[Multiple counties in Florida are still counting.](https://floridaelectionwatch.gov/CountyReportingStatus),Borkenstien,e9e1tm0,conservative
That’s not what people are like in my area.  It’s about 50/50 conservative/liberal here.  Europe and Canada will learn some lessons from their bad political choices.  I know that the younger generation is getting conservative values too.  They are our future.  Never give up.  ,Neanderthalbastard,e9ebf2m,conservative
"How nice of you to drop in and alert us that yet another Leftist is going to ignore their own party's corruption. 

It's sad how far you idiots are gone from reality. ",Ledcookey,e9ek5a8,conservative
"LMAO, head over to the_douche and you'll see a call for civil war in any single thread you open.   But sure, us leftist are the ones with issues.",Borkenstien,e9eps8r,conservative
"And? Im not saying only Leftists are the ones with issues, but you idiots sure as hell take gold on frequency and severity as of late.

Again, it's sad that you morons cant recognize your own violent, corrupt, and pathetic issues. It's sad that you're too blind not only to the fact that your talking heads use you, but have allowed them to completely shape your world view making everything outside your own little bubble is racist, sexist, fascist and whatever other word pops up into your heads. 

There are plenty of dipshits on the right who can be described in very similar ways, but the difference between the average Conservative and Leftist is night and day. You idiots are jokes. 

",Ledcookey,e9evgcn,conservative
"I actually was a conservative, McCain in 2008 and Romney in 2012, but eventually I started to actually examine my beliefs, then I realized how rampant contempt for science and evidence is in conservative circles.  When I turned off the news and started reading research and actually looked at myself I realized how delluded I really was.  Turn off the Rush, the Hannity, and Fox, it's bad for you.

Edit:
Why do you think I posted the link Rubio posted sans editorial?  And why has that sat here for a day while bouncing from positive to negative?  Because, people saw what they wanted to, some saw me supporting conservatives others saw me supporting ""leftests"", I just posted raw facts.  Y'all gotta learn how to process data for yourselves.  Just saying.  The data Rubio posted, pretty much showed that other than a few counties being slow, things are more or less normal.  ",Borkenstien,e9evvrw,conservative
"lmao... right, im sure you were just a typical Conservative who finally saw the light. Cmon man, defend your post against me but dont start stupid shit like that. 

I'm not attacking the fact that other counties are still counting ballots, Im attacking the idea of that somehow meaning what's going on in Broward is not fraudulent. You're really going to take that data and use it to disregard the videos of all these early vote and provisional ballots being trucked in by personal vehicles to facilities where the election officials arent letting in  outside inspection? You're going to use it to ignore the terrible track record of fraud this idiot Brenda Snipes has had?  ",Ledcookey,e9g1gzn,conservative
"LMAO, I was what you'd call an evangelical.  So I was more lost than most.  But I'm done, I said my peace, believe me or not.  IDC",Borkenstien,e9g2czn,conservative
"And that makes you Conservative? I'm Antheist. You dont need to be religious to be an American Conservative.

Probably the biggest core value of Conservatism in this country, the thing that separates us from the Left, is our adherence to the Constitution and belief in limited Government. While the Left believes every problem can be solved by passing a law... or at the very least, they are conned into voting that way...

Im sure you're done. Wouldnt want you to address any of those issues if it makes you uncomfortable.",Ledcookey,e9g3z4g,conservative
Nope.  Just you don't believe me so what's the point?  For the record I believed that ideal too.  But W/E,Borkenstien,e9g69fa,conservative
"Believe you about what? Other counties still counting votes? Did you not read my comment about that? 

What, you believed it until you were convinced our Government is a benevolent force filled with nothing but benevolent people looking out for whats best for the people? lmao ",Ledcookey,e9g7oq3,conservative
It's Blatant Banana Republic Bullshit (now the name of my new band as well),ngoni,e9dykcd,conservative
Good. If we tolerate liberals donning pink cat ears and screeching at the sky because somebody they didn't like won fair and square then conservatives have every right to protest the shenanigans going on right now. ,Natetendo83,e9cygjr,conservative
"Good,

It's Friday, and I'm glad he got in a good solid 3 days of sitting idly by before deciding to get the fuck up out of his idle chair.",TheComedianGLP,e9dhgyb,conservative
[removed],,e9d0216,conservative
"No, we defend free and fair elections.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9d2ide,conservative
"There are such a things as rules and laws....  You can not go vote right now the election is over.
so if thousands of ballots were not turned in in time... That is too fucking bad, that is why we have rules and laws without them we would have fucking chaos.  Is that what you want fucking chaos?",ozric101,e9d22qi,conservative
When it’s convenient. ,RealSlimBiscuits,e9d695y,conservative
[removed],,e9d6bse,conservative
Find me a close election where the Republicans actually gained votes when counting in the final hour.,1wjl1,e9ddad3,conservative
"Ah yes, because there are so many incidents of Republicans rigging elections and stealing / 'discovering' thousands of ballots.  Mmmhm.  

Why are you here again?",Colonize_The_Moon,e9d6el1,conservative
How did you feel about the Kavanaugh hearings?,TheBrovahkiin,e9d6uy5,conservative
"You forget how we got here, the blatant disregard for election LAWS...
So, no you do not get to break laws and use that as a spring board to upend an election... SORRY.  ",ozric101,e9d71ae,conservative
Rick Scott is the current Governor.  Him leading the charge to investigate potential foul play IS the legal process.,gameinator3000,e9dgf50,conservative
There’s a pretty famous one in 2000 Bush v Gore in....Florida. ,RealSlimBiscuits,e9ddr92,conservative
That’s my point. Just because liberals overreact to some accusations doesn’t mean that conservatives should do it at the first opportunity. ,RealSlimBiscuits,e9d8e4m,conservative
If they broke laws it will be handled. Then you can celebrate. But overreacting to accusations is exactly what conservatives were just complaining about the liberals doing. ,RealSlimBiscuits,e9d8jve,conservative
"If I recall, Bush was solidly ahead and Gore conceded...until more D ballots started coming in",1wjl1,e9ddw2b,conservative
"That was the opposite of this, I believe.  Bush was ahead until provisional ballots for Gore turned up.",TBSportsFan1254,e9dhyh7,conservative
"And you would be *shocked*... ***shocked*** I say, when you find out which county those votes came from.

*cough* Broward *cough*",KrimsonStorm,e9dqz9s,conservative
Seppuku wasnt on the list.,CapitalGGeek,e9g3su9,conservative
"They have no desire to restore any trust. Their purpose is only to advance the goals and narratives of the statist left. If people seek out alternative news sources, those must be silenced, destroyed, or discredited. Hence the tech industry's purging of dissenting voices in social media, the constant attacks on Fox News and talk radio, and the phony ""fact checking"" outfits that are nothing more than leftist spin. ",PhilosoGuido,e9he86q,conservative
How long before the media (and by extension the DNC) goes into a “CRITIQUING HER IZ RAYCISS” mode?,Knollsit,e9cywjk,conservative
"If you get convicted of molesting a child you don't get to keep your job at the daycare center, why is she allowed anywhere near a voting system?",BeachCruisin22,e9cu0tp,conservative
"She needs to be in prison for the rest of her life. Election fraud is no small thing, especially since she's seemingly done it about a dozen times.",deathwheel,e9d26cy,conservative
It is mind boggling that this troll is still the supervisor of elections in that county. ,Meatball2112,e9cs8hs,conservative
It's not bad enough that we have to deal with a lying media pushing the liberal agenda everyday and rinos working against us.  We have to deal with these horrible people simply trying to steal elections.  Starting with hrc is any democrat held responsible for breaking the fucking law.  It is the very fact that these bastards are never prosecuted that it keeps happening.,stancrouch,e9cxbaa,conservative
Evil Lt. Uhura from the Mirror Universe.,TheComedianGLP,e9d9w23,conservative
So what is he going to do about it? Someone needs to DO something to stop this nonsense. 2 counties in Florida...how many times now? Affecting national elections? Come on. Time to DO something about it.,cmiller1225,e9cx5me,conservative
"Okay, so if she have pulled this shit before, why is she in the position to do it again? ",Escenze,e9di49d,conservative
The only way it makes sense that Brenda Snipes is still the election supervisor still is that she is the fixer for the Democrats and they are very pleased with her past performances. No one else would keep their job had they the same track record as Snipes.,skankblunt42,e9dpgr2,conservative
DJT won’t sit idly by.,Otto-Carpenter,e9ddc4w,conservative
Was literally wondering this myself as soon as I saw the headline.,BuyChristianSlaves,e9d5k6p,conservative
Democrat?,_SkeletonJelly,e9dx5hs,conservative
"So, wondering what the result of a recount will show.  Disturbing to know observers were not allowed and the deadline was passed before “finding”. Did someone go down the list of names and start asking people to bring in and backdate mail ballots or provisional?  I don’t have enough imagination to think of how only one party would benefit from these “mostly Democrat” and statistically remote chance of finding only missing votes in Gillum or Nelson’s favor.  

Scott was correct to be angry and I hope he acted quickly enough.",Ted-the-Pirate,e9diacw,conservative
Liberals have one consistency during elections and that's fraud. ,MountainsMan55,e9dja2j,conservative
"I'm shocked, shocked to find that voter fraud is going on in there. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9dkukz,conservative
"Question...If they are rejecting these because they KNOW the person already voted, doesn’t that mean they actually know for sure who it was that tried voting a second time and can’t they prosecute these people?",Meatball2112,e9dn0qd,conservative
"Voter fraud is a real thing, every year the police department for my city I reside in makes multiple arrests for voter fraud. I don’t live anywhere special so if it’s happening here it’s happening literally everywhere.",Nodoxxing1234,e9e21zw,conservative
[removed],,e9dmxzh,conservative
"Prosecution requires *criminal intent*

You know, just like for Hillary. ",Liberty_Pr1me,e9h91iu,conservative
"And that makes them right? Where has an event like this benefited Republicans?

They tell campfire stories about voting machines switching names. 

We have widespread events like this. Which party wants stricter verification for voting again?",greeneyedunicorn2,e9dox2b,conservative
"You know, when the Russians did that stuff with the things!!",CASunDevil24,e9dpwaa,conservative
[deleted],,e9fwsqx,conservative
"Did you follow me from /r/politics? LOL. I remember the blue takeover being talked about in 2016, with people saying there's a 99% of a Hillary win.  :D",mp-,e9fxos4,conservative
[deleted],,e9fy6rd,conservative
">United States House of Representatives elections, 2010: Republicans regained control of the chamber they had lost in the 2006 midterm elections, picking up a net total of 63 seats and erasing the gains Democrats made in 2006 and 2008. Although the sitting U.S. President's party usually loses seats in a midterm election, the 2010 election resulted in the highest loss of a party in a House midterm election since 1938, and the largest House swing since 1948. This also happened to be the Republicans' largest gain in House seats since 1938",mp-,e9fy9id,conservative
[deleted],,e9fyvjk,conservative
"When Chuck Todd, the midterm-nerd of MSNBC, tells you it wasn't a blue wave...then it wasn't a blue wave.",mp-,e9g8j0v,conservative
[deleted],,e9g8tnk,conservative
"I love how much in denial you are, it's cute. I mean, even people on the left are telling you it's not a blue wave, yet you think it is.  
  
And also, LOL:  
  
>United States House of Representatives elections, 2010: Republicans regained control of the chamber they had lost in the 2006 midterm elections, picking up a net total of 63 seats and erasing the gains Democrats made in 2006 and 2008. Although the sitting U.S. President's party usually loses seats in a midterm election, the 2010 election resulted in the highest loss of a party in a House midterm election since 1938, and the largest House swing since 1948. This also happened to be the Republicans' largest gain in House seats since 1938

",mp-,e9g93cb,conservative
[deleted],,e9g9ned,conservative
"So there was a red wave twice the size in 2010? Right? For example:  
  
- 2010 Obama: -63    
- 1994 Clinton: -52   
- 1958: Eisenhower: -48    
- 1974 Ford (Nixon): -48   
- 1966 Johnson: -47   
- 1946  Truman: -45
    
  
And in 2006,  Republicans lost 30 seats in the House AND six in the Senate. In 2018, they GAINED 3 senate seats.     
   
You can't have it both ways, I don't understand why you claim it's a blue wave in 2018 but not a red tsuanmi in 2010? In fact Obama even described the Republican wave as a ""shellacking"". He's basically saying he got fucked in the ass, and that was DOUBLE what Republicans encountered in 2018.  He also LOST senate seats. Trump GAINED senate seats.  
  
 
Your ass has been red since 1994, it's better to get it checked so you don't get fucked again in 2020.",mp-,e9gi1yk,conservative
[deleted],,e9gjd9d,conservative
"Okay dude, take a deep breath, I know Orange Man is bad and all but let's not be morons about this.  
  
Losing the house is BAD for Republicans. I can say that. Ben Shapiro said it. Lots of Conservatives said it. We know it's bad, it's called being logical.  
  
The weird thing with you is I can't figure out what is and isn't a ""wave"" to you. So if losing 30 seats in the house is a wave, then that must mean Obama was royally fucked in the asshole in 2010 with a red tsunami, correct? We know a larger percentage of votes came out in 2018, no fucking shit, but that applies in general.   
 
 For example, in 2014, the Florida gubernatorial election had 2,865,343 votes go for Scott. In 2018, guess what DeSantis got. 4,075,879. Yes, I'm not joking.  
  
You just have to remember you're not arguing with your retarded uncle at the dinner table. You're arguing with someone who knows politics inside and out, so throwing statistics out there is only going to work if it can't be used against you.  
  
Again, Dems own the house (like practically EVERY party opposite of the incumbent President), but LOST the senate (unheard of). Not only that, but the dems with their 2 most recent incumbent Presidents lost TWICE the amount of the ""blue wave"", so they were fucked til their ass was red.",mp-,e9gkgz4,conservative
[deleted],,e9gksn1,conservative
"Great retort!!! Now, numbers don't lie baby, move along, get reamed (like you did on Tuesday) LOLOLOL",mp-,e9gkute,conservative
[deleted],,e9gowdn,conservative
"Imagine how dumb you have to be, intellectually, to see 60, and 30, and think 30 is larger than 60.",mp-,e9gq04y,conservative
lol its ironic that dems were the ones whining about voter suppression. I guess its only a problem when we're 'suppressing' illegals and other participants in their voter fraud rings. It's totally cool for them to suppress legitimate voters who would vote Republican,VoinaYMir,e9dxsu4,conservative
It's an effort to make sure all those illegals pouring in over the border finally start to pay real dividends.,nited_states,e9dto6g,conservative
"Ok, let’s be clear here. We can complain about private institutions indoctrinating students and suppressing dissenting voices, but there’s no such thing as a “right” to hear conservative speakers. Private higher educational institutions are just that—private. It’s not the government’s job to tell private actors what speech to allow, that would be compelled speech and violative of the 1st Amendment.",Rex_Wyatt,e9evjcg,conservative
"I'm floored that he's able to remind everyone about the common good and decency of most Americans so soon after this mob. I may not agree with him on many things, but I honestly think he's a good person...",Mewster1818,e9dj8nd,conservative
"Tucker, only *you* can reclassify it from ""protest"" to ""demonstration of castle doctrine in action.""",soylent_absinthe,e9eag30,conservative
"Next time, kill the guy who kicks your door in and this nonsense will stop.",DarthNaseous,e9f4dky,conservative
Tucker seems like a really great dude. Strikes me as humble and nice in long form interviews like when he was interviewed on Adam Corolla’s podcast ,i_floop_the_pig,e9e8z26,conservative
"That's right Rubio, the Democrats are using brass knuckles, at the very least it's time for Republicans to start taking off the damn gloves. ",Rightquercusalba,e9crvn8,conservative
"You gotta keep counting until you get the results you want. Even us dumb ""crackers"" know that! LOL",JFGFNY,e9d8pnw,conservative
"Broward County is a shithole, but there maybe *A* reason for it:

> Bay County Population: 183,563 (2017)
>
> Broward County Population: 1.936 million (2017)

",Roidciraptor,e9d0rrq,conservative
"Odds are they are not ""counting"" -- they are ""printing"" ",Racheakt,e9d400y,conservative
Cheating is OK if you're on the 'right side of history',puddboy,e9d6bad,conservative
"If Republicans wanted to win elections half as badly as Democrats are willing to cheat to win them, then we would have 100 Republican senators and 350 House seats.",BuyChristianSlaves,e9d6kl1,conservative
Also Broward county has the shittiest election supervisor in the United States ,SanduskyTicklers,e9d14ax,conservative
"Why can almost all of the big cities in Texas have all the votes counted in a few hours after the polls closed here. Dallas county has 2.6 million people living in it, but it was one of the first counties to be counted. I call BS on both Florida and Arizona. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9d3l8p,conservative
"> Miami-Dade County Population: 2.752 million (2017)

Yet they managed to count and submit their vote results on time.",LoneBurro,e9d6eho,conservative
"And yet, Chicago, New York City, and all the other huge metropolitan areas across the country managed to count their ballots in time in accordance with their state laws. ",TBSportsFan1254,e9di9o6,conservative
"Yep, there may be many, many boxes of votes that keep mysteriously turning up. My guess they will all be bubbled in for straight D. ""We lost the election, F!"" ""It's ok, with this debacle going on we have more time to prin-count more votes.""",RKfan,e9d6fcz,conservative
You do know what gerrymandering is right? Like actual cheating that gave the Republicans a huge edge? You’re delusional.,ytinasxaJ,e9datl9,conservative
"Yea, Arizona was for McSally and then when this BS started, it swapped to Sinema.",R0binSage,e9d6a0i,conservative
They better had. What happened in 2012 was very embarrassing.,goldmouthdawg,e9dfzhu,conservative
They might have more resources dedicated to vote counting. Population size is probably unrelated.,xJBxIceman,e9dfhnw,conservative
"Every red state in the South is required by federal law to gerrymander their congressional districts to ensure a certain number of minority-majority districts exist. If you've got a problem with that, take it up with the Voting Rights Act.",Publix_Deli,e9df9r4,conservative
"> You do know what gerrymandering is right? Like actual cheating that gave the Republicans a huge edge? You’re delusional.

Gerrymandering is how the law is set up. Ballot box stuffing is not. ",BuyChristianSlaves,e9dbb9c,conservative
"> You do know what gerrymandering is right?

You apparently don't.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9dd61l,conservative
">A panel of three federal judges ruled Wednesday that Maryland's congressional map was unconstitutional and ordered the state to draw a new one in time for the 2020 election.

>A group of seven Republican plaintiffs filed the lawsuit against Linda Lamone, state administrator of the Maryland Board of Elections.

https://www.upi.com/Top_News/US/2018/11/07/Judge-panel-rules-Maryland-congressional-map-unconstitutional/6011541628734/?rc_fifo=1",chabanais,e9deen9,conservative
isn't that what Dems do ?,JobieWanKenobi,e9dthcy,conservative
"Yeah and now I guess McSally can't win mathematically, yeah that doesn't seem odd at all. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9d6jxx,conservative
Glad to see the general population starting to make the connections here.,BuyChristianSlaves,e9d6mef,conservative
"Yeah, thats called ""proper management""",why-this,e9dhi56,conservative
"I think the ""Satire"" flair on this article must have been a mistake...",IndefinitePresent,e9dusf1,conservative
"[Here](https://www.lawfareblog.com/matthew-whitakers-appointment-acting-attorney-general-three-lingering-questions) is a good summary of the legal issues. The question is whether Trump can designate someone as acting AG who has not been confirmed by the Senate, when the office of AG is subject to Senate confirmation. The Federal Vacancies Reform Act says that Trump can do it, but some question whether the FVRA is constitutional.",PubliusVA,e9fvben,conservative
"It is largely nonsense as the Federal Vacancies Reform Act allows for the default appointment in case of the second officer. 

However, the statute allows for the President to replace the acting department head with an employee of the agency who has worked there for 90 days and has a GS-15 compensation level. 

Whitaker meets both of those requirements as he served as Chief of Staff for Sessions from September 2017 to Sessions resignation. 

",tm1087,e9fv4jp,conservative
">  claiming that Trump can not appoint Whitaker

Because Orange Man bad

>  I also can not understand why people are protesting Sessions being fired

Because Orange Man bad

> Conservatives hated his policies, Democrats hated his policies, how is this even remotely a protest event?

Because Orange Man bad

*^This ^message ^was ^brought ^to ^you ^by ^the ^Ctrl-Left*",Jizzlobber42,e9fqp14,conservative
"I'm very confused on this issue.  So this might go to the supreme court then?  It seems like both sides are set up to challenge either one of these laws if they dont get their way, and the court seems to be the only option.  That being the case, I would assume that Trump would lose this as a conservative majority would seem to favor limiting the authority of the presidential office.",Falkamper,e9fvubn,conservative
"Well I can understand that for the extreme base, but what about the moderates?",Falkamper,e9fsdcq,conservative
"While his explanation is reductive, it's sadly quite accurate. There are no moderates on the left. The left will do anything for power. They see Mueller as a vehicle for impeachment. They were ecstatic over Sessions' recusal and ineffectual pusillanimous management which has allowed partisan Obama holdovers to continue their nefarious deeds. They saw Rosenstein as a fellow traveler who would subvert the President and loved his lack of oversight of Mueller. This temporary vacancy appointment puts all their hopes of impeachment at risk, therefore they must find any justification to attack it, no matter how specious. They had no problem with Obama's recess appointments where he tried to unilaterally declare when the Senate was in session. This was slapped down by all nine justices, but we didn't see all this ""Constitutional crisis"" handwringing from the media. Federal Vacancies Reform Act allows for Trump's appointment. The real question for the left is that if the appointment of Whitaker is unconstitutional, how in the hell is the appointment of Mueller constitutional? The answer is, the ends justify the means. ",PhilosoGuido,e9hglef,conservative
"I can't believe there are no moderates, I live in southern New England and there are quite a few people that would be considered moderates to the rest of the nation.",Falkamper,e9ildq7,conservative
"You must live in a unique and rare microcosm that doesn't exist in the rest of the country. The data shows that moderates are disappearing. Furthermore, as seething, radical, cynical, win-at-all-costs, consequentialism takes over the Democrat party and they still win the midterms, this proves that this so called moderate Democrat faction is nonexistent. Any moderates who reject their unhinged out of control behavior were too inconsequential to effect the outcome.

http://www.people-press.org/2014/06/12/political-polarization-in-the-american-public/pp-2014-06-12-polarization-0-05/
",PhilosoGuido,e9j830g,conservative
I find it ironic that the people that hate Trump are also so obsessed with him.,Dinopet890,e9egpd7,conservative
"Culturally, Trevor Noah should be hard at work making fun of South Africa's government and how it wants to kick out white farmers.  White farmers who are the only ones interested in producing food for South Africa.  


Trump is a low hanging fruit for comedy because you are praised by the public the more cruel your words are for this person.",markcocjin,e9eqpzb,conservative
"To be fair, they have a lot to work with. It comes with being a reality tv star before becoming president.",FabioFresh93,e9ev01q,conservative
I totally agree. He gives them so much material to work with. Every single day. ,FoxOnTheRun76,e9f84av,conservative
Sessions would be so triggered if he was still around,Dank_Cartographer,e9dozkq,conservative
"For goodness sake, this was a state issue until progressives federalized it in the early 20th century. ",paulbrevik,e9dxdoo,conservative
I hope republicans (especially this administration) are the first to legalize weed at a federal level and leave it up to the states,i_floop_the_pig,e9eacd6,conservative
About time!,fulklelechin,e9dxmha,conservative
"""But-but-but Marijuana is the devil's lettuce and will cause you to murder your entire family and have hallucinations and you can get aids from injecting it!!!""",molon-labe7,e9dsqhc,conservative
If they do would Democrats start working to criminalize it again?,TangoDown357,e9f7c17,conservative
"Voters are normal, not Trump. ",Rightquercusalba,e9dpcve,conservative
Odd the ones that got one termed were higher. He’s about the same as the ones that had a semi close but solid 2nd re-election and better than the one that steamrolled in re-election.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9djgx1,conservative
"Oh, he’s no ordinary president. He’s the best since Lincoln and Reagan. I’m sure I will get brigaded by those here to downvote but, that MHO.",chilikarnkarny1,e9dkfp9,conservative
"Biggest swing the house since watergate. But let's ignore that and try the same strategy next election. 

No evidence Trump's strategy can win elections when Hillary's not on the ticket. ",Glsbnewt,e9e5xy0,conservative
That's not true. He has a vicious media campaign working against him.,Terra_green2,e9e47lo,conservative
I wouldn’t say ordinary President.  I am worried that he’s working himself to death.  A lot of other ordinary Presidents would’ve been planning their 30th golf vacation at this point of their career.  ,Neanderthalbastard,e9e7ddf,conservative
The one-termers suffered from a really horrible economy. Trump has no such issue.,1wjl1,e9dpn6o,conservative
Put some respect on Calvin Coolidge’s name,YankeeBlues21,e9dm512,conservative
I think he’ll definitely make a lasting impression in the history books like Lincoln and Reagan,WannabeBadGalRiri,e9e06p8,conservative
Biggest swing since Obama you mean....,snow_ninja,e9e7pid,conservative
"Don't forget Grover Cleveland, the only good Democrat!",Glsbnewt,e9e5zal,conservative
I guess I meant Democrat swing. ,Glsbnewt,e9eacmd,conservative
Make the Democrats Bourbon Again! ,YankeeBlues21,e9e61nz,conservative
"They are pathetic bastards.  Wonder why packing the courts with lawless judges is so important to them.  Because even when they lose elections they cannot accept the results.  Though I believe the judges in Florida are lawful enough that in the end these slimes will be turned away in their upcoming ""count enough votes until we win"" scenario.  ",optionhome,e9cliux,conservative
This criminal makes $170k for doing a corrupt job.,SanduskyTicklers,e9d1251,conservative
This clown will probably have voter fraud evidence brought against her and not a fucking thing will happen to her.  And that's why these slimes continue to do this.,stancrouch,e9cuz6n,conservative
These riggers are always causing trouble and up to no good.,Rip_Van_Finkle,e9dvgn8,conservative
She should have been locked up already ,BeachCruisin22,e9d4wdq,conservative
Just like 2000 votes are going to be counted and counted until the demonrats win.,mayargo7,e9d3cp8,conservative
what the FUCK is going on in Broward County?!  ,insomagent,e9dkidk,conservative
"My rigger, my rigger!",Boon-Lord,e9cyexf,conservative
"Explain like I'm five. Why should I spend well over $2000 a month in taxes, and not be allowed to vote? ",TheRealBMT,e9cm6pg,conservative
Are you a citizen of the United States?,mlmack,e9cslaa,conservative
"you're either 1) a felon, or 2) an illegal alien.",Gamephreak5,e9d64jc,conservative
I am. Both my grandfathers fought in ww2. I'm also white and blue-eyed. Do I meet the definition? Am I considered a citizen? Your dumb-asses thought I was some immigrant. How utterly laughable. ,TheRealBMT,e9ibu50,conservative
"3) legal alien who is not a citizen, and therefore cannot vote on the government positions of another country(in most of the country)",Mewster1818,e9dbt5a,conservative
Why would you not be allowed to vote?  ELI5.,mlmack,e9iqow6,conservative
wrong. ,TheRealBMT,e9ibf1b,conservative
"I mean you can say that, but it doesn't change the law.",Mewster1818,e9ihqkq,conservative
"What a fucking ditz. So if ANY conservatives AT ALL post in his precious sub it’s brigading?z


That’s like saying if I go to a college class and there are seven conservatives and 13 liberals and the conservatives speak they are “brigading” they classroom. 

Some mods are beyond reproach. ",Zac1245,e9cracv,conservative
"I was banned from that forum a few months ago. The mod responsible messaged me “Hail Satan.” as the reason.

Clearly good, well meaning, and mentally stable people. /s",_Hospitaller_,e9cr8dz,conservative
"3 days ago, the top minds downvoted [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9ucd1k/z/e93wkme) to -184.


They downvoted [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9u2bm1/this_is_how_it_happens/e90znlr) to -524 only 5 days ago. 


 And now they are crying about finding 5 that showed up in their thread that weren't even linked there. ",LumpyWumpus,e9cqvw2,conservative
"I thought brigading was illegal in redditville.

Why are all the libtarded subs allowed to do it?",TheComedianGLP,e9dadur,conservative
"Ironic subreddit name, /r/topmindsofreddit",deathwheel,e9d1pms,conservative
"It seems like the more tools that Reddit's little Stalinists have to identify wrongthinkers, the crazier they get.",JaneTheThird,e9d0o55,conservative
That sub is like reading /r/iamverysmart only the commenters are the hubris-filled kids and the posts are about generally normal people with a different opinion.,Mewster1818,e9deu7m,conservative
"roflmao @ TMOR crying about brigading

that is the most fucking ironic thing ever

tmor is literally a dedicated brigading subreddit haha
",VoinaYMir,e9dvrv0,conservative
Top minds of reddit. It’s like r/iamverysmart,,e9dddgt,conservative
Wtf is that sub?,Emperor_Aurelian,e9dpix7,conservative
I always wonder how many accounts these people have? If they think leaving one sub and commenting on another is brigading how do they use Reddit? Do they have one account for every sub they visit or do they never leave that one sub? I use the same account everywhere and just block the morons that can't do anything but worry about your post history. ,FreeSpeechRocks,e9dw74r,conservative
Aside from that holy cringe that the Donald title,MegaBlastoise23,e9cv19e,conservative
"They pull that shit all the time. Any time I comment on a post that is near the top of r/all I get “go back to Le_Drumpf!” and “hehe le_Donald  is brigading again!”. It’s a post on r/all you idiots, perhaps everyone can easily access it and it’s not being brigaded? ",Knollsit,e9cypwt,conservative
"Stop expecting human-level capabilities from libtards.

It's not fair.

Just understand that they recoil from pain.  That's the most important thing to remember when interacting with them.",TheComedianGLP,e9dalf7,conservative
"Clearly he is a *top mind* here at Reddit.....

If only the left were capable of introspection.",rf-engineer,e9dansl,conservative
They seem particularly hell bent on brigading here recently its pretty obvious im glad yall flaired me... The conservative only pist seem to be reqired more frequently,freedomhertz,e9cyxvs,conservative
"The admins are complicit.  Seriously, the admins have an agenda and willingly let leftist subs carry it out so they can say ""we aren't a biased site"".",anuser999,e9dc0ba,conservative
"Should be /r/stopmindsofreddit

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e9db2vw,conservative
"It's actually double ironic. The point of their sub is to mock others who are ""top minds of Reddit,"" but they have become exactly what they intended to mock.",houseoftolstoy,e9dxgx8,conservative
Jesus that is painful to read...,RampantAndroid,e9ea0r7,conservative
I see it in my local subs too. If someone disagrees with the liberal hive mind it’s “brigading.” Or some topics where most don’t agree with the liberal viewpoint it’s a brigade and people are from the Donald. ,Zac1245,e9cz42f,conservative
"Even if it doesn’t hit all, do they not think that people with right-of-center opinions are in non-right wing subs? 
It’s so stupid when they claim “BrIgADe!!1!!1” in politics or news which have THOUSANDS of subscribers. ",tiredofyourshitrdt,e9czqbr,conservative
If they were they wouldn't be leftists.,anuser999,e9dbthj,conservative
"Because all the further right subs have all been banned or quarantined, so they turn their sights on whatever is leftover.",groyperslefthand,e9db8mo,conservative
*My flair is better*,Saigunx,e9dqmx8,conservative
"Ironically it was like this when I first came here like 4+ years ago when srs was still a dominant force. They'd brigade people all the time but the moment anyone went over there to complain they'd get banned for brigading srs. 

Worst part is that some of this was happening a bit before mao became CEO, it's only gotten worse since then. ",NotaInfiltrator,e9debvg,conservative
"I stopped going to my local sub altogether (r/ireland). They are super leftists. I was having a conversation about sports, not political whatsoever and was just talking about results of a game, the person I was talking to got a reply (in which I was tagged) telling him that I post to t_d and to ignore me. People are regressive cunts. ",Knollsit,e9cze4a,conservative
"I nodded my local sub (/r/WestVirginia) and they hated it. I dropped it because of disinterest and they immediately started lying about me, haha. Really sad snowflakes in there, with some good people mixed in. ",skarface6,e9d44r5,conservative
They really don’t because of how hard left so much of reddit is. ,skarface6,e9d46bs,conservative
"Which is ridiculous.  I tried explaining how the leftists have started considering everyone and thing that isn't hard left of the spectrum to be Nazis.  


I had an agreement about this is the /r/liberal sub with is supposed to be our counterpart.  I explained our detest of the alt-right, but that doesn't seem to be enough.

It's anecdotal, but this is getting ridiculous.",Castaway77,e9ehiq3,conservative
"srs (and the diaspora subs they use today to somewhat hide their activity) has several admins in the mix.  They are the ""plausibly deniability"" cutaway for the admins to enforce their narrative without running too afoul of the (not enforced anyway) laws that would cost them neutral platform protections.",anuser999,e9dhlac,conservative
"To this day I blame Digg.

I was here in 2008. r/politics was a Ron Paul refuge. Then the Digg collapse happened. Seemingly overnight it went uberleft. It's only spread outward throughout the rest of the subs in the following years. It's to the point where all of us on the right have is this sub and maybe a few /news comments are rational before the left wakes up from their slumber at noon.",ryph,e9e4dkh,conservative
"Yeah no.

I love my movies mah dude ",BrazilianRider,e9ec2ew,conservative
"Cancelled it several months ago. On top of all the leftist bullshit, their lineup sucks. A lot of my favorite shows, like The Expanse, 24, Battlestar Galactica, etc, vanished from Netflix and reappeared on Amazon Prime, which I like a lot better. Netflix's lineup keeps shrinking because all their money is going towards funding original content, like House of Cards, Orange is the New Black, etc, instead of renewing contracts with studios for other content. The only original show of theirs that I really like is The Punisher, and I'm not paying a subscription just for one show. ",GuitarWizard90,e9ec433,conservative
I never bothered to get into their original content outside the marvel shows. I’ll gladly pay the 12 bucks though for a month though to watch whatever new season they drop. Otherwise no point in keeping it honestly. Hulu is what Netflix used to be. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9eupji,conservative
"Eh, they have enough subscribers that if most of us cancelled, it still wouldn't make a dent.  I don't plan on getting rid of it.  There's a lot of shows and movies I watch on there.",R0binSage,e9ekbn9,conservative
"What about Amazon Prime Video?

Is there a list?",GreekLogic,e9eobfb,conservative
"You should try books, they will not only improve your creative thinking but also your vocabulary.",RoyalTFree,e9ecruy,conservative
Just buy a Synology and install Sonarr and Radarr,epicaricacy12,e9ez0mt,conservative
"Punisher was good but I found myself barely watching Netflix more than once a week. Not only is it not worth the money but you are right, a lot of their films are half assed and rushed to production and rubber stamped with an A-List celeb.

Heard last week they are giving Obama a show and this week seeing Acosta was the tipping point.  

Stephen Miller made Acosta look like a fool:
https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=6Z-tOhfpEow&vidve=5727&autoplay=1",RoyalTFree,e9eczfe,conservative
"That’s exactly what they’re doing. Netflix started as an anomaly no one was really ready for, but now people are copying them (well). They’ve become more of a studio than a streaming service, in order to prepare for a future that a large portion of their movies/shows aren’t available for purchase. Disney’s streaming service will be especially detrimental. ",Applesauce_Police,e9eqkdl,conservative
I got a free Netflix month. Nothing from their original content is watchable.,sjwking,e9ewyjw,conservative
"Oh, you mean NBC Comcast owned Hulu? Really fighting the power there",Liberty_Pr1me,e9h95jh,conservative
"I understand your position but disagree. The company gets its value from new and total subscribers. If that took a hit, the value of the company would as well.

I’ve had it for years and don’t really use anymore so if there are others that were on the fence as well, hopefully they will understand the ramifications of funding a company actively working against their interests. ",RoyalTFree,e9emmbz,conservative
I love audio books.... ,ozric101,e9euyty,conservative
Oooooh you’re so smart dude. ,BrazilianRider,e9ed3pm,conservative
"Never said I was fighting the power. I like watching my shows. Hulu lets me do that. I will pay for that service. If there is political undertones in their original content so be it, I will just not watch it.",WebSliceGallery123,e9hcw0r,conservative
I do too - really like Librivox -but I feel like I'm cheating when I don't read. ,triggernaut,e9evq7e,conservative
"Me too! Listen in car on way to work. Some books you may not of heard of that were very good:

Road to Wigan Pier - Orwell
Them - Ben Sasse
",RoyalTFree,e9f8snl,conservative
My apologies for being condescending and I appreciate your input but it didn’t really bring anything more to the discussion.,RoyalTFree,e9edjtw,conservative
Eh that’s alright. I’m sorry for being a smart ass too. It’s a valiant effort but I really do love my movies too much :P,BrazilianRider,e9ef7yc,conservative
"Would it though? In a sane world it would, but in a sane world they would have been run out of Congress in the recent midterms for being extreme left and completely uncivil. Instead, America rewarded their behavior and Marxist beliefs by giving them the House and most senate defenses. 
",YankeeBlues21,e9enn58,conservative
"Impeaching Trump would be like Vader striking down Obi Wan Kenobi, bring it.",BeachCruisin22,e9f1u3i,conservative
no it wont they are proving that even stealing the elections isnt beyond them,Delta_25,e9ek0i2,conservative
It won't stop them from doing it.  The point is to tie Trump up and disrupt his ability to get things done.  The Dems are no long really focused on winning elections.  All that matters to them now is power and they're using ever tool in the book to try and gain it.,StraightNewt,e9ek3x1,conservative
At this point what isn't beyond them. Political assassination notwithstanding.,Gunstray,e9el200,conservative
"> Political assassination notwithstanding.

Give it time.  It was only a year ago that a Bernie supporter came really close.

Of course they'll cite the pipe bomb guy, but it hasn't even been proven yet that his bombs were even designed to explode in the first place.  Some of them were just filled with leaflets from what I've read.  

Pretty sure the Bernie shooter's bullets were working regularly, though.",Telineye,e9entml,conservative
"They were hoax bombs incapable of exploding.  It still is terrorism, in my opinion, but very different than actual working bombs.

You know its bullshit when you hear the ""experts"" on the news talking about how they ""might"" have been ""able"" to go off due to static electricity aka 1 in a 1,000,000 freak accident.",BeachCruisin22,e9f1t74,conservative
"He is 100% correct... and there is NO disenfranchisement argument, if you were worried bout your vote  making it on time you COULD have gone to the polls in person.

Democrats OR Republicans breaking rules to steal elections is unacceptable.  ",ozric101,e9d2lxs,conservative
"If an early vote was cast before Sunday, but the election officials didn't count and submit it by Tuesday night, is that a legal or illegal vote? ",BaronVonFunke,e9d5yvu,conservative
"If they didn’t include it by Tuesday night, according to the law it’s not legally supposed to be counted. That’s my understanding. ",justhere2havefun,e9d8v1k,conservative
This is correct.,TBSportsFan1254,e9dhfqy,conservative
"It seems like this falls under ""The Fox Guarding the Henhouse"".",mlmack,e9e38a6,conservative
Could this lady have a more perfect last name?,mlmack,e9e3fm3,conservative
[deleted],,e9dr9vy,conservative
Is the source factually incorrect?,chabanais,e9dwaqb,conservative
[deleted],,e9dwevx,conservative
">I don't know where the original source is. Because it's a fucking picture.

I guess you didn't see that the ""fucking picture"" contains the name of the story, the publication where it appears, and the date, too?  That would be what we call a *standard citation* that would be in any academic paper.

Maybe you've never read a research paper, scientific study, or non-fiction book?",chabanais,e9dxabt,conservative
"That's a bold strategy Cotton, let's see if it pays off.

",Scozzar,e9dpzwe,conservative
[removed],,e9eb919,conservative
"> which is worse? a poor person dies, or someone cheats the welfare system and gets money they don’t deserve

There are a lot of poor people in this world, they they ain't my responsibility. ",PrawnsAreOk,e9ej37r,conservative
"Hypocrisy at its finest. 

Jim Accosta losing his white house credentials: “An unprecedented attack on the press and a direct violation of the first amendment!” Plastered all over the media. 

A liberal mob targetting Tucker Carlson’s family at his home: *crickets* ",BarelyAUseraname,e9cm9bs,conservative
The shocking thing is that CBS actually did report it.  ,stancrouch,e9cv1a1,conservative
Led by Giraffe nevk professor? The one that like being tied up in ropes?,krepogregg,e9cpbs0,conservative
"Fox News covered and sided with the news personalities who were targeted by the pipe bomber, showing solidarity. Guess it doesn’t make the circuit if it’s the “other side” getting attacked. ",justhere2havefun,e9d2km2,conservative
Jobs not mobs!,sjwking,e9cnbn3,conservative
"Remeber when all the MSM covered the right's attack on journalists and called the president a threat to the free press...

Well here are people threatening a journalist at his own home and they are silent.  The media really are the enemy of the people.",NEW_JERSEY_PATRIOT,e9dfh2w,conservative
This Tucker Carlson thing has really gotten to me. Haven't been this pissed in a while.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dlisl,conservative
"Nothing to see here. Move along, move along ",Chapka69,e9cn7ci,conservative
I'm flabbergasted!,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9d7lxw,conservative
"""Assaulting Home"" -- What does that mean? The videos shows them chanting random drab during the night with some banners. ",imabeautifuluglymess,e9d8okm,conservative
Good for CBS. ,YeOldeVertiformCity,e9df1or,conservative
Still. Newsbusters is the hero we need,ExpensiveMention,e9dfhyq,conservative
was very pissed at the Kavanaugh hearing but this is just as bad.,Terra_green2,e9e4tiz,conservative
"It's been reported that they tried break open the front door, or at least were pounding on it to terrify the wife and children who were home. Tucker was away at the time. His family hid in the pantry.",Sideswipe0009,e9da8o9,conservative
"Just a heads up, this is an antifa apologist who regularly defends the domestic terrorist organization. ",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dln7g,conservative
">  What does that mean? 

They actually broke his front door.  That's what it means.  They committed a fucking crime and should be found and their asses put in jail.",optionhome,e9dz3wc,conservative
"According to his wife, they actually did manage to crack the door. One of them was probably throwing himself at it repeatedly.",Beercorn1,e9dv2t2,conservative
"Here's a first hand account: https://thinkprogress.org/i-was-at-the-protest-outside-tucker-carlsons-house-heres-what-actually-happened-665c2dc0cb67/?fbclid=IwAR1sVAvh-noMX_M2N8KWEG_RKqP5LGpz67uc3dDSjFzrZ9vfo_-JHpE0Iyw

I know the source is questionable for other conservative-minded folk. 

I don't know why I got downvoted. I was earnestly asking. The conservative subreddit has been really hostile toward my comments as of late, even accusing me of being an ""antifa""?",imabeautifuluglymess,e9edwe1,conservative
"No? No I am not. I can be a conservative and not be fond of ""Proud boys"" and other violent groups. That doesn't make me pro-""other side"".",imabeautifuluglymess,e9eeiu0,conservative
"Oh, so they’re not too bright. Gotcha. ",RowJoe,e9e4qns,conservative
">The conservative subreddit has been really hostile toward my comments as of late, even accusing me of being an ""antifa""?

Chances are likely its brigaders",Sideswipe0009,e9efe1u,conservative
"Haha, whoops. Confused you with a different poster.

My bad.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9gol04,conservative
Those of us down in South Florida know exactly what you’re dealing with over there in AZ. Prayers that we both pull through without the radical Dems pulling off this sham,YankeeBlues21,e9dm38b,conservative
Wow I’m so surprised that the people who supported a Taliban sympathizer would do something unethical ,burtmaklin1,e9dma4e,conservative
"Question.  Even if Simena is elected, what is preventing a recall?",ravenswin,e9dmcmf,conservative
"Has to be in office 6 months 

https://ballotpedia.org/Laws_governing_recall_in_Arizona",mbarnar,e9ds3sk,conservative
"It says this though:

&#x200B;

  In the case of state legislators, a recall petition may commence five days after the start of their first legislative session after their election. In the case of other elected officials, there is no six-month limit for subsequent terms in office.[\[](https://ballotpedia.org/Laws_governing_recall_in_Arizona#cite_note-2) ",TheDwarfGimli,e9en4fc,conservative
"go ahead make your own fucking army, as it sits 80 percent of your equipment doesnt work any ways. they have no real surface fleet, and the ships they do have are all almost always drydocked for repairs.",Delta_25,e9e9ndf,conservative
Mocron is a boob trying to replace Merkle as the de facto head of Europe.  What a tard.  ,stoffel_bristov,e9e7o5t,conservative
At least he's honest. After having to be bailed out in 2 World Wars why even bother.,postonrddt,e9eji7z,conservative
It is well known that Macron and the other Eurocrats fancy themselves the leaders of a United States of Europe. There is a massive inferiority complex with regards to the US here in Europe. It’s pathetic. ,Kutepov,e9etq51,conservative
[removed],,e9eer1i,conservative
"I want them to, let them spend fortunes on military spending, we can bring our guys back home. I would love to see if they can afford that universal healthcare. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9ea3bv,conservative
"“We have to protect ourselves with respect to China, Russia and even the United States of America,” he said on French radio.

For all the money we spend to help Europe regarding the military, Macron should not be saying that. He put us in the same sentence as China and Russia.",Boon-Lord,e9efxq6,conservative
"To suggest that the US is going to attack Europe; that is highly insulting.  Europe is our ally and we have helped the continent immensely.  What Macron said is highly insulting and was meant to be.  

With that said, Europe should spend more on their military and not depend on the US for everything.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9ekyhy,conservative
"NATO, needs a rework at this point, it is pretty obvious.  If Europe wants to play EU games, let them, but end NATO for all EU members. ",ozric101,e9ej3ls,conservative
"Yes, and I’m sure Hitler felt quite insulted when France and Britain built up theirs defences in response to the Nazi nationalism and hate. In America we have Nazis marching in the streets, killing people. Of COURSE the EU is worried, and wants to build up defences",Solarat1701,e9ejcw9,conservative
What in the world are you taking about? You need to get out more of you think Nazis are killing people in the streets. ,War-Damn-America,e9eoe7e,conservative
You’re a deranged moron and it’s honestly sad.,hello_japan,e9ewnz1,conservative
"It must be tough going through life being so stupid.  Of course, if you're really that stupid you probably don't know.",chabanais,e9es5hx,conservative
you meant antifa,Delta_25,e9g39tm,conservative
"I hate when people act like Chick Fil A is evil. I do a lot of fund raising and many, many companies never ever give back to communities. Companies like Victoria's Secret, Lane Bryant, Ulta UGG, Teva sandals for one, their big charity was giving sandals to an ELEPHANT that had arthritis. It's all a big circle of no money to local charities. 

Chick Fil A always donates to local charities. It always has fundraisers. They are very much a supporter of local schools and causes. That is more real an indicator to me of their ethics as a company. 

",GladysCravesRitz,e9dqo02,conservative
"If you get triggered by a hat or a chicken sandwich, you probably need to be in a rubber room somewhere.",mlmack,e9dq0w5,conservative
">“I thought that it would be OK for me to post that I voted. I thought that it would be OK for me to say who I supported,” Blount said. “I had a MAGA hat on. For that reason, and that reason alone ... my career is on hold”

Why do we accept this as a society?",Silicon_Avatar,e9d1co0,conservative
Who would have thought eating Chick-fil-A makes you a lousy musician?,SaltineAmerican_1970,e9djhqd,conservative
ZZ top are libtards? Never knew.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9d7r1k,conservative
Id rather not. Loved the YOUNGER ZZ.. but this? No,lax714,e9d0wkr,conservative
"Maybe ZZ Top can tour with  Willie Nelson in the ""Texas Traitors Tour"".

Assholes.",TheComedianGLP,e9dgbz8,conservative
"Even though I personally find folks that go around trolling other people with their MAGA hats to be extremely distasteful, they shouldn't be fired for it. Expressing political views is a right.  

&#x200B;

With that said; we gotta start owning bad behavior on both sides of the aisle. The longer we go around treating each other like enemies (from going around trolling people with a hat to shouting at people going to dinner), the worse the countries' going to get. The only way to fixing this shit is by rejecting un-neighborly behavior everywhere.

&#x200B;

Before anyone says OMG wearing political apparel isn't trolling. Bologna - it was just as bad when dems ran around with their Obama stuff. ",dukescalder,e9d9842,conservative
"It's not right, but it is their right. ",Glsbnewt,e9e634z,conservative
We don't. That's why Trump got elected.,SickofInternetProgs,e9de2dz,conservative
Like 90% of the entertainment industry is.,justhere2havefun,e9dbi1o,conservative
"disagreement = traitor. 

Got it.

C'mon. ",gaelorian,e9dv9qn,conservative
True. I just assumed they were some good ol' boys.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9dblc0,conservative
"You're not a Texan.

You would not understand.",TheComedianGLP,e9dxp2t,conservative
Just because they have Duck Commander beards doesn't mean they're Chalie Daniels-approved.,TheComedianGLP,e9dge55,conservative
"Fake good ole boys, like most of them. ",Zac1245,e9dr3i6,conservative
"Slightly less than half of voting Texans aren't real texans now.  Got it.

Fuck Willie for not betraying the ideals he's had his whole life in order be a 'real Texan.'",__space__,e9easd7,conservative
Yep just saying I woulda lost money on that bet.,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9dhbsz,conservative
"He doesn't have ideals.

He has feelings and low or no information.

Just like you.",TheComedianGLP,e9g0flh,conservative
\#MeToo,TheComedianGLP,e9dhz9l,conservative
"“I hope they call me insane… (laughing emojis) wouldn’t that just be a big ball of irony?” Ian David Long, 28, wrote around the time of Wednesday’s attack, law enforcement officials told CNN.

“Yeah… I’m insane, but the only thing you people do after these shootings is ‘hopes and prayers’.. or ‘keep you in my thoughts’… every time… and wonder why these keep happening…”

Did this guy fancy himself some sort of martyr for gun control? It's like he's just parroting the talking points floating around the media, the people who mock ""thoughts and prayers"" and demand stricter gun control laws. It's weird.

And how typical is it for a genuinely insane person to be aware enough of their own insanity to acknowledge it like that? I think he just lost it emotionally, but not necessarily mentally, if that makes sense. ",MisterMouser,e9ehst0,conservative
"Killing people with guns to troll those who don't want gun control??

Yeah he is insane.",Dudehitscar,e9ehj0m,conservative
I wonder what his /r/politics user name was? FuckTrump001?,StraightNewt,e9ejs9e,conservative
"So he was Jared Loughner mixed with James Holmes mixed with Nicolas Cruz. A sociopath. Not a vet with PTSD, but a legitimate sociopath who maybe might have antisocial personality disorder. ",giobbistar21,e9f1lz5,conservative
This would explain how this story disappeared so fast.,BeachCruisin22,e9f220i,conservative
"Yeah, this smells worse than ""crazy guy shoots up bar."" This says, ""I have an agenda other than just 'I'm crazy.' I will kill myself to push gun control."" Ever see *The Life of David Gale*?",justhere2havefun,e9enivg,conservative
">And how typical is it for a genuinely insane person to be aware enough of their own insanity to acknowledge it like that?

There's a lot of types of crazy and some are quite evil like this guy. Which is why this country desperately needs crazy control.  Reopen the mental institutions and put insane people in them so they don't hurt themselves or the public.",StraightNewt,e9ejxe2,conservative
"He is a domestic terrorists, no different than a suicide bomber with a political agenda.  ",ozric101,e9euf7e,conservative
How?  He had a point.,chabanais,e9ei9nm,conservative
"Yeah, he sure sounds like a sociopath. He said he was going to do it because he found life boring.",MisterMouser,e9gtqde,conservative
"I assume you are trolling me now but I'll bite..

How is that not an insane motive for mass murder of strangers?  ",Dudehitscar,e9eikl9,conservative
Insane or evil? I think he was able to think rationally enough to understand what he was doing. His thinking did not seem to be disordered or deranged per say. I think he did it because he was spiteful and full of hate.,MisterMouser,e9ejk9c,conservative
He could angry not insane.,chabanais,e9ejj1e,conservative
"How about both?  He was clearly nuts as there was an effort to institutionalize at some point.  However, he did know what he was doing and thus is evil.  ",StraightNewt,e9ejuvx,conservative
"That's possible and likely since they tried to lock him up before. The line between insane and evil often seems to be thin, but I do believe that some people can reach that level of evil and not be crazy. I mean, obviously it would require warped moral reasoning to justify evil acts like that, but that could be a conscious, defiant choice that they know deep down is wrong and not the result of pure delusion.
",MisterMouser,e9ekgbh,conservative
The article says that there will be an update at 1pm on remaining ballots. Did they release that somewhere?,r777m,e9dgznz,conservative
Got a bunch of friends and local political associates out there today. Hoping everyone keeps their cool and doesn’t give the media ammunition. ,YankeeBlues21,e9dgz0v,conservative
"Snipes was supposed to speak, but all they did so far was open the doors of the building to GOP/DNC lawyers and select media film crews. 

Word is that the number of “found” ballots is ~80,000",YankeeBlues21,e9dj1j4,conservative
"Is that “found” remaining to be counted or include ones already counted? I’m assuming that is remaining to be counted. As at about 68% of Broward County being Democrat, that would pretty miraculously be just about enough to flip the election. Incredible! What luck!",r777m,e9dkovs,conservative
Sad really. With her ideology we should outlaw vehicles first. They kill way more people at a way faster rate. ,SonnyBlac,e9f995v,conservative
Poor lady is brainwashed and exploited. To HELL with the media. Selling souls for views and clicks ,FourThrones,e9f93uf,conservative
Emotions shouldn’t dictate policy. Otherwise we’d have nuked countless countries who pissed us off. ,justhere2havefun,e9fdg3v,conservative
"It’s ironic that she “hopes to God” that she doesn’t get anymore prayers. Also, what else are they going to do in California short of a total ban? They already have some of the strictest laws in the country. ",Jmjhsrv,e9fa25t,conservative
"I know a monologue when I see/hear one.

She looks like Lorraine from MadTV. 

*cough, cough*",burgeoningboysclub,e9fcl11,conservative
Also she read that script and was practiced up for it. ,mods_blow_goats,e9fa2dz,conservative
Your strong emotions don't supercede my rights. ,triggernaut,e9f9zay,conservative
Everyone has a voice and she has the right to exercise it by voting. And so do we. ,not_me_but_still,e9fli8q,conservative
"As much as I feel sorry for her, gun control won’t stop these things from happening. And I say this as a citizen of one of the most anti-gun countries in the world.",Kutepov,e9fxd31,conservative
"My heart goes out to this woman, this mother who lost someone very precious to her.

However, her ask is a non-starter. California has some of the toughest gun control restrictions in the country. I dont mean to sound trite, but her son was killed by a mentally impaired man who happened to use a legally purchased pistol with an illegally modified clip. It wasn't an ""AR-15"" type rifle that is so frequently pointed @ by the media and leftists as evil...it was a pistol and an ALREADY illegal clip.

She is really asking for gun confiscation, which will make criminals out of law abiding citizens and give violent criminals a distinct advantage over the unprotected citizen in their own home.

I am all for background checks and measured gun ownership restrictions for persons with mental health issues with violent tendencies (which are already in place in states like California). But I can't bow to a mother's emotional plea to take guns from its law abiding citizens.",rznfcc,e9fqpne,conservative
"Sorry for your loss, but your scripted-sounding message is a turn-off.
",paulbrook,e9ghcjh,conservative
Found the insane cunt,mods_blow_goats,e9f9g63,conservative
"I said this same thing. Got hit with a “we have laws against drunk driving” excuse. 

But guess what? Drunk driving still happens. Running red lights does too. Checking cell phones still does. People abuse their rights and do harm. 

The shooter in Vegas had “illegal” guns. The shooter in CA apparently modified his handgun so it carried more rounds than was “legal”.",justhere2havefun,e9fdd2h,conservative
Lol if only she knew,CanadianWithNoName,e9kyw01,conservative
So true though,CanadianWithNoName,e9kyxy1,conservative
"I mean, the cops were called to his mama’s house for a domestic disturbance and there was a bullet hole in the wall. Does it sound right that he should’ve been able to buy a gun?",faint-smile,e9gjgxh,conservative
"Cripes man, this woman just lost her son.  ",defnotthrowaway27,e9fb3ll,conservative
I guess the man obviously didn’t see the “gun free zone” sign. This is a vision problem. ,SonnyBlac,e9felog,conservative
Nah. That was read right off the script. Her son was also at Vegas. So were 6 other people in that club. Yeah ok .gov  later I’ll dox her family tree and show you she has no son by that name. Just like I did with the driver in Charlottesville. They fucked that one up big time. He didn’t have a Jewish mom. Also if you know even one Jewish mom .. they don’t wait outside for the police in a lawn chair with a son in prison. They would lawyer up so hard. ,mods_blow_goats,e9fbdad,conservative
Be careful with this kind of talk. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9fdj9i,conservative
What do you mean? ,mods_blow_goats,e9fds8f,conservative
People have been doxed for less,JMB_was_a_god,e9fn0fi,conservative
Oh you mean I could get doxed? Lol. No. I put myself on doxbin. It doesn’t mean anything. There addresses are already on spokeo as free info. I just want to prove they don’t have a son who served in the navy. That was textbook what she said. But they shouldn’t have used a name like that. James Fields took me and my lawyer several FOIA requests to verify. This one I can do on my own most likely. ,mods_blow_goats,e9folgi,conservative
Are you saying James fields isn’t real? ,JMB_was_a_god,e9fp3ot,conservative
"Well in the sense that he didn’t hit anyone in Charlottesville and that the lady the press interviewed is 100% not his mom. Also he has no dept of corrections # either. Don’t trust me. That’s all free info. Try to deposit money in his commissary. I know you wouldn’t want to but just try..  let me show you another example 

https://www.theguardian.com/news/2014/dec/18/-sp-the-race-to-save-peter-kassig

Read this story. Think openly about it. 

Then understand the “hero” lawyer in it is the lawyer for Hamas and was under investigation by the govt. and I was one of many paying for his 24 hour surveillance. We left notes on his door and wherever he went. He couldn’t leave America. He wouldn’t spend a dime of his own money to help anyone and furthermore all of his money was seized. He admitted openly and freely on Twitter he made it up to get a lighter sentence. 

Also I want to be very very clear.. a psychopath went in and shot people up in Cali. But 7 people from Vegas were not there. When a shooting happens and it can be used for an agenda or a bombing or plane crash.. sadly the dead get used. 

Same for Vegas. Paddock was either the worse shot of any human ever or.. a shooting happened and an agenda was formed. Hence the LVPD chief getting corrected on air by the fbi and having to actually turn and look at them before answering often. ",mods_blow_goats,e9fpx81,conservative
So you think [this](https://taskandpurpose.com/navy-veteran-thousand-oaks-las-vegas/) is all fake? Task & Purpose is lying about reviewing his Navy records?,PubliusVA,e9fr1fc,conservative
No. That man was the killer. But the lady who is a substitute teacher in Thousand Oaks didn’t have a son who was in the Vegas shooting and died by the hand of that Marine. These things are easy but no one looks. Just like Julie Swetnick never knew Brett Kavanaugh. Piece of cake to prove. Avenatti just threw shit against the wall hoping for a held vote until after midterms. They knew BK is very unlikely to sue Swetnick at this point. ,mods_blow_goats,e9fruvx,conservative
Telemachus Orfanos was the killer??,PubliusVA,e9ft9ln,conservative
No. The killer was the killer. That Marine. The lady on the tv saying the governments line of  “I don’t want thoughts. I don’t want prayers. I want gun control” is not related to anyone in that bar. She didn’t want her son back. She wants what now? Gun control. Let me restate this. The Marine really killed folks. No false flag. It happened. He killed a cop too. But once that went down... the crisis actors.. I mean relatives arrive on scene. Like in Sandy Hook. Boston. Vegas. Real events lend hand to a agenda. “Overly crying girl” is famous. I want her back. She is cute and wears tight jeans and did pretty good. ,mods_blow_goats,e9ftq4e,conservative
I welcome a full and impartial investigation regarding all parties involved.,Nevaknosbest,e9byvy9,conservative
possible my ass.. there is,Delta_25,e9byvbk,conservative
Good.  Now for AZ and GA.,gbimmer,e9c0obc,conservative
*That’s* my governor,YankeeBlues21,e9bxp68,conservative
"Thank fucking God.    
Those counties are notorious for doing this shit.  ",strallweat,e9c13y0,conservative
"This shit https://www.thedailybeast.com/republicans-freak-out-as-new-ballots-threaten-florida-senate-win was shared on /r/politics, they think we are outraged because the counting votes process is slow. wtf",PapaGeorgio23,e9clwm9,conservative
We can not let Broward get away with this. Thank fucking God we have a solid conservative majority on the SCOTUS because this has potential to go straight to the top like Bush v. Gore. Broward and Palm Beach counties broke state law by not reporting the number of absentee ballots they had within 30 minutes of polls closing. This law is why absentee ballots are due several days prior to Election Day and the law exists to prevent this exact situation from happening. ,Tau23481992,e9c3ql1,conservative
"Breaking: 80% of Broward County register voters show up for the midterm elections, with 63% going for the Democrats /s",Kickmull,e9c9rp6,conservative
Shouldnt he recuse himself considering the fact that his senate race is in contention?For the sake of independence,T4mvv1lc0xx,e9chw2e,conservative
"The lawyer behind this, was the guy who got SNL Al Franken elected with 1,099 ineligible felon votes, the North Carolina Governors mansion. Also general counsel to John Kerry and Hillary Clinton’s campaign. Total partisan hack job. The guy is a treasonous snake.   ",Slippery____Pete,e9chgov,conservative
Good. He won this race. He should be fighting back.,1wjl1,e9c7ytk,conservative
"The Democrats aren’t happy about *just* ruining CA and NY. 

The sad part is, people move from those places after they have ruined them by voting in liberal, then they *still* vote for liberal in the new places they live. 

I guess they think the places they moved from just did not liberal the right way. ",KKN0PP,e9ch9cj,conservative
"It's damn well time. Fuck broward. Florida belongs to the republicans, suck it the fuck up.",xJownage,e9c3gho,conservative
Broward County government should be abolished and placed under direct administration of the state government until we can excise the rot in their bureaucracy.,0ttervonBismarck,e9cuj5c,conservative
"Democrats don't give af, they just want power. Heck, Broward wasn't hit by hurricane like other counties, yet they are still counting lmao.

",Saigunx,e9cpi89,conservative
I heard that this could be as big as Bush Gore problems.,goldrotmgonly,e9dbzg3,conservative
"# Rick Scott has ordered an investigation into continuous election fraud in Palm Beach and Broward Counties.

Fixed.",TheComedianGLP,e9dd3ky,conservative
These effing liberals. I swear to God... This has got to stop.,MyBestVersionOfMe,e9cnimz,conservative
[deleted],,e9cw75j,conservative
One that will be argued and bickered over for the next 20 years.,GFZDW,e9cw01u,conservative
"I have no knowledge of any of this, but broward county seems to come up a lot. ",wpiman,e9cjnz4,conservative
What's going on?,StupidAmericanRednek,e9ctpjw,conservative
"Ducey won by 17 points, but McSally is down as they keep keeping tallying these boxes of ballots.  Right.  This is normal.",nited_states,e9c8qsy,conservative
and CA,Delta_25,e9c77tj,conservative
Praise the Dark Lord!!!,freshSkat,e9cb7xo,conservative
Unfortunately.,Neuroleino,e9cijbr,conservative
"I just realized how much I hate it here in Broward after the election. Me and my boss are both thinking of moving up north. The blue wall in Broward doesn't see the light of day coming down.
",abuigues,e9cs4wg,conservative
"I'll be honest, I'm an independent that has a guilty pleasure of reading both this sub and the Democratic sub (r/politics). I'm having difficulty enjoying the show when I don't fully understand both team's motives...

I believe Democrats are angry that citizens' votes aren't being counted due to negligence or conspiracy. If conspiracy, they would believe some boxes were intentionally ""lost"" or turned in late in order to invalidate them. If negligence, then that's a loss for democracy that people that followed the law don't get their votes counted. 

While this sub... believes what? If there's a conspiracy, they are trying to validate fraudulent ballots? That they planned to make a mistake to try and demand a recount? 

I think either way, the anger should be at the voting process and the incompetent fools who are denying voters their votes, one way or another. ",jal0001,e9cs1bm,conservative
"The Google News section on this topic is worse. All sourced from HuffPo/Daily Beast/Washington Post, all making various statements about how Republicans are ""freaking out"", something about racism in Florida, etc. I'm fucking sick of it.",MackMizzo,e9d3sdd,conservative
[deleted],,e9cpejo,conservative
"Absentee ballots aren't due several days before, they're due 7 pm election day",AllMyName,e9chd3d,conservative
The democrats do not believe in rules or laws anymore.,ozric101,e9c4aai,conservative
5-3 majority as of today,days_of_being_mild,e9caa92,conservative
"I have a hard time with this stuff anymore.  Kagan didn't recuse herself from voting on health care at the Supreme Court.  NJ just elected a Senator who was using under aged prostitutes and taking bribes, and the juror on his trial who acquitted him was at his election night party.

It's really hard to try to be straight and narrow when you're not so sure the other side is going to follow suit.  I would really, really like it if things returned to a sense of normalcy.  But, again, it's hard not to say, ""you first.""",Roez,e9cvc6r,conservative
"I'm ok with that, but who would step in and order that? These counties broke state law, and they should be objectively investigated.",peacekeeperBrew,e9cs059,conservative
"What would Scott recuse himself from? He's not doing the investigation himself. All he's done is rightfully order the activity of these election boards to be looked into by the proper authorities, and he's lawyered up like the Dems have. ",Hrendo,e9cu4lb,conservative
Happening here in Texas too.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0sdb,conservative
[deleted],,e9cpi24,conservative
It's funny because the Democrats are accusing the Republicans of hiding these votes. Funny how something fucky always happens in Broward.,Demplition,e9cv0f5,conservative
its going to take some extreme measures that will make a lot of people very uncomfortable for it to stop. ,iwasthebeaver,e9cvzsq,conservative
So this puts you on the edge but what about Kemp suppressing voters in Georgia? ,Boltonlove16,e9d140v,conservative
"Who handles this stuff then? The Feds?  It ALWAYS seems to be Florida.  

Side note I would hate to be a regular family trying to live in Florida as the amount of retirement communities expands.  I have a profound disgust for them, they eschew good community standards and shift the focus of the local community from the good of the whole to the good of the retirement community with their solid voting blocks.",Falkamper,e9cxc0u,conservative
"Not maintaining voter rolls is a mechanism for conducting voter fraud. Basically anywhere anyone advocates for worse standards and regulations you can bet they have ulterior motives. It's voting, it's important, why?",MackMizzo,e9d3107,conservative
"Basically my stance too.  Gerrymandering?  Bad ballots?  Hacked booths? Double voting?  Illegals voting?  Dead voting?  Threatinging voters?

Investigate any and all of it. When I was younger I used to believe my vote didn't matter.  

It should be one of our highest priorities to ensure that voters feel that there's security in our elections.  We may not like the result, but there is no reason there shouldn't be oversight.

Particularly in federal elections such as presidents and congressmen. ",Lobo0084,e9d2891,conservative
This comment could be the title for the GOP mindset for two decades,stamosface,e9cuto4,conservative
"the parkland school shooting and the mail bomber happened here, coincidence? ",Delta_25,e9da68g,conservative
"Broward keeps ""finding"" more ballots and they are all magically 90% democratic, and they won't tell anybody how many more ballots they need to count. ",iwasthebeaver,e9cvsol,conservative
[removed],,e9c7v3n,conservative
Come to Texas. We need more conservatives to stem the influx of libs.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0jvh,conservative
This sub finds it highly suspicious that the same county that routinely fails to display competency on election days is where this issue is again happening. The current commissioner was convicted of election fraud for the 2016 election. Convicted. Of election fraud. She's still in that position. They are refusing to follow reporting norms by not updating the Capitol every 2-3 hours. They failed to report early voting totals now 2 days after the deadline to do so has passed. The chain of custody for some ballots is known to have been broken. Its a complete and total shit show in the same fraudulent county that is always a shit show. The fact that this one is possibly going to overturn previously called election results is causing the issue,sumgidan,e9ct7ep,conservative
"That county is largely Democratic, so hiding stuff that already exists would hurt Democrats statistically.  

The concern--and I thought this was pretty clear from last night's thread-- is they are not keeping track, maintaining chain of custody, or reporting the various ballot numbers not yet counted.  People do not know why stuff is missing, being found, and so on.  That leaves room for someone to manipulate from inside the system.  

This process is supposed to be transparent, and that county has a ton of problems with fraud and negligence.  Here's a list of 12 things someone quickly jotted down:  https://twitter.com/SteveGuest/status/1060707597563637760",Roez,e9ctysc,conservative
"If you don't see a problem with the massive chain of custody issues here and the possible breaking of laws in a county with a history of election fuckery I'm not sure what to tell you. 

",Hrendo,e9ctoik,conservative
"How could it be a conspiracy against democrats to ""lose"" ballots in a predominately controlled and run Democrat stronghold exactly? ",GodzRebirth,e9dgze2,conservative
"I hate comments like these. Both parties are capable of wrongdoing and in these two years with Trump, republicans have been letting him get away with shit that they would never allow a democrat to do. Take your hypocrite ass somewhere else",RichysRedditName,e9cjwyc,conservative
They never did. Democrats supported communists in the cold war. They are the anti-america party.,NakedAndBehindYou,e9d1d1i,conservative
That's rich! LOL,BarackaFlockaFlame,e9cjmu7,conservative
I'm out of the loop.  What law did they break?,nearlygod,e9ct2ps,conservative
That has nothing to do with politics and everything to do with the weather,PragueNole09,e9csvrv,conservative
the Republicans have 0 power in the political machine in Broward. They couldn't hide those votes even if they wanted to. ,iwasthebeaver,e9cvykh,conservative
Like what?,nearlygod,e9d0yhc,conservative
According to what court?,chabanais,e9d24bl,conservative
[deleted],,e9cxsd0,conservative
[deleted],,e9d661u,conservative
Classic Broward county. Who ultimately oversees elections? The state AG?,StupidAmericanRednek,e9cwv2y,conservative
[removed],,e9c97a2,conservative
"Yeah, I do find it suspicious. I just thing Occam's razor would say it involves a massive conspiracy to produce a box of fake ballots or commit some sort of voter fraud. 

If this is a conspiracy by the county that's pro left, I'd guess they assumed they could lose the election and wanted to invalidate it? That's the only reasonable explanation I can come up with. 

They could also ""change"" ballots while not in view, but aren't there measures against that which would make it super obvious?

I just haven't heard any reasonable explanations yet. I only see people acting skeptical against (agreeably) suspicious people. ",jal0001,e9ctta8,conservative
"Oh, I agree! I just can't think of any grounded explanations on what the conspiracy would have been. Just that it's suspicious",jal0001,e9ctxcr,conservative
Because those are most likely Democratic vote which would go towards Senate and governor?,jal0001,e9e1v2a,conservative
"That’s a false dichotomy. This sub isn’t neutral politics, it’s conservative. However, the difference I think between here and total echo chambers like politics and TD is there isn’t complete fealty to the party. So, yeah, most here don’t have much in common with progressives and, of course, they’re gonna throw shade at them but that doesn’t mean that there isn’t self reflection either (there’s plenty of internal division, hell I vote mostly L and disagree with people here plenty). 

In the end, I believe there’s nothing wrong with rational discussion on conservative beliefs AND bitching about leftists. If people only talked about the things they never did wrong, nobody would have shit to talk about. ",gt4674b,e9cp07z,conservative
"Give one example of such, pls. ",ozric101,e9d4ojy,conservative
They democrats simply don’t. It’s an accurate comment ,Str8DonLemon,e9ck9cp,conservative
"They broke the law, by not reporting the number of absentee ballots within 30 mins of the polls closing.",peacekeeperBrew,e9ct9dg,conservative
"Breaking the law doesn't necessarily mean criminal law.  There are various reporting and chain of custody procedures (paper ballots for example are supposed to be maintained, stored, transported in a certain way).  

The purpose of those various rules and regulations is to maintain transparency and prevent fraud. The county has not been following some of those, apparently, and hence they are breaking the law.  ",Roez,e9cuehk,conservative
Number of absentee ballots is required by law to be reported no later than 30 minutes of the closing of the polls. They just keep finding more now and are refusing to report on how many.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0o58,conservative
[deleted],,e9cwh40,conservative
the inevitable [balkanization](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Balkanization) of the United states.  ,iwasthebeaver,e9d17u3,conservative
What? Native Americans aren't citizens? What the hell are you talking about? ,Bored2001,e9d6z3n,conservative
They are citizens and every one of them has the right to vote. Look up 1924,GodzRebirth,e9dienn,conservative
"Some states and counties, (unsure about Georgia) do not allow hyphens on licenses. 

And can someone empirically test this. Everytime a purge happens, count up the ethnicities and after 5-10 purges you should have enough information to perform a statistical analysis and decide to see if any particular groups are statistically more likely to be purged. My expectation is yes, some are. ",Bored2001,e9d7d2d,conservative
"Without a doubt the most maddening thing about it is how, on this issue in particular, the MSM will go all out to cover for it. They'll frame it as Republicans pouting or recently ""freaking out"", they'll characterize it as unsubstantiated or ridiculous, and cite bullshit like ""proven cases of fraud"" as if every form and instance of fraud went to court and managed to get a conviction (very difficult to do, especially when prosecutors in the worst offending areas won't bother). I mentioned I just browsed over the Google news section on this topic and they're linking Daily Beast/HuffPo/NPR/and WaPo who are varying levels of disparaging Repubs and calling it warrantless or irrelevant. Imagine if the general public actually got a fair impression of the likelihood and existence of widespread forms of fraud. It isn't all ""person claims other person's ID, walks into voting booth and casts a fraudulent vote"". It's misuse and abuse by officials themselves, from ballot stuffing to ""mistakes"" like losing ballots. Voting fraud has existed for as long as voting has existed and is the most natural thing possible for those who would benefit from it.",MackMizzo,e9d732v,conservative
"Secretary of State here in PA, not sure about Florida, but I would imagine its a similar position. ",iwasthebeaver,e9cxine,conservative
Hi r/againstHatesubs wildly outrageous comment account. ,Knollsit,e9cbfa3,conservative
"All they have to do is keep ""finding ballots"". This is not a huge conspiracy theory. Its assuming that a group that committed election fraud two years ago might be willing to commit election fraud today. ",sumgidan,e9ctygv,conservative
"Creating new votes in a district isn't a massive conspiracy, especially when the person in charge has been known to tamper with elections.",unityrootts,e9dey28,conservative
I don't think you quite understand the meaning of conspiracy as you think you do.,GodzRebirth,e9g5aqj,conservative
[removed],,e9cqxcj,conservative
You ever notice how conservatives tend to be more open about their bias? Examples are Daily Wire and Louder with Crowder who state they lean right and people should find left wing sources to get a full picture. Problem is left wing sources try to pretend they’re unbiased/moderate...then they’ll say they’re dedicated to progress or whatever ,i_floop_the_pig,e9cqyd4,conservative
"In ohio, ballots have to be postmarked by election day so they could still arrive later in the week and be valid.  Is it different in FL?",nearlygod,e9cz6pw,conservative
Because Florida is significantly closer to NY then California is. If you're moving away from NY you most likely still want to be able to come back and visit family on a somewhat frequent basis.,dehshadow,e9cx35s,conservative
Mainly California.,_SkeletonJelly,e9dmuv6,conservative
"They are citizens of America and of their respected tribe. 1924 they were granted citizenship. They have all the rights and privileges Americans get, although there is an understanding that the tribes tend to govern themselves to a large degree",GodzRebirth,e9dhv4i,conservative
[deleted],,e9dm4s5,conservative
"I doubt they'd make new votes. That's insanely difficult to pull off, as the numbers must match the registrations and the ones who signed in. 

I guess there's always a chance they could have counted the number of votes going in one box and then built another box full of Democratic only votes and swapped them out? Same could have happened the other way around too. ",jal0001,e9e1ybi,conservative
"I defend the use of hyperbole (which I consider this to be) in an environment of peers and which I consider different than speaking in a public square. My point of contention is that even with that, I believe this sub in general remains quite reasonable in their terms of rhetoric and self reflection. No one said we have to be neutral. 

Besides, look at the comments of the guy I replied to. Obvious shill. Possible perv...",gt4674b,e9cry8k,conservative
Yes. Anything not reported by within 30 minutes of the closing of the polls is not to be counted. They are ignoring that and counting them anyway and refusing to report on how many they have (also required by law to disclose this).,Starky_McStarkface,e9d0qw5,conservative
"Cost of living and convenience would be the most obvious reasons. If you’re making a significant move 1k+ miles away and the #1 reason is politics, you’re weak minded imho ",PragueNole09,e9cxr2r,conservative
[deleted],,e9cxnpu,conservative
"Horse shit.

Some voter ID laws absolutely were passed with the *intent* to disenfranchise. To pretend otherwise would be disingenuous. There is a long history of this. 
",Bored2001,e9dor61,conservative
"You do know that the concern over this is because they haven't provided any numbers at all? Their ""counting"" is completely behind closed doors.",unityrootts,e9e7re5,conservative
Shill confirmed... Fuck that guy.,abuigues,e9csad4,conservative
Older people moving to warmer weather is incredibly common.  Use some critical thinking skills here. Not everything revolves around politics is my point.,PragueNole09,e9cy0z7,conservative
[deleted],,e9dt5xd,conservative
"Well if you were intentionally committing a crime, would you try and leave evidence? 

And considering that Georgia has already literally deleted election data that a judge told them to keep, I doubt you'll find evidence either. 

Lack of hard evidence in this case is not the standard. In light of history the statistical outcome is the reasonable standard in this case. 

Now the question, is there anything legal that can be done about it. I doubt it. But this is not democracy as it is meant to be. 
",Bored2001,e9dxcmy,conservative
[deleted],,e9dyxhp,conservative
"Show me that there is a significant problems with the voter rolls, or significant voter fraud due to no exact matches. 

A more workable and frankly better system, used by real computer scientists would be to tokenize the names, include a common mis-spelling and punctuation ontology, and to harmonize the databases using this procedure. You could probably write 10 lines of code to do this (calling on existing libraries and at the proof of concept level of course). What do you think all the big tech companies and marketing firms do? 

And it was not done in an off year it was done every year until a lawsuit stopped it. ",Bored2001,e9dzd5o,conservative
[deleted],,e9e1eke,conservative
And why do you think that? Such a system would work just fine. ,Bored2001,e9e66g4,conservative
"Have there been any police reports filed by the Carlson's family? And if so, why the hell are people not being arrested? ",Quazimodal,e9d8fvf,conservative
DC? Arresting people? That's almost unheard of. I'm not even joking. ,DBG1998,e9d8qvo,conservative
"He's since deleted all his tweets-
https://dailycaller.com/2018/11/08/vox-condone-violence-deletes-tweets/

So not sorry, just not comfortable with the blowback.",ngoni,e9dcfdl,conservative
He’s also obviously been terrorizing the snack cabinet. ,pugmommy4life420,e9dhd3a,conservative
[deleted],,e9dmus0,conservative
What is this right wing violence?  I honestly don't know what they're referring to.,Qwawn72,e9dtntw,conservative
"Yes, and it's DC.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9d8l28,conservative
And growing that neck beard to hide a floppy chin (it’s ok for me to mock him cuz I’m overweight too!),trelium06,e9dhpak,conservative
Think he's exercising his 2nd amendment rights?,Reven1911,e9egfu4,conservative
A big part of their strategy is to call everything they disagree with hatred. ,JimboJehosephat,e9crc5h,conservative
"Marx: perpetual revolution. This is their aim because it confers political power. It keeps us fighting each other and allow the state to sieze and maintain power. Review the history of Mao - he went after academia. THat is what the left is doing. Did you read the pinion piece in the NYT about the 12:1 progressive to conservative in university administrators. Have you seen the 'life' at college campuses? I do every day and its a transgender dream. It isnt anything we should be paying for, Ill tell you that much!",proteios1,e9dgw02,conservative
"Normalizing it?

They are defined by it.

If you take away their hatred, they literally vanish into oblivion.",TheComedianGLP,e9ddctc,conservative
"""The left has painted all men with a broad paintbrush soaked in the evil of some."" You can pretty much replace ""men"" in this sentence with anything conservative, and it would still be accurate. ""The left has painted all white people with a broad paintbrush soaked in the evil of some."" for example.",DrLurn,e9d814t,conservative
"We all know that happened to the Jewish population when hatred towards them was normalised under Nazi control. The first step to genocide is making it seem completely normal to hold hatred and rage towards a group of people for no reason.

It’s completely terrifying these left wing nut jobs  can’t even seen the similarities between themselves and the people they’re supposed to be against!! 

If they think it’s acceptable to almost home invade a persons house for different views what’s next? Burning books on opinions you don’t agree with or shun? Segregation? Genocide? 

These current events are very concerning and shouldn’t be viewed lightly at all. What was the polices response to this? Has anyone been arrested yet? I like in the UK so our bias mess station only show us news that panders to their agenda. ",Harryfwd,e9d9bpx,conservative
My social media timeline is basically divided between hateful leftists spam posting and conservatives mocking hateful leftists.,BeachCruisin22,e9ddfoj,conservative
Wrong.,Lives_With_His_Mom,e9dye7y,conservative
[removed],,e9db9mm,conservative
"If you understand anything about human beings and philosophy, this should not surprise you.  The Left's intellectual system is to forsake the intellect.  Their problem solving strategy is appeasement, surrender, or ignoring the problem.  They are so against imposing on others that they renounce any systematic approach to society.  
  
Without the intellect, they only have the will acting on appetites.  Hunger and power is all they understand so they attribute all dissent to hatred.  ",PlasmaBurnz,e9d8dmk,conservative
Trump advocates racism and bigotry,AkilaC,e9d0zud,conservative
I hope the lies you continuously tell yourself bring you the comfort you seek.,Solypsys,e9dco24,conservative
"You live in a bubble full of other idiots who all sing the same chorus about the horrors outside the bubble.

I'll also venture to say that you have literally no idea about any human history, except for American slavery and ""colonialism"".",TheComedianGLP,e9ddjmq,conservative
I don't see conservatives assaulting people in the streets. ,Hello_rojo,e9df6hs,conservative
Well put!,TheComedianGLP,e9ddfto,conservative
Post your video of him advocating racism.  ,timbowen,e9d22ic,conservative
"You deliberately twist his words to get the result you want and, when you can't do that, claim the non-racist things he says are 'code' for racist things and that only you can divine the truth. Trump is often bullheaded, tactless, stupid, incompetent, arrogant, any number of negative adjectives you won't find me arguing with. However, overt racism and bigotry are simply invented by those that hate him.",DMooseJ,e9dr53s,conservative
"When exactly did he do that? Oh, never? Got it.",hello_japan,e9d63el,conservative
Found the TDS sufferer,VoinaYMir,e9dxwul,conservative
[removed],,e9dh64q,conservative
[removed],,e9djfe7,conservative
[Further reading](https://edwardfeser.blogspot.com/2018/10/the-voluntarist-personality.html#more).  ,PlasmaBurnz,e9dhcci,conservative
"Synagogue shooter was a leftist, so was the guy that shot Steve Scalise. If you want to make sweeping generalizations from examples you won't win. Because I have more examples than you do.",Hello_rojo,e9dhhzd,conservative
"Ahh good, so you're speaking for me now. Did I say that? Here is something real enough to pass your standards, apparently. I'm reading that you say conservatives are killing liberals in the streets. Pretty typical of a bunch of Nazis, huh? ",Hello_rojo,e9djxvh,conservative
">driven by a conservative

Hey. Do you know what the word ALT means in ALT right? It means they are the alternative to us. They aren't us. He wasn't a conservative. ",LumpyWumpus,e9dqz5c,conservative
"I like you.

(glass raised)",TheComedianGLP,e9dhwg2,conservative
[removed],,e9djfyo,conservative
"""They just shoot up sunagogues and mail bombs to people""

Followed by:

""My point is that you can't make sweeping generalizations from just a few examples""

May be your point now, was not your point earlier. But we can keep moving the goalpost. ",Hello_rojo,e9dkuu9,conservative
"Well it doesnt help that the majorty of people having kdis are very poor or very rich, middle class,working class people are not.",Manchurainprez,e9ddfav,conservative
Didn't LBJ say something to the effect that if you hook people on welfare they will vote for you forever?,R-M-Renfield,e9dafd8,conservative
And here I am waiting until I'm financially secure to have kids.  The government could have been paying for them this whole time.,ElbowDeepInIt,e9dkt3c,conservative
"

Isn't there a general correlation between Income/Wealth and Fertility and that the ""poor"" generally have more kids than the ""rich?""

Also, it would seem that research has shown that waiting until you're in the right position to have children generally means you're going to be more successful in the long term?  Wouldn't this extend to the number as well?",bigdaveyl,e9dd0bl,conservative
Mostly Illegals tho. Around 30 million currently right?,aesaweebradar,e9d97rg,conservative
"I don’t understand why you would have a child when you aren’t finically prepared to take care of them. 

I understand if you suddenly get cancer or laid off...but surely not every single family in that statistic is in one of those situations. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9dgxx3,conservative
">I'll have those n*ggers voting Democratic for the next 200 years.

Was the quote.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dlrjb,conservative
Because you know you’ll have them paid for (sane reason universities can charge exorbitant amounts),stanleythemanley44,e9diqvc,conservative
"Carelessness.  They don't have any financial planning, and it never crosses their mind.  They dont even consider their life's stability, that boyfriend of 3 months they keep fighting with will be fine to have a kid with.  Like a spoiled child in a candy store (or perhaps an adult on black friday?), they want it (in this case a baby) right now, so that's what they're going to get regardless of the circumstances or consequences.  

Let alone the people who are careless with their protection (stupidity, ignorance, drunk/drugs, laziness, whatever) and end up getting pregnant ""accidentally"".",DeadWater27,e9e9452,conservative
"I like how I’m heartless if I don’t want to subsidize someone’s poor choices, but the parents aren’t considered heartless or at fault at all even though they’re the ones who put their child in that situation. ",Hipster_Dragon,e9dq0a9,conservative
Sketchy is one way to put it.  Another way is to say that this bitch is a straight up crook and should be in jail.,johnnydrama00,e9drfp5,conservative
First of all: that hair.,Aauo2688,e9dv2m2,conservative
This is the argument Mark Levin and professor [Steven Calabresi](https://thehill.com/opinion/judiciary/393088-us-law-is-not-on-the-side-of-robert-muellers-appointment-as-special-counsel) have been making for a while now.,ngoni,e9dc24c,conservative
[removed],,e9ebc4d,conservative
Levin has been on this narrative for ages. He says Mueller is acting like a superior officer as described in the Constitution. Thus needs consent from the senate.,JMB_was_a_god,e9dbwrf,conservative
"Ding, ding, ding! That's how you stick it to them.",mastaxn,e9d7l5s,conservative
"There is a good argument that the ""special prosecuter"" is not constitutional at all.

I mean think of this, a handfull of people in the DOJ can appoint a man with near unlimited power, budget, scope  with a free hand to do anything he wants, supeana anyon he wants all approved by a secret court and judge????  The president cant stop him, the Congress cant stop him, argually the acting Boss of the special counsul cant do anything?

The Special council is like some kind of internal affairs dictator it makes no goddamn sense. 

What the hell? Event he House doesnt have this kind of power its absolutely insane. ",Manchurainprez,e9ddq45,conservative
[removed],,e9dfhru,conservative
"So you're saying that Mueller has no authority to convene grand juries, issue subpoenas, or submit criminal indictments? Because those are the kinds of things that typically need to be signed off on by a principle officer. 

You can't have it both ways. Either Mueller has been unconstitutionally appointed without the consent of the Senate, or he has no authority to conduct the investigation in the manner he has been.",mastaxn,e9eobua,conservative
Every US Attorney is a principal officer that has to be confirmed by the Senate. Are you saying that Mueller has less authority than a US Attorney. He's acting as the most powerful US Attorney in the country. There seems to be no limits to what he can investigate.,PhilosoGuido,e9f6fnp,conservative
This dude is going to make them have a complete mental break. He trolls like no other,molon-labe7,e9d87a2,conservative
[removed],,e9dfcv6,conservative
You literally describe every grand jury ever convened ,jsjdbejdbxbfhdjxbeh,e9dyzey,conservative
Is someone paying you to act stupid or do you do it for free? ,NoobishPanda,e9dhixy,conservative
"Or you could link the evidence you have that shows it is untrue, Cenk",ModsAreThoughtCops,e9dg3x2,conservative
"No, he literally didn’t, dummy.",hello_japan,e9ewpyl,conservative
All grand jury proceedings are secret ,jsjdbejdbxbfhdjxbeh,e9fhd1s,conservative
"While I agree with the sentiments in the title, I'd like to observe that a big part of why the military is and remains 'tired' is due to mission creep.  Sure, the military has more funding and a few more bodies now - not many, but a few more - but we're still conducting operations in Afghanistan, Iraq, various other Middle Eastern nations, the South China Sea, Western Europe, South Korea, multiple African nations, etc.  

The military is neither funded nor equipped to run continuous multi-theater operations for decades without incurring significant degradation, both in material and in personnel.  We've ground ourselves down for zero benefit, and the rebuilding cost is going to be in the literal trillions when you consider how many hours have been placed on our airframes, vehicles, and facilities.  Not to even mention munitions stockpile depletions.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9dcbsz,conservative
I said the same thing to my wife.,bitERRORrate,e9dbtud,conservative
"Military spiked under Obama, then went down when we weren't as active, not to some crazy numbers, but back down to a mere 600 Billion.

Jesus is it that hard to Google ""Defense budget by year""?

The Pentagon has said multiple times they don't need anything, yet they still get more, which then gets passed down to your local police force! How fun.",Lives_With_His_Mom,e9dyjph,conservative
For better or worse he will be most remembered for his run as the VP pick. Conservatives will remember him for tax reform and gutting Obamacare. Liberals will remember him for the shelter gaffe and SNL skit. ,GoHuskies1984,e9fqymi,conservative
"Not great in the short term, but I think once we've had Pelosi or whoever for awhile, and then a Republican who gets no better results than and may well be worse than Ryan (depends on what the political climate is like in 2020 and beyond) the negative reputation will go away. How much it comes up is anybody's guess and partly dependent on what he does afterwards, even though it shouldn't matter when it comes to judging past performance. ",ZarahCobalt,e9gfe05,conservative
Who?,ReaganTroll,e9fxld5,conservative
He honestly just won't be remembered too much as Speaker. ,nealski77,e9gddt3,conservative
"I mean, a dead pimp won a state legislative seat in Nevada. ",soxfan90,e9e2dz0,conservative
How the hell was he running unopposed? ,BrockLee76,e9e4w3m,conservative
My county once had a jailer elected from inside the jail.,JMB_was_a_god,e9ejr9k,conservative
Wow I actually live in this district 🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️🤦‍♀️,littlebit90_,e9elvwv,conservative
This guy would make an excellent candidate to run against Trump.,optionhome,e9dzwbh,conservative
"Honestly, I'd rather have a dead pimp over Tom Wolf.",DogBeersHadOne,e9e4efl,conservative
[removed],,e9dk5m4,conservative
"> I’ll never forgive [Barack Obama] for what he did to our United States military. By not funding properly, it was depleted. Everything was old and tired. And I came in and I had to fix it.  
  
He’s right though.  
  
I joined the Air Force in Sep. 2008. I graduated Basic Training the day before they announced that Obama had been elected President. If only I had been prepared for what was to come.  
  
My first two years were okay because I was in tech school. After that, everything declined rapidly. They made cuts to AFSCs (I was safe because mine was a critical position), but I had many coworkers who were either reclassed or just cut loose completely.  
  
We were constantly undermanned. Because of cuts they made to other careers, I had at one point three additional duties, on top of being in a job that involved chasing flights for missions (long and often crazy/unpredictable hours).  
  
Instead of spending time and money on additional training, we started having to attend mandatory sensitivity trainings and lectures about how all men were sexist pigs. That really boosted morale and camaraderie, let me tell you...  
  
It was awful. I never got to do my job.  
  
I’m not trying to brag here but rather provide some context: I graduated top Airman in my basic training flight. I was top in physical fitness. I consistently scored 95+ on all my PT tests. I graduated top of my class in my first tech school, won the provost award, graduated top of my class in my second tech school, was awarded SrA BTZ, made Staff Sergeant my first try...  
  
And Obama’s policies drove me to say goodbye to all of that. It was both the best and worst time of my life. I was sacrificing everything I had to be treated like the dirt under his shoe. No thanks.",jina100,e9d3pce,conservative
">But it was also dangerous, deliberately meant to stir up the wingnuts and kooks…What if someone with an unstable mind loaded a gun and drove to Washington? 

You mean how a Bernie Bro actually did that after all the rhetoric about how evil Republicans are?",MajesticMulva,e9d2ihr,conservative
"Punch him in the dick, Boss!",TheComedianGLP,e9dfeco,conservative
"Rather unChristian, but whatever. It'd be a good time for the GOP to keep climbing the moral high ground. After Carlson/Antifa thing, and more violence coming down the pipe, it'd be in the GOP's best interests to come out of this without mud on their faces.",cons_NC,e9d2qor,conservative
Maybe she explains in her book why she was never proud of the United States until her husband was elected.  Maybe no one is asking for Michelle’s forgiveness for anything.,Neanderthalbastard,e9dd67v,conservative
[removed],,e9df8qb,conservative
How is that rasicm?,larrykins,e9dlrmf,conservative
Having him as our Commander and Chief sucked...I swear we spent most of our time in sensitivity training...they had a training for every little thing...and then he didnt even show up to the funeral of Major General Harold Greene  after he was killed in an insider attack...ugh my Army blood is boiling ,Septimus_Decimus,e9dlko1,conservative
"BUMP!

(salute)

Thank you airman.",TheComedianGLP,e9dfifw,conservative
Thank you John McCain.,TheComedianGLP,e9dfj9k,conservative
"You turn the other cheek to a leftist and he'll just smash a bike lock into it.

It's time for the right to evolve. We're not dealing with the Democrats of the 80's, and we need to stop acting like it.

Jeb represented the 'nice, wholesome' Republican of the past. He lost for a reason. 

Trump is a vicious attack dog that doesn't back down and fights like hell for his party. Anyone else would've dropped Kavanaugh but Trump had his back and didn't bow to the leftist mob. He represents our future- what we need to become if we don't want to fade into obscurity.

The times are changing, and we have to change with them.

Blind kindness will only get us taken advantage of. 

In the words of our president: ""Maybe hate is what we need if we're going to get something done.""",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dfcpy,conservative
"> John 10:11-13

Like many Christians, you mistake humiliation with humility. The good shepherd lays down his life for his flock in more ways than literal death, and letting your opponent trample you with words is not a noble sacrifice. I mean, Christ only didn't say anything at all to Herod; to everyone else he had proper responses and comebacks, and sometimes insults like to the Pharisees and Sadducees.",sunder_and_flame,e9diyq0,conservative
"A Shepard has a duty to protect the flock, you do not turn your cheek on a wolf.  ",ozric101,e9d3t8r,conservative
"Let the crazies show their crazy.  Let the media ignore the craziness because its associated with the side they want to win.  Let this go on for 2 years, then run with that on the ""poster.""",jdizzle161,e9d3ube,conservative
" LMAO!

## It’s Snopes vs. Politifact! The vile bias of the left wing media in an ugly display 

[http://www.floppingaces.net/2016/08/06/its-snopes-vs-politifact-the-vile-bias-of-the-left-wing-media-in-an-ugly-display/](http://www.floppingaces.net/2016/08/06/its-snopes-vs-politifact-the-vile-bias-of-the-left-wing-media-in-an-ugly-display/)

&#x200B;

# EXPOSED – Guess Who is REALLY Behind [Snopes.com](https://Snopes.com)?

[http://www.angrypatriotmovement.com/who-is-behind-snopes/](http://www.angrypatriotmovement.com/who-is-behind-snopes/)",TheComedianGLP,e9dg066,conservative
"Yeah let's crank up the hatred, then the other party will too in retaliation, and it just keeps going higher and higher, and everyone just gets madder and madder. What could go wrong???",Bilxor,e9ednkm,conservative
THIS!!,TheComedianGLP,e9dfkfx,conservative
John 10:11-13,cons_NC,e9d3z9g,conservative
"Ah yes, angrypatriotmovement.com, one of America's most trusted news sources.",Bilxor,e9edr5c,conservative
"Or we could remain polite while the left becomes increasingly radicalized and violent and just allow them to attack us and threaten us while doing nothing so we can claim the moral high ground.

Personally, I'll stick with hatred. I hate these people; they're detriments to society and add absolutely nothing of value to this world.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9gonij,conservative
"There is a difference between turning the other cheek and being a doormat.

Luke 22:36 And He said to them, ""But now, whoever has a money belt is to take it along, likewise also a bag, and whoever has no sword is to sell his coat and buy one.",I_dont_study,e9dxytx,conservative
"> John 10:11-13

""I am the good shepherd. The good shepherd lays down his life for the sheep.""

I hope you're not suggesting that Trump should die for the good of the country...

I agree that the GOP needs to attract more moderates, and I thought Trump's response did that. Michelle's criticism was personal, and Trump responded with a criticism that was national. The Birther thing was dumb, and Trump stopped that a long time ago, but the effect of Obama's policies can still be felt today.",TangoFoxtr0t,e9dbuah,conservative
">t 

Can't read?

Or do you need to be spoonfed from NPR?",TheComedianGLP,e9g0d6o,conservative
"I guess I've never heard of hating someone ""politely"" before. Isn't that a little two-faced? How can you be polite to someone while simultaneously and conspicuously hating them?

Hatred fuels conflicts not solutions",Bilxor,e9gp347,conservative
I'm not. Trump is the hired hand. Christ already died for us. God for President.,cons_NC,e9dc0vk,conservative
"What does NPR have to do with any of this? 

Do you listen to NPR? I don't",Bilxor,e9gd2le,conservative
"Go away, shill.",TheComedianGLP,e9dfmai,conservative
"You're apparently in the business of trying to invalidate facts due to the source of their documentation, so I naturally assumed you like English accents lying to you.",TheComedianGLP,e9gdtw3,conservative
Lmao...check my post history,cons_NC,e9dfqku,conservative
"Well my uncle's brother from Minnesota said you're wrong!!  


Don't believe me? You must be in the business of trying to invalidate  facts due to the source of their documentation...",Bilxor,e9gegkv,conservative
No need.,TheComedianGLP,e9dg2mq,conservative
"Thanks, I figured you were a waste of time.

You've verified it.",TheComedianGLP,e9gf8xn,conservative
"Uh don't descend to ad hominem, that's pointless

You can back up and make a point about the thread if you want",Bilxor,e9gi4rj,conservative
"> ""invalidate facts due to the source of their documentation"" 

\^\^yeah I was, the point I was trying to make is the source of the material matters. 

Extreme example: If someone is on trial for murder, do you believe them when they say ""I didn't do it?""  


If you don't, you are ""invalidating facts due to the source of their documentation.""

Hope that makes sense. That's what I was trying to communicate.",Bilxor,e9gi9vr,conservative
"Well... according to her you ""just pay for it.""",ADamnTroll2,e9cvdxl,conservative
Just find an apartment and make all the other tenants pay for it...duh.  Use your common sense here ,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9d82gt,conservative
She will be a gift that keeps on giving,PerceivedShift,e9d7ad3,conservative
"Hey, I too have not been receiving a congressional salary as a non-member of Congress! What gives??",PubliusVA,e9cxcx4,conservative
I honestly thought this was satire. Reality is getting increasingly stupider. ,justhere2havefun,e9d0vap,conservative
"Oh man, stung by the b-… Wait, this is real? There's no way… ",drgmaster909,e9d5p6d,conservative
Wat you have to work before you get a paycheck?!? Bullshit pay me now! ,CuckRhoades,e9cvni8,conservative
"I'm going to move to her district and vote for her re election, this lady is comedy gold.",BrigGenMordecaiGist,e9d7z1v,conservative
"Just when I think the Democrat party couldn't elect anyone dumber......they go and elect someone like this. 

And totally redeem themselves!!!!!!!",MajesticMulva,e9dkha6,conservative
"""Fuck you, Pay me""

On a serious note, how can we expect someone who apparently can't even handle their own financial situation to do so for the area they represent?",Silicon_Avatar,e9cxr23,conservative
She's already complaining that she's not taking in the dough fast enough. And how in the world is the electoral system to blame for you not being financially stable enough without a six figure income from the government? ,MaddSim,e9cxkyx,conservative
You could quit?,Manchurainprez,e9ddssf,conservative
"This socialist will fit right in in DC.  Schmoozing with elitist lefties at swanky cocktail parties, decrying those rubes in flyover country as being inbred and racist.  No doubt she'll enjoy the finer things in life that crony capitalism supplies.  ",puddboy,e9d6s2w,conservative
"> “I have three months without a salary before I’m a member of Congress, so how do I get an apartment?” Ocasio-Cortez said. “Those little things are very real.”

It’s almost as if she lacks any foresight.",Lustan,e9d703p,conservative
"She has no place in politics. But, this is what happens when you brainwash people. I could slap a D next to my name and promise free shit and win too.",HolsterOfNuts,e9d1cr3,conservative
"One thing that struck me reading LBJ's biography a few years ago was that when he was a freshman congressman, he lived in a college-style dorm with other freshmen congressmen, shared bathrooms and everything. It was a big part of how he established personal relationships throughout Congress and built his power base. That's how he became so adept at the retail politics necessary to get legislation passed. 

I guess my point is: may AOC find her single bedroom condo.",oilman81,e9dfxyu,conservative
"This has got to be a spoof - if not, NYC, you are in for a world of hurt via the Dumber & Dumberer version of a House Rep.",JFGFNY,e9d9qhv,conservative
Jesus Christ I thought this was satire...this is actually real? The fuck is this world coming to...,Finfan90,e9dppy5,conservative
Has anyone started a crowdfunding campaign yet?,mlmack,e9dq755,conservative
She's going to get her paycheck and go to payroll asking for the other half of her paycheck that they forgot.,M0D3RNW4RR10R,e9e8bm9,conservative
Just go on welfare like the rest of your relatives bitch,Rudeirishit,e9dbk6a,conservative
"Honest question, what do you guys think we should do about representatives that don't have enough money to fund their move to DC? I feel like that's an arbitrary barrier to representing the people that voted for you. Outside of debts, shady deals etc I don't think there should be anything stopping lower or lower middle class people from running for office.",itsNick_,e9dof5c,conservative
"People like her are the exact problem with big government. If you can’t afford something, you just raise taxes a bit (over simplification obviously). A few extra bucks from everyone is more than enough to cover whatever they’re trying to pay for.

I will never understand why we don’t operate government like a business. So much waste and unnecessary spending. ",WebSliceGallery123,e9cvp9f,conservative
"her and Bernie make a great team  
https://i.imgur.com/PKRwRNv.jpg****",alc59,e9d925y,conservative
Speaker! Speaker! ,etherealsmog,e9djc9x,conservative
\#MeToo,TheComedianGLP,e9dgpiu,conservative
Hey me too! This must be Bernie Sanders plan to get more people federal employment,F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e9czq4h,conservative
I was expecting a babylonbee link. ,UltimoRush,e9d7ipe,conservative
">~~Reality~~ Ocasio Cortez

FTFY",burtmaklin1,e9dcbko,conservative
We are well past that in deep in full on clown world. ,Manchurainprez,e9ddtip,conservative
I also assumed this was Babylonbee. This was a real Poe's Law moment for me.,Vratix,e9drxk5,conservative
I thought she had two jobs?,jdizzle161,e9cy1ie,conservative
"Honestly, I don't think she will. Fit in, that is.

She seems so incredibly removed from how politics and governance actually work, that I imagine she will be completely dismissed by her ""peers"" in Congress.

They will patronize her when they need her vote and ignore her the rest of the time. ",Vratix,e9ds8hw,conservative
"Considering she gets sworn in on Jan 3, her math is also really questionable (less than 60 days away)",Taylor814,e9ddujw,conservative
We need to start doing this on a local level.,TheComedianGLP,e9dgw5e,conservative
"I was thinking about that this morning.

She's going to be making 174k a year, with no qualifications, no experience, and no idea what she's doing- all in a job that doesn't require you to actually work.

I could easily move to some deep blue area, promise a bunch of retards free shit, and end up with a job that pays nearly 200 grand a year.

I'm really thinking about it. I'd just have to scrub my social media and maybe change my name.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dftjg,conservative
"Comparing this to her previous statements, there is absolutely no way to determine that this is not a valid quote.",TheComedianGLP,e9dgxmk,conservative
Maybe elect officials that understand basic economics and finance and are responsible enough to have a 60 day emergency fund.,Finfan90,e9dpjxa,conservative
The sheep wonder why the wolves don't act more like dogs. ,Rightquercusalba,e9cw2qa,conservative
"> If you can’t afford something, you just raise taxes a bit (over simplification obviously).

Not really actually.",FelixFuckfurter,e9d1wjq,conservative
"Government isn't operated like a business precisely because it exists to solve problems that the profit motive doesn't. It literally won't work. Yes, we can use economics and business concepts to design some aspects of government, but at its heart government is antithetical to pure capitalism. ",GorathThorgath,e9d4vde,conservative
  #mefuckingtoo.,fifaislife206,e9dq8fy,conservative
[removed],,e9eca3a,conservative
Seriously just grab some bar shifts.  I’m sure any bar in Brooklyn if DC would love to have her slinging drinks.,timbowen,e9d7sqj,conservative
"Peers in Congress?  I could see that, but there are plenty of reporters and hoighty toighty in DC, and they'll gladly have her at their fart-sniffing parties.",puddboy,e9dxk5p,conservative
Change it to Beto. You’ll be loved.,BoD80,e9dgp6g,conservative
"I agree. My mother won the election for Sheriff in our home town by running as a Democrat. She’s a staunch Republican. It really does work. I’ve strongly considered doing exactly what you said. Scrubbing my social media completely, waiting a few years, and running as a Democrat. Once elected, vote straight Republican on everything. I’m sure it would make national news.",HolsterOfNuts,e9dgk7b,conservative
How the hell do you make it through BU and land a seat in Congress when you're this clueless?,JFGFNY,e9duezx,conservative
I'm not talking about policy or economic ideas. I'm talking about someone from either party that doesn't make a high enough income to save up for a big move. That should disqualify them from running for office?,itsNick_,e9dqe5e,conservative
"And what happens when ""a bit"" is 100% and there isn't anything left to tax? If we confiscate 100% of the wealth of the ""rich"" we couldn't pay for all the left's wish list.",SilverHerfer,e9d8wpn,conservative
"You’re missing the point.  In government there is every incentive to spend all the money you can, even if it’s on dumb stuff you don’t need.  In business you have every incentive to cut costs because it adds to your profit margin.

There needs to be some incentive for people in government not to waste money. ",timbowen,e9d7opm,conservative
"Don’t deserve. Good point you make there. People die everyday, all the government is supposed to do is make sure everyone has an equal chance to live but nothing is guaranteed nor should it be. ",F1F2F3F4F5F6F7F8,e9eczg5,conservative
"Gentlemen's clubs, top shelf.",TheComedianGLP,e9dgsi4,conservative
 Nah cause then he’d still find a way to lose HAHAHAHAHAHA,HolsterOfNuts,e9dh1b5,conservative
"I'm a pale white Jew but maybe just maybe I could pull off changing my name to Tyrone Hussein Hernandez.


",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dinml,conservative
Damn this started out as a joke but now I'm actually considering it.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dipvz,conservative
"1) You're overestimating BU

2) You're overestimating the people who voted for her",TheComedianGLP,e9dwe8i,conservative
"I mean, kinda, yeah. Even if you're completely on the up and up, it's an expensive lifestyle that requires additional capital on your part to maintain.

You have to travel back and forth between the capitol and your district several times a year, so you need a place to live in both regions.

You have to employ staff, which is expensive. If you have any hope of actually meeting the bare minimum of your responsibilities you're likely to come close to hitting the cap of staffers (14 full time, 4 part time).

You have to attend/host political functions, which aren't free, if you want to have any hope of actually making enough political connections to ever accomplish anything.

There's certainly more things that I can't think of at the moment but, if you're paying your staff a living wage, you're likely already tapped out of funds right there.

Is it gatekeeping? Yeah, a little. But it's also sensible. ",Vratix,e9dtk2u,conservative
Then they start executing us for being treasonous Trump-Jews.,TheComedianGLP,e9dgnz1,conservative
"""Beto"" is a pasty white Irishman with a tanning booth. Your odds sound pretty good, Congressman ~~Jewish Guy~~ Totally Diverse Hussein Hernandez. ",ClosetFascist,e9duw37,conservative
Touche!,JFGFNY,e9koclx,conservative
"I wish it wasn't the case, but it's the reality and avoiding it would cause new problems. I hope we can lower the bar little by little in the future. Thanks for the response.",itsNick_,e9dw0os,conservative
"If all else fails, I'll just change my name to Zino Foabe and hope no one notices.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9earra,conservative
They're not 'Shenanigans' they are ***crimes***,moist_bag,e9dy26d,conservative
Arizona is lost at this point. ,MaddSim,e9e51ip,conservative
"While I'm still holding out McSally might persevere. Do you think McSally had a messaging issue reaching moderate GOP/McCain voters? 

Maybe they thought she would be another Jeff Flake.",speedybuddy562,e9ec7tw,conservative
"Sinema went from down 22K to up 22K. Which means she got 55% of the 350K uncounted votes in maricopa, even though shes only got about 50% in that county overall...

It's so odd... like they saved all her votes till the end. Such an uncharacteristic jump.

",mbarnar,e9e54zu,conservative
"Do you guys seriously think this is being handled correctly without fraud, cause I sure as hell don't.",Havebaconwilltravel,e9eabip,conservative
McSally was almost always up in the polls. Can somebody explain why the 1% left to count doesn’t model even close to what the other 99% did?,the-divine-comedy,e9emjer,conservative
"Even more late votes for Sinema. She was right, Arizona IS a meth lab. How does any American vote for this radical?",YankeeBlues21,e9e4ydr,conservative
This is out and out fucking theft.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9e5f5n,conservative
Just doesnt make sense how the Governor handily won reelection but Sinema in leading her race.,Zac1245,e9e5rgj,conservative
"This is a shameful, shameful showing for that state. This country is losing it, electing these radical leftists ",YankeeBlues21,e9e5uuz,conservative
"I don't know what more McSally could've done. We have video and audio of Sinema saying it's okay for US citizens to join the Taliban, calling Arizona the meth lab of democracy,  and defending men who fuck teenagers because they ""might look older than 18""  and shes still getting 900K votes.

Now I'm not saying McSally is the perfect candidate,  but this should've been a landslide with all the PR nightmares Sinema has had.


That's a massive block of people that clearly don't give a fuck about who actually goes to the Senate for our state as long as it's not a Trump person.",mbarnar,e9eg6ug,conservative
"McSally is a moderate herself, but frankly, there needn’t *be* a message to “moderate” voters. The GOP *IS* a moderate party. We’ve moved left on a bunch of issues over the last decade or two. Meanwhile, the Dems? Not only didn’t they move rightward to meet us, but they flew off at record speed to the extreme left. 

It’s stunning to me how many voters willingly allowed themselves to be pulled hard left by the Dems, media, academies, and entertainment. We have out and out socialists, not only proudly running, but *winning*. ",YankeeBlues21,e9edisj,conservative
">In Maricopa County, there were approximately 266,000 ballots left to be processed.

We got a ways to go, they didn't even get through 100,000 today lol",Zac1245,e9e5fxc,conservative
"A few precincts were slow to report their election day vote count (hence the 99% reporting).

However, there were many more votes outstanding in the form of mostly early ballots. In Arizona these are counted by hand and each signature is manually verified, which often takes several days after election day.

This is how the situation was described on Wednesday:

> An analyst in the secretary of state’s office estimates that nearly 500,000 votes have yet to be counted statewide — including 80,000 in blue-leaning Pima County and 345,000 in Maricopa County (the Phoenix area). Maricopa has some very blue corners and some very red corners, so without knowing where the outstanding ballots are coming from, this is a totally wide-open race. The state says it will issue updated vote totals at 5 p.m. local time every day.

Since then, they have released three updated vote counts: on Wednesday night McSally was up ~2,000 votes, the next night Sinema was up ~9,000, and now Sinema is up ~20,000. There are still about 360,000 votes to count as of Friday night; [this article](https://www.azcentral.com/story/news/politics/elections/2018/11/09/how-many-votes-left-count-mcsally-sinema-race/1948889002/) has a breakdown by county and type.

",eclaircissement,e9ep6a8,conservative
"Especially considering the climate with ducey out here with red for ed.

Theres no way anyone would vote Sinema and Ducey in the same ticket",mbarnar,e9e605f,conservative
But did Ducey ever distance himself from Trump? I Just don’t get it. How did Ducey do so well but not McSally. ,Zac1245,e9ehvu3,conservative
The secretary of state is reporting 100%,mbarnar,e9e5im7,conservative
"Yeah, I remeber when they were claiming Ducey was gonna be out of office. He won by a wide margin. ",Zac1245,e9e654i,conservative
"The article says differently. Still 360,000 left in the whole state to be counted. ",Zac1245,e9e5nku,conservative
Well fingers crossed then lol that 55% just seems so high,mbarnar,e9e5slj,conservative
Are you from AZ? Could still be all the Gilbert and Sunrise Valley votes in there lol. ,Zac1245,e9e5xaj,conservative
[deleted],,e9e8lvj,conservative
Yeah east valley. ,mbarnar,e9e5ypv,conservative
They working over the weekend?,Zac1245,e9ehj3b,conservative
"I’m from there and grew up there. Been don’t in VA for eight years. I was looking to move back. I can go back to AZ or Tennessee. I just wonder what long term, like twenty year prospects for Arizona and guns and taxes and everything else. Where ever I go is where I’ll probably stay for a while. I just wish this wasn’t happening to AZ. Makes me sad. ",Zac1245,e9eicc7,conservative
Is it weird that I dont really care about this controversy? Acosta is a dick an deserved the ban. Everything else is rage bait drama.,bitERRORrate,e9dbko8,conservative
"guys, it's just not assault. lets drop it",sylect,e9deh99,conservative
Exactly.  If it wouldn't have been this it would've been some other incident to finally get his press pass revoked.  The only surprise here is that it took so long.,anuser999,e9dd0m0,conservative
"The ""assault"" claim wasn't actually part of the statement from SHS, she stated that Acosta had put his hands on the intern and obstructed her from doing her job(which is true, he didn't have to be violent to have been unprofessional and to push the intern's arm away so he could hog the mic long after his turn should have been over.)",Mewster1818,e9dn0sb,conservative
This is the definition of cognitive dissonance ,stoffel_bristov,e9e7rz3,conservative
"HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA! Trump will do more than just retire you then, he will utterly destroy you!",heartless_13,e9e8u3f,conservative
"Flake off, Jeff.",PurpleHouseSlippers,e9e8wu3,conservative
"What a moron. He can’t honestly think he’d have a chance in hell, ever? He’s spineless. I might actually vote in the primary if he runs. ",HolsterOfNuts,e9e8t6f,conservative
"Why would I not vote for a guy who has a permanent look of constipation on his face. 

-No one",DPistola,e9ea9jx,conservative
Let me guess he wants to be the Triumphant Perot,Enzo_SAWFT,e9ed0h5,conservative
"LOL!  Like it was a total accident that Trump beat the whole Republican slate in 2016.  Good luck, snowFlake.",BrighamYoung,e9efsgj,conservative
This guy is so RINO you can practically see the horns coming out of his forehead,unityrootts,e9eikwu,conservative
Lawl ,Natetendo83,e9e907e,conservative
"Flake as Skinner: No, it is the Republicans who are wrong",Lilla_Snigel,e9emjln,conservative
"That would get interesting. I could see a ton of Dems change registered party affiliation if needed and vote for Flake in order to primary Trump.

The problem for them then being, they would need to have a strong unifying candidate from the get go that everyone got behind. If the Dems have a clown cars worth of contenders, are they willing to sacrifice their favorite and end up with another shitty Dem candidate just to screw Trump?

This may also be a defensive maneuver with the Dems colluding with Flake to keep the Repubs from changing registered party affiliation if needed, and voting for the weakest of the Dem candidates.
",MooMooCudChew,e9etnna,conservative
"He's being paid for it.  He won't run in the primaries, he'll run in the general election to siphon off votes.",StraightNewt,e9e7ylr,conservative
">""If Donald J. Trump decides as president to throw a whistle-blower in jail for trying to talk to a reporter, or gets the F.B.I. to spy on a journalist, he will have one man to thank for bequeathing him such expansive power: Barack Obama,"" Risen wrote shortly after Trump's election.

I went through Obama's unprecedented and outrageous conduct towards journalists during his administration in the /r/TrueReddit thread on the Acosta ban yesterday and got absolutely buried.

&#x200B;

[https://www.cbsnews.com/news/fox-news-reporter-secretly-monitored-by-obama-administration-court-documents/](https://www.cbsnews.com/news/fox-news-reporter-secretly-monitored-by-obama-administration-court-documents/)

>\[CBS News' Jan Crwford\] added on ""CBS This Morning,"" ""Now, of course, media critics (including) the American Civil Liberties Union say no presidential administration -- not even the Nixon administration -- went after reporters with search warrants and secret surveillance, and journalists I'm talking to in Washington ... are saying they are seeing the impact of this, that their sources and whistleblowers -- those people who can be so important in bringing out information to the public that the government may obviously want to keep secret -- that they're afraid to talk, that they're staying silent. And that, they say, could be the real impact of this. If the administration kind of intimidates people into not coming forward, people stay silent and the administration gets to control the information and the story.""

&#x200B;

Yea, this quote is about the Obama administration.

&#x200B;",sdotmills,e9drfja,conservative
"> got absolutely buried

Good on you for standing up for truth.",undue-influence,e9du855,conservative
A little comic relief is helpful in my opinion. Even if sometimes the line between satire and reality is really blurry these days. ,CASunDevil24,e9ghorx,conservative
I love the Bee personally. Satire is my favorite type of comedy. ,WebSliceGallery123,e9gi48m,conservative
"We already have a voting system. Posts are submitted and our users decide to upvote or downvote. Most users here seem to really enjoy Babylon Bee articles, so we're not going to ban them. 

There's only one Babylon Bee article on our front page right now. I think you'll be okay.",GuitarWizard90,e9gh6sf,conservative
/r/ConservativeMeta,ultimis,e9gjiyx,conservative
I like the BB.,paulbrook,e9gn1a9,conservative
"Or, you could just downvote them and click the 'hide' option underneath the post? And then move on with your life? I mean it's not like they're really interfering with the discourse on the sub. They tend to get 6-10 comments along the line of ""Poe's Law"", ""stung by the bee"", or ""it's sad that satire looks so much like reality""--maybe 16 such comments on a *really* popular one--and then we all move along and get back to business. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9gq7bq,conservative
"

Why do you complain about the content of this sub but haven't posted anything here except this little whine?",chabanais,e9gtx7t,conservative
"why do you believe this is a problem, and why is the sub better off without satirical links being shared?

also: are you down with memes? i notice that you don't mention them, even though they are just as, if not more, commonly shared.",SKWM3000,e9gq7ol,conservative
Satire sites such as Babylon Bee should simply be flagged/flaired as satire.,bachiavelli,e9gm39z,conservative
"Why not a simple Satire Tag? Often, satire is more effective at communicating concepts, ideas, and problems. ",LordShadow_Cinci,e9heq43,conservative
"
>also: are you down with memes? i notice that you don't mention them, even though they are just as, if not more, commonly shared.

Right? They are also crossposted from other subs so I usually see the same meme 3+ times a day. If anything, that's what's actually annoying on this sub. Memes are super low effort too. The Babylon Bee is well written and actually funny. Most of the memes posted here aren't really that funny. ",Dunkeliness,e9gt44e,conservative
"It’s often convenient for liberals to overlook their biggest perceived enemy: racism.

What could be more racist than Margaret Sanger, founder of PP?

The answer is simple: her construction and vision of black genocide. 60 million dead black babies since Roe v Wade.",deepfeels96,e9daykf,conservative
I want that t-shirt.,tenshon,e9d72m2,conservative
Baby is defined as newly or recently born. So youre claiming planned parenthood is helping mothers birth their children and just murdering them. And you beleive this happened over 60 million black children. Does that sound accurate?,Corslutty,e9dk1ib,conservative
"http://www.numberofabortions.com/

https://docs.house.gov/meetings/JU/JU10/20171101/106562/HHRG-115-JU10-Wstate-ParkerS-20171101-SD001.pdf

https://www.desmoinesregister.com/story/news/politics/reality-check/2015/03/06/million-abortions-claim-checks/24530159/

Still is terminating a life. Brain activity, heartbeat, dreams, has functioning organs, etc.",deepfeels96,e9dptaj,conservative
"Not always, no. In some cases, yes. Sometimes it's just a bundle of cells. In others, it involves vile people who made decisions about their life and dont want to suffer the consequences. Other times the baby endangers the life of the mother. I'm not arguing it didnt happen, im arguing that they in most legal cases are under developed humans, not babies. Not murder, abortions.

If contraceptive was more widely propegated it would actually reduce these numbers. I can get the sources for you if you would like, but it doesnt need to be this high. Unfortunately religious fervor doesnt allow for that so we are in a place where women are chastised for trying to stop pregancy and also chastised for doing it after the fact. We should just have contraceptive treatment and then we won't have to ""kill babies"" as you are so instant on peddling.

",Corslutty,e9ds7at,conservative
">bundle of cells

[https://embryology.med.unsw.edu.au/embryology/index.php/Carnegie\_Stages](https://embryology.med.unsw.edu.au/embryology/index.php/Carnegie_Stages)

&#x200B;",Nora_Durst,e9e54fg,conservative
"It’s completely legal for a woman to terminate a pregnancy if the baby is threatening the mother’s life. The willful abortion of a 6 month old baby is completely murder.

Contraceptives are very widely available. Pack of condoms is extremely cheap and Plan B isn’t expensive. I went to public and private catholic schools and was railed with sex ed every single year. Religious fervor is irrelevant because Griswold v Connecticut ruled that banning contraceptives is unconstitutional.

",deepfeels96,e9e15jz,conservative
"Well, abortion at 6 months for non-health reasons is illegal in 43 states. It's also quite rare. Only about 1% of abortions occur after 21 weeks. I wasn't able to find data, but it seems like the vast majority of these late abortions are for medical reasons, not personal reasons.",eclaircissement,e9fyrga,conservative
I am unironically flipping out about this. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9d1mle,conservative
How many ballots left? ,Intimidator94,e9d26y2,conservative
you should be. This is a travesty,iwasthebeaver,e9d5ix6,conservative
Brenda Snipes refuses to say,YankeeBlues21,e9d43l4,conservative
"How many do the Democrats need? That many, plus a few.",hello_japan,e9d89fn,conservative
How many can Broward cook up in the next 7 hours and 35 minutes?,DogBeersHadOne,e9d2coo,conservative
As many Nelson needs to win,Dank_Cartographer,e9d5qah,conservative
Let's be realistic now. It will have to be a bit higher than how many they need. It would be too obvious if they found just a bunch of votes for Bill Nelson. They have to throw in at least a small but significant percentage of fake votes for Rick Scott just to make it seem somewhat believable. Which means that they will have to have enough to win on top of that.,nateious,e9dgv3w,conservative
2 million ,Intimidator94,e9d2eru,conservative
"But seriously, there can't be more than 100,000 left outstanding, we need election reform if that is so. ",Intimidator94,e9dn6sp,conservative
"You give them too much credit, they aren't that smart.",Finfan90,e9ds1oo,conservative
Less talk more results Trump,Menhadien,e9dcj0c,conservative
"If theres one thing everyone should be able to agree on, it's that Trump is massively egotistic.

His policies have been very good, but damn is his mouth not great as often as it probably should be. ",Ledcookey,e9dg6t8,conservative
It's a package deal.,guanaco55,e9dqpja,conservative
"It always is with politics, it seems. To bad Conservatism/Constitutionalism gets screwed most of the time regardless.",Ledcookey,e9dt0rm,conservative
Where would I find them? Was there supposed to be a link here?,PubliusVA,e9e5v3t,conservative
?????,cons_NC,e9eoyxd,conservative
That guy was a special type of warped.,SickofInternetProgs,e9ep85v,conservative
I did post it. Hmm... I’ll post again. ,mikeygio,e9e794w,conservative
The punishment should be the Death penalty ,Dank_Cartographer,e9dftbd,conservative
Good,Enzo_SAWFT,e9df7eo,conservative
Somebody in my neighborhood had their christmas decorations up the day after Halloween. ,iwasthebeaver,e9djo6z,conservative
Can we ban it after Thanksgiving too? ,etherealsmog,e9djowu,conservative
Amen.,Manach_Irish,e9dlghe,conservative
Y’all know this ain’t true right?,Alexxion,e9dgfro,conservative
Don’t encourage me,burtmaklin1,e9dl2tm,conservative
"It would help though if there was any good Thanksgiving music...

But there isn't so I'm just gonna play Handel's Messiah until January. 🤷🏼‍♀️",Mewster1818,e9dfg9x,conservative
Y'all know this is satire right?,I_WANT_TO_LOSE_3_LBS,e9dhtna,conservative
Adam Sandler's Turkey Song on repeat is a classic in my family's kitchen.,highlanderiic,e9dh17v,conservative
"""Over the River and Through the Wood"" is supposed to be a Thanksgiving song, but is often turned into a Christmas song because apparently we don't have enough of those.",Bob9999999999999,e9dk1am,conservative
"You would think we didn't have that many Christmas songs with the number of times you'll hear ""All I Want for Christmas is You"" by Mariah Carey....",Mewster1818,e9dl42t,conservative
The Babylon Bee is a treasure. ,MookieMagic,e9bv2rz,conservative
Nazis and Communists are just the National League and American League where the sport is collectivism.,aboardthegravyboat,e9c3e6q,conservative
*Real* nazism hasn't been tried. ,DenSem,e9c5mbw,conservative
Oh Bee you scamp! Now get outta here and do some actual satire 'stead of all this real news.,UltraSurvivalist,e9cbko6,conservative
This is absolute gold. ,Nightshade37,e9c4zq5,conservative
Can we all agree on one thing?  Fuck nazis,hugelkult,e9c0dtt,conservative
Real Nazism has never been tried.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dcflg,conservative
"It's never been tried before

""What about in Nazi Germany?""

That wasnt REAL Nazism",HelloThere243,e9co3cu,conservative
"> The things you could vote for would be stuff like how Nazi should we go? Double-Nazi? Triple-Nazi? Nazi-nine-thousand? The choices would be endless, but of course all Nazi choices.”",Quantumstinger,e9cjbkb,conservative
Bernie has more in common with Fascists than actual socialists.,ultimis,e9c2sma,conservative
"""Nazism"".. I see that made up word everywhere. It's national-socialism you know.",fractal_lifeform,e9cn8vf,conservative
"I mean,  technically the Germans did have a parliment. ",Manchurainprez,e9ddhdc,conservative
"Its happening right now. Anti muslim voters, anti gay, pro war... ",AntiAntiAntiFash,e9cusye,conservative
This is solid gold. Going to use this amongst my liberal friends.,powpowbang,e9d1s9c,conservative
"If the media has taught me anything, it's that if it's prefixed by ""Democratic"", it must be good!",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d6ok8,conservative
It gives me a good break from real American politics. It's too stressful.,goldrotmgonly,e9dc3vs,conservative
I thought the sport was suffering,therealdutchman11,e9crim8,conservative
"Perfect analogy.

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UUMdCV-Z7kk](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UUMdCV-Z7kk)",TheComedianGLP,e9ddqdw,conservative
"Can we all agree on the definition of ""nazi""? ",skarface6,e9c2a1o,conservative
">active in /r/politics and /r/news

no",richardguy,e9cb0x9,conservative
Fuck communists and their antifa terrorists. Can you agree on that?,LastationNeoCon,e9c8ti2,conservative
Agreed.,Nevaknosbest,e9c0quf,conservative
"i'm not saying bernie is a maniac like mussolini, but wasn't mussolini a socialist before he became a fascist?",fireball3k,e9c88v1,conservative
Look at the all downvotes the fascist Berniebots are giving you.,TheComedianGLP,e9ddy5t,conservative
most Americans don't seem to know what socialism actually means,RobotXander,e9cnqg0,conservative
"I think the terms are pretty interchangeable. In German it was Nationalsozialismus, or National Socialism, but also called Nazism. But, it's all semantics really and none of this stuff is black and white anyway. What was National Socialism isn't the same as what people necessarily mean when they socialism now.",RunagateRampant,e9cyfqw,conservative
a good ground rule would be that whatever the left claims to be nazism is almost never what nazism actually is.,fireball3k,e9c875f,conservative
"It means white people. 

I know, this may be shocking to hear. Thing is, words are defined by how they're used and especially how they're used by the people in power. Right now in  the public consciousness, this is what ""Nazi"" means and that's why people getting punched by the ""punch a nazi"" crowd are white much more often  than they're Japanese and never have swastica tattoos. It may be a definition conservatives don't  like, that conservatives wish  was different, and what have you, but that's the definition for all practical purposes. The only way to deny that ""Nazi"" means something other than ""white person"" is to come up with some intangible metaphysical navel gazing thing that will not impact discourse one bit and will leave you sitting in a room feeling smug while the world moves on without you. Nazi = white person. 

Anyone who disagrees with me is free to put this to the test. Go find any leftist discourse and replace the word ""Nazi"" with ""white person."" If whatever they're saying seems to be basically the  same thing (or dare I say, more accurate!), then you know I'm correct.",Hmmmming,e9c8ffh,conservative
People who disagree with me.,JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dchad,conservative
"I liked Jordan Peterson’s short hand for this:

Any time you hear people talking about racial superiority, you know that they’ve gone too far. 

That’s the best indicator. And we do a good job of following that indicator for people on the right. 

I hope that anyone here agrees with me that everyone should be treated as an individual. And if people of several different races applied for a job, that you shouldn’t make any pre-judgements based on the colour of their skin - you should evaluate each person objectively and pick the best candidate. ",YeOldeVertiformCity,e9dfc1c,conservative
this is a troll account,richardguy,e9cba95,conservative
"Yes he was a socialist his entire life. Fascism was based off of ""an evolution"" of the socialist ideology. They used the ""transitional state"" that communist literature supported to implement their utopia, and decided that was the end goal. As instead of the collective, it would be the ""state"" (slightly different).

Socialists of the early and mid 20th century saw the transitional state as a means to an end. The fascists saw it as the end. Bernie has no interest in reducing the size or scope of the state, thus he is more aligned with the Fascists.",ultimis,e9c8d7y,conservative
"Oh really? Hm, I thought all those black, gay or jewish people supporting Socialism were actually supporting Nazis?

Super eye-opening that it turns out Nazism may not necessarily be the same as what those people mean by Socialism; Neat!",MorePointsThanShalov,e9cznir,conservative
National socialism,SuperiiorX,e9d2ym3,conservative
Leftese dictionary? Lord Klavan is that you!?,callthereaper64,e9c9k5e,conservative
Brilliant.,TheComedianGLP,e9ddvo1,conservative
We all agree on that!,elcuban27,e9di8z5,conservative
[removed],,e9cbcop,conservative
"dang. i suppose i need to bone up on my history, then. would make it easier to deal with my peers who champion socialism.",fireball3k,e9cdpqn,conservative
"Yeah, black/gay/jewish people did not support Nazis, especially because they were killed by them because they were considered lesser human.

Socialism is not the same as Nazism. Nazism is synonymous with ""National Socialism"" but that's not the same as ""Socialism,"" which is obviously confusing because they both say Socialism. Nazism is called National Socialism but is really a form of fascism.",RunagateRampant,e9d1i8z,conservative
"National bad.

Socialsm good.

Beep.",TheComedianGLP,e9ddtck,conservative
"You make yourselves so obvious just by pretending so hard to be a conservative. Anyway, six years account and just a few hundred karma? Ok.",richardguy,e9cbgsx,conservative
"Be prepared for a nasty argument, the left hates hearing that the fascists were leftists. They have been brainwashed into believing it's an ""extreme right wing"" movement. You ask them why they state ""Nationalism"" and ""Racism"". As in left wing governments have not been nationalistic (which they very much were during the time of Stalin and Mao). Or that somehow ""racism"" is left wing even though progressive heroes Woodrow Wilson and FDR were up to their necks in the KKK and other racist associations.

Post modernist thought as allowed them to label anything that is known to be bad as ""right wing"" so it makes them feel better about the intellectually and morally bankrupt movement they are associated with.",ultimis,e9cdwrg,conservative
"""The only feasible socialism socialisticamente is corporatism, confluence, balance and justice interests compared to the collective interest."" its still a market economy in his mind



Mussolini rejected egalitarianism, a core doctrine of socialism.[6] He was influenced by Nietzsche's anti-Christian ideas and negation of God's existence. [40] Mussolini felt that socialism had faltered, in view of the failures of Marxist determinism and social democratic reformism, and believed that Nietzsche's ideas would strengthen socialism. While associated with socialism, Mussolini's writings eventually indicated that he had abandoned Marxism and egalitarianism in favor of Nietzsche's übermensch concept and anti-egalitarianism

Definitely not a marxist or socdem either ",SdSquid,e9chy3t,conservative
Orange man bad,SuperiiorX,e9djwcp,conservative
[removed],,e9cbmv0,conservative
"i was always told that fascism was a right wing movement, but after knowing the things i know now, i don't believe that it is. in college, i was also told that the republican and democrat parties did a switch sometime in the past, but i now doubt this even though i know i'm ignorant about why this claim is a load of garbage.

post modernism basically claims that the truth is that there is no truth. how people can believe that the statement ""there is no truth"" to be true is beyond me, given the inherent contradiction in a statement like that",fireball3k,e9cfhn7,conservative
[removed],,e9cgw4t,conservative
You post in /r/politics all of a sudden? And talk shit about conservatives in their own sub? And you thought you would pass?,richardguy,e9cc06o,conservative
What do you understand the ideology of fascism to be? ,cucumba_water,e9d8fzz,conservative
">i was always told that fascism was a right wing movement, but after knowing the things i know now, i don't believe that it is. 

Based on the origin of ""left"" and ""right"" wing as they were originally defined in France, it *was* a right wing movement. But in that context, ""right"" meant ""loyalty to the crown"" + social traditionalism/conservatism, while ""left"" meant no loyalty to the crown but still not libertarian view the way we think of it. See my analogy above: it's really just the left vs right leagues where the sport is collectivist authoritarianism, while our ""right"" wing is a totally different sport altogether.

American conservatism = social conservatism, yes, but also individual liberty and federalism. The only common thread is social conservatism. Social conservatism can be toxic when you mix it with centralized power and authoritarianism (see Islamofascism), and that may make it sound bad, but social liberalism is just as toxic when mixed in the same pot (see intersectionality). 

So really, what we consider to be ""right"" is about 3x further to the right ""right"" than what they consider to be ""right"" because classical liberalism and federalism aren't even included on the map.",aboardthegravyboat,e9di8fa,conservative
"Numbers 2, 3, 4, 6, 7, 11, 12, 13, 14 were all present during the communist regime in my country. I can clarify if you want. ",ginkavarbakova,e9cjh52,conservative
"Oh look, a list that was likely identified by a left wing professor ",Dranosh,e9cpx75,conservative
"Was Hugo Chavez left or right?   Bolivarianism shares many of those qualities, and many of those traits most certainly applied to Chavez's rise of power and his control over Socialist Venezuela.  

Most Conservative and right leaning pundits in History have been pushed out of universities.  I'm not surprised if this debate has been reshaped over the last few years, because it wasn't anywhere near as cut and dry as you are portraying when I was in college in the 80's.  ",Roez,e9cwg32,conservative
"I don't have time to go through this right now. My definition comes from Mussolini himself in his ""Doctrine of Fascism"", written intentionally to mimic the Communist Manifesto. He literally tells you (as a man who was a socialist his entire life) that fascism was an ""evolution"" of socialism, how he has nothing but disdain for capitalism and classical liberalism (everything the right stands for in the United States).

Considering he coined Fascism and its definition, you can fight this all you want. A brief glance through your list and you are reaching hard to claim ""right"" wing. In most it has nothing to do with American ""right"" which is the typical leftist attempt to make this claim. The American political spectrum is not the same as other countries, that is due to the overall political spectrum not being a line, but more like a grid.",ultimis,e9czbcp,conservative
"Kill my enemies, seize their goods, rule the survivors.",TheComedianGLP,e9de1sn,conservative
[removed],,e9coajj,conservative
Thats cute but an ideology is more than that. For example who are your enemies and why? What does ruling look like and why? ,cucumba_water,e9dhahi,conservative
"Most of those break down when you realize that all the privately owned stuff was because the government let you own it. Not that you have a right to it in the first place, such as what the American right wing believes. In a communist country the business you ran was owned by the government. In a fascist country the government let you run a business that you ""owned"". But in reality do you own something if the government has more of a say than you do?",notagooduname,e9cvgt9,conservative
"Facism isn't an ideology, it's a form of maligant psychosis, and I summed it up perfectly.

Same with Communism, same condition, same definition.",TheComedianGLP,e9di2qg,conservative
"This is incredibly ignorant and obtuse. You may have summed some sentiment but my questions are still relevant. You said kill enemies, seize goods, rule survivors. But defining those enemies and identifying why they are enemies and identifying why killing and seizing their goods is necessary and defining a vision for what ruling the survivors looks like is what comprises an ideology. An ideology is just a system of ideas for political and/or economic policy. ",cucumba_water,e9dikgy,conservative
">This is incredibly ignorant and obtuse.

Screw you twice.

I don't need to play your game. It serves no purpose other than distraction from the real and factual nature of statism.

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e9djzuv,conservative
I’m not playing a game. Facts don’t care about your feelings dude you can be as mad as you want. How am I distracting from anything when this discussion can’t even agree on the definition of the word “ideology”? It is your obtuseness that is stopping us from engaging in meaningful discussion about statism or fascism. ,cucumba_water,e9dkon0,conservative
"Yes, it's my fault you're useless.
Good day.",TheComedianGLP,e9dncel,conservative
I am not useless i Create more wealth nd power in my dick tip than you will wit your entire existence u puny trumptard ,cucumba_water,e9do2v8,conservative
"Aww, I cracked the NPC wide open, and several of its personality yolks are pouring out all over the floor.

Adios Humpty.",TheComedianGLP,e9doktc,conservative
Nothing your sayings makes sense youre grasp of the english language seems tenuous at best. Oh and BTW Humpty is what ur mum called me last night m8 XD omg lol ,cucumba_water,e9doubh,conservative
"Nevermind my last response I actually just want to explore this comment. 

What does it mean to “crack open” an NPC?

And also what is Humpty supposed to mean?",cucumba_water,e9dp3q1,conservative
"Bwahahahahaha!

How many of your classmates are there?",TheComedianGLP,e9dp7id,conservative
What is this even referring to? ,cucumba_water,e9dp98z,conservative
"Thankfully they don't have the Senate (even if they cheat in Florida/Arizona).

Mitch better hold his ground and not even let this see the light of day.",workaccount35,e9dqna5,conservative
"> Democrats say **they will pass** the most aggressive gun-control **legislation** in decades when they become the House majority in January

Was some form of Legislation passed that took away a Presidents Veto power away while I wasn't looking?  Because if that hasn't happened, they won't be passing shit",Jizzlobber42,e9dtovp,conservative
It doesn't have a chance. ,MaddSim,e9dr3gg,conservative
"You can always trust democrats to show you exactly who they are. And, no matter how badly they lose or underperform, they will always assume that they were just not liberal enough.

Stay stupid my comrades.",SilverHerfer,e9e5jjp,conservative
So what are they proposing to ban now? Can’t read the whole article as I don’t have a subscription.,Rabidraccoon76,e9dznpk,conservative
Didn’t you hear? Some Hawaii judge struck down the veto clause last month ,paulbrevik,e9e7ve7,conservative
That poor girl,BrockLee76,e9e5hk3,conservative
How does she still have this job? How???,the-divine-comedy,e9bkzpa,conservative
"Right out in the open, and not only is she not in jail, she still has her job.

We talk about things like 'justice,' and 'the rule of law,' but neither of those things exist, and we all know it. If the other side doesn't like the result of the election, they'll simply change it.",NocturnalPatrol,e9blpyh,conservative
She's undermined our democratic process far more than Russia ever could ,BeachCruisin22,e9c1hep,conservative
Leftists who were flipping about Kemp and his “conflict of interest” are suddenly silent.,gster50,e9bmhch,conservative
We’re descending into a banana republic ,true4blue,e9bt2xy,conservative
"Liberals- ""election fraud never happens""",zeldaisaprude,e9boy9q,conservative
Every time I talk about voter fraud I get downvoted. This shit happens.,noiwontsharemyfries,e9bznan,conservative
Just ask Tim Canova about Snipes. ,nkn_19,e9bs36j,conservative
There’s systemic voter fraud going on in favor of the Democrats but any time you try and look anything up it’s just endless posts about how it’s all a Republican plot to reinstate Jim Crow or some other inane bullshit.,DocMilk,e9ccqib,conservative
How is she not in jail?,luccadeo,e9cbwdp,conservative
This is real voter suppression. Not that other shit they trot out there as such. ,Ruckus45,e9d2hrg,conservative
"“So long, and thanks for all the fish.”",Otto-Carpenter,e9ctaqo,conservative
"Neat. Kinda like Georgia, what goes around comes around, eh? 

Tongue and cheek of course, we should be investigating both cases. Voter tampering is the worst.",Lives_With_His_Mom,e9dyuu4,conservative
"so the Republicans are the Gerrymandering masters, and the Libs are torching ballots?  
Awesome",RobotXander,e9cnnk8,conservative
>Broward,JMB_was_a_god,e9bn4tc,conservative
We no longer have justice because the “investigate media” covers for Democrats. It’s disgusting.,the-divine-comedy,e9bmbvl,conservative
"She is going to steal the election.  However many votes they need they are going to ""find"".  Al Franken redux.",WIlf_Brim,e9c298p,conservative
"Orange County has an all Republican Board of Supervisors but magically has only 2 of 7 congresspeople because of some fantastic work by the states ""independent"" redistricting commission. ",SickofInternetProgs,e9c31pe,conservative
"In r/politics it sounds like they think it's a Republican conspiracy.  Does this woman have a party affiliation?
",tehForce,e9c1979,conservative
Well they shouldn't be. Kinda like the caravan no one is talking about. ,nkn_19,e9bs68i,conservative
Liberals are fraud.,StephenScherer1,e9bx9tc,conservative
"We need to start upvoting people in posts like this *just because*.

These people try to downvote accounts into oblivion. When I first started I had someone following me do just that. I finally got a bit more than 2k, so I’m pretty safe now.",KKN0PP,e9chlzs,conservative
I was just talking to a guy in another thread. There needs to be a serious push to get him to run for SoE. I disagree heavily with his politics but he seems like an honest anti-corruption Democrat... if such a thing exists.,Tau23481992,e9bumif,conservative
Stop using Google and use Duck duck go. It’s *amazing* what I have been able to find info on since I switched. And it just goes to show just how much Google suppresses for the left. ,KKN0PP,e9chizi,conservative
"Let me know when you get an answer.

&#x200B;

Lack of accountability is common in the government, sadly and it's incredibly frustrating when this type of corruption occurs.  


More than likely, they hire people to take the blame/fall and act as scapegoats in return for political favors?",Religion_N_Polyticks,e9cf84w,conservative
"If there’s a D next to it, we’ll vote for it down here. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bohjb,conservative
Cowards.,memberCP,e9c52mu,conservative
"It's funny how while this is happening leftists are up in arms rioting about how ""nobody is above the law"". Apparently they forgot to add ""except Democrats""",VoinaYMir,e9brfnb,conservative
r/politics is a shit show. I’m *sure* they are up in arms over there being a “r” in front of their politics. ,KKN0PP,e9chg15,conservative
"They're saying the Republicans are trying to subvert democracy by not accepting the votes.

It's a parallel universe over there.",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9d82np,conservative
She totally has no connections to Hillary DWS of the DNC. Zero. Trust me. Don't look.,Alex15can,e9ce81i,conservative
I already do.,noiwontsharemyfries,e9e3lvq,conservative
"That's not such a bad idea.  Technically, he non party affiliated 😉",nkn_19,e9dgx5p,conservative
"I’ve been phasing DuckDuckGo into my searching but it is till hard to find evidence sufficient enough to sway middle of the road people, since they still believe that MSM is unbiased.",DocMilk,e9d2ef3,conservative
"But in all seriousness, is there not more to this? Her having a job is the least surprising thing about this, how is destroying ballots not an automatic prison sentence?  
  
Any of you from Florida know?",mp-,e9cicb6,conservative
Too bad the only sites on the whitelist in r/politics are far left liberal blogs and superpac owned sites like thinkprogress and shareblue (and media matters),ExpensiveMention,e9cry6e,conservative
">Under new Justice Department and Department of Homeland Security rules published Thursday, immigrants who illegally cross the U.S. southern border from Mexico would be barred from claiming asylum. All asylum claims must be made at a legal port of entry.

This is a good start, certainly, but it is simply not enough.

We should NOT be entertain the idea that ANY of these people whom are passing though Mexico could possibly qualify for asylum. There are no civil wars or any other kind of wars occurring in Mexico. If said persons are truly fleeing from torture, they must sneak asylum in the first safe country they pass through. Traveling hundreds of miles through a perfectly safe country then throwing themselves at our boarder is not ""asylum seeking"", it is a SHAM to extract ill-gotten gains from our welfare system.",Silicon_Avatar,e9d4vda,conservative
"Good Trump!

It's long been time to stop using ""compassionate"" enforcement of our immigration policies. The very inconsistency of how these laws are applied invites more and more illegal aliens to come here and take their chances at facing little or no consequences for violating our laws.",mastaxn,e9d5nms,conservative
[removed],,e9dgee1,conservative
"> You realize that there are other countries SOUTH of mexico seeking US asylum? Ones that are in high violence areas. They need to PASS through mexico. Most of these ""caravan invaders"" arent even Mexican, Read the article.

Did you even bother to read what I wrote?

Your entire paragraph just restated what I said...

My *entire* point was that this caravan is full of people from south of Mexico.

They are supposedly fleeing violence and require asylum in a safe country. Well they had to travel hundreds of miles through a perfectly safe country to get to our border, and **that** is where they should have requested asylum.

If their fleeing something south of Mexico, they don't need to come here to flee it, they are perfectly safe in Mexico and have no reason to beat down our door other then free handouts.",Silicon_Avatar,e9dgwt7,conservative
"http://archive.fo/LIzYY

Archived link to the article for anyone who wants it.",PrestoPesto1,e9dz8cf,conservative
They want to count the votes of non-citizens. ,Stephanstewart101,e9d5flj,conservative
Isn't that part of the plan?,DBG1998,e9d8gur,conservative
You don't say!,MuchoGustoMeLlamo,e9dmj79,conservative
White people haven’t learned yet that minorities will vote for a candidate based solely on skin color and ethnicity.,teddyrooseveltsfist,e9d9l8j,conservative
"Shhhh!

You weren't supposed to notice until it was too late!",Silicon_Avatar,e9d8sse,conservative
"""Identity politics"" isn't something that can be supported or opposed. It's a political reality: in multiethnic, multiracial democracies, racial groups will band together for their own self-interest.",Silicon_Avatar,e9d9pae,conservative
"Many foreign born minorities, especially south of the border, have been exclusively exposed to socialism their entire lives as it is the predominant system down there.  They vote for what they know.

Also, many vote based on skin color and demographics (which is textbook bigotry).",BeachCruisin22,e9ddmkw,conservative
"you left out the most important part, if they are democrats.  John James only got 8% of the black vote or something like that.",IvankasFutureHusband,e9dvifk,conservative
unfortunate plot twist: It's already too late.,IvankasFutureHusband,e9d95sr,conservative
"Which is fine when every other ethnic group does it, but incredibly racist and unacceptably evil when 'white people' (that amorphous ill-defined portion of the population) decide to vote in their self-interest.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9db7ld,conservative
how long before race wars!?,donjohn1986,e9ebgq0,conservative
[deleted],,e9c3jnj,conservative
Is Broward County literally the most corrupt county around? Inept sheriffs department and now this. ,Zac1245,e9bcm55,conservative
"They just ""found"" a box of ballots at Miramar Elementary School....on Thursday afternoon, 46 hours after polls closed",YankeeBlues21,e9bj2c9,conservative
Are we suing to stop this?,hipsterdufus84,e9b8r9y,conservative
"I don't understand why the law isn't enforced. Like whoever the election officials are in these counties should be arrested. Same for when mayors of cities declare the cities sanctuary cities and refuse to enforce immigration laws.

I don't get to pick and chose the laws I want to follow with impunity, why the hell should people who work in the government?",123hig,e9bely3,conservative
"Those Broward bastards are waiting to see how many votes they need to ""recover"" for Nelson. Fuck this shit.",1wjl1,e9bagja,conservative
"They need to be in court now.  

There is a reason broward county isn't disclosing the number of votes left.  They are figuring out how many they need to get the result they want before they lie.  ",stoffel_bristov,e9bex94,conservative
Where the fuck is Pam Bondi?,ReaganTroll,e9b85hl,conservative
"As long as there's no fuckery going on, let them count the votes. ",Nevaknosbest,e9by5c7,conservative
"The incompetent Supervisor of Elections in Broward County has broken her silence and will make you even more pissed off.  FTR, she has already been under investigation for the handling of past elections.  
[https://www.local10.com/news/elections/broward-county-elections-supervisor-explains-why-its-taking-so-long-to-count-ballots](https://www.local10.com/news/elections/broward-county-elections-supervisor-explains-why-its-taking-so-long-to-count-ballots)",TBSportsFan1254,e9bcgik,conservative
Reminds me of when hundreds of Al Franken ballots were “found” in the back of a trunk in 2008. ,CherryCokeNixon,e9blmzo,conservative
"Hey mods, sticky this.  This cannot be allowed.",StraightNewt,e9bb23h,conservative
"Unbelievable they have refused to state how many they have left. It's been 2 damn days. 

Tells me they either are scrambling because they fucked something up or they are up to something illegal. ",MajesticMulva,e9bjfef,conservative
Corruption at every level.,TBSportsFan1254,e9b8caa,conservative
"Edit Updates 2: @marcorubio: This video,posted by an Independent Cong candidate in 18 (who was endorsed by Bernie Sanders in 16) purports to show BrowardCounty ballots being transported from polling places in private cars. Has anyone in local media looked into this claim or asked elections dept about it?

Updates via twitter:

@marcorubio: This report comes from reporter at South Florida Sun-Sentinel reporting from the #BrowardElections office; ""Ooops! Looks like the 205 provisional ballots that were approved by the Broward elections office and tabulated maybe should have gone to the canvassing board first so they could be challenged by the candidates' reps. Stay tuned.@lbarszweski""

@charlescwcooke: Scott bluntly says that Broward County and Palm Beach County are finding votes ""until they get the results they want."" Calls for the FL Department of Law Enforcement to ""investigate.""

@charlescwcooke: Rick Scott notes that 100,000 votes have been ""found,"" in addition to the numbers publicly released by Broward and Palm Beach, and that nobody can say where they came from or how many remain. He uses the words ""bad faith"" and ""fraud"" to describe Brenda Snipes.",Zyrioun,e9bwuy5,conservative
"Well, its Democratic counties. Rules are different for them. ",molon-labe7,e9b89jv,conservative
[removed],,e9c0yo0,conservative
"If they get away with this, our republic is pretty much done. ",iwasthebeaver,e9b8rjs,conservative
I am legit unironically triggered at this bullshit. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bal6d,conservative
"Just like the Good Old Days when the democrats would find a box of ballots they 'forgot' to count.

All of these late ballots should be tossed out by law. 

",ozric101,e9bbifp,conservative
"Broward County voter here. This is FUCKED up. I just checked my voter status online and it says that my mail absentee ballot was ""tabulated"" so HOPEFULLY I'm good. But still, something is extremely fishy here and I'm really concerned that they are magically going to find the necessary votes to push Gillum and Nelson over the finish line. I really hope Rubio, the campaigns, GOP officials get ON this because they may be trying to pull a fast one. ",itsnammertime,e9bk3on,conservative
Shouldn't every vote count? ,LogicInText,e9brxzn,conservative
"If they can’t reliably win elections anymore, the Dem’s goal is becoming to make them become illegitimate entirely ",YankeeBlues21,e9b90q2,conservative
This literally affects my mother and I directly as we did early voting at FAU in PBC. Ridiculous how no matter what election it is it's always us and Broward at the center of election scandals.,Unforgivenfive,e9bmq1r,conservative
"Well the issue here is not as straightforward to me.  The county is in the wrong - theres no doubt.  The election officials of Broward should be punished.

But should the votes not count?  If the people voted ahead of time, the simple fact the election officials messed up is NOT on the voter, and that persons voice should NOT be taken away.  As long as they can show the vote itself was on time I dont see how these votes can stop.",PTLove,e9bidnq,conservative
"And this is why I always vote in person on the day and recommend that others do too. Lots more eyes on the process on election day at my polling place with a certified chain of custody.

Early voting sounds like a good idea, but lots of opportunity for things to go bad when there are less watchful eyes.",doomrabbit,e9bfn3g,conservative
"I was going to make a comment about law enforcement and Broward county, but I won't.",justhere2havefun,e9bavt8,conservative
"Hey, I'm from Broward. Be happy they haven't burned any buildings down in protest, though there honestly might be drugs involved. No seriously.",Neckbeardascended26,e9bp1ik,conservative
If there's any justice their authority to count votes should be rescinded. Send in the FBI and send the votes to be counted some place else.,dontshootthattank,e9c54lx,conservative
What is being done about it? This is a literal example of a threat to democracy... Which I have been told for 2 years is the worst thing ever ,BeachCruisin22,e9blk8r,conservative
Literally rigging ,TrumpwonHilDawgLost,e9bqbeh,conservative
[removed],,e9btxk9,conservative
It's almost like they had more early voting and vote by mail ballots than expected or something. ,mdconnors,e9bzj9t,conservative
"They just stole the election in Arizona too. But no, it's Russia we should be worried about. 

We need to make it clear that you can't steal elections. McSally and Scott should simply report to work when the senate starts up, regardless of how many votes the Democrats are able to manufacture. Just ignore Sinema and Nelson. If a court tries to rule otherwise, ignore the ruling. Don't let another Al Franken happen.",Glsbnewt,e9by7ih,conservative
The Dems are up to the same fraud in Arizona now as well.,ecfreeman,e9bg6pe,conservative
No irregularities to see here. Move along.,Lepew1,e9bbmok,conservative
Something so strange going on. Seeing a bunch of my liberal friends post a pic of Gillum with him urging his supporters to call the election officials and tell them they want their vote counted. Is he telling them to vote after the election? This is so bizarre and if we can’t protect the dignity of our elections what is left.,the-divine-comedy,e9bd8xb,conservative
No surprise the place is a Democratic stronghold. It takes longer than the law allows when they must additionally count the votes of all those dead people.,StephenScherer1,e9bn4cu,conservative
cheating to get elected? Say it ain’t so lol,EnditAll4me,e9bp5wz,conservative
"So they're trying to figure out how to pool in extra democrat votes to sway the election numbers, and deliberately breaking state law to do it. Why is this not surprising? ",xJownage,e9c26r0,conservative
"Of course the left is just screaming ""every vote should count!"" They leave off the ""even the ones we made up"" part.",metalhead1974,e9cx71x,conservative
"I was wondering what the Acosta smoke screen was trying to distract from...

VOTER FRAUD",wynhdo,e9bn5au,conservative
They know there is no law,indrid_colder,e9bhjbw,conservative
They don’t know how many they have until they know how many they need.,HiGloss,e9boqyx,conservative
"I honestly thought, real life-ending political violence was going to wait at least few years. But alas if this blatant fraud is allowed to stand then I fear someone is going to lose their cool and do something rash. Hell, even if it’s stopped it could happen anyway.",,e9c49ae,conservative
It's ok! 100000 democratic votes from a city of 1000 citizens will totally change the elections in democrats favor!,Electroyote,e9bitzs,conservative
"GOP needs to [investigate the dems voter fraud](http://archive.is/bf50f).

It's obvious that dems are trying to steal Florida.",LastationNeoCon,e9bpv5f,conservative
"It’s BS that they’re still counting after 43 hours. Though I’m not inclined to call corruption just yet bc even though the law requires all votes to be counted 30 min after polls close, there’s a recount happening so that changes things if I’m understanding the law correctly.",PoliticPetes,e9bi6be,conservative
"Sticky this bs, this is crazy",Tantalus4200,e9bzrji,conservative
"It's not rocket science to make the connection why they don't give a total count immediately after the election. 

They want to know how many added votes they need to fib the democrats into office",Moonthrower,e9bvrsw,conservative
Dirtycrats.,Mr_Hyde_,e9bp46c,conservative
[deleted],,e9boc8d,conservative
[deleted],,e9bcvly,conservative
The Left always eventually win,aJVRa,e9br1tp,conservative
[deleted],,e9cwfyd,conservative
The irony is that millions of provisional ballots were and are still uncounted from the Democratic primaries and now all of a sudden #ProvisionalBallotsMatter.,37reasons,e9caluq,conservative
"Georgia aside, nobody has to fight to vote here. It’s easy all over the place, and it is the VOTER’S responsibility to ensure registration. It is the voters responsibility to ensure he has completed the basic steps required to cast a verifiably legal vote.

",TrumpsTwitterIntern,e9cazk8,conservative
"One time I was leaving on a cruise out of one of the ports in Broward and the sheriffs patrol boat ran into the cruise ship, knocking out an officer and forcing our boat to leave four hours late.

Literally the only experience I’ve ever had in Florida and it did not leave a good impression.",redfern962,e9c5ezw,conservative
"A friend of mine was running as a berniecrat progressive against Mark Bogen, the county vice mayor for Broward county commissioner. In addition to having to deal with his car getting towed regularly by Bogen's friends, a mysterious ""write in party"" candidate appears just before the primary, which made it a closed primary. My friend Ryan had been building a coalition outside the party and needless to say was destroyed when it became dem only. To nobody's surprise, the new challenger did nothing, and when Ryan initiated legal action was represented by his Lawyer... Mark Bogen. So yea, Broward is fucked up.",piper06w,e9btka4,conservative
"> Is Broward County literally the most corrupt county around

No, I think Cook County wins that contest.  Broward is a strong contender for \#2 however.",Colonize_The_Moon,e9blpfu,conservative
"Read through this tweet thread of Rubio's below about Broward. 
 The county is terribly run.  

https://twitter.com/marcorubio/status/1060596888372699136

Rubio has been putting all sorts of stuff out on Twitter about this too.   It's really worth a read through it.

https://twitter.com/marcorubio

",Roez,e9bpkf1,conservative
"Our SoE has ALWAYS been a corrupt Dem cesspool. And we never run anyone against Brenda Snipes either. Had to write my cat’s name in last time. 

In the primaries this year, they “found” a van full of 9,000 “absentee ballots”",YankeeBlues21,e9bd3im,conservative
"Out of the big ones, probably.",ReaganTroll,e9bcu83,conservative
Truly a toss up with Dade depending on the decade.,Cronus6,e9bndj3,conservative
So many graveyards so many new Demoncratic voters.,StephenScherer1,e9bn8yz,conservative
"This reeks.  I don't understand how a county can't say, ""we took X number of votes, we only have Y, where's X-Y gone to?""

I thought basic practices like that were mandatory?  How do these states even conduct an audit if they don't have basic information.  ",Roez,e9bpxn9,conservative
They just found a box Milwaukee too lol,VincibeLemur03,e9c4s2q,conservative
"I know you all hate this, but public record. Let anybody run throught the votes and verify they aren't illegals or dead.",Philletto,e9bqg1g,conservative
46 days and the cole ran out!,Marmar1117,e9bwj4t,conservative
"Per the letter of the law, anything they didn't report on time is null and void.",happybirthdaydude,e9bbttg,conservative
"Two days after the election, we still don't know how many people voted in Broward.  This is insane.  Regardless of the count, the number of people who came in to vote or mailed a ballot should be obvious to anybody in charge.

If the GOP cannot stop this, we are screwed.  The Democrats can steal any election they want in direct contravention of the law.",nited_states,e9bhfqg,conservative
"Who's going to enforce it, the Broward County Sheriff's office?  They don't exactly have a stellar record...",alienvalentine,e9c0rvh,conservative
"I understand your point, but this would be impossible to carry out in reality. Governments—like people and entities injured by tortfeasors—have limited time, limited money, and limited legal personnel. Litigation (while a valuable tool) is chancy and sometimes very lengthy. They have to pick and choose what’s worth expending those resources on. 

I don’t know anything about Florida law on this, but there are also constitutional and statutory limits on (1) who can sue (2) whom for (3) what kind of relief that might make it impossible to enforce the law.

And many *many* questionable (or even obviously illegal) actions by governments and non-governments alike go on forever because they are never challenged.

I’m not from Florida and have no idea whether this situation should be a priority. But to answer your “I can’t pick and choose what laws to follow; why can they?” question, the answer is because no one is stopping them—and that is because the process to do so takes a lot of effort. (And honestly you probably *do* pick and choose what laws to follow because of this reality too: you may occasionally roll a stop sign, or go slightly above the speed limit, or share Netflix account, or maintain a Facebook account not in your legal name, or pirate songs, or post a yard sign without your landlord’s permission, or any number of everyday activities that are or might be illegal. I’m not saying those actions are culpable in the way voter fraud would be, just that everyone makes a calculus.)",SuurAlaOrolo,e9borq0,conservative
Sanctuary cities is why sessions is out,collectijism,e9br17w,conservative
Exactly what is going on.  If they admit how many are left to be counted they can't come up with a given number.  We need to do the same shit in the panhandle.,WIlf_Brim,e9bdmjn,conservative
Coward County,DeadHeadLibertarian,e9baq23,conservative
This. And hide or destroy unwanted red votes. ,socrates40000,e9bgvki,conservative
Hmm. She got in trouble for destroying the ballots too fast... Nothing fishy about that...,strallweat,e9bcrgj,conservative
How in the actual fuck is she still employed for this?,MigzMando,e9bhj8k,conservative
"Yup, and that's how he got elected.  It was 800 votes difference or something.  ",Roez,e9bqc2k,conservative
"Or the 2000 election where each time they recounted democrats ""found"" more Al Gore votes.",ultimis,e9brbep,conservative
"Ballots for me, Al Franken.",TheComedianGLP,e9c4qd9,conservative
Agree this needs to be stickied ,SanduskyTicklers,e9c0qut,conservative
In both parties.,KrazyKukumber,e9bs94y,conservative
We need laws to keep Republicans from cheating! Otherwise our cheating would be less effective!,burtmaklin1,e9b96wz,conservative
"Just to be clear, you're saying that both parties are corrupt and guilty of shady tactics like this, righ?
",KrazyKukumber,e9bsjdz,conservative
"It would be one thing if this happened once or twice. But it has happened in many states and the ""found"" votes are *always* for the dems, and it's always for *just* enough votes after they know how much they're down by.

It's not a case of legitimate votes not being counted. It's election fraud, and it has been a tactic that the dems have been using for years and years because the GOP has never pushed back.",jtljtljtljtl,e9cb4oi,conservative
"Already did in New Mexico where it was called then hours later oops found some more.

And then this in SC

https://mobile.twitter.com/TheLastRefuge2/status/1060405898538033152",Enzo_SAWFT,e9baae5,conservative
You think our republic is done if voters don't have their ballot invalidated because someone is slow at counting? Or is there some other scheme going on here?,BaronVonFunke,e9bca97,conservative
Gotta be carefull though: They could be withheld red votes. Throwing them out may well be what they were hoping for.,SaiHottari,e9bmmrx,conservative
"The legit ones. That's not the issue.  The issue is how do we know what ones are legit or not when they aren't even saying how many were taken in by the close of the election?  

If this county didn't have such a terrible track record, including destroying ballots early, it might not be as much of a concern.  ",Roez,e9btknr,conservative
"Just wait until they lose enough elections to declare voting itself to be ""racist"".",justhere2havefun,e9basz9,conservative
That’s the problem is how do you validate that the votes weren’t created after the fact? You would have to have independent investigators go to every single person whose vote was counted in that fashion and verify their vote. Anything less is unacceptable and worse than throwing away the votes. The county officials should be removed from office as their ineptitude disenfranchised their voters. The law is the law and frankly if the rule of law is not followed then this state is lost. ,Tau23481992,e9bl6t4,conservative
"It seems to me that if you are going to vote early or by mail, your ballot should be sitting in some official facility on election day.  The total number of ballots in that facility should be known.

We are now two days removed from election day and nobody can even say how many ballots exist in Broward County.  How do you not know this?  Forget the actual count—all we want to know (as the law requires) is how many people voted.  This should be recorded.

This is either extreme incompetence or malice.  Either one threatens the integrity of the democratic system.",nited_states,e9blq75,conservative
"Don’t come here as a leftist concern troll and pretend it’s something else. We’re not stupid. You know damn well what’s being talked about here — it’s got nothing to do with ‘making your voice count’ and *everything* to do with fraud. 

Edit:

Do you people really think we care about your brigading? Coming in here like children to downvote things you don’t like is a genius move — really. Sure fills me with empathy for your phony fuckin’ causes. ",CabinDownBelow,e9bk6wg,conservative
Funny... it's elected Democrats in democrat counties that always fuck up.,Moonthrower,e9bvnyf,conservative
Yeah how come this is only happening on Democratic counties in red states? Really makes you think 🤔,RepubliKin,e9c0kiz,conservative
That’s for if they did a mail ballot and it had an error of some kind that had got it thrown out. I am not sure of the process for fixing them though and what sort of protections there are for ensuring nothing illegal occurs. It needed to be “cured” by 5pm today or else it’s definitively voided. ,Tau23481992,e9bkvzt,conservative
"Lol, that's ridiculous. Have you seen the full video? If anyone is trying to smoke screen anything it's sarah huckabees doctored video",BrumDawgMillionare,e9brnbj,conservative
Acosta smokescreen? Maybe if the right didn't keep saying he attacked her there wouldn't be one.,explosiveteddy,e9bqxjo,conservative
And Arizona ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bvzdz,conservative
Yeah but the ballots that they are currently filling out to add to the pile will count in a recount too.,r777m,e9brx30,conservative
"This post came up under all, I'm not a conservative. If the law is 30 minutes, it should be followed. If they have a problem with the law, they should suggest changes be implemented. It sounds more like gross incompetency rather than something malicious. It is a hardcore blue county, so it isn't like a heavy democratic vote isn't expected. And if there IS something malicious going on, it should be investigated.",NotNyuda,e9c165i,conservative
"It opens up room for fraud.  By not following the steps and providing a proper accounting, no one can later say, ""you had so many at election close, why did that number go up?""

It's worth noting this county is terrible at running elections, which means there's not much confidence people on their own inside the office aren't playing shenanigans.  

Everyone wants and is entitled to transparency.  ",Roez,e9btzn5,conservative
"Florida went Republican in Senate and Governor(a big and unexpected loss for the Dems), if they get what they want they might change that and totally change Florida's coarse for the next 2 years.",ardubeaglepi8266,e9br9h4,conservative
"They haven't even reported how many ballots they received and how many they need to count. If we can't even verify if they are telling the truth of how many votes they got, what makes you think we can trust what votes they have that are going to where?",HighLatencyRaptor,e9bf1dv,conservative
You at least say there’s a pile of 500 votes here that we will count. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9be8vq,conservative
"> So if the government is too slow at its job, your vote gets thrown in the trash?

Think of it like a statue of limitations.  It's a safeguard.  You can't just ""find"" thousands of ballots days after the election, otherwise we'd just start seeing that tactic used in every county eventually.",Telineye,e9bjujq,conservative
How do you not see a cruise ship in front of you lol. ,Zac1245,e9c5hel,conservative
Progressive or not that shit shouldn’t be happening to anyone. People should be able to compete and win fair and square. ,Zac1245,e9bu1ma,conservative
Fair.,Nonethewiserer,e9bxcgo,conservative
"They ""left behind"" a whole tub of ballots. WTF",Zac1245,e9byx1b,conservative
He’s making the Lindsey Graham Republican super saiyan evolution over this,YankeeBlues21,e9bqmuz,conservative
Please tell me the van was down by the river... ,AeonTek,e9bjajw,conservative
"They found a van, you have to be kidding me. ",Zac1245,e9bdj8e,conservative
"You can't even make this shit up, they don't even hide it",LastationNeoCon,e9bpt2e,conservative
Did they say it was Cesar Sayoks van?,srThoits,e9bzl6i,conservative
"That's just the tip of the iceberg.  The bigger issue is that there is absolutely chain of custody with any of these ballots that are being discovered God only knows where, and we don't know the total number of outstanding ballots to make sure there is no fraud.               ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bx8zx,conservative
They are going to scream voter suppression and the corrupt media will follow along.,the-divine-comedy,e9bbx3h,conservative
But are we going to sue over it?,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bc6pv,conservative
Source please?,BirchSquid789,e9cav99,conservative
There's no way that will happen. Time to grow a pair and tell Dems to play by the rules or face the consequences.,PigsAndCats,e9bk78d,conservative
Not trying to disagree only trying to educate myself - - do you have a source to this law?,KingGrowl,e9bwft3,conservative
"> Regardless of the count, the number of people who came in to vote or mailed a ballot should be obvious to anybody in charge.

This exactly.  This is the problem.  ",Roez,e9bq0h6,conservative
"Same in Georgia. The Democrats won't concede because there is still absentee ballots to count. Well, there's about 25k absentee ballots to be counted and even if every single one went blue there still wouldn't be enough votes to push Kemp below 50%. It's BS and the media isn't calling them out on it. ",haplogreenleaf,e9blpaw,conservative
"Yup, and you can only do a recount 30 minutes after it ends, not 2 days. They can't get away with this. ",mw3noobbuster,e9bm84z,conservative
"This is about election integrity. Without it our system of government is meaningless. It should be absolute top priority to enforce election laws, and bring those who break those laws to justice.",_Hospitaller_,e9brguc,conservative
"There are allegedly now fewer reported votes for Senate than for Agriculture Secretary in Broward. Also, 4% of Broward ballots voted for Governor but didn't vote for Senate (over 25k). No other county had more than a 1% discrepancy....

B U L L S H I T",YankeeBlues21,e9bjzh0,conservative
Corrupt Dems keep electing her. She’s of the same stock as Debbie Wasserman-Shultz. Andrew Gillum is equally corruptible so of course they’re going to do this to get him in as Governor.,Tau23481992,e9bjubt,conservative
cuz Democrats.,TheComedianGLP,e9c4xh3,conservative
"Are you just here to say “Nuh uhhhhh, you toooooo.”?",OstentatiousSock,e9bv7cy,conservative
"It's not cheating. Stop using that word. It's ""resisting"", not cheating. ",molon-labe7,e9b9z4i,conservative
"Lol, no, it's the democrats that are engaging in election fraud. Name an instance in recent history where the GOP has been found to be tampering with votes or an election? Go ahead, I'll wait.",Clint_East_Of_Eden,e9d5c2l,conservative
"No, because it’s consistently democratic strongholds that this happens in.",Masterjason13,e9cf4vx,conservative
"Starting to think we need a do over election, with strict rules and poll watchers in place. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9c7bu4,conservative
And in Wisconsin,samiam0295,e9byn35,conservative
">Or is there some other scheme going on here?

It's certainly fishy in that the Panhandle counties that got shellacked by the hurricane managed to count all of their ballots (including mail and early voting ballots which are at issue in Broward) when their infrastructure was completely destroyed.  I don't know if you are a Floridian or not, but Broward county has a history of cocking up elections (including the 2000) election.  ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bcn9w,conservative
"they are ""finding"" ballots and the Election Officials won't say how many more ballots they have left to ""find"". And they are coming in at like 100% democrat. Its absurd and its actually against Florida Law, not like the law means anything anymore. ",iwasthebeaver,e9bd6lb,conservative
"Yeah, I don’t think you understand the process well lol. Just scurry back to r/politics",pro_nosepicker,e9bjf3s,conservative
"All real votes should count, Democrat or Republican.

The issue is these votes seem incredibly suspicious.  Not only has the chain of custody been broken, but they've just been laying around for two days in a box.

They should either be ignored, or a new vote needs to take place with an impartial body overseeing it.",Telineye,e9c7hbl,conservative
Except this just happened to be the bluest county in FL... 🤷🏻‍♂️,why-this,e9btv4l,conservative
"Wrong....and the person who broke the Florida Election laws needs to be prosecuted. 

It does not matter if you win by 1 inch or 1 mile a win is a win.",ozric101,e9bn3t0,conservative
Not in Broward,OneMe2RuleUAll,e9byhs6,conservative
">The legit ones. That's not the issue.  The issue is how do we know what ones are legit or not when they aren't even saying how many were taken in by the close of the election?  

Now this is where we agree. I think they should say how many they have. The only disagreement that im making is how long they should have to count them. 



>If this county didn't have such a terrible track record, including destroying ballots before they could be verified, it might not be as much of a concern.  

This is also where I can understand the concern. I don't think they should be allowed to destroy the ballots but I also think they should be allowed to count them all even if it goes beyond the 30 minute time frame. ",LogicInText,e9bugbv,conservative
I am surprised 4chan hasn't tried this angle yet,soxfan90,e9bhox3,conservative
"Usually with data validation, you don't do every single one.  You pick a random 10% or something and verify those. Unless you find a problem, then you do more.",mermaidKT,e9c3y3e,conservative
"So your solution is to outright throw out potentially valid votes?  I don’t consider that a option, it’s the most fundamental principle of our republic. 

Paper trails exist. I’m sure you can quantify a ballot was mailed to X person by a barcode of some sort. ",PTLove,e9blkmc,conservative
"It’s a little hard for me to argue against this. Depends on what the postmark date required is in Florida. From what I can tell they must be received by 7pm on Election Day. Absentee is just must be postmarked by Election Day and received up to 3 days later. 

I still find incompetence (a very basic human trait) far more compelling then a nefarious theme to cheat. ",PTLove,e9bm70i,conservative
"I don’t hide my leanings. I still don’t see how what you said is relevant. 

There are lawyers from both sides present. The legislature in the state is GOP controlled, and Scott does not lack for resources personally. You can believe incompetence, which is the most straightforward answer, or something nefarious, that magically flies past all those lawyers and money. You’ll excuse me if I don’t find the cheating argument more compelling. ",PTLove,e9blghb,conservative
[removed],,e9c28n3,conservative
"I saw the video and it clearly shows him pushing her arm away and keeping her from getting the mic away from him.   He should have gotten his credentials pulled a long time ago.   

He got what he wanted, so he can scream about the 1st amendment which is what is really rediculous.   If you disagree you're not paying attention. ",wynhdo,e9bushy,conservative
"Itd be nice, too, if the Left actually acknowledged their own bullshit. Unlikely that happens anytime soon, though. ",Ledcookey,e9c8tb9,conservative
That along with alot of the other states that dems won in Red America.,LastationNeoCon,e9bwi33,conservative
[deleted],,e9bf9as,conservative
[deleted],,e9bkf2d,conservative
"I fear it will do no good, but he's right.  This can't be allowed to happen over and over.  Especially when there's cause for concern about the validity.

No clue what the law is there, but perhaps a Federal Judge would have the authority to step in and mandate how it has to be run, and appoint an independent law firm (law judge or whatever) to supervise the judge's mandates were put in place. ",Roez,e9brvm6,conservative
"Was it down by the river? 


Edit: /u/aeontek beat me to the joke. Fuck.",LogicInText,e9buqqd,conservative
"I mean, I would be pissed if my vote wasn't counted because the polling place didn't get their shit together",Horse_Ebooks_47,e9bzg4b,conservative
They already are in /news. Ignoring the fact it's the law. ,valmeister,e9blj8a,conservative
"Let them.  At this point it should be clear and obvious that no amount of appeasing the screeching left will ever be enough for them, so fuck 'em.  If they missed the cutoff then that's a problem they should make sure to solve for *next* election.",anuser999,e9c568h,conservative
And the rest of us know it's falsified votes... Again,nBob20,e9boef3,conservative
"There are Republican Party of Florida lawyers heading to (already at?) the Broward SoE Office. A recount is scheduled for Saturday with RPOF staff in attendance, but, according to Tim Canova (the Dem who ran against DWS in the 2016 primary, as an NPA this time, and sued the county SoE last election) the chain of custody of ballots has been broken and there won’t be a way to confirm that the same amount (plus or minus) are involved in the recount. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bd00s,conservative
"Problem is, it's the government.",ryph,e9bsmzt,conservative
"Shouldn't it be top priority to ensure that every vote counts?  If you don't count one of those votes, then you can't really say it was a fair election if one rights are trampled on.",LogicInText,e9bs4wy,conservative
When you are cranking out hundreds of fake ballots it's so easy to forget one place or two.,WIlf_Brim,e9c3job,conservative
"Also we never run a Republican against her. Granted, they wouldn’t win since Broward is so blue. 

My pet project is going to be trying to talk Tim Canova into running as an NPA if he knows he’d have the GOP and his own Bernie wing behind him. He *hates* the SoE and DWS down here and is a stickler for election transparency. I don’t care about the SoE’s opinion on taxes, I care that they count the votes. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bm1la,conservative
"""Electing"" .... sure...",Player_17,e9bp8zj,conservative
Democracy has failed us!,Philletto,e9bqm7g,conservative
"Provide a fingerprint ID, which is extremely difficult to fake. Wouldn't be the worst idea. ",psstein,e9cd5sq,conservative
"It’s also shady that every other major city NYC, Chicago, LA, Houston all can count in a timely manner. Then there’s the Miami area.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9bdue7,conservative
"Reading up, Broward does seem to have a pretty shady past with elections. Some investigations need to happen if they happen to destroy the ballots before the smoke clears. Although at this point the process of electing representative has been so debased that it feels odd to fixate on this one example without also being extremely disturbed by pretty much every other part of the process as well. ",BaronVonFunke,e9bdeci,conservative
"I'm always happy to improve my knowledge and change my mind, what do you believe I'm missing?",BaronVonFunke,e9bjjfy,conservative
"If the SoE doesn’t follow the law yes. This sham can not be allowed to stand. Only two counties in the entire state have failed to report their numbers, Broward and Palm Beach. If Miami-Dade can do it on time so can Broward. There is no excuse and any disenfranchisement falls on the hands of the Broward/PB SoEs the prior of which was already in legal trouble for illegally destroying primary ballots prematurely in 2016 when those ballots were being challenged in court. Snipes is as corrupt as they come and this will go to the SCOTUS if it comes to it. ",Tau23481992,e9bmnqz,conservative
"I think the phrase is"" never attribute to malice which can easily be explained by incompetence""",Zetesofos,e9bniba,conservative
"When it happens consistently in the same way on a regular basis, and always to the benefit of one side over the other, incompetence stops being a plausible explanation.",GameShowWerewolf,e9bno4i,conservative
"I’m not even talking about Rick Scott — and his “resources” don’t have a goddamn thing to do with it either way. This is the fucking playbook for Dems in S. Florida, has been for decades, and inferring that it’s some kind of conspiracy theory to minimize the goddamn obvious is disgusting. Don’t concede — obfuscate, go to the streets, look for optics-changing opportunities, find some “votes” in a van. By any means necessary. That shit ain’t a conspiracy. 

I won’t excuse you. You are not needed here. This is the *one* fucking place on this godforsaken site that actual conservative adults can have a conversation without the cancer of blind leftism or the absurdity of memes and pedes and blah blah blah, and you can’t just leave well enough alone. All due respect — blow me where the pampers is. 

",CabinDownBelow,e9bme6l,conservative
"Miami-Dade was fine, Leon County (Tallahassee) was fine, every other county red or blue besides this was fine except  Palm Beach and the one repped by DWS, who infamously rigged the primaries, and had legal restrictions placed on it because of fears of election security. Nope, not buying it",RepubliKin,e9c34c6,conservative
If you have x number of envelopes from mail in ballots you can count those up without opening and tallying the contents inside. If you have y number of early voting you can easily count those in a reasonable time.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bfgjx,conservative
"They are able to report how many ballots they have received, counting them refers to counting which ballot goes to which candidate. They haven't even reported how many they received, so we have no idea if anything regarding the vote total there is truthful.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9bfo3b,conservative
"When you show up to vote, your name is recorded as a voter (so that you cannot vote twice, for instance).  Figuring out how many votes we're cast is as simple as tallying up the voter roll.

We don't know how anybody votes, but we do know *who* votes.  Or, at least, virtually every county in America does.  Except Broward.",nited_states,e9bhzy4,conservative
"Hilariously, the same woman at the head of this debacle destroyed ballots in 2016.",Telineye,e9bmpcm,conservative
Either way lol I don’t know how you fucking lose a van ,Zac1245,e9byjdk,conservative
"They have their shit together though. Thats the problem. They were waiting to see how many tubs of ballots they had to ""find"" ",iwasthebeaver,e9c2wz3,conservative
> REEEEEEEEEE ITS TOTALLY NORMAL TO FIND SEVERAL BOXES FULL OF DEMOCRATIC VOTERS BALLOTS.,Penguin_Party12345,e9bzemw,conservative
Can you link me the thread?,General_Queipo,e9c02g5,conservative
This is a huge problem.  If you can't confirm a break in chain of custody it is hard to throw them out.,TBSportsFan1254,e9bhi6q,conservative
So are we suing? We need to sue over this shit. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9bd4ot,conservative
Do you have a good suggestion or two where I can follow this from the local level?  Is there a group putting out updates?,Roez,e9bs04c,conservative
That's terrible.  What's worse is people pretend there's no problem with it because it's their side.  ,Roez,e9bq3jr,conservative
"Accepting late votes AFTER the total tallies of the election are decided is a guaranteed way to get fraud.

Further, if you accept votes that weren’t properly handled and had the huge possibility of being tampered with, you risk invalidation of far more votes than otherwise. Election procedures and laws exist for a reason.",_Hospitaller_,e9bsju7,conservative
"Dumping random piss into a urine test invalidates the test.

Why are you being thick about this?",TheComedianGLP,e9c3og8,conservative
"That’s a great idea. A good friend of mine took a law school class he taught and loved him, she’s likeminded to us too. ",Tau23481992,e9bmygo,conservative
"The irony might be, from what I am reading, is by no one running against some of these D's it might explain why Broward has less votes for Senator than Governor by about 3.5% (much lower than the rest of the state).  

The theory being the box for Senate was on the same side where the R candidate would be, but on the very bottom.  Since that side is empty, they think a lot of people missed it.  It was a new ballot design (in a county run by all Democrats).  Apparently, this problem came up in a couple wards in particular and they are tracing the lower Senate votes to those specifically (but I haven't seen confirmation this is true). ",Roez,e9bsox7,conservative
"I might be retarded, damnit ",Tau23481992,e9bq4lh,conservative
"Fortunately we are not a democracy.

We are a Constitutional republic.",TheComedianGLP,e9c4ukn,conservative
"Those cities listed have tons of polling locations, so it's pretty easy to count millions of votes in a relatively short time. ",LogicInText,e9bs9i1,conservative
[removed],,e9c3f0o,conservative
[deleted],,e9bg1ei,conservative
[deleted],,e9bfvjo,conservative
Apparently you need to park it by a river. ,LogicInText,e9bz1wk,conservative
I actually has the wrong story. They are going mad about the main in votes thing. ,valmeister,e9c058w,conservative
He posted a video of ballots being unloaded from unmarked civilian cars and driven away on election night. [Bizarre](https://twitter.com/Tim_Canova/status/1060575611868114944). ,YankeeBlues21,e9bit3m,conservative
I don't understand your logic here. If you have evidence in a criminal trial and the chain of custody gets broken it's thrown out. If you have ballots and chain of custody has been broken they're hard to throw out?,aCreditGuru,e9bncyn,conservative
"I don't know how you can count them.  If so I just found 75,000 ballots in the panhandle.",gbimmer,e9c7fsg,conservative
"Have to imagine once they file whatever specific grounds to sue, they will. 

This has already overturned the Sec of Agriculture result in favor of the Dems (worth noting that our Agr Sec has purview over the distribution of gun licenses...) ",YankeeBlues21,e9bd96b,conservative
"I’ve been getting them from other Republican political insiders, activists, and officials on the ground down here so I don’t know any specific sites to follow from. If I hear anything huge, I’ll be posting about it. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bs4c4,conservative
">If you accept votes that weren’t properly handled and had the huge possibility of being tampered with, you risk invalidation of far more votes than otherwise. 

Until it can be determined that a vote is being tampered with, all that is happening is a simple count. Should they not count every valid vote? 

>Election procedures and laws exist for a reason.

Yes, and that's too determine if a vote was mishandled and not to ensure that valid votes don't get counted because of arbitrary reasoning.",LogicInText,e9btajl,conservative
That's really not an accurate analogy but ok.,LogicInText,e9c4glw,conservative
"He’s absolutely a nice guy. His economics are out there, but he’s an honest person who could help clean up Snipes’ cesspool. 

I just finished being a staffer on a winning local campaign and have some prominence in local GOP circles so maybe the political visibility can get me in the door to talk to the guy about it. ",YankeeBlues21,e9bnbjh,conservative
"Yeah that’s being tossed around as an explanation. Still weird that over 25,500 voters apparently missed the senate box and didn’t think it was weird that one of the 2 big ticket races wasn’t on their ballot. 

I fielded calls on my campaign’s google voice (not MY campaign, but the one I worked on) all day Tuesday from people out of district asking about our candidate not being on their ballot. So voters had SOME idea who’d be on the ballot. ",YankeeBlues21,e9btnr0,conservative
So greater Miami does not? Bowerd county and Palm Beach are not in the middle of the Everglades. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9bsnsa,conservative
"I think she had it regardless, Clinton dominated the minority vote and that’s a huge part of the Dem primary electorate. That doesn’t mean they didn’t fuck Bernie over in every conceivable way imaginable. You can rig something you would win anyway. ",RepubliKin,e9c4d2m,conservative
No it makes sense to count the envelopes you receive as you receive them as there is a legal deadline to state your amount of absentee ballots. Worry about the contents later. The law exists so nothing shady can occur and I would rather absentee voters be disenfranchised because their SoE couldn’t follow the law than millions of Floridians be disenfranchised because we allowed an election to be rigged using faked absentee ballots. ,Tau23481992,e9bm2zk,conservative
">That would be a reduplication of work, though.

It isn't about convinience, it is about supressing fraud and doing things correctly.  That is why tons of money goes into getting elections correctly.  I would be way less cynical about this if it weren't Broward County which can't go 5 years without fucking something major up.

Edit: supposedly some truck was found with thousands of ballots in it.  You reduplicate the work to prevent situations like that from happening because who is to say whether those ballots were legitimate or not, originally? ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bhrow,conservative
"The reason why is to verify that the amount of votes given to either candidate matches the votes received. Its to make sure I can't just show up with 9,000 ballots in a van (which actually did happen, by the way, but not by me) and pass them off as legitimate votes, because first off they were given illegally, second off they are given past the deadline. Since they haven't even reported how many the received when the polls closed, we again cannot verify.

The reduplication of work is purely to make sure it is legitimate.",HighLatencyRaptor,e9bg27d,conservative
"Reduplicating = double checking, a good thing.  And it’s very easy to get a count of votes before determining officially who the ballot goes for.  

Every other county except the two dem strongholds get this right and done in time.  Please explain why they can’t.  ",pro_nosepicker,e9bjwk3,conservative
"No, we will get blamed for the EPA violation ",Drunkenly_Responding,e9c4vex,conservative
"Faked by the same people who faked that video of Acosta.

/s",TheComedianGLP,e9c3dc1,conservative
"You have to prove it was broken, can't assume. ",memberCP,e9bw5v7,conservative
"Better to count a *potentially illegal* vote than throw out a legitimate one accidentally.

Innocent until proven guilty",duckduckgoit,e9bnt9d,conservative
How are firearms related to agriculture lol,AyyyGreens,e9bheto,conservative
[removed],,e9btczr,conservative
">So greater Miami does not? Bowerd county and Palm Beach are not in the middle of the Everglades. 

Never said they were. Just said that the cities you listed most likely had far more polling places. ",LogicInText,e9bt1ng,conservative
This. Answer isn’t that hard. ,phi11ip,e9bsoxf,conservative
"That's proving a negative, a logical fallacy.

This can't be correct.

Proving chain of custody is a positive assertion.",TheComedianGLP,e9c3h5a,conservative
"That's essentially what I was getting at, but I don't do election law for a living, either. ",TBSportsFan1254,e9bobk5,conservative
"No idea, just the way it is down here",YankeeBlues21,e9bjpgj,conservative
Don't know - perhaps it's related to hunting.,Dial-1-For-Spanglish,e9birct,conservative
"I asked exactly this when I went to get my CCW. But after my run-ins with local law enforcement, I'm kind of sketched out by the idea of Florida LE being given more control over that aspect of my life.",richardguy,e9bnuyx,conservative
"Department of Fish & Wildlife or Fish & Game might be under Agriculture. Past legislators might have tucked guns in with hunting/fishing licenses.

Maybe? 

If the GOP controls the legislative and executive branches they could change that now.",sanjoseboardgamer,e9btktv,conservative
How do you defend your farm?,duckduckgoit,e9bnw1n,conservative
[removed],,e9bu9c0,conservative
"Let me rephrase, you would have to cast reasonable doubt upon the chain of custody. I am not a lawyer so I am not sure what the legal standard is so could be wrong. ",memberCP,e9c51ea,conservative
"Bears, mostly.  Hbu?",KilKidd,e9by1rw,conservative
"When other counties with even more voters are able to count their votes in time, there is NO EXCUSE for counties like Broward. There is far too much possibility for fraud and abuse if you just keep extending their time to “count votes”. ",_Hospitaller_,e9bufx2,conservative
"The video of them being loaded from a private car on to a truck should suffice, no?  Or the box left for 56 hours in an elementary school?",gbimmer,e9c7iya,conservative
">When other counties with even more voters are able to count their votes in time, there is NO EXCUSE for counties like Broward. 

I've already addressed this issue. 



>There is far too much possibility for fraud and abuse if you just keep extending their time to “count votes”. 



There's also far too much possibility for fraud and abuse by not allowing every vote to be counted because of a lack of time.


Ballots shouldn't be destroyed but all votes should be verified.",LogicInText,e9buocj,conservative
"Your “addressing” of the issue was nonsense. You said count votes first, verify second. What a great way to defraud an election. 

> There's also far too much possibility for fraud and abuse

So you admit there is far too much possibility of fraud and abuse by extending vote counting indefinitely. First correct thing you’ve said this entire thread. 

I’d take the possibility of fraud within a time limit than the possibility of fraud by having people dump endless piles of manufactured votes into the tally until they reach the number they know they need to win.",_Hospitaller_,e9bv4wd,conservative
">Your “addressing” of the issue was nonsense. You said count votes first, verify second. What a great way to defraud an election. 

Phrasing could have been better but that's not what I said. you're welcome to believe it though.  

>So you admit there is far too much possibility of fraud and abuse by extending vote counting indefinitely. First correct thing you’ve said this entire thread. 

Not at all. If you add the rest of the quote you get what I said. Cherry picking a quote isn't doing your argument justice. 



>I’d take the possibility of fraud within a time limit than the possibility of fraud by having people dump endless piles of manufactured votes into the tally until they reach the number they know they need to win.

That's why they should verify votes. If you'd read the things I've said, you'd see that. ",LogicInText,e9bwsqi,conservative
Allowing specific counties to keep counting votes long after total tallies are given allows them to know exactly how many votes are needed to be manufactured for their candidate to win. This is why it's far the far more dangerous form of fraud.,_Hospitaller_,e9bx1oj,conservative
">Allowing specific counties to keep counting votes long after total tallies are given allows them to know exactly how many votes are needed to be manufactured for their candidate to win. This is why it's far the far more dangerous form of fraud.

I think all voters, regardless of county should be counted and given a reasonable time frame(couple days in my opinion). And they should all be verified. ",LogicInText,e9bxchm,conservative
Your problem is your blind faith that Democrats will verify all these votes they find AFTER they know the amount of votes they'll need to win.,_Hospitaller_,e9bxmgj,conservative
">Your problem is your blind faith that Democrats will verify all these votes they find AFTER they know the amount of votes they'll need to win.

I said votes need to be verified. The only blind faith is yours with the assumption that republicans are the only ones that should be trusted. ",LogicInText,e9by85p,conservative
"To my knowledge there has not been a single election in modern history where a Democrat was leading on election night only for a Republican to take the lead several days after the election.

However there are many cases where the reverse has happened. Senator Al Franken's election being one of the most obvious and consequential.
",_Hospitaller_,e9byl2e,conservative
">To my knowledge there has not been a single election in modern history where a Democrat was leading on election night only for a Republican to take the lead several days after the election.


Then read up on the 2004, 2006, 2008, 2010, and 2012 elections. 


>However there are many cases where the reverse has happened. Senator Al Franken's election being one of the most obvious and consequential.



Not saying you're lying but id like proof. I don't remember anything about this. 

",LogicInText,e9bzfxd,conservative
"Please provide specifics about elections where a Democrat lead on election night and later votes being found then lead to their loss.

[Here's what happened with Al Franken](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Senate_election_in_Minnesota,_2008);

""Since the unofficial results were first posted on the Minnesota Secretary of State's website, Coleman's lead had narrowed from 726 votes on November 5 to the official pre-recount tally of 215 votes on November 18. 

In accordance with state law, the Minnesota State Canvassing Board ordered a hand recount in the Senate race...

The state canvassing board certified the recounted vote totals on January 5 with Franken ahead by 225 votes.""",_Hospitaller_,e9c0483,conservative
">Please provide specifics about elections where a Democrat lead on election night and later votes being found then lead to their loss.

You might be too young to remember. Look up diebold and George w. Bush election. The results on television showed the dems up but after a blackout, the republicans were up by a wide margin. I tried finding the news footage of when it happened but to no avail. 


>The state canvassing board certified the recounted vote totals on January 5 with Franken ahead by 225 votes.""

Well, if the votes were verified, I don't see the issue.



Either way, if you were truly sincere about your argument you'd be bothered that the last three republican presidents lost the popular vote. Now i'm sure you're going to throw the ""it's a democratic republic"" line in my face and I'll give you that; however, I doubt you'd have the same stance if a Democrat was in office after losing the popular vote. ",LogicInText,e9c4ab3,conservative
"Bush was NOT behind Gore in votes in Florida at the end of election night. That does not meet the criteria I described, where a Democrat was leading on election night and a Republican passed them days later. 

From [Bish vs Gore](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_presidential_election,_2000); 

“At approximately 2:30 a.m., with some 85% of the votes counted in Florida and **Bush leading Gore by more than 100,000 votes**, the networks declared that Bush had carried Florida and therefore had been elected president. However, most of the remaining votes to be counted in Florida were located in three heavily Democratic counties—Broward, Miami-Dade, and Palm Beach—and as their votes were reported Gore began to gain on Bush. **By 4:30 a.m., after all votes were counted, Gore had narrowed Bush's margin to under 2,000 votes**, and the networks retracted their predictions that Bush had won Florida and the presidency. Gore, who had privately conceded the election to Bush, withdrew his concession. The final result in Florida was slim enough to require a mandatory recount (by machine) under state law; **Bush's lead dwindled to just over 300 votes when it was completed the day after the election**. 

> if you were truly sincere about your argument you'd be bothered that the last three republican presidents lost the popular vote

My issue is with FRAUD and manipulation, not the electoral college which is part of our Constitution.",_Hospitaller_,e9c50nw,conservative
">Bush was NOT behind Gore in votes in Florida at the end of election night.

I don't believe I specified Florida. 

>That does not meet the criteria I described, where a Democrat was leading on election night and a Republican passed them days later. 

I ignored that and went for a real issue instead. 

>My issue is with FRAUD

As with mine. Again, you're probably too young to remember what had actually happened that night. 
",LogicInText,e9c5eyb,conservative
Well you won't actually give **any** specifics. I have.,_Hospitaller_,e9c5iyf,conservative
"Same law firm 2 different National Scandals they are at the center of...
Nothing to see here just a coincidence, right?     ",ozric101,e9d3xfm,conservative
"I thought I smelled ""Clinton"" on this thing.",mastaxn,e9d5p8p,conservative
A politician lied? Well I'm not shocked at all.,KeithCarter4897,e9d8vzi,conservative
New York is starting to win its competition with Cali for worst people in Congress.,Terra_green2,e9dhflk,conservative
Gee I bet this has nothing to do with the Muslim population,noodlesaremydick,e9d29mw,conservative
What could have caused this? /s,MAGA_Carta,e9d7vkz,conservative
"Donald Trump’s rhetoric is at it again!

/s",justhere2havefun,e9d152l,conservative
Waaa ... muh jews... was,InevitableEndResult,e9drai1,conservative
Of course not. Muslims love Jews,rharravs,e9d5wph,conservative
"I know it's been said numerous times, but when satiric headlines read like real news (or a true reflection of it) it's a sad state of affairs.",Terra_green2,e9btark,conservative
Oh look anti fascist being fascist. ,Stonemeteor360,e9bzdma,conservative
why didn’t carlson use his guns? i would’ve ,Cesar_XCVII,e9c27fg,conservative
"Question, if one of these retards end up with a chest full of shotgun pellets one day, would they stop this behavior? Or would they send the women and children to the front?",CN9YLW,e9c6zpw,conservative
"TI actually woke up to two redditors telling me that the mob at his house was both fake news and justified if real.

[Crazy people I tell you](https://np.reddit.com/r/news/comments/9vbgra/man_charged_with_threatening_to_kill_cnn_anchor/e9c6rjv/?utm_content=permalink&utm_medium=front&utm_source=reddit&utm_name=news)
",DangerToDemocracy,e9cnmd0,conservative
"""There's a really easy way not to get mobbed in public places or your own home: march in lockstep with the leftist agenda,"" said a Smash Racism D.C. spokesperson. ""It's really simple.""

Come on. I'm really expected to believe this was said verbatim? I'd need to hear that in audio before I'd ever be able to swallow that bullshit as truth. What is this, The Onion?",Nevaknosbest,e9byeyn,conservative
Bamboozled again ,paulbrevik,e9cvale,conservative
i love that the protestors are being investigated for Hate crimes. lets set that precedent and she what happens.,atmatchett,e9cyehk,conservative
"This is essentially the responses I'm getting in /r/askaliberal. ""He's not a journalist, so it's ok to harass him"".",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d7cdw,conservative
Freedom of speech. Both sides.,Lives_With_His_Mom,e9dyyah,conservative
"Not satire tho, sadly",rdrptr,e9cqgkw,conservative
"Agreed, getting stung by the bee over and over again ain't good for my mental state...",wynhdo,e9bwj5e,conservative
I'm pretty sure they just lifted the headline from itsgoingdown for this.,anuser999,e9dcojb,conservative
"Yup, seems like a growing trend more and more. ",TheMongoose101,e9c9kev,conservative
"The Left amazes me with their disconnect from reality and lack of self reflection. 

I just got a PM from a whinny bitch Leftist to kill myself. 

This is why I stopped being a liberal. Well, one of many reasons. ",Legendary_Hypocrite,e9cq1hx,conservative
He wasn’t home at the time. His wife was calling 911 while hiding. ,Mindcraftjoe,e9c57fa,conservative
They'd send the women and children to the front,prcampbell10,e9cmul9,conservative
"It’s the Babylon bee, a known satire site, hence the satire flair.",Logan891,e9c0580,conservative
"So I get that now you understand this post was satire and all, but I have to say your comment genuinely made me burst out laughing with your candor and bluntness about it all, like, “Come on, you’re fucking kidding me, right?”

What makes it a little sad (and definitely ironic) is that no leftist ever does this with the media he’s digesting. He just swallows it whole without any qualifications.",ascatraz,e9cliok,conservative
r/woosh,haplogreenleaf,e9c2300,conservative
Which just means we need to get over our complexes about harming them. ,anuser999,e9dcrst,conservative
"Ohhhkaayy, I get it. Sorry for being stupid.",Nevaknosbest,e9c0t7h,conservative
Virginia didn’t vote on state legislature this year. It was last year and republicans got slaughtered. We lost a ton of seats. Most likely will flip completely in 2019. ,Zac1245,e9doqek,conservative
Will we be able to redraw the recently (this year) redrawn PA Congressional map in 2020 with the new census in time to flip some seats for the 2020 general election? Cause we got totally screwed with this new map and making it a little less Dem-leaning would go a long way toward retaking the House in Trump’s re-election year ,YankeeBlues21,e9djc9h,conservative
Good analysis. I haven't seen this anywhere else.,ngoni,e9dk07u,conservative
They is why the dumbocrats have been beating the gerrymanding drum so hard. ,ozric101,e9dn0ef,conservative
Interesting. The table from NCSL shows Republicans controlling the state legislature. I'll edit the post when I get back to my office. ,MyWifeDontKnowItsMe,e9e1488,conservative
I don't believe it will affect the 2020 elections. I think 2022 will be the first major elections with new maps redrawn in 2020.,MyWifeDontKnowItsMe,e9e1e6u,conservative
"Yeah, we vote off year here. We lost a ton of seats last year. Still, control it but its by one seat in both state house and senate. 

Edit: looked it up we lost 15 seats in the legislature last year. Also the only reason we have a one-seat majority is cause it came down to a coin toss, litteraly. ",Zac1245,e9e19c7,conservative
Sounds right. Explains why I lost Allen West as my Congressman in 2012 when he won solidly in 2010. ,YankeeBlues21,e9e1o3m,conservative
Why have republicans been doing so poorly in VA elections as of late? ,IrishSim,e9elzbc,conservative
More and more liberals moving in essentially. Also the GOP has been running terrible candidates. The same failed candidates keep running for state wide office.  ,Zac1245,e9f0ffr,conservative
It looks like the left may start brigading these threads (about the broward controversy). Nothing would make me happier than the left proving they don't care about voter fraud unless it suits them (2016). ,xJownage,e9c8zax,conservative
Now look into the other ones like Wisconsin and Arizona,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c4iuo,conservative
Finally. Get em Trump!,the-divine-comedy,e9c482s,conservative
[removed],,e9cxgpc,conservative
That just makes me more certain that someone corrupt is actually happening. No need to brigade if it’s nothing.,Masterjason13,e9ce23s,conservative
"works both ways though, right?",RobotXander,e9cnx8s,conservative
[removed],,e9cxkmw,conservative
Can you provide any reputable sources detailing voter fraud in the 2016 election? I was under the impression it was such a non issue that Trump had to disband his voter fraud commission.,Mrranger92,e9cxxpa,conservative
Isn't it weird how this giant stack of unmarked envelopes always comes in overwhelmingly Democrat?,nited_states,e9c63yj,conservative
"Exactly this. If this is being done in Florida and Arizona it must be being done in other battleground states.

Honestly, if voter fraud is found, I want every fucking state to go under investigation and I want every single inch of ground covered to show the nation-wide effort to interfere with the democratic process. I don’t want to just investigate the close states I want every one and every single election volunteer to be investigated.

This is bigger than Russia. I fundamentally believe there is a massive, nation-wide voter fraud apparatus designed to help the democrats. Whether the democrats are directly involved or not is yet to be determined (hint: they are directly involved. So are major news networks)

This isn’t tin foil hat shot anymore. This is the situation we are in right the fuck now.",DJ41,e9cfida,conservative
"Um as a conservative voter in Wisconsin... no.  I don’t want a witch hunt.   I’m not aware of any issues at polling locations in Wisconsin and the margin was wide enough that a recount won’t change the results.  Yes there was a story about Madison handing out IDs to foreign nationals.  It may even be possible there was some influencing at some city polling locations, but without video evidence it’s not provable and I have seen no evidence.

Provide evidence and I damn well wanted it investigated.",Lustan,e9cxwkq,conservative
"The yellow media is what is creating the damaged perception, so try again.",mlmack,e9d42tp,conservative
You think the media will be kind to conservatives is Trump just stops talking? They will NEVER give conservatives a fair shake. The media IS liberalism.,Starky_McStarkface,e9d13vc,conservative
"Concern troll somewhere else, loser.",hello_japan,e9d9di1,conservative
"Two two years later and all Mueller has done is prove that Trump is 100% innocent and the cleanest president in history. While also proving massive corruption from Democrats.

Whitaker needs to CEUs and take charge of all of the corruption that Mueller has found because Mueller referred it to the Democrat attorney general in New York who will likely sweep it under the rug",ExpensiveMention,e9cw5r0,conservative
"Sure, I’m for anyone caught doing this bullshit to go to jail.",Shotwe11,e9cq1nc,conservative
"Yes, but we both know there is only 1 side who magically find thousands of ballots after polls close that magically support  their candidate (D), election after election after election.",TheComedianGLP,e9df3ip,conservative
Yet another Trump-hating Democrat making up terms.,TheComedianGLP,e9df5ks,conservative
He had to disband it because no one would give up any information.  You have to be pretty dumb to think that voter fraud doesn't happen.  Why else would the democrats stymie every attempt to create a system of voter identification?  And spare me the standard democrat BS of black people being too dumb or too poor to get an ID.,mlmack,e9d3z8s,conservative
Other than W has any big race flipped blue to red/ affirmed red,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c6kok,conservative
"The theory is this: it’s usually large cities that report last because they have more votes to count, and urban areas vote democratic.

That’s bullshit as far as I’m concerned though.",Masterjason13,e9cdzw6,conservative
Happened in the 2004 Washington gubernatorial race. Republican was winning until they found enough votes to put the Democrat on top.,flextov,e9chynd,conservative
"Everything is bigger than Russia, haha. ",skarface6,e9d3vy8,conservative
"How can you fundamentally believe something without evidence? Asking as a conservative, not a liberal sneaking into this sub. 

I’ve enjoyed this sub for its rationality and this perspective makes us no better than liberals who believe every shred of everything in the liberal media. ",modtrax,e9cyqv3,conservative
"Im not concern trolling I'm being a realist. There is a bad perception, how is it fixed?",Falkamper,e9e33h5,conservative
"I'm allowed to Express concern without being a troll or a loser, what is your issue with me?",Falkamper,e9e3i45,conservative
"The cleanest president in history is a bit of an overstatement.  I mean, there was a prezzy nicknamed ""bathtub taft"" after all.  Let's not forget James K Polk either.  Dude makes 4 promises during his campaign, follows through on all of them, does not seek reelection.  ",yomon1771,e9cwtht,conservative
Life sentence. This is tantamount to treason. It’s ruining and subverting our very foundation for representative government. ,Aviator07,e9cvzon,conservative
"[https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/12/01/0-000002-percent-of-all-the-ballots-cast-in-the-2016-election-were-fraudulent/?utm\_term=.9d7d9a1fdad3](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/12/01/0-000002-percent-of-all-the-ballots-cast-in-the-2016-election-were-fraudulent/?utm_term=.9d7d9a1fdad3)

Here is my source. Of course voter fraud happens, but .000002% of all cast votes? It is not worth depriving citizens of legitimate votes in an effort to combat a problem we already do a good job at preventing.",Mrranger92,e9d5ya4,conservative
W started red. Every recount it got bluer,greeneyedunicorn2,e9ccpte,conservative
"W didn’t even flip red, so he’s not an example. He won in the first place, continued to win and was still winning when the courts stopped the endless counting.",hello_japan,e9d92d9,conservative
In my experience urban areas have always reported earlier than rural area.,SWTORBattlefrontNerd,e9d3m0k,conservative
"Their neighbors in Miami apparently did things on time (with 100k more votes, apparently).",skarface6,e9d3uf3,conservative
"No evidence?

[Illegally destroying ballots](https://www.sun-sentinel.com/local/broward/fl-sb-broward-elections-supervisor-broke-law-snipes-canova-20180514-story.html) (Sun Sentinel, May 14, 2018)

[Absentee ballots that never arrived](https://www.miamiherald.com/news/local/community/broward/article221207380.html) (Miami Herald, November 6, 2018)

[Fellow democrats accused her precinct of individual and systemic breakdowns that made it difficult for voters to cast regular ballots](https://www.miamiherald.com/news/politics-government/article3563324.html) (Miami Herald, November 4, 2014)

[Posted election results half an hour before polls closed – a very clear violation of election law.](https://www.miamiherald.com/news/local/community/broward/article220841135.html) (Miami Herald, November 2, 2018)
[Sued for leaving amendments off of ballots](https://www.miamiherald.com/news/local/community/broward/article109574732.html) (Miami Herald, October 20, 2016)

[Claiming to not have the money to notify voters when their absentee ballot expired](https://www.sun-sentinel.com/news/fl-vote-by-mail-absentee-ballots-20140712-story.html) (Sun Sentinel, November 8, 2018)

[Having official staffers campaign on official time](https://www.browardbeat.com/challenger-charges-broward-election-boss-brenda-snipes-ethically-challenged/) (Broward Beat, July 20, 2016)

[Problems printing mail ballots](https://www.miamiherald.com/news/local/community/broward/article220841135.html) (Miami Herald, November 2, 2018)

[Accusations of ballot stuffing](https://www.heritage.org/election-integrity/commentary/election-fraud-nonpartisan-issue-these-cases-florida-prove-it) (Heritage, August 1, 2017)

[Voters receiving ballots with duplicate pages](https://www.miamiherald.com/news/local/community/broward/article220841135.html) (Miami Herald, November 2, 2018)

[Slow results and piles of ballots that cropped up way after Election Day](https://thecapitolist.com/broward-recount-shenanigans-over-38000-democrat-votes-found-since-election-day-with-more-to-come/) (The Capitolist, November 8, 2018)

[Opening ballots in private, breaking Florida law](https://www.politico.com/states/florida/story/2018/08/13/judge-sides-with-florida-gop-in-absentee-ballot-dispute-with-broward-county-555553) (Politico, August 13, 2018)",hello_japan,e9d9bkg,conservative
Let’s start with your capitalization of random words.,hello_japan,e9e3kl1,conservative
Polk fought the bank,ExpensiveMention,e9cxb4x,conservative
"Look, if you want to believe that there were only 4 cases of voter fraud in the entire US, that's your business.  Besides, that says only 4 cases that were documented.

When there are no stringent voter ID requirements, it's impossible to know how many people who voted were actually eligible to vote.",mlmack,e9d7fa0,conservative
"Damn, I’ll take a look. Thanks. ",modtrax,e9dardj,conservative
"""Never argue with a fool, they bring you down to their level and beat you with experience""  Your attempts to be divisive won't work.",Falkamper,e9e50th,conservative
"Note that clean and conservative are two different words, even though they both start with the same letter",yomon1771,e9d0e1h,conservative
"I believe facts. Just because you have a ""gut feeling"" voter fraud is a huge issue, doesn't make it true. If you have information from a reliable source that discredits me, please do post it. (Not Breitbart, Infowars, etc.)",Mrranger92,e9d7nte,conservative
“NevEr arGuE wiTh A fOOl”,hello_japan,e9e53gn,conservative
"1 election, 1 instance in 1 corner of 1 county, 100 fraudulent votes.

Sit down:

# Voter Fraud Allegedly Found In Deep Blue Florida County

[https://www.dailywire.com/news/38153/breaking-voter-fraud-allegedly-found-deep-blue-ryan-saavedra](https://www.dailywire.com/news/38153/breaking-voter-fraud-allegedly-found-deep-blue-ryan-saavedra)",TheComedianGLP,e9df0ha,conservative
"It's not a gut feeling, it's just common sense.  I don't know of any reliable sources these days, and that includes The Washington Post.",mlmack,e9d8886,conservative
Stand up:https://www.npr.org/2018/11/09/666018707/trump-scott-spread-claims-of-voter-fraud-as-florida-race-narrows,Mrranger92,e9dt5jd,conservative
"So because you don't believe any sources that are contrary to your views, voter fraud is a massive issue that affects every election. Got it.",Mrranger92,e9d8qwf,conservative
"NPR is not  valid source.

&#x200B;",TheComedianGLP,e9dwh3g,conservative
"What facts do you have that proves that voter fraud is not widespread?  Voter fraud has been going on for years, so why would you believe that it still isn't?  Because the Washington Post reported that they only found 4 cases?  Where did they look?  Did they look at all 100+ million ballots that were cast, and check them against voter records?",mlmack,e9da0o2,conservative
"A publicly funded nonpartisan source isn’t valid? Once again, just because you feel something,doesn’t make it true",Mrranger92,e9enzmr,conservative
"It's government funded and horribly left-biased.

What sort of government school did you graduate from not to know this?

Speaking of feelings, screw yours :D",TheComedianGLP,e9g04r9,conservative
"I mean, he's not wrong. But I wish he would have said it before they fired him. ",S_D_W_2,e9cfud6,conservative
"CNN started going to shit around 2005/2006 when Fox news started. 


Before then you had Larry King obviously as a great interviewer, Tucker Carlson on Crossfire, Robert Novak was very smart, Bernard Shaw was great at hosting, Christianne Ammanpour did excellent, hard hitting, investigative journalism. Anderson Cooper was decent too, so was Wolf Blizter. Aaron Brown did an excellent job on 9/11.


Nowadays, they've pretty much all left. We barely hear much from Ammanpour, Wolf Blitzer is well past his expiration date and doesn't have a clue half the time what he is doing, and you can somewhat say the same for Anderson Cooper.
",cbdb9,e9cu75r,conservative
"  

CNN is the cheerleader for left-wing extremism.

&#x200B;

Look into who owns it and who all the top people are.

&#x200B;

That will explain a lot as to why.",_Paradigm_Shift,e9crtte,conservative
"Watch his interview with Dave Rubin on The Rubin Report

https://youtu.be/CxB8rQyQ2qU",djent_illini,e9cwl7n,conservative
It's nice to see Rick Sanchez again.  I thought he was treated poorly by CNN.,ChunkyArsenio,e9cjfo2,conservative
Would love to hear someone like Jake Tapper give their honest opinion on political bias at CNN but that will never happen. It would discredit him when he occasionally tries his hand at real news and piss off his fans.,CarlosGrimes,e9d32e1,conservative
I wish more news anchors would say it. :/,Nodoxxing1234,e9d3vjb,conservative
I realized how bad their network was when they covered MH370 24/7 for a month straight,dlc_protocol,e9cvgmb,conservative
"First half was great, second half not so much ",i_floop_the_pig,e9cyl5u,conservative
"> I realized how bad their network was when they covered MH370 24/7 for a month straight

All MSM took a shit the day Bill Clinton got caught getting a blow job in the oval office.  That was the day real News died and 'Entertainment News' was born.  Shit has been on spin-cycle ever since",Jizzlobber42,e9d12cq,conservative
Especially with their crazy conspiracy theories and their ignorance about planes. ,PM_ME_LEWD_SHIT,e9d79qo,conservative
Is there evidence of fraud in this one? I mean clearly there is in Florida but are we just yelling fraud because she is losing? It does seem odd that she is slightly ahead when 99% of precincts report but then is behind when some behind the scenes ballots get counted.,the-divine-comedy,e9ds197,conservative
"Between the amount of people who’ve turned their backs on American values by supporting the modern Dems and the rampant fraud we’re seeing, it’s getting very close to the time to dump some tea in the harbor. ",YankeeBlues21,e9drpm1,conservative
"Not fraud as much as negligence and malpractice. The az gop is rightfully arguing that all counties in the state must adhere to the same standard in the counting and verification of early ballots (much like with boward county fl). 


If you are going to cure all the  votes from sinema strongholds then the same standard ought to be  applied to those counties that are McSally strongholds as well. Or vice versa.

Edit: that is exactly what just happened

https://www.cbsnews.com/news/settlement-reached-in-tight-arizona-senate-vote-count/

Btw you are not going to get the true story by following mainstream (leftist) media including this one. I only posted this because it has the most updated info on this saga. ",dtlv5813,e9dtly7,conservative
"I’ve heard this has happened before in Arizona? Apparently most of their votes come by mail which explains the long methodical process. From what others have said on here, there’s a chance that McSally ultimately wins given that the last county to be counted is in her favor. But who knows at this point ",KnightofFaith26,e9dtkzi,conservative
"Trump just tweeted “Just out — in Arizona, SIGNATURES DONT MATCH. Electoral corruption - Call for a new election? We must protect our Democracy!”",anon1122334455612,e9du1hk,conservative
"Well theres more too. They're accusing the Maricopa county recorder of intentionally destroying evidence.

https://mobile.twitter.com/yvonnewingett/status/1060930458462998529?ref_src=twsrc%5Etfw%7Ctwcamp%5Etweetembed%7Ctwterm%5E1060930458462998529&ref_url=https%3A%2F%2Fwww.azcentral.com%2Fstory%2Fnews%2Fpolitics%2Felections%2F2018%2F11%2F09%2Fmcsally-sinema-election-republicans-claim-arizona-vote-fraud%2F1942637002%2F",mbarnar,e9e3vl1,conservative
"Chance is McSally can  only win if they count all the early and absentee ballots from those counties that are gop strongholds as well, not just the two counties that favors the dem candidate.",dtlv5813,e9dtwqv,conservative
"If BSA and GSUSA merged, would they peddle cookies, popcorn, or both? That's what this is about. GSUSA has the inferior service, it's a scheme to sell cookies. They've lost a bunch of ""scouts"" (read: salespeople) for their cookies to the rebranded BSA. These girls want to be scouts, not cookie peddlers, and it's hitting the GSUSA's bottom line.",Cr8er,e9cxres,conservative
"So rather than have the girl scouts change and do some activities the boys are doing, the boy scouts had to change to include girls, and now the girl scouts are mad that the boy scouts are taking away some of their cookie salesmen from that shoddy money making cookie operation. Do I have that right?",FecalMist,e9drztk,conservative
Robert Baden-Powell must be rolling over in his grave. ,PubliusVA,e9cu4we,conservative
"Boy Scouts produce self reliant conservatives, the Left has always wanted them gone.",svengalus,e9ddjdz,conservative
This is like a South Park episode. ,Break-The-Walls,e9dmlj1,conservative
It’s becoming a crime to be feminine... unless you’re a male.,Lustan,e9czsqz,conservative
"As an Eagle Scout, I hope they win.  Anything to keep the sexes separate.  ",ravenswin,e9cyk2j,conservative
"> “Mr. President,” she said, “on the campaign trail you called yourself a ‘nationalist,’ and some heard that as emboldening white nationalists. There are some people that say the Republican Party is seen as supporting white nationalists because of your rhetoric. What do you make of that?”
> 
> This is the classic ‘when-did-you-stop-beating your wife’ question. To answer it is to accept the premise, that a nationalist is a racist and bigot simply because “some people” say so, and that “the Republican Party is seen as supporting white nationalists because of [the president’s] rhetoric.” She apparently never learned that “some” is not a legitimate source.

These people are not only blind to their own bias, they are clueless when it comes to doing their job.",Tawana_Brawleys_Dad,e9d91m1,conservative
“Some people say” could be me and my friends. ,justhere2havefun,e9de68b,conservative
">A video expert had told The Associated Press that the video appeared doctored to speed up Acosta’s arm movement and make his gesture more threatening; the White House used that encounter to justify pulling Acosta’s credentials.
Abba Shapiro, an independent video producer hired by The Associated Press to compare the footage tweeted by Shapiro with the AP’s coverage of the news conference, said the alteration made was “too precise to be an accident.”


I think we need to all get on the same page of doctoring. The argument that the video is not 100% unzoomed therefore doctored can be made. But Trump’s point should also not be over looked as nothing was edited out or added.",Enzo_SAWFT,e9ehcd8,conservative
"Any time a video is converted to lesser quality some frames can drop.

Even on the ""original"" non zoomed version he chops her arm.  It's not assault but it's an asshole move to keep the mic.

This whole ""doctored"" thing is a distraction.",dudeman5445,e9ehfk7,conservative
"""Two late-night comics, Stephen Colbert and Jimmy Kimmel, both said on their shows Thursday that Sanders should be fired for her action.""
AP has the best sources. Pulitzer prize winning journalism here. 

",DBG1998,e9ehd93,conservative
"Who cares, I could care less if Acosta was fired and had to get a job at a car wash. ",ozric101,e9ehpr1,conservative
"Of course it wasn't altered.  Dems just can't believe their eyes.

They are also pretty astonished by the concept of stupidity.
",paulbrook,e9f5ezb,conservative
"Dude, they're analyzing a GIF.  They're being intentionally stupid trying to defend Acosta.",StraightNewt,e9ejq3s,conservative
"The media is nothing more than a giant, incestuous circle-jerk.
",nited_states,e9eioyp,conservative
Hey at least they used named sources. That's an improvement!,ngoni,e9epen8,conservative
"Flake, Sasse, Kasich, or Trump?  
  
My, what a difficult decision... /s",jina100,e9dslcw,conservative
The would all get curb stomped and leave Iowa with less than 1% of the GOP vote between them. ,iwasthebeaver,e9drtdz,conservative
Flake had a 12% approval rating in Arizona...he would get crushed anywhere else,mbarnar,e9drzpp,conservative
"Please for the love of god run. Trump can only be defeated by a bigger scarier mud monster. He steam rolled his competition because people want someone who will fight for them so they better bring someone who will get down in the dirt and kick the shit out of Dems 24/7. Flake is a piece of shit neocon, he wouldn’t even make it out of the gate. ",HonorMyBeetus,e9e8kr6,conservative
I could see a hopeless primary challenge from a RINO actively helping Trump in the general election.                                    ,tau_decay,e9du3jt,conservative
A legend in his own mind,SickofInternetProgs,e9epfw6,conservative
"What makes him thinks that he'll win?

Trump curb stomped the field of a bunch of neocons like Flake.",bigdaveyl,e9du28i,conservative
"If you are against Trump one thinks they are considered 'reasonable' but the swamp RINOs aren't going to fly the way they used to.


",postonrddt,e9du5te,conservative
"John Kasich, Mr. ""God-darn AR-15"" himself.

Yeah, that'll go over REALLY well. Jeff Flake is apparently just as clueless and naive as Mitt Romney.",Strait409,e9ecfa7,conservative
"For what its worth, midterm Exit polls showed 25% of Republican voter would be happy with a primary run against trump. Not sure if i saw on fox or cnn...",hipsterdufus84,e9ds034,conservative
Maybe Jeb could run again 😏,jina100,e9dux5m,conservative
"Trump has a 90+% approval rating among republicans according to every poll. Flake, Sasse, and Kasich would get steamrolled. ",iwasthebeaver,e9ds75q,conservative
"Of course 25% would love to see Trump challenged, but you're going to have to do better than Trump for it to get anywhere.  In other words, you can't put the same old neocon candidate up there against Trump....  We saw what happened last time.",bigdaveyl,e9du7b9,conservative
Beat me to it!,Rabidraccoon76,e9dylrm,conservative
She should have called the police. ,ozric101,e9c3w8m,conservative
So was it full of Democrat votes? It’s official now that Florida needs an entire new voting system. Scrap the whole thing and re-build it.,the-divine-comedy,e9c4akk,conservative
"“I don’t think you’d lock up extra ballot paper.”

Of course you should lock up blank ballots. That’s literally how you predict false votes.",quadrophenia515,e9crhwh,conservative
"Broward Country, public school teacher, friend of a sitting Democrat state rep.

Nothing to see here, carry on.",DogBeersHadOne,e9c60km,conservative
This is so damn blatant ,unityrootts,e9c5e0g,conservative
"""Provisional Ballots""

Like, in case we need these to be ""found"" if we haven't got enough legitimate ballots to win",Liberty_Pr1me,e9csdbw,conservative
Golly Gee now Howed that get there,Enzo_SAWFT,e9c4kwq,conservative
"Get your shit together, Florida",Nevaknosbest,e9c8y1s,conservative
"No chain of custody. They can’t be counted. I mean, that’s just common sense.",Dammit_Banned_Again,e9cgu9p,conservative
It's no fucking coincidence **if** these ballots were found AFTER Ginsberg was admitted to the hospital for falling and breaking 3 ribs. Desperate times call for desperate measures among Democrats. So I'm curious what the timeline is on these new ballot discoveries. ,Rightquercusalba,e9cro4y,conservative
"Surprise! Surprise! and magically ""discovered"" by a Democrat with connections to Gillem. Butter my buns and call me a biscuit!",JFGFNY,e9da0c2,conservative
Let’s not involve Sheriff Scott Israel in this one. ,YankeeBlues21,e9c62ln,conservative
as if that would have changed the outcome.,JMB_was_a_god,e9c79lf,conservative
"Florida election officials - ""Hold my beer...""",Moonthrower,e9cp9bw,conservative
"> No chain of custody.

I'm not sure of FL election laws, but wouldn't there need to be chain of custody for a ballot to be counted.  And could any ballot not accounted for in the chain of custody get thrown out?  ",jedichric,e9d0he5,conservative
"I said call the police not the sheriff, do they have State Troopers in FL?
They would be the ones to call if they do. ",ozric101,e9c79c8,conservative
"The Broward Sheriff’s Department *are* the local police for all but a handful of local cities. Most folded their departments and outsourced their police to the BSO. 

But yes there are also state troopers. ",YankeeBlues21,e9c7qro,conservative
You can’t pick and choose what agency handles your call to 911. ,rpm3311,e9ccipb,conservative
Love how we’re arguing over something that doesn’t matter. The box was placed there. ,,e9cu8y0,conservative
"There are direct police numbers, 911 is only for emergencies ",catholicgrant,e9cgs16,conservative
And when you call the wrong agency they redirect you to the correct one. Ask me how I know. ,rpm3311,e9chdu3,conservative
"We are talking about a call to 911, don’t take my comment as a threat lol. 
",catholicgrant,e9chleq,conservative
"Ok, so again the call would go to Broward Co. Sheriff. ",rpm3311,e9cjjoq,conservative
"If anyone is a Feminist of their time, it's Tommy Robinson.  This is what his UK supporters need to say to get the message out to support him in the crazy language of regressivism as he is the only one to speak out against rape gangs.",CreativeRoutine,e9d4wkf,conservative
"The problem is the way in which he does it. His recent antics nearly lost a case which resulted in a number of gang rapists being jailed. The real problem is that he's comes across as a hateful clown, but recent headlines keep proving him right. ",scud121,e9dfkpi,conservative
"Democrats? The Republicans wouldn't even fund the wall or repeal and replace Obamacare and they just got their ass handed to them in the House, despite what all those strangely giddy Conservative Twitter analysts say.

 A bunch of total losers in Congress. Trump's agenda is done unless he wins re-election.

This is the dangerous part. Presidents who lose Congress usually decide it's time to start bringing Democracy to the 3rd world. Hope he's the real deal.",SickofInternetProgs,e9epmsa,conservative
"Can anyone supply a rational explanation for this? I'm genuinely curious. It looks shady as hell, but I don't want to jump to conclusions without all the facts.

What is the best interpretation of this and what is the worst? ",ripecookies1,e9bxbdc,conservative
Werent the two districts mentioned being late the only ones the Democrats wanted to count in 2000? I'm now wondering how long this has been going on.,chugonthis,e9c4y0v,conservative
They are not going to get away with it.  ,ozric101,e9bnb2j,conservative
Just more bullshit that the news and dems won't mention,tohollywoodandback,e9c37w9,conservative
"I just think it odd that we dont have a better system in place nationally.  Armored cars, police escort, and a national holiday.  These votes are one of the most precious things we have and I dont understand why we dont have a holiday and armored escorts for them.  TV cameras should be following caravans and proudly playing the national anthem like ice cream truck sirens.  Voting is an awesome responsibility.",Falkamper,e9cxocg,conservative
Is this for real?,genie73118,e9bxdo2,conservative
"If this is true* 

This is so unjust, unconstitutional and un-American. 

I would bet if this did come out the Dems would go back to Russian collusion. LOL",StockSkys,e9cb3cz,conservative
"I have been a poll worker before and yes, all the ballots are stuffed into a normal persons car and driven to a location where there are trucks to go to Norwalk or wherever the voting center is in your state.  

It is also why I only vote by mail ahead of time now bc of the incompetence of several things I’ve seen that can miss your ballot, tear your ballot, or lose your ballot.",HowRememberAll,e9chhgu,conservative
"the same reason the obama administration's spying on the trump campaign isn't front page news. the media doesn't want it widely known, so they bury it. ",tifuforreal,e9cjfn7,conservative
"> why isn't it front page news

Don't ask, we can't talk about it here.",anuser999,e9c5boz,conservative
Because it doesn't fit the democrat/liberal narrative.,LastationNeoCon,e9c8s52,conservative
Penalty should be really harsh,chauey,e9ciu7j,conservative
"Shit like this is why we need to keep the electoral college.  

Without it, this could happen in any solidly blue state (where it's easiest to get away with it) and screw up the election for the whole country.",BrighamYoung,e9cvi37,conservative
We live in a lawless country run by a corrupt media.,NocturnalPatrol,e9d70xz,conservative
"Perhaps they're extras - you know - an ""insurance policy"" in case Gilliam and Nelson got out voted...",JFGFNY,e9d9g1e,conservative
"Uhmm...
Would you rather see the ballot boxes arrive at the county commissioners office in an ice cream truck?

Have you ever volunteered to help at voting sites?",bombilla42,e9cn369,conservative
"Best interpretation? Incompetent staff, should be fired and severely punished. These ballots aren't toys. Votes also invalid due to state law.  
  
Worst interpretation? The whole system there in Broward County is corrupt with officials who are in on it.  
  
Likely explanation because this happened last time and a judge found them guilty of destroying ballots? The latter.",AThiccMeme,e9cdon1,conservative
"Is anything from the headline verifiable? 
Do we actually know what's in the boxes?
Do we know where this was actually filmed?
Do we know when this was filmed?
If they are ballots and they are from this election and they are from where they're prepared to be from there may still be a reason that this is happening.

Extraordinary claims require extraordinary evidence.",aptpupil79,e9cc5w6,conservative
"The one in charge of Broward or however you spell it has been caught before manipulating the vote totals, how she is aloud even close to ballots I don't know.",etibbs,e9c5tkk,conservative
"You have more optimism that I do, sadly.",PrawnsAreOk,e9br1ji,conservative
Oh yes they are. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9c5klw,conservative
They're *getting* away with it.,NocturnalPatrol,e9d71vm,conservative
"> They are not going to get away with it.

""Hold my pumpkin-spice soy latte"" - The Ctrl-Left",Jizzlobber42,e9d1h3t,conservative
Don’t forget r/politics ,SteelersBraves97,e9c63w6,conservative
"They’re stealing elections, and they’re importing people who will vote for them. 

Sadly if Texas turns blue we will lose the country. It will be tyranny of majority rule. ",,e9ctlk0,conservative
Maybe in Fl but other states the ballots are in a locked box while being transported in the normal persons car,krepogregg,e9clo2i,conservative
"I honestly don't know how the precincts work... How is it supposed to be done then? 

I do find it odd that volunteers have the ballots in their car and are moving ballots to a pick up location.",abuigues,e9cw2l7,conservative
This is far beyond incompetence. Don't be naive.,phoenix335,e9chqp7,conservative
"Here's the Facebook post of the woman who took the video. https://www.facebook.com/joann.knox.7/posts/1875888749146325
",_Hospitaller_,e9cgs2f,conservative
"See this is why l like the right, we actually question what’s in front of us instead of swallowing whatever they tell us",poltergeist007,e9cjw19,conservative
My optimism level is about on par with yours. ,bdub561,e9bsw9h,conservative
"They are just very desperate, crime does not pay for very long. ",ozric101,e9d7jnd,conservative
"I helped with the voting one time when I was living in a small town in Texas. Once all the polls had closed, the boxes were sealed with tamper proof tape and a lock and they were under watch of no less than two county officials responsible for making sure the rules were followed. Later in the evening a pickup came around to load up the boxes. 

The boxes were moved from the polling place to the truck - still under the watch of the polling place officials. The boxes each had a unique number stamped on them. The numbers were noted on a form and it was signed by three people - the official in charge at the polling place, the official accepting the boxes, and a random person as “witness” of the transfer. Copies of the form were given to each person. 

The driver got into the truck with the other county official and they drove to the next site to pick up the next boxes. 

Finally, everything is brought to the county commissioner’s office where the ballot boxes were finally unsealed and the counting began. This process was further witnessed by the county commissioner herself and about a dozen other people. 

Now, I’m not saying that something fishy isn’t going on in this particular situation - after all, it is Florida and there always seems to be drama and shenanigans with all their elections. Whether or not that’s occurring in this case is something I can’t determine from pictures taken at long distance. However, I can tell you that there isn’t any kind of armored truck with armed guards picking up ballot boxes. 

At least that’s not how it was during the 2016 election down in Texas. ",bombilla42,e9d9sxz,conservative
That's why I said best case scenario,AThiccMeme,e9chz04,conservative
"Some people on the left question things too, like me when I was on the left.

I'd always ask questions, and doubt sources, and hear all perspectives before I made up my mind, and then I looked up one day and I was on the right. Funny how that works.",misespises,e9cv560,conservative
They've paid for the past 5 decades.,NocturnalPatrol,e9d7lvn,conservative
People that do that on the left don't last long on the left.,Error_Lord,e9d1xim,conservative
And I'm willing to bet that none of them are dumber than a box of rocks or married their brother and draped themselves in a Palestinian flag.,Tu-ne-cede,e9dr3tn,conservative
"If you have a gun for defense, you have to be willing to pull the trigger if the time arises. ",Rabidraccoon76,e9dzto0,conservative
Pistol whip them,Reddcity,e9doutm,conservative
That is a good way to kill somebody... ,ozric101,e9dpg6d,conservative
This woman is a tool.,blakandy,e9e0383,conservative
It's hard. Do we want a competent tool or an incompetent tool with memory issues.,SickofInternetProgs,e9e33qa,conservative
Unequivocally the latter  ,Dank_Cartographer,e9e3osb,conservative
"You are absolutely right sir. If things don’t change we will stop wining elections all together. Be glad we are not in straight up democracy or things would be way worse. The future of this country lies in the culture war, which we are loosing. We need to produce conservative culture. We have no cultural outlets, the left controls every single form of artistic production. You cannot turn on the tv without being blasted by the left’s agenda. It is a war of attrition and we have little to no reinforcements. 

What scares me the most, is not the left taking over entirely(though thats plain scary). What is really scares me, is what follows in response of years of the left systematically destroying this country. The resulting backlash will put Mussolini and Hitler to shame. ",lgalucard,e9e0r9j,conservative
"Obviously it would help, but it's not necessary.

If W could win 50%+ with all the grief he got, Trump can. I doubt he'll get 50%, but he just has to win the right states. Whoever runs against him will also play a part.

Midterms don't mean anything and don't predict Presidential winners. All reelected Presidents since Ike lose the first midterm but W (9/11 had something to do with that).

I have to admit, I never thought Trump would win in a million years. He provided a blueprint to Republicans to pick the lock. Target voters you usually ignore, and motivate them to vote. Dump the mindless free trade talk that has in reality hurt so many in the rust belt.

Just calling yourself conservative or liberal or progressive isn't enough. The Dems are clearly fired up and raising tons of cash. The fact that they took Alabama (because the GOP put in such a bad candidate), and almost took Texas tells you all you need to know.  

My 72 cents.",SickofInternetProgs,e9e52ui,conservative
Suburban women. ,StraightNewt,e9dl2j6,conservative
"I find this hilarious. These people do understand that voting Democrat means less money for them, right?",HolsterOfNuts,e9dhlp5,conservative
Virtue signalling suburban yuppies who aren’t willing to fight for American values,YankeeBlues21,e9dhkg7,conservative
"So now we know suburbanites don't actually care about policy, they only care about tone and appearances.  ",tja_1478,e9djaco,conservative
"Because they're morons who have been indoctrinated into thinking they don't deserve their success because they are white, so they virtue signal and vote Democratic. ",1wjl1,e9dpwlu,conservative
"Yup Trumps too mean and nasty for their sensibilities. It’s unfortunate that tone matters more to many of them than policy, which is actually benefiting the country. The disparity between them and men in the same group is wild.",SirRollsaSpliff,e9dqqk9,conservative
We need to restrict the vote. ,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9e6pob,conservative
"They don't care,  many of them commute into the cities and work in government sheltered jobs. DC is a prime example, fat and rich and always first to the government trough. The scraps are thrown to lower class voters in the inner city. ",Rightquercusalba,e9dzrl4,conservative
It’s almost as if people aren’t single issue voters,funk_man1,e9dxwd4,conservative
It's tough to invest in policy when you have nothing at stake. People with the easiest lives will care most about the optics and style over substance and results. ,greeneyedunicorn2,e9dnefp,conservative
"No, it's not that.  It's the media.  Men being insulted for not voting the right way isn't effective.  It tends to make most men do the opposite. Women being insulted for not voting the right way tends to make them want to appease the people attacking them due to social pressure dynamics.  The media generates that social pressure.  

That social pressure was less effective in 2016 because back then social media was free and open.  Today it's pretty much all controlled and shaped by the left thus the attacks on all sides was effective.",StraightNewt,e9drbb3,conservative
"Never going to happen.  No democracy or republic in history has ever reduced voting rights through a vote.  The only time they contract is after a revolution or coup.

Personally I want to limit voting to families with children, since they're the most likely to vote for things in the long term interest since they have their children's future to think of.  But again it's never going to happen in America.",StraightNewt,e9e6xud,conservative
They apparently care nothing for our nation and our Founders/founding principles either. What an embarrassment. ,YankeeBlues21,e9doi5j,conservative
"I don’t know how that’s different? Especially when you look at polling, the vast majority of women are far more worried about Trumps language and combativeness. Obviously media exacerbates it, but guys just don’t care about his language nearly as much if it means they’re making more money.",SirRollsaSpliff,e9dtb4b,conservative
Votes should be limited to people not receiving government assistance.,Thatlookedlikeithurt,e9e85f8,conservative
"It's called first world problems, little do they realize that Democrat policies lead down the path to 3rd world problems. ",Rightquercusalba,e9dwe7m,conservative
"Seriously.  It's their prerogative on how they vote, but they can't expect to be taken seriously anymore whenever the whine about policy. ",tja_1478,e9dpjid,conservative
"> Especially when you look at polling, the vast majority of women are far more worried about Trumps language and combativeness. 

And yet they vote for the dems who are much more foul mouthed and combative group that Trump.  What's the average Dem rally cry?  Fuck Trump?  IE, the media says Trump is uncouth and the suburbanite women repeat it, it's not real reason they voted for the dems this time around.",StraightNewt,e9duaw3,conservative
"I’m not arguing their hypocrisy, it’s absurd, I’m just reporting what they say in polls... I’ve no clue why you’re disagreeing. It’s splitting hairs. ",SirRollsaSpliff,e9eal06,conservative
Exit polls are notoriously unreliable. ,iwasthebeaver,e9dc5dj,conservative
I don't know if exit polls are good. But that was an interesting take on the people leaving California,gtrdundave2,e9dclxv,conservative
"It's not really a mystery.  The younger you are, the more likely you are born in the state you are in.

The younger you are, the less educated you are on economics and politics.  You are more likely to vote for the hip trendy skateboarding guy that mainstream media is pushing.  ",Baptism-Of-Fire,e9dl4wp,conservative
That’s kinda funny if true.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9dcs0t,conservative
"My boss is from Texas and Texan to the core. He lives around DC cause he’s a lobbyist now but he told me this doesn’t surprise him. He always said there is one things large parts of Texans love, it’s a populist and person who seems like a good person. Cruz just isn’t that likable. I’m glad he won but I can see Betos appeal to those not educated in politics. ",Zac1245,e9dppfb,conservative
Well cruz comes off as smarmy. I have Republican friends in texas.  He isnt terribly popular with them.,hipsterdufus84,e9dfsoy,conservative
When I was young I refused to vote because I knew I was too ignorant.,trelium06,e9dsmtz,conservative
Republican in Texas here. There is a big difference in “terribly popular” and voting for Beto... that poll has to be BS. ,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e9djnvr,conservative
"I understand why the voting age was lowered to 18 (so those in the Military could vote for who was going to be commanding them), but I really wish it was 21 or even 25 for the rest of the population. ",Aloha_Tradin_Co,e9e6j72,conservative
Agreed.  They all voted for cruz.  ,hipsterdufus84,e9djqcv,conservative
My mind did not mature till I was 25. Then suddenly things started becoming clearer. Then I started voting :),trelium06,e9e7ig0,conservative
"Honestly its more about research and knowing who/what you are voting for. Age doesn't really matter, but generally the older the more mature you are. ",Aloha_Tradin_Co,e9e7q47,conservative
You may fire when ready.,checkmate14,e9c2pmj,conservative
Rebel scum,Delta_25,e9bzo5d,conservative
I laughed ,freightofheights,e9c6u6x,conservative
"Jim Acosta, you called it an invasion.

Trump, yes I did.

Jim Acosta, but it is not an invasion.

Trump, but I believe it is.

Jim Acosta (now crying) but I said it wasn't and I will tell mom.
",Conservativeone,e9c904n,conservative
"This bickering is pointless! House committe, release the funds!",TangoFoxtr0t,e9d8986,conservative
I wish the left would take this seriously and make fools out of themselves.,xJownage,e9c3f4u,conservative
"A surprise to be sure, but a welcome one.",ponmbr,e9cy7jp,conservative
"That's no moon.

It's Michael Moore.",TheComedianGLP,e9dgkue,conservative
">The Death Star will fire at the caravan, obliterating the ""invading army"" from reaching the U.S., and likely destroying the entire planet as well.

Using a single reactor won't destroy a planet, it'll definitely wipe out the convoy and some of the surrounding area.",DarthT15,e9dmton,conservative
Dear diary... today the President played rough with me again... ❤,r-magnificient,e9ck7zb,conservative
Stormy Daniels?,ElbowWhisper,e9czi3t,conservative
"OC spam, also posted by OP under:            

>Trump fears 2020 Rerun see why (houseboimarket.com)           

     

",tau_decay,e9gk7yr,conservative
"I see the point, but from here on out the left en masse will vilify every Republican. Look what they did to Kavanaugh. They loathe Pence. And this includes the media who can make or break the swing voters. ",triggernaut,e9gio3j,conservative
"Archive link without pop ups

https://archive.fo/4UM6Z",Enzo_SAWFT,e9gg1ze,conservative
He’s a National Treasure.,niresangwa,e9dosqj,conservative
"If it turns out to be true, I'm going to roll my damn eyes the next time one of these people parrots that ""Trump is a threat to democracy"".

Because it's crap like this that *actually threaten democracy*.",AvdaxNaviganti,e9cdzb3,conservative
No... democrats steal an election? Say it ain’t so.,Wespiratory,e9clq7k,conservative
"Somebody posted on the other thread that Scott and Desantis had to file lawsuits or else they'd end up losing. Right on cue, Scott fights back. GOOD.",xJownage,e9c350v,conservative
"Oh look, that thing that never happens is happening again...",Starky_McStarkface,e9d1fxa,conservative
"This is outrageous. They've ""found"" enough votes to put Sinema over the top in AZ and now they are doing what they can to steal it from Rick Scott.",Sola__Fide,e9c3bnd,conservative
Counting every vote is a threat to democracy?,Brewster-Rooster,e9cnmde,conservative
"Democrats are in Totalitarian Mode at this point. They next time they grab power, they will probably never relinquish it. ",tifuforreal,e9cd00s,conservative
"Loading fake ballots onto a truck the day after election to be counted is a threat for sure. You know the lady in charge of this in Florida has been found doing this stuff before right?

And by the way, I don’t care which side you are on. If you are rigging elections, you’re a piece of shit to the highest degree.",Shotwe11,e9cq78w,conservative
"Every ballot counted? Like the ones in counties where there are somehow thousands more ballots than registered voters?

It's funny how every time there is a close race and the democrat is down in votes someone just happens to find a box of ballots in the trunk of a car or in some janitor's closet and those ballots are somehow 95% democrat votes. This happened in Washington in 2004, Minnesota in 2008, North Carolina, Florida and Arizona this year and probably many more.  

Not to mention that this specific one happened in Broward county where this has happened before. Also, the election commissioner had been convicted of election fraud just two years ago and has been involved in numerous other fraudulent activities. ",deathwheel,e9d2thw,conservative
Projection much?,Hip_Hop_Hippos,e9cl5jm,conservative
"We need a full federal investigation into where those votes came from and why they weren't counted originally.

also the only threats to democracy are the people who are trying to overturn the results of an election in 2016",ExpensiveMention,e9cwaq0,conservative
Count every vote...even the fake ones!,justhere2havefun,e9dbk8s,conservative
Projection much?,wynhdo,e9cr4ik,conservative
When have republicans done anything like this or anything resembling totalitarian behavior?,deathwheel,e9d2x3i,conservative
Allowing Kemp to be in charge of an election that he was running in? ,itsNick_,e9doqp9,conservative
"Maybe it is far past time for some form of licensing for 'journalists'.

I am no fan of occupational licensing in general, but maybe an exception needs to be made here.

It seems to me a 'free' press being germane to our system of governance almost demand some type of objective standard be constructed by an association outside the realm of government control and open to public hearings and debate. 
    
What we have now is pure insanity and I do not see how it can continue to any good end. ",ozric101,e9df9sh,conservative
Jim Acosta is a journalist?,mikecx79,e9deqta,conservative
More government won't fix it,tehForce,e9dfqsd,conservative
Why are you posting pro-refugee propaganda here?,PrawnsAreOk,e9e853w,conservative
What a crock of shit. ,JMB_was_a_god,e9ejgox,conservative
">In fact, the German people have no unique genetic heritage to protect. They—and all other Europeans—are already a mishmash, the children of repeated ancient migrations, according to scientists who study ancient human origins. New studies show that almost all indigenous Europeans descend from at least three major migrations in the past 15,000 years, including two from the Middle East. Those migrants swept across Europe, mingled with previous immigrants, and then remixed to create the peoples of today.

Let be real here, by mingled they mean murdered the men and kept the women as sex slaves.  That's how human migrations work.  Groups that refuse to keep invaders out soon end up with almost the males dead and their women as wives of the new people.  Groups that tend to survive such migrations intact tend to be more hostile to outsiders and more warlike than average.",StraightNewt,e9e7f6r,conservative
So a pro-refugee piece that seeks to establish there seeks to undermine the cultural identify of native Europeans. This plays into the narrative that such a massive population flow is nothing to be concerned about and hence by implication don't pay any attention to the ethnic problems that bedevilled Europe up to the enforcement of homogenatity immediately post WWII by vast internal flows caused by that war.,Manach_Irish,e9e7gzj,conservative
President Trump has signed an executive order to deny asylum to migrants who enter the country illegally.,LumpyWumpus,e9dc6p2,conservative
"It's ok as a first step, but why is asylum even being considered for the ones who do it at a port of entry?

If they are fleeing some type of persecution in their own country then Mexico, being a safe country, should be more than sufficient to get away from their own country. Why would they spend weeks traveling hundreds of miles through a perfectly acceptable country just to get to ours, for any reason other than to milk the system of our generosity? ",CAGUnion404,e9di270,conservative
McSally in Arizona appears to be having her seat robbed as she is now behind in a recount. I’m speechless,PurpleHouseSlippers,e9cozpy,conservative
Arizona elections are always like they. They never call it until days after. Now Florida is some shady shit. ,Zac1245,e9crc60,conservative
What evidence is there that it’s being robbed? How do you know the recount is inaccurate?,Hotal,e9croxq,conservative
"Babylon Bee nails it again. 
",Dunkeliness,e9bhfpr,conservative
Thats a spicy one from the Bee.  ,timbowen,e9bkcvg,conservative
"Trump: I'm going to choose your successor.

RBG: I know. <*woosh*>",Anti-Decimalization,e9bnpkd,conservative
I’m liberal and even I think this is funny,FalcoonnnnPUNCH,e9ccxsz,conservative
Obama gonna break her out with a thermal detonator,UltraSurvivalist,e9c2tv0,conservative
Looks like Boba Fett's guys dropped her.  Don't tell Jabba.,tehForce,e9bvvki,conservative
"They joke, but one of the top comments in the /r/politics thread was

>I hope she has whatever the opposite of a DNR is - a keep alive at all costs form. Even if she's brain dead, keep her hooked up and ""alive""

",JuliusEvolasGhost,e9dewp3,conservative
I swear to God if she dies in the next two years the Dems will do a Weekend at Bernie's with her to stave off another appointment,greatatdrinking,e9coj6f,conservative
Cortez: Yoosa say people gonna die?  Gib dem free insurance Ani!,Lustan,e9btm85,conservative
"I read one that said she fell because she leaned too far left. Sorry not sorry, that's hilarious, ",GladysCravesRitz,e9cxmy0,conservative
I find tonnes of Trump jokes hilarious too. ,Glochidiate,e9cm6z6,conservative
Jar Jar was wayyyy smarter,MastaSchmitty,e9byoql,conservative
"I confess I tune out a lot of news these days. I am vaguely familiar through headlines but I don’t know details (I finally got sick of all the sensationalism so I haven’t been reading too many articles). Can someone please help me with this one...

“Critics have long noted that extended wait times at ports of entry may not be an option for migrants fleeing danger in their home countries.”

Even assuming they all have valid asylum requests, extended wait times “not being an option” doesn’t make sense to me. The danger they’ve been fleeing in their home countries hasn’t been following them as they’ve been walking thousands of miles, but suddenly it’s an issue once they get to the border? Something about “if it smells like bullshit...” comes to mind, but since I haven’t been following this in depth, maybe I’m missing something?

E: why are you downvoting a legitimate question? At a minimum, I’d think I’d get an “it *is* bullshit” response. I have been leaning more to the right lately as I’ve been hearing nothing but the same BS script in the far-left city I’m in, and I am sincerely curious as to your thoughts on this. ",GreenEyesClementine,e9cuz11,conservative
"Dude, don't worry about the downvotes, it's most likely the first wave of brigade downvotes this sub gets daily.

As far as your question: it's all bullshit. If they really wanted asylum, they can request it, and must by law, in the first safe country they reach. By bypassing Mexico, they are saying one of two things; they don't want asylum, or Mexico isn't safe. The latter is bullshit, and the former is grounds for denial and deportation.",Cr8er,e9cygfo,conservative
"Thank you. Yes, I’m late to the game, and a big reason why I’ve tuned it out is because all I get is the left’s typical outrage script - there is no discussion where I am and asking questions is a big no-no (as I’m sure you all know already). I’d rather disagree with you (I don’t here) than even attempt to have a conversation with the left these days. I’m more of a lurker than a commenter here, but damn are the different views on this sub a breath of fresh air from what I normally hear. ",GreenEyesClementine,e9czm3b,conservative
"Solutions simple, ask for asylum through a legitimate portal or take Mexico up on their offer.  
But don't expect to come here and get anything just cause you showed up and crossed illegally.   
  
This isn't a US problem until they set foot on our soil, until then this is a Mexico problem and Mexico needs to solve their problem before making it our problem.   
",MonkeyWrench,e9e78bk,conservative
There is no legitimate reason for them to be two days past what the law allows on this. ,Buddha_Punch,e9cbx1o,conservative
LBJ won his senate seat with a ballot box of 200 votes that showed up at the last moment putting him 14 votes ahead. It was about to be opened up an examined in court for the first time when LBJ got a Supreme Court Justice to throw it out. Barely stole the election. ,thebroncoman8292,e9cc16b,conservative
What a gorgeous thumbnail.,xJownage,e9c8sh6,conservative
"She's a *beautiful* and *magnificent* woman. 

This photo simply exemplifies the level of scrutiny she will use when overseeing the vote ~~manipulation~~ counting, as is traditionally displayed by the body language of a squinting eye. ",PrawnsAreOk,e9c968y,conservative
No reason to cross that out when we all know it's true. ,xJownage,e9c9jv3,conservative
Yeah good luck with that Tony.. thankfully it’s harder to fudge the numbers for the overwhelmingly republican state chambers.,niresangwa,e9dhj9t,conservative
GayPatriot on Twitter has been using the name Jim Accoster for the past day or two.,pfildeez,e9egcji,conservative
"Hurrumph. And here I thought *I'd* originated the Jim Acosta/Accost joke... I'd been saving it and finally used it two days ago. Looks like I'm not that original after all :(
https://www.reddit.com/r/Conservative/comments/9v1gvk/trump_stops_briefing_to_berate_cnns_jim_acosta/e99cxth/

Is it very widespread?",MisterMouser,e9eie78,conservative
"I think it's just one of those things that fits so perfect that several people naturally thought of it, kind of like the Anthony Weiner situation, or the second Anthony Weiner situation. I'm just surprised I haven't actually seen or heard any of them until now.

I also like how the two jokes mentioned in the comments here and my own all slightly vary. Accoster, Accost ya, Accost-her. That guy's name was clearly a powder-keg just waiting for a reason to be made fun of.",misespises,e9f0b4v,conservative
"Yeah, I kinda knew it was obvious and I did wonder why people weren't making those jokes. I was really just feigning perturbation. Let's hope it catches on more, because it is perfect wordplay for many of the situations he gets into.",MisterMouser,e9f9op3,conservative
"There is always people saying ""We should concede this issue"" be it abortion or now healthcare. This isn't really a path forward. If you continue to abandon your positions, you lose. What we should be doing is better explaining why Obamacare was worse than the status quo before it (because it is). So not only should it be repealed by its own merits, we can than work on a new healthcare law to address the real issues that Democrats never even bothered to correct (healthcare costs). Accessibility was never the issue, it was costs that were the issue. Make costs affordable and competitive and people will have no problem getting their healthcare needs taken care of.

&#x200B;

Unfortunately Republicans are really shitty about narrative control and getting their message out (part of the problem being the media is a propaganda arm of the Democrats). We don't need to abandon this issue, but we can allow it to drop in our priority list. Address the problems that Americans agree need to be corrected.",ultimis,e9eabt6,conservative
Said for a while concede health care only under the pretense the GOP gets full control of drafting immigration reform and defense. They like bundling stuff together there you go.,Enzo_SAWFT,e9eeymw,conservative
"Depends on what you mean by more government intervention.

- Government intervention to guarantee price transparency throughout the medical-industrial complex, yes.

- Government intervention to break the AMA's stranglehold on the supply of doctors (we have almost 25% fewer per capita than in Europe), yes.

- Government intervention to outlaw anticompetitive practices in state-level healthcare-related industries/government, yes.

Government payment for healthcare, a thousand times no.",paulbrook,e9f73y9,conservative
"We lost the battle to control the narrative on Obamacare when McCain fucked us. If we can find a way to make costs affordable then great, I recant my statement, but we now have to do that in a way a democratic house will approve. We don't have to endorse medicare for all, but something needs to be done on prices so people stop caring about healthcare so much. Doing nothing allows the Democrats to continue to run on healthcare (and win).",anewleafthrowaway5,e9eda4p,conservative
"I would agree to it, but the vocal minority of dems would probably rage over conceding immigration. We NEED to find a way fix immigration regardless though.",anewleafthrowaway5,e9ekc3d,conservative
I don’t love the idea (just because I don’t want to concede) but it might be what we need.,jina100,e9ejkpm,conservative
"They are the ones who screwed up on Healthcare, how are they winning on it? Yes McCain truly did screw us, there is no doubt. I don't see how Democrats look favorably on this because Republicans were unable to fix their mess. They screwed this up, it is on them. They also refused to work with Republicans to address those issues.",ultimis,e9edj7z,conservative
"In reality it isn't our fault, but in every exit poll for the past 2 years when health care is listed as someone's biggest issue they say they vote democrat. They vote republican if they say immigration or economy. It is clear many voters are against the Republicans because of health care. 40% said health care was the biggest issue in the midterms and they strongly went democrat. I don't like it either because thats the reality, and without the house we have no possible way to enact conservative health care. We either allow them to continue running on it or put it to bed.",anewleafthrowaway5,e9ee195,conservative
"It wasn’t a reporter. It was a transgender activist who was shouting and protesting against LGBT deportation. The people who were clapping weren’t the press corps, they were guests from the general public invited to the speech. 

Edit: [Video: Transgender woman heckles Obama](https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/jun/25/barack-obama-heckled-transgender-woman-gay-pride-white-house), [more info](https://www.nytimes.com/2015/06/25/us/politics/activist-removed-after-heckling-obama-at-lgbt-event.amp.html) ",wine_o_clock,e9bcsxc,conservative
This doesn’t seem to be the same thing Trump did yesterday.  But Obama did refuse conservative reporters access to the news pool on Air Force One.  That wasn’t over rude behavior that was just conflicting ideology.,nooneuknow42,e9b4j3n,conservative
"This is just a picture, not the video in question. Would have been nice to post the video so I could see it for myself.",Nevaknosbest,e9b50ba,conservative
Obama had a heckler. Trump had a journalist.,bobzilla509,e9cjpfu,conservative
https://youtu.be/HpF9ObMoIDc?t=142,CHAD_THE_INCEL_SLAYR,e9b6me2,conservative
[removed],,e9aw1q3,conservative
"We're all aware that Trump is way more outspokenly hostile to criticism than any president in modern history, and doesn't have any attachment for things like decorum, politeness, or fairness as stand-alone concepts, right? He's been pretty explicit about his views that lying is okay if it helps you get what you want, and ""good"" is synonymous with ""on my side"".  I don't get the need to drum up flimsy justifications of his behavior, when the president himself is generally unashamed to admit that he did something because he wanted to, and he can do it because he's in charge. ",BaronVonFunke,e9bacoy,conservative
"The white house -press interaction is a PRIVLAGE  the white house does not need to have these conferences or a press secratary or a press core that flys around. 

Its a privlage, Acosta among others has been abusing that privlage, its about time something was done.",Manchurainprez,e9b99wp,conservative
"Liberal hypocrisy is no longer surprising, in fact it's expected. ",SilverHerfer,e9b2lao,conservative
The most striking difference is the entire press corps sucking it up to Obama. Just no professional distance there. They are all fanboys. Tittering at his every rehearsed joke. Sort of like he is the love god embodied in their leftist orgy of love and he can do no wrong.,Lepew1,e9bbaer,conservative
"I think OP was going for the video that corresponds with the link below.... I know Obama kicked Fox out of the press briefings at one point, I just couldn't sort through you tube on my work PC to find it

[“We’re going to treat them the way we would treat an opponent,” she says. “We don’t need to pretend that this is the way that legitimate news organizations behave.” - White House staffer, 2009, concerning Fox News](https://www.newsweek.com/when-obama-went-war-fox-news-632424)",Jizzlobber42,e9br21z,conservative
Democrats are such HYPOCRITES.,StephenScherer1,e9bkw1c,conservative
[deleted],,e9bl7dp,conservative
[deleted],,e9btjb5,conservative
Wish op would correct the headline. If what you posted is true.  Truth has to start somewhere.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9biq5z,conservative
Man he was charismatic. ,Enyalius3-3-3,e9bn1dw,conservative
"> It wasn’t a reporter.

I would argue that's not the part that really matters. It's the fact it's wasn't a question-and-answer period like it was with Acosta and Trump but instead a speech. Obviously interrupting a speech is rude and dumb but if this activist was asking Obama a question during a designated period it should be no different. I think there's far too much clout around the ""the press"" and it creates this different class of citizen. You should not need to be apart of some aristocratic class of journalists to get the privilege of asking a politician a question. 

The problem with this example is that the activist asked made a scene at an inappropriate time, not the fact she wasn't a priestly ordained ""journalist"".",Glochidiate,e9clysu,conservative
"Every modern president has had a contentious relationship with the press, but Trump takes it to a new level. ",TrueBirch,e9c0nfc,conservative
"The woman Acosta “Struck” should have just filed charges and that would have given them more cover to do this. 

That being said I think they did the right thing by banning Acosta.",SnickersReese,e9baumq,conservative
[This article details the hypocritical nature of the press corps](https://www.washingtonexaminer.com/opinion/its-ok-to-hurl-questions-at-the-president-until-it-isnt). They are outraged when a conservative reporter interrupts a democrat president but are silent as reporters sink to new lows daily with a Republican president.,ngoni,e9bw8hp,conservative
https://twitter.com/almostjingo/status/1022297569337077765,cons_NC,e9b6etb,conservative
"
This clip documents an incident which took place at a July 2015 event at the White House in honor of LGBT Pride Month. President Obama was delivering a speech (not taking questions at a press conference) when a protester (not a reporter) interrupted and shouted at him to demand an end to the deportation of LGBT immigrants:

An activist interrupted President Obama at a White House event celebrating L.G.B.T. Pride Month to demand an end to the deportation of L.G.B.T. immigrants. The activist was escorted from the room amid a chorus of boos and jeers from the assembled guests.

The activist, Jennicet Gutiérrez, who is transgender and says she is in the country illegally, interrupted Mr. Obama shortly after he began speaking, calling from the back of the room, “President Obama, release all L.G.B.T.Q. immigrants from detention and stop all deportations!”

President Obama displayed little patience with the heckler, telling her, “You’re in my house” before having her removed.
  

Edit to say this is an excerpt from snopes.",ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9bj2va,conservative
https://www.cnn.com/2015/06/24/politics/obama-heckler-white-house-lgbt/index.html,TangoFoxtr0t,e9c0hzt,conservative
"Wrong, the journalist Obama threw out was from the Daily Caller.

Lie some more....",SuperCharged2000,e9kae0z,conservative
I felt a chill up my leg on that one.,Lepew1,e9bb23j,conservative
Wow Obama was a fascist too? /s,steampunker13,e9bcpea,conservative
There's no bias here....,,e9bc7q9,conservative
Is it ever possible for Biden to not be the creepiest lookin dude in a room?,The_Mighty_Rex,e9bi0fy,conservative
"Funny though that in that video Wolf Blitzer called it an ""awful situation"" for a heckler to interrupt the president.",justhere2havefun,e9b2vu8,conservative
Go back to /r/politics. ,VirginWizard69,e9ayq7k,conservative
"Did the reporter smack an intern? Was Acosta escorted out mid conference?

Your right Acosta acted much worse and was treated much more leniently. ",greeneyedunicorn2,e9azcxo,conservative
[deleted],,e9b462a,conservative
"[Harry Reid](https://www.huffingtonpost.com/ayobami-olugbemiga/harry-reid-gives-shameful-response-to-his-attack-on-mitt-romneys-taxes_b_6999996.html) and [Obama](https://www.realclearpolitics.com/articles/2014/08/13/too_bad_obama_didnt_follow_his_own_advice_123650.html) would like you to not forget about them!

Also the NY times would like you to consider Obama's track record with the press:
https://www.nytimes.com/2016/12/30/opinion/sunday/if-donald-trump-targets-journalists-thank-obama.html",ngoni,e9bws5h,conservative
Uh what. ,mw3noobbuster,e9bpkzj,conservative
_privilege_,malevolent_maelstrom,e9bdbrf,conservative
How did he abuse it?,mutt_butt,e9ba8nw,conservative
"Lefties dont care about hypocricy, half of their policies are contradictory ",Manchurainprez,e9b9bgc,conservative
Wasn't that in the middle east?,glwilliams4,e9brtej,conservative
I think the press took it to a new level,billswinthesuperbowl,e9c8zil,conservative
Hello Mr Obama Apologist,0b1w4n,e9cbuii,conservative
"From the video I saw, it didn’t look like she was ‘struck’. However, anyone can file charges and let law enforcement investigate. People these days lose track of the difference between allegations and convictions.",linklitter,e9bdim3,conservative
"If she had been in fact struck, I’m sure she would have.",iHaveAMicroPenis12,e9cbq36,conservative
"> That being said I think they did the right thing by banning Acosta.

I'm in the camp of ""right thing for wrong reasons"". 

The shit Acosta pulled at the N. Korea meetings was beyond disgusting. He was basically trying to undermine negotiations to make Trump look bad. It was revolting and so partisan. I don't agree with the whole ""he abused a woman"" narrative but don't expect tears from me that Acosta got the boot.",Glochidiate,e9cm4dj,conservative
"File Charges? Please, stop being so partisan.",jay_dar,e9bbaj1,conservative
"He’s a man, she’s a woman,  shouldn’t he just roll over and show his belly?  What an example of white male patriarchy.",nooneuknow42,e9c66x7,conservative
She is a victim of workplace violence.,Lepew1,e9bb4mj,conservative
Was it a reporter or lgbt heckler like posted above?  It makes a big difference.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9biu6c,conservative
"Ur doing God's work, thanks",Nevaknosbest,e9b6ou7,conservative
"I would disagree and say he showed quite a bit of patience. He let it go on for a full minute and a half before asking secret service to remove her from the room. Even said she could stay if she would just shutup. Not defending anyone, just assessing the situation with my eyeballs and calling it how I see it.",Nevaknosbest,e9bjk95,conservative
"Do you ever stop lying? I mean, seriously, it's all lies all the time.

Neil Munro heckled Obama when he wasn't taking questions, a bit different than what you're saying. Grow some morals dude.

[https://www.politico.com/blogs/politico44/2012/06/obama-interrupted-by-heckling-reporter-126301](https://www.politico.com/blogs/politico44/2012/06/obama-interrupted-by-heckling-reporter-126301)",BlueOrange,e9l2b6z,conservative
Unironically yes,cucumba_water,e9d29bg,conservative
[removed],,e9az9ez,conservative
*you’re,IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e9b0hpw,conservative
[removed],,e9b48td,conservative
"His question was asked and answered and when president trump called on the next reporter, he threw a tantrum and refused to give up his microphone. Did you not see the video? ",VeryMint,e9bacuu,conservative
"I think more reporters need to call him out on his bullshit to be honest...  
Now the White house is gaslighting the American people with fake news videos...  
I have to admit though, it's all very entertaining from an outsiders perspective :)",RobotXander,e9cod7n,conservative
"They set you up by only accepting one answer, that they are right and you are wrong. Not even a discussion to get there, just ""You're all Nazis and racist and white people suck."" That is only if you happen to not agree. That's not even a disagreement with them. You could be completely neutral but they need you to take a side. Because they aren't divisive at all, y'see.

They have a problem with Trump saying, ""Stop being lying dicks."" Why? Because calling out lying dicks is considered a dick move. Liberals have become masters of projection.",Buce-Nudo,e9cahfr,conservative
Hello Mr Trump Apologist,digitag,e9clv5t,conservative
It was no worse than what Adam Sandler did to that poor flight attendant on Anger Management.,JackFucington,e9bzmkw,conservative
He karate chopped her. There is even video evidence of it,SnickersReese,e9cdrdt,conservative
Yeah I kind of agree. I’m just glad to see him go. He was definitely mentally unstable.,SnickersReese,e9cu0zs,conservative
I mean it would have been in her right to do so. I think it would be good just to give the WH more cover to get rid of Acosta. It would be hard to argue it didn’t happen with video evidence and charges filled. Of course the media is full of retards with room temperature IQs so who knows.,SnickersReese,e9bbg9g,conservative
"Exactly.  This wasn't some horrible beat down, but if you attempted to strong arm a co-worker and refused to hand over a file or something, I'm pretty sure every single person in the office would consider that to be out of line.",Telineye,e9bk2tu,conservative
"She was thrust into a combat situation. Albeit, a small one. I bet she’s never tried to pull a microphone away from a grown man in front of the world before. ",SonOfSite,e9bfplp,conservative
[It was a heckler.](https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2015/jun/25/barack-obama-heckled-transgender-woman-gay-pride-white-house),81toog,e9bnswi,conservative
"People acting like these situations are the same just want to play goal keeper.

1) Acosta asked a question and was answered

2) Acosta attempted to continue to ask questions and was informed it wasn’t his turn

3) Acosta continued

4) The intern is directed to get the mic and Acosta resists

5) Eventually the mic is handed over

It SHOULD have ended there then his press pass revoked citing his inability to respect the time of the other reporters trying to ask questions. The President should not have berated him and should not have clapped back at the next guy with “I’m not a fan of your either” all around lack of professionalism.

The Obama situation was a speech not a press conference, was a protester not a reporter, why is this even being brought up its beyond me.",BigAggie06,e9bnh85,conservative
Sorry - it was cut and pasted from snopes - I agree with you.,ithinkitwasmygrandma,e9boe3t,conservative
What Obama did was worse. ,VirginWizard69,e9azc8z,conservative
[removed],,e9b4wsj,conservative
"How was his question answered lol? Being accountable to press who you disagree with, or who have an agenda, is part of being POTUS. Hell its part of being a politician in any civilised democratic nation in the world. Revoking a  respected journalist’s credentials because they ask you tough questions or challenge your policies and statements is tantamount to actively gagging them. Even if they are attacking you, the right thing to do is respond to their question in a level headed manner. 

Whatever side you are on, that accountability and sense of professional respect for people who you disagree with has completely gone out the window with Trump. It’s a worrying precedent, which should leave anyone concerned with basic democracy worried about how this president may behave over a whole host of issues, if he has the opportunity. ",digitag,e9cm6fv,conservative
Saw the video. Don't think that getting into a heated exchange with Trump amounted to 'abusing' a privilege. Thanks for the reply.,mutt_butt,e9ban41,conservative
I didn’t see the difference between the supposed doctorered cideonit just looked zoomed in,billswinthesuperbowl,e9cscw1,conservative
"I'm not an apologist for any president. But if my employees acted like he does at work, I'd probably fire them. It's not appropriate.",TrueBirch,e9d0nqe,conservative
"Do you even know what a real karate chop looks like? I see more violence during my morning commute on the subway. Jesus, ya bunch of snowflakes.",iHaveAMicroPenis12,e9cnxqq,conservative
Or they could have just refused his access for his blatant erratic behavior for the past two years instead of trying to force this issue lol.,_yuengling,e9bipvi,conservative
"Ummmm.... is it really her job to pull a mic from someone... or isn't that the job of security?  


Think about it this way... is her job to take microphones away from people, or just to pass them around to the reporters in the room?

&#x200B;

Technically, she reached into HIS personal space.

&#x200B;

Honestly, it's stupid that this is the reason they used. ",tomowudi,e9bt9pp,conservative
Combat situation?  You can't be serious. ,PatrickJane,e9c5kr6,conservative
[removed],,e9b1s03,conservative
His privilege is him getting to ask a question and participate in the process led by Trump. That’s like a kid getting the privilege of recess in grade school and then throwing a tantrum when recess end because he wants to stay. ,VeryMint,e9bb1oa,conservative
"The abuse comes in when Acosta refuses to respect the time of the other parties involved. He asked a question and was asked, his turn is over, he chose to ignore that and continue. There are other reporters there who have questions and have a limited window of time in which to do so.

I’m not a Trump supporter, I don’t think he is a conservative and he is erratic, I don’t generally defend him and I don’t believe his response was appropriate for his office but Acosta was clearly in the wrong.",BigAggie06,e9bntye,conservative
If your employees acted like who does? Trump or Acosta?,digitag,e9d3jqs,conservative
"> is her job to take microphones away from people, or just to pass them around to the reporters in the room?

Why are you fighting a teenage girl over a microphone?

No one was hurt or anything, but what sort of classless buffoon are you to do that?
",lipidsly,e9bvvr5,conservative
That's some incredible mental gymnastics. You should compete professionally. In no sense is Abilio Acosta the victim in this situation. ,ngoni,e9bwk87,conservative
So her job is only to GIVE Reporters the microphone and not take it away.........Interesting mental gymnastics you have there.,SnickersReese,e9c1ant,conservative
/s,SonOfSite,e9c7081,conservative
Go back to r/politics,VirginWizard69,e9b1ujm,conservative
I meant Trump in this case,TrueBirch,e9f1mq5,conservative
"I don't think anyone behaved well.

I don't Trump behaved well - he was dismissive and interrupted Acosta 4 times before not answering his question. And to be fair, it's not a bad question. It wasn't a ""Does your wife care that you cheat on her?"" Question. It's about this stupid caravan that Homeland Security doesn't seem worried about.

I personally have a problem that he spent $300 million on this nonsense to tweak an election. If that's true... that's some bullshit and I don't want other Presidents to do that either.

Acosta was being a dick about refusing to give up the mic.

And the girl... I feel bad for her. She's caught in the middle of this nonsense. She reached into his personal space, but I imagine if she didn't she might have felt she'd be fired. She should have called for security or just stuck her hand out and politely asked for the mic rather than snatching it, but she should be forgiven for being flustered and trying to snatch it. It's a high pressure situation for her, and her choice was suboptimal for how messy this was.

Obama froze out Fox... that's a way of playing favorites, and when he crossed a line the Press closed ranks against him. He pretty much walked up to the line in regards to Fox, but he didn't really cross it.

Trump is crossing it in my view, in a way that is... potentially dangerous. Lindsey Graham has pointed out his tendency to do this in general, so it shouldn't be unreasonable to point out.",tomowudi,e9cuh7o,conservative
Deserves a gold medal,billswinthesuperbowl,e9c91nl,conservative
"Interesting use of a semantic argument - intentionally misunderstanding the point is not actually a rebuttal.

I was pretty specific - there is a difference between the difference between a bouncer and a cocktail waitress. My point is that she isn't a bouncer, she's a waitress. Last I checked if someone is causing a ruckus, the waitress has no obligation to wrestle them.

But sure, if you want to distort that point with a semantic argument, that is certainly something you can do.

It's not intellectually honest, but evidently you are a fan of intellectual contortionism.",tomowudi,e9cthj3,conservative
"Fair enough, think we’re on the same page.",digitag,e9f6hkj,conservative
"> I don't Trump behaved well - he was dismissive and interrupted Acosta 4 times before not answering his question.

He answered it fairly and pretty respectfully “my opinion is that its an invasion and thats different from yours” quite well tempered for trump especially with acosta. Acosta then continued pushing which is where trump started interuppting him because hed already answered his question and acosta was onviously full of it

>300 million 

what?

>his personal space

Because he was refusing to give up the mic when he was quite presumptious in asking multiple questions unlike everyone else. He continued to ask them and hog the mic after the *president* had to tell him *multiple times* to move on. Children dont behave that way

>she should be forgiven

She can tbe forgiven because she did nothing wrong. “Journalists” like acosta should give up the mic the very second theyre asked. The fact she had to come take it from him at all is 100% on acosta and shed have been right to wrench it from him

>didnt really cross it

He had the nsa spy on a fox news reporter because he said bad things about him...

",lipidsly,e9cvybu,conservative
Again mental gymnastics. If you weren’t trying to make excuses you would realize that her job is to control White House Property (The Microphone). There is no way the procedure would be for her to call security wait for security to come and then take the microphone while the White House loses total control of the press conference. No workplace would have two separate people control the microphone (One to give and one to take away). But I know Orange Man is Bad,SnickersReese,e9ctwi3,conservative
"If someone interrupts you 4 times as you are trying to ask a question, is that them treating you fairly? C'mon, we can be objective about this. Trump was annoyed with Acosta and tried to bully him. Acosta certainly is a bully with his questions, but if he was interviewing say, Obama like this, you'd be cheering him on as a great reporter, right?

And the last headlines I read estimate that the troop deployment to the border is going to cost us taxpayers $300 Million, which sounds about right given that we're sending 14000 troops for approximately 1400 people. Which... seems excessive, to say the least.

Yes, he was being a dick with the mic. Clearly she would have been just as effective at getting it from him if she had waited obviously and patiently with an outstretched hand. She's the equivalent of a cocktail waitress and Acosta is a drunk at the bar. When you've got a drunk, do you let the waitress or the bouncer deal with things? 

And fair point - that's similar to the SS interviewing Eminem and Kathy Griffin, so sure, Obama crossed a line that time. But Trump, by comparison, is a habitual line crosser. The point I care about is that crossing the line is bad every time, and Trump does it often enough that it is reasonably concerning to people like me that miss Reagan Republicans.",tomowudi,e9cwuh4,conservative
"You are saying her job is to be the bouncer, not the waitress?

I find that an interesting, if uncompelling argument.

I'd be curious to see where exactly in her job description it requires her to snatch microphones away from pushy reporters. 

Your semantic argument is cute, but let's be honest here. The expectation of her job does not require her to touch anyone unless she also happens to be trained as a stripper or a security professional. Clearly she wasn't trying to give Acosta a hand job, and clearly she was trying to snatch the mic back, and failed.

Because if she was hired for her ability to wrestle reporters, that was a stupid hiring decision.

This was outside her job description. An unfair situation for her to be in the middle of.

Acosta was a dick, and so was Trump, and she was caught in the middle and made a suboptimal call that was good for her with her boss and little else. 

But, I can see that you are getting triggered about all this, ;)",tomowudi,e9cxe7f,conservative
"> If someone interrupts you 4 times as you are trying to ask a question, is that them treating you fairly?

When im not supposed to be asking a question?

Yes, frankly the fact i was allowed to ask is generous

> C'mon, we can be objective about this. Trump was annoyed with Acosta and tried to bully him. Acosta certainly is a bully with his questions, but if he was interviewing say, Obama like this, you'd be cheering him on as a great reporter, right?

No, hed be incredibly disrespectful to the president of the united states. The only way i could see it being okay is if he was asking for a clarification because he misunderstood or misheard. So just a “could you repeat that”


> And the last headlines I read estimate that the troop deployment to the border is going to cost us taxpayers $300 Million, which sounds about right given that we're sending 14000 troops for approximately 1400 people. Which... seems excessive, to say the least.

>1400

Try 14,000

And id pay 1 billion to keep them out. Its a killer savings in the long run


> Yes, he was being a dick with the mic. Clearly she would have been just as effective at getting it from him if she had waited obviously and patiently with an outstretched hand. She's the equivalent of a cocktail waitress and Acosta is a drunk at the bar. When you've got a drunk, do you let the waitress or the bouncer deal with things?

You get a bouncer but dont victim blame the waitress for trying to do her job. And how sad it must be to be that drunk that security has to come get

> And fair point - that's similar to the SS interviewing Eminem and Kathy Griffin, so sure, Obama crossed a line that time. But Trump, by comparison, is a habitual line crosser. The point I care about is that crossing the line is bad every time, and Trump does it often enough that it is reasonably concerning to people like me that miss Reagan Republicans.

Following the letter of the law is very different than spying on people you dont like *for no reason* or sicking the IRS on groups you dont like

Youre comparing grapes to watermelons
",lipidsly,e9cx9hk,conservative
"Trump called on him. He didn't have to. So, false premise on your first point. Trump called on him and then interrupted him. This is normal for Trump, I am not sure why it's a point worth disputing? Dude wasn't elected because of how courteous he is.

As for this idea that the POTUS deserves more respect than any other citizen - that can only be true when they are held to a higher standard for their behavior. Reagan was deserving of respect. Let's not pretend the two are even remotely comparable with the standards they are held to. Trump was elected because he ""tells it like it is"". So he set the tone for ho much ""respect"" he is entitled to.

Acosta was a dick, and so was Trump.

But being a dick to get the truth is what reporters are paid to do, and Presidents are supposed to tell the truth. Especially at a Press conference. You really believe that the other reporters weren't interested in this story? This confrontation happened because Trump didn't like the question, because if it had been about the Stock Market Trump would have given Acosta all the time in the world.

And that fact matters in this conversation.

And I agree with you about how sad it is about the drunk, and how the waitress can be forgiven for suboptimal choices. I have not ""blamed"" the waitress... I simply pointed out that snatching mics from reporters is not her job, which is a point others are arguing.

And it's a stupid point to argue, because she doesn't fucking matter. There are 2 things that matter.

Acosta's behavior and intent, and Trump's behavior and intent.

Both of their behaviors sucked.

But I think Acosta's intent was more about revealing the truth, and Trump's was about concealing the truth, and that is a very important distinction.

And I already conceded that Obama crossed the line, I don't even recall the details, but it's really not important, because that was then and this is now, and right now I care about the truth.

So, where are you getting your numbers from?

The reporting I have seen in multiple sources is about 6500 people in the caravan, and only 20% are expected to actually make it to the border.

Here's the only source for the leaked memo I have: https://www.newsweek.com/migrant-caravan-terrorists-military-armed-1194456

It actually had the actual memo. Do you have information that I am missing?",tomowudi,e9cz1qq,conservative
"> Trump called on him. He didn't have to.

Right, for one question. It is a privilege, not a right, to be called on and you are not permitted to ask as many questions as you want

> So, false premise on your first point. Trump called on him and then interrupted him. 

When he started asking more questions than permitted

>This is normal for Trump, I am not sure why it's a point worth disputing? Dude wasn't elected because of how courteous he is.

He is being perfectly courteous. He is just not bending over and letting journalists shaft him, as is right and proper for the man who is allowing the reporter the question.

You just have a completely warped sense of what is courteous and what is not.
> 
> As for this idea that the POTUS deserves more respect than any other citizen - that can only be true when they are held to a higher standard for their behavior. Reagan was deserving of respect. Let's not pretend the two are even remotely comparable with the standards they are held to. Trump was elected because he ""tells it like it is"". So he set the tone for ho much ""respect"" he is entitled to.

That's a bunch of retarded hogwash and you know it. The respect comes with the position not for who holds it. 

> 
> Acosta was a dick, and so was Trump.

Trump was only a dick once Acosta was. That is perfectly fine.

> 
> But being a dick to get the truth is what reporters are paid to do,

Incorrect

> and Presidents are supposed to tell the truth. Especially at a Press conference. 

Incorrect again.

>You really believe that the other reporters weren't interested in this story?

It literally doesn't matter if they are.

> This confrontation happened because Trump didn't like the question, because if it had been about the Stock Market Trump would have given Acosta all the time in the world.

No, the confrontation happened because Acosta stepped out of the designated acceptable bounds because he's a self righteous asshole that believes himself above the protocols that every one else present was able to follow.

> And I agree with you about how sad it is about the drunk, and how the waitress can be forgiven for suboptimal choices. I have not ""blamed"" the waitress... I simply pointed out that snatching mics from reporters is not her job, which is a point others are arguing.

""I'm not blaming her for what she was wearing...""

Whatever dude, you know exactly what you're doing by shifting the focus on to her. Not only is she absolutely in the right to ""snatch"" the mic from Acosta, Acosta is absolutely in the wrong for her being in the situation of ""snatching"" the mic from him.

> And it's a stupid point to argue, because she doesn't fucking matter. There are 2 things that matter.
> 
> Acosta's behavior and intent, and Trump's behavior and intent.
> 
> Both of their behaviors sucked.

Trump was in the right for treating Acosta how he did. You have a completely pussified understanding of behavior and proper conduct so you see it as both being dicks when one absolutely deserves the response he received as a result of his actions.

> 
> But I think Acosta's intent was more about revealing the truth, 

Bullshit, nobody believes this, not even Acosta.

>and Trump's was about concealing the truth, and that is a very important distinction.

What are you even doing here?

> And I already conceded that Obama crossed the line, I don't even recall the details, but it's ***really not important,*** because that was then and this is now, and right now I care about the truth.

Of course it's not. It never is. Why would precedent matter to you? How could a literal crime committed by the past president, infringing on a private citizens rights compare to the current president not bending over backwards to be courteous to some asshole?

Pathetic


> 
> So, where are you getting your numbers from?
> 
> The reporting I have seen in multiple sources is about 6500 people in the caravan, and only 20% are expected to actually make it to the border.
> 
> Here's the only source for the leaked memo I have: https://www.newsweek.com/migrant-caravan-terrorists-military-armed-1194456
> 
> It actually had the actual memo. Do you have information that I am missing?

https://abcnews.go.com/International/trump-asserts-migrant-caravan-headed-us-includes-middle/story?id=58660279

This says 7.5k + but is conservative as we know there are stragglers and the ""loosely affiliated"" who don't count.",lipidsly,e9da518,conservative
Please take them,HolsterOfNuts,e9dneqt,conservative
Do it.,gizayabasu,e9dnwzv,conservative
Probably needs to donate her liver as well.,bigdaveyl,e9due1h,conservative
"if i was forced to choose between milano, a rabid leftist, and ginsburg, a reasonable liberal, i just have to say: anyone here know a doctor who would do this surgery on the down low?",SKWM3000,e9fsvaw,conservative
"and the tits, too",SKWM3000,e9gpn40,conservative
She offered her brain but there wasn't one.,chabanais,e9dtxx1,conservative
HAHAHAHAHAH,donjohn1986,e9eap4z,conservative
They really need to get a handle on their election process down there. This happens every damn time.,Wespiratory,e9cllos,conservative
"One good thing that I think is going to come of this is that the argument that lefties like to make claiming that voter fraud isn't a big deal will be completely nullified. I've never seen such blatant mishandling of elections anywhere else like it happens in Broward county. They're obviously just trying to ""find"" enough ballots to steal the elections away from Scott and DeSantis, and they're not even hiding it.",Hayes_for_days,e9d7rxy,conservative
How much longer will the public allow social media sites to openly set politically biased and hypocritically enforced rules?,raffu280,e9b7esf,conservative
"""Sure, they're *saying* threatening things, but they agree with me so I know they're really good and don't mean it""",burtmaklin1,e9b9bwn,conservative
When will antifa be labeled a terrorist organization like it deserves?,Aaron1570,e9bjo6a,conservative
Then they are responsible for the content on their site and should be sued.,zeldaisaprude,e9bbq64,conservative
"So if a law was made that imprisoned backpage creators because their site was used for prostitution, why can’t twitter execs be held responsible for enabling their users to break the law? Not saying I agree with it but just a thought. ",Dmfconrad,e9beye6,conservative
They approve of the terrorist group known as Antifa. ,J0kerr,e9bd17j,conservative
"I'm not surprised. The left likes to see themselves as ""victims of right-wing bigotry.""

So as far as they are concerned, those people were merely ""defending themselves.""",mikecx79,e9bjwf7,conservative
"And they wonder why the number of users is dropping.

Half of it is their excretable privacy policies and data mining, half of it is the blatant favoritism. There's something here for everyone to dislike. I can't imagine leftists being too pleased about their personal information being used for a huge corporation's profit.",ZarahCobalt,e9bluv1,conservative
Why isn't Tucker Carlson suing Twitter?  it is on Twitter where the addresses where posted,CreativeRoutine,e9c1k0t,conservative
REGULATE,LastationNeoCon,e9b8r9q,conservative
They are commies...,lax714,e9boflr,conservative
Terrorists deserve no mercy.,TakeMeToTheArch,e9btiep,conservative
Anti-fa and Nazies are two sides of the same coin,PerceivedShift,e9bqxjr,conservative
Does it help if we report them as hate speech? I know I did. Maybe we need a reporting mob just like  theirs. ,Mesicks,e9d0qf3,conservative
But look at what happens with our boy from the daily wire Michael Knowles,uriel2xa,e9bnddq,conservative
Facebook and Facebook*,Pointy_Nipples,e9crrqv,conservative
"Indefinitely.  

The only option to stop it is to not use those sites and either create or patronize politically neutral alternatives, gradually reducing the market share of Leftist ones. ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bfsob,conservative
"They just need to be enforced as publishers. If they want to curate content, that's fine. But they need to held accountable for what they allow on their platform then.",Drewbagger,e9cbwm4,conservative
"Until people stop using social media, which means never",Al_Gayda,e9bw1zc,conservative
As long as anyone who disagrees still uses it.  Delete Failbook,booblitchutz,e9byz28,conservative
At this rate forever. It keeps happening. We yell and complain. We ask: ‘What are we going to do about this?’ We do nothing and repeat. ,A_WildStory_Appeared,e9cplte,conservative
"Bullshit. These people make us on the left look terrible, not that we needed their help.

This is unacceptable.

Edit; If Alex Jones was deplatformed then these wackadoos should be as well. Charged with crimes too.

Edit 2; Smash Racism DC or whatever the fuck their ridiculous name is has been deleted off Twitter, but is still on Facebook. Unacceptable. People who call for harm to fall on those they disagree with should not be given the time of day.",ScramJiggler,e9byu4r,conservative
When we get a FBI and Justice Dept that the nation deserves again.,raffu280,e9bkq8p,conservative
I believe New Jersey has designated them as such.,unibuckeye,e9bmfeq,conservative
I thought they were.,dicaparly,e9boeh6,conservative
"after hundreds (or more) of Conservatives die, then *maybe* they will conisder it",CreativeRoutine,e9c1lsx,conservative
Because the people writing the laws are too busy sucking Dorsey's pencil dick to care.,dicaparly,e9bodu2,conservative
Boycott,eleete,e9bk8h8,conservative
"> create or patronize politically neutral alternatives, 

How? 

No credit card or payment processors will allow you to collect money to fund it (has happened to many people before, they've resorted to crypto, but that's a poor substitute for real money).

No US-based domain registrar will allow you to have a domain name though you might find a shady foreign one if your lucky, and if your unlucky one of the US based ones will just decide that they don't want to act as a registrar and then refuse to transfer the domain, effectively stealing it (has happened at least once recently).

No US-based hosting will allow you to purchase their services to host your content. If you are lucky, a sketchy off-shore host might allow you, but their sketchy (only allow payments in crypto), their slow since their not hosted in the us, and have poor uptime. This severely impacts any competitiveness that you might hope to have, and effectively rules out hosting streaming video of any kind.

Same for any major content delivery networks (CSNs), so that's another knock at any chance of competitiveness. 

No mainstream DDOS-protection service will do business with you, making you highly susceptible of attacks and a lot of downtime, and will likely get your hosting provider to drop you, if your constantly under DDOS attacks.

So, your solution to tech monopolies colluding to limit free speech is to rely on non-US companies, to do it for free (since they can't collect money), and to not bother trying to compete with services that require your site to be fast, have 99% uptime, or host video content. Yeah, sounds like a winning solution.",PrawnsAreOk,e9cc99y,conservative
Except they get shut down as soon as the media can find a reason. Just look at what happened to Gab,dicaparly,e9bobnj,conservative
"> The only option to stop it is to not use those sites and either create or patronize politically neutral alternatives, gradually reducing the market share of Leftist ones. 

literally impossible.",JMB_was_a_god,e9chj72,conservative
Then Write ur representatives,ExpensiveMention,e9csl9x,conservative
Or until conservatives wise up and remember that even there ancestors supported Regulation now and then,ExpensiveMention,e9cses0,conservative
"You already deleted it.

So why isnt it dying?

Every conservative in the world wouldnt even make a dent in Facebook",ExpensiveMention,e9csiwc,conservative
Alex Jones never called for violence like this,ExpensiveMention,e9csoi1,conservative
"""Again."" Since the cross dressing queen of blackmail started it, the FBI has been nothing but incredibly corrupt. ",PascalsRazor,e9cq239,conservative
Write to mathew whitaker. Tell him it needs to be,ExpensiveMention,e9csrc5,conservative
That escalated quickly ,Dmfconrad,e9bpv00,conservative
never works.,JMB_was_a_god,e9bm93s,conservative
well said!,JMB_was_a_god,e9chjcm,conservative
"Dont worry! Im sure some noble billionaire will fund a Facebook alternative that loses him money just for u!

/S

In reality the richest company in the world (google) already tried to dethrone Facebook. It didnt work

Even when they FORCED u to sign up",ExpensiveMention,e9cs9hu,conservative
"So itss not really an option

The public has 0 options to stop it

Wich is precisely why the govt exists

Because the ONLY option to stop it is a govt law 

",ExpensiveMention,e9cs502,conservative
"And that, ladies and gentlemen, is the liberal mindset in a nutshell.",booblitchutz,e9cu8ow,conservative
Its true tho.,ExpensiveMention,e9cssdn,conservative
[Boycott](https://i.pinimg.com/736x/97/a8/0e/97a80ed8356a560effcca23fd89890c1.jpg),ClosetFascist,e9ckvu7,conservative
"But Libertarians are still busy praying to ""muh invisible hand of free market"" and would never support govt action of any kind (unless its bailing out billionaires)

Conservatives need to step up and take our party back from the Libertarians that would destroy it on ""muh principles"". Libertarians already destroyed there own party. Dont let them ruin ours",ExpensiveMention,e9cs6ij,conservative
"Except im conservative but sure

Ur not conservative. Ur Libertarian.

And Libertarians are idiots who support an ideology thats killed more people than communism

They understand economics less than ocasio cortez
",ExpensiveMention,e9cuwai,conservative
Libertarianism boycotts in a nutshell,ExpensiveMention,e9csuiu,conservative
"No, pot heads destroyed the libertarian party. The issue with libertarians is that they have solid principles, but lack the historical context of their ideas put into action. A totally free market sounds good in theory, but so does communism. Its very different on paper than it is in practice, where you get that pesky thing called ""human nature"" thrown into the mix. We need a healthy balance of free markets and government control, and it seems the only people willing to have a debate over where that balance lies is conservatives and classical liberals.",dicaparly,e9cuz9z,conservative
"> And Libertarians are idiots who *support an ideology thats killed more people than communism*


I’m not sure who the idiot is here. ",justhere2havefun,e9dbt0f,conservative
"That comment 100%

Idk if it was just pitheads but everything else 100%


Ideologues are bad on either side

And Libertarians and communists are the 2 extremes of both sides. Both are probably equally bad in practice",ExpensiveMention,e9cv4wt,conservative
libertarianism has failed every time it's been tried. Every single time that lead to starvation oppression and murder,ExpensiveMention,e9df1ec,conservative
"You are ridiculously misinformed, lying, or trolling. ",justhere2havefun,e9dhssg,conservative
Why not all three?,booblitchutz,e9fg05o,conservative
">I am similarly acting to suspend, for a limited period, the entry of certain aliens in order to address the problem of large numbers of aliens traveling through Mexico to enter our country unlawfully or without proper documentation.  I am tailoring the suspension to channel these aliens to ports of entry, so that, if they enter the United States, they do so in an orderly and controlled manner instead of unlawfully.  Under this suspension, aliens entering through the southern border, even those without proper documentation, may, consistent with this proclamation, avail themselves of our asylum system, provided that they properly present themselves for inspection at a port of entry.


>But aliens who enter the United States unlawfully through the southern border in contravention of this proclamation will be ineligible to be granted asylum under the regulation promulgated by the Attorney General and the Secretary of Homeland Security that became effective earlier today.  Those aliens may, however, still seek other forms of protection from persecution or torture.  In addition, this limited suspension will facilitate ongoing negotiations with Mexico and other countries regarding appropriate cooperative arrangements to prevent unlawful mass migration to the United States through the southern border.  Thus, this proclamation is also necessary to manage and conduct the foreign affairs of the United States effectively.


This is good, certainly, but it is simply not enough.

We should NOT be entertain the idea that ANY of these people whom are passing though Mexico could possibly qualify for asylum. There are no civil wars or any other kind of wars occurring in Mexico. If said persons are truly fleeing from torture, they must sneak asylum in the first safe country they pass through. Traveling hundreds of miles through a perfectly safe country then throwing themselves at our boarder is not ""asylum seeking"", it is a SHAM to extract ill-gotten gains from our welfare system.",Silicon_Avatar,e9d177s,conservative
"> The most likely answer seems to be that white women vote for Republicans for the same reason that white men do: because they are racist.

You can’t make this stuff up.  They’re a real life satire.",Adarkes01,e9deqtm,conservative
lol i thought most democrats are supposed to be educated lol,donjohn1986,e9d8tbd,conservative
Why is this sexist racist going on about white women?,paulbrook,e9f55tl,conservative
Free thought isn’t allowed unless its correct though in the dem party,Dank_Cartographer,e9dadoa,conservative
"They hate themselves, apparently. ",ATableForOnePlease,e9d4b1f,conservative
"Do you think they really believe that, or are they knowingly manipulating through these crazy claims? 

I can't quite figure out which one would be worse.",DenSem,e9e77gx,conservative
No. Most Democrats are poor. There is also a small minority of elite people who vote Democrat because they are rich enough to not be effected by Democrat policies,SnickersReese,e9dbmk0,conservative
You're just parroting your daddy's and/or your spouse's viewpoints! /s,DBG1998,e9dlj7k,conservative
The 35% of White People who will still vote for a Democrat President are the ones who hate themselves ,SnickersReese,e9dbob6,conservative
"Based on the past couple years, they've actually started believing their propaganda.",SilverHerfer,e9e8tmw,conservative
"Until entitlements are cut, it's band-aids on bullet-wounds.",powest02,e9djkhw,conservative
It’s a hard position to take because nobody wants to be the one that cuts Medicare or defense spending.,XMAGA_1776X,e9diw89,conservative
Conservatives want the deficit cut. Emphasis on conservatives. Republican politicians do not want to cut it because they would have to cut welfare and such which would cause them to lose elections,phantomcut3,e9dm1k7,conservative
"The problem is that many neoconservatives, who infest the halls of the GOP establishment, embrace Hamilton's mantra that the national debt is a national blessing. They only rail against spending in elections and then do nothing whatsoever whenever they actually have power. This, in my view, is one of the reasons that we lost the House of Representatives. The last two budgets that they passed were almost as bad as the liberal budget in 2010. 

&#x200B;

The other issue is that these social programs have been permanently institutionalized by imperial presidents, their bureaucracies and the courts despite their dubious constitutionality. ",Sola__Fide,e9dkyyh,conservative
"First rule of combat medicine. There is no medicine in a gunfight. Step 1 of any combat lifesaving procedure is to suppress the enemy fire *before* doing anything else. 

That's the fight we're in right now. Stop the Left. Remove their ability to destroy the very foundation of the United States. We're taking heavy fire from the Left as we speak. That needs to be dealt with first before we can do *anything* else. I am more than willing to set aside other more long term policy goals for now while we deal with the dire emergency at hand. The Left is at war with the United States itself. They seek to undermine and destroy every Constitutional protection the founders put in place to prevent tyranny so they can make us all bend the knee to their collectivist utopia ideals. This needs to be stopped. *Everything* else is secondary to that in my mind.


And as far as the spending/deficit/debt issue goes, I honestly don't ever see it being solved.  I think by the year 2100, there will not be a United States in its current form. I can see a post Soviet style breakup taking place where instead of a civil war, the central government basically has to just let territory go because they can't afford to control it anymore. A sort of ""you're on your own"" dissolution of the United States. Thankfully we have a framework of state governments in place already so that when it happens, states can revert back to having sovereignty, and maybe in time a new union of those states can form. Sort of a ""declare bankruptcy, dissolve the company, and start over"" sort of deal. The federal government currently exerts control over the states via 3 means. Economics, law, and military. The feds dole out confiscated money to states in return for the states doing what the feds say. Then there are laws on the books that give the feds authority over a lot of what the states do. And finally the military is of course the big stick in the back pocket to keep things together. But all of those things cost money. They have to have money to dole out, they have to pay for federal police and courts, and of course pay for the military. So what happens when the feds *can't* pay for that stuff anymore? Sure the laws can still be on the books, but with no enforcement mechanism at all, they don't mean much of anything. At that point, I can see the US deciding to allow various states to more or less go it on their own because there isn't any other option.

The United States is *going* to be completely broke at some point. I'd argue we already are, but the effects haven't had time to set in yet. It will happen. Once that occurs, the same thing that happened and happens to every government in history that is dead broke will happen to us. That government goes away and something else takes its place. Debt felled the Roman Empire. We're not immune to it.   ",ConsistentlyRight,e9dvvab,conservative
"I think we just prefer to keep kicking that can down the road, both sides. There’s really only two ways to fix it. Increase taxes or cut spending. Or both. And that means entitlements. Personally, I hope Trump guts entitlements in his second term.",HolsterOfNuts,e9djcon,conservative
"The deficit is less an issue than the over all debt load is vs GDP.  Under Obama we went from 67% debt to GPD to around 105% debt to GPD.  Massive increases mostly because Obama's economy didn't grow much while he spent like crazy in the first few years of his administration.  When GPD grows so do goverment revenues so as long as the ratio of debt to GDP isn't increasing, or even decreasing then the debt is less and less of an issue as long term revenue outpaces debt growth.

https://tradingeconomics.com/united-states/government-debt-to-gdp

With a divided congress it's not feasible to cut spending because the only way to get basic budgets through is to grease the wheels with pork.  Trump's plan for dealing with it was to keep interest rates low and grow the heck out the economy via regulator cuts and fixes to the trade system but the Federal reserve has decided to raise interest rates which is massively driving up the deficit just in interest payments.  Government revenue are way up but interest payments have gone up 5-10x.  Spending is a major problem, but dealing with the huge debt ratio from the Obama years along with the fed jacking interest rates is an even bigger one.

Finally the other big factor in the debt is entitlements.  This is a problem that's political suicide to touch.  Which means either that both parties need to come together to fix it (not going to happen) or we have to wait until a crisis to fix the issue.  Either way it's going to kicked down the road.

",StraightNewt,e9dkx21,conservative
"It is a touchy subject. But a wound that’s gotta come sooner or later. It’s a long term gratification kind of things. And I believe most people are short term thinkers. 

Neither side wants that because everyone involved will prolly never get voted for again. 

",Chapka69,e9djsee,conservative
Right now the most pressing battle is fighting back the socialist left. Once that battle is won then we can get back to trying to balance the budget. ,iwasthebeaver,e9djme7,conservative
"Conservative or republican?

Nothing is more conservative than a balanced budget. 

Republicans are all talk no action. They honestly couldn’t care less, as a party. Some conservative members do care though. ",IIWhiTeIIHaWkII,e9dngz0,conservative
"I definitely support it, as well as cutting entitlements across the board, but I think the problem is that nobody wants to run on that platform because they don't think they will win. When almost everyone on both sides has a pet entitlement, they're probably, unfortunately, right to think they can't win on that position.  

",LethiasWVR,e9dmx3w,conservative
"And the bullets are 40mm cannon rounds.  

We can cut the DoD down today to literally nothing - no military at all - and in a decade entitlement spending will have devoured that amount.  [Take a look](https://www.thebalance.com/current-u-s-federal-government-spending-3305763).  Social Security, Medicare, and Medicaid ALONE are $2.083 Trillion in the FY19 budget.  There's $656 Billion more that encompasses all other mandatory spending, which includes stuff like Food Stamps, Child Tax Credits, and Child Nutrition programs, unemployment benefits, ACA subsidies, plus retirement and disability programs for civil servants, the Coast Guard, and the military.  

Ok. So the DoD base budget plus OCO funding (and I'm being generous by not partitioning out OCO into sub-categories) is $686 Billion.  

Now, let's play some fun math.  $2.083 Trillion at 3% growth per annum, starting in 2020 and ending in 2029, produces $2.799 Trillion in 2029.  Subtracting $686 Billion from that, we wind up with $2.113 Trilion, which is still *MORE* than we started with.  

And there you go.  The cost savings from literally disbanding our entire military has been devoured in a decade by nothing more than inflation.  We can safely assume that entitlements will grow by more than the rate of inflation.  

We need serious change, but we're not going to get it.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9dlxg2,conservative
"Military spending is only about 15% of the yearly budget. It is only a portion of discretionary spending which in total is only 27% of the budget.

Mandatory entitlement spending is 66% of the federal budget. Social Security & Unemployment are 33% of the total and Medicare is 28% of the total.

https://www.nationalpriorities.org/analysis/2016/presidents-2017-budget-in-pictures/",ngoni,e9djsvx,conservative
Bingo.  And this isn't going to get any better with the rise of the Trump-aligned Republicans.,FelixFuckfurter,e9dmstk,conservative
"You have to consider the global bond market, We do not have to be the best only the safe option, it is all backup by nothing but the promise to make good on the debit at some point.  Sometime in the future another system might develop but right now, money and debt are the same thing.   
",ozric101,e9dmnkj,conservative
"> Personally, I hope Trump guts entitlements in his second term.

I see no chance of that.  He's a populist, not a conservative.",FelixFuckfurter,e9dmucn,conservative
"But the economy crashed drastically as soon as Obama took office.

It's pretty standard economics to spend when you're down and save when you're doing well. 

It's hard to save when the economy is down, even if you don't try to stimulate the economy, because government revenue is down too. ",asdfman123,e9donf6,conservative
"I wish.  We had control for 2 years and did nothing about immigration, (neither did the dems when they had control) or cutting spending. ",BrockLee76,e9dk8zf,conservative
"Lots of young people want things like universal healthcare and other forms of income redistribution. You can't just fight it off and be done with it. Those people are still going to remain and want that.

If anything, there's going to be more liberal opposition with the house flipping, and if the Trump investigations don't play out well there's going to be an even bigger backlash against them. It's going to be harder, not easier than it was the last two years. It doesn't get much easier for Republicans than full control of the executive and legislative branches. ",asdfman123,e9dorm8,conservative
I don't understand how you're using inflation here. Shouldn't you be making all comparisons in inflation adjusted terms? ,asdfman123,e9doehx,conservative
There just examples I used.  Replace it with which ever popular program you want.  The point is nobody wants to cut because it would cause a lot of back lash.  Cut X and you lose interest group Y.,XMAGA_1776X,e9dkb2e,conservative
"Fair point. Wishful thinking. Then again, if he was that much of a populist, he’d legalize marijuana.",HolsterOfNuts,e9dncur,conservative
">But the economy crashed drastically as soon as Obama took office.

Yes, and instead allowing companies to discharge their debts and go under Obama instituted a Japanese style lost decade with bailouts on a massive scale and zero percent interest rates.  Which kept the US economy growing at tiny amounts and blew up the debt to GPD ratio with tons of spending.  This sort of thing was already tried in Japan and all it resulted in was super high CEO salaries and almost no economic growth while regular people got poorer.  Obama repeated their mistakes and we're saddled with a huge debt ratio because of it.

",StraightNewt,e9dq033,conservative
And they will not do anything this time either...  That is why the WALL is the best option out there. ,ozric101,e9dmr5e,conservative
"The Republicans didn't have ""Full control"" of the legislature though because of the Filibuster. ",iwasthebeaver,e9dp20w,conservative
"I figured I should have clarified that.  I'm freezing the DoD budget as static, not inflation adjusted.  There is no point in inflation adjusting it because it's not being spent anymore.  

Edit: you can't -3% the budget to death because it would take centuries.  By 2234 it would drop (inflation-adjusted) below $1B, but by that point entitlements would be slightly over $1,000,000 Trillion per annum in 2234 dollars.  Soo...",Colonize_The_Moon,e9drnpb,conservative
"I think the point is to say that even if we agree that the military could be leaner and more efficient, at least it's part of the federal government's actual job. Over half the budget is stuff that shouldn't be federal level stuff.",aboardthegravyboat,e9dlxdh,conservative
"The US actually made money on our bailouts, though. 
",asdfman123,e9dqeqc,conservative
That's just semantics. It's still only going to get harder for them. ,asdfman123,e9dpdb5,conservative
"I'm still having a hard time following. It makes the most sense to subtract away inflation when making monetary comparisons across the years, and I don't see how the inflationary growth of one year of one category of spending is relevant. ",asdfman123,e9dryjp,conservative
"If they did, why didn't the debt go down?",StraightNewt,e9dqwq4,conservative
"Its not just semantics, its a fact, but you are correct with the democrats in control of the house things will be much more difficult because they are going to be running bullshit investigation after bullshit investigation and leaking to the media along the way. The next 2 years are going to be absolute gridlock. ",iwasthebeaver,e9dpkqy,conservative
"It wasn't due to the bailouts. Here's a good article on it:

https://www.thebalance.com/national-debt-under-obama-3306293",asdfman123,e9drpz0,conservative
That’s good to hear. ,Enzo_SAWFT,e9cqxax,conservative
"She needs to retire and I despise her politics but I do hope she comes through okay. Hopefully this will be a wake up call for her. 

But I'm not going to sit around and wish ill will on an old lady.",brogarn,e9culd4,conservative
"Broken ribs hurt, especially as you get older. She's braver than some; except I have this horrible feeling she'll have to deal with FedEx boxes full of donated ribs and organs from all the celebrities donating theirs. The doorway to her office would piled high from all the offers I'd read.
(I'd be mortified if people online were offering their still in-use body parts to me. It would make me feel worse off than what I was.)",Upnsmoque,e9dgsp6,conservative
I hope she's working on a retirement letter. ,triggernaut,e9csq8x,conservative
I bet. ,StillANNONin,e9cr7lm,conservative
She acts irresposibly clinging to her seat with physical issues like that. It's time to spend more time with the family. But then again she loves her job & probably has clerks doing most of it. Wishing her well.,ReaganTroll,e9cv18b,conservative
Maybe because I think for myself and don’t use beauty magazines as voting guides.,jina100,e9d2y3v,conservative
"Seeing How the far left is fine with importing Islam, I would say voting republican is in their best interests. ",ozric101,e9d2q7y,conservative
Abortion isn't the be-all end-all for every woman.,MadLordPunt,e9d5zv3,conservative
"“Why don’t these women do exactly what I want them to do, don’t they know I know what’s best for them better than they do?”",hello_japan,e9d8jq6,conservative
"I see this as no different than people who call someone a ""traitor to their race."" ",svengalus,e9dct6z,conservative
"Kinda patriarchal, assuming you know all women and what's in their best interests.

Keep on proving you are absolutely tone-deaf, leftists.

",expendable_Henchman,e9dcmoh,conservative
"In fact, some women are *gasp* pro-life.",justhere2havefun,e9d8rbc,conservative
"'This other one deserves to be...


killed.'",paulbrook,e9gp4oh,conservative
"Chanting “Tucker Carlson we will fight, we know where you sleep at night” on his front lawn with a bullhorn is just peaceful protest. Not mob behavior, obviously.",mattyice18,e9bbugx,conservative
"My wife knows where the shotgun is, the location of the ammo, how to load and charge the weapon, and how to discharge it at the intended target.  Like myself, the wife is also aware of the extreme circumstances that need to be present, and provable in a court of law, that would justify that magnitude of self-defense.  A mob of mask wearing psychopaths breaking down the front door, **and gaining entry**, is absolutely one of those justifiable moments.

",Jizzlobber42,e9b2bx1,conservative
Breaking down the front door gives reason to shoot back.  ,CreativeRoutine,e9b4tlz,conservative
"Maxime Waters wanted this. This is going to escalate until they break down the wrong door and catch a 9mm round to the chest. 

...And then the media will vilify the guy defending his home. ",LumpyWumpus,e9b0w0n,conservative
"If they actually entered his home and harmed his family, I bet CNN would try to blame Trump for it.",mikecx79,e9b2fku,conservative
"Just had multiple ""conversations"" with lefties in r/politics and r/news.  They are mostly ok with this because they think Tucker is a racist.  Troubling times indeed.",socalpro,e9bemg6,conservative
This is a mob...a product of the democrat party.,J0kerr,e9b55s6,conservative
This is one of the reasons we have firearms.,KryptoPower77,e9bstt6,conservative
WeRe nOT a MoB. People who downplay ANTIFA are the worst ,thereisasuperee,e9bdamk,conservative
"*mob literally breaks down Tucks door*:
""hahahahahahahaha""

* A psycho simply threatens a CNN anchor*:
Reeeee kill all Republicans now!",coolrulez555,e9bkrza,conservative
This should be talked about way more than Acosta.,callthereaper64,e9bgy0y,conservative
"She should've taken Joe Biden's advice: Fire two blasts, outside the house.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uv66RiFC4T0
",synn89,e9bi1pn,conservative
Damn. There are seven hundred and sixty two reasons to stay the fuck away from my door. ,AmericanYidGunner,e9b8dak,conservative
This is so unacceptable.  Where are the police?  What is wrong with these people?,Falkamper,e9bqpb5,conservative
Jobs not mobs,SuperFunMonkey,e9bdjal,conservative
These commie purple haired freaks are going to mess with the wrong person and get speed holes punched in them eventually. They're lucky Tucker's wife wasn't waiting behind the front door with a rifle or shotgun in case one of those gender studies majors actually got into the house.,MrSparkle86,e9batou,conservative
Grab a gun and wait for them to come inside. ,M0L0N_LABE,e9bap28,conservative
Is this real?,callthereaper64,e9b9ltn,conservative
"When will people realize, the time for peaceful protest and deliberation is soon coming to an end. Nations are founded through the fall of older nations...it's cyclical if you will. I don't suggest conservatives resort to violence, but we ought to be prepared because it will eventually find us...and if the fight is brought to us we should stand united against the ultimate goal of the west, to destroy the founding concepts/principles this country was built on. Conservatives should wait patiently, but eventually you won't be able to sit on the sidelines, as not acting is to act and to choose a side. Eventually this will boil over and it will have to solved physically.",annonymous93,e9ba2as,conservative
Time to start shooting mf'ers,Pockaden,e9bai6o,conservative
"Wow... this is screwed up

“They weren’t protesting anything specific that I had said. They weren’t asking me to change anything. They weren’t protesting a policy or advocating for legislation. … They were threatening me and my family and telling me to leave my own neighborhood in the city that I grew up in.”",linklitter,e9bdtyk,conservative
Animals,BombadMus1im,e9bpwr4,conservative
"I'm taking a gander that this would be the incident that would allow DOJ and Trump to label Antifa as a domestic terrorist organization, and start investigations to find anyone and everyone who is linked and has donated to them and have them investigated as well. Lets see how the Dems like it when they're on the wrong end of a criminal investigation. ",CN9YLW,e9c6bqp,conservative
"It used to be outlandish to think that another shooting level civil war would happen in America again, but I'm really starting to believe it's coming. Soon. ",DXGypsy,e9cf23i,conservative
"The way things are going, our beautiful country's going to be in a dark place soon.  These weak-minded useful idiots don't understand what their political party's getting them into, and I almost pity them for it.",Orbtecc,e9bnvnp,conservative
[deleted],,e9bh4td,conservative
[removed],,e9azgwo,conservative
"I would have been unloading at the point they broke the door down.  Unloading and reloading.  Wash, Rinse, Repeat.
",tehForce,e9bx2dk,conservative
"Seems like most of Reddit news and political subs are silencing this story which is unsurprising. I’m glad it’s still somewhat trending on Twitter. I understand protesting, that’s fine, but this is completely illegal. Liberal MSM refusing to talk about it is setting a dangerous precedent that this nonsense is okay. ",WannabeBadGalRiri,e9bnic7,conservative
She needs to be well armed in the future. Nothing says safety like a 12 gauge.,StephenScherer1,e9blts2,conservative
This is horrible. Why didn't the police show up?,daviipup,e9c2vo2,conservative
"I'd imagine tucker's wife to be the kind of gal that keeps a revolver on her, not the hide in the closet type.",mkov88,e9cdhpx,conservative
So have these fools been arrested yet?,RobotXander,e9coluy,conservative
What COWARDLY Behavior. ,StephenScherer1,e9bmreg,conservative
"I have several times considered putting together an AR for home defense, but my pistol always seemed sufficient.

Thank you, Antifa, for giving me the clearest reason yet for needing a much higher mag capacity for home defense.",haplogreenleaf,e9b7dox,conservative
In Texas just being on your property dressed like that and being threatening is enough.,SeismicOne,e9bopwj,conservative
"So she shouldn't just go on the back porch and unload a couple of shells in the air?
",tehForce,e9bx5kf,conservative
AR15 is better for home defense contrary to what people say.,M6D_Magnum,e9bxugz,conservative
Can't beat a good shotgun for home defense.,pacifist228,e9bbc8n,conservative
Came here to say exactly this. Good shotgun fixes everything,Nemesis651,e9bklla,conservative
This is exactly what Leftists want.,8K12,e9b9wm6,conservative
"This already happens any time there's a self defense shooting. Just go to local media in Dallas, Memphis, or Atlanta, or any other major city. In one recent story, an elderly man was villified by the media for shooting a black man who broke down his door and had a weapon.",dicaparly,e9bni9u,conservative
"I have always said that the left aren't interested in civility because the can ramp up the violent rhetoric and use an event, like having a poor activist getting shot, to their advantage and plan for another Anti Gun rally in DC. Win - Win for the Dems.",Buit,e9baoe7,conservative
"I said it elsewhere in this thread.  I would've unloaded and reloaded.  Wash, rinse, and repeat ",tehForce,e9ccomn,conservative
I look forward to the day they come to all of our doors and are surprised when they are euthanized for threatening our families.,deepfeels96,e9cfyr5,conservative
Piggybacking to ask: Did Tucker address this on his show tonight? I wasn’t able to watch. ,GetAGoddamnBeagle,e9c6t8a,conservative
That's like betting the sun is going to rise tomorrow. You're not gonna get any takers.,ValidMakesnake,e9b8fva,conservative
"""You made them do this! """,mexicanmuscel,e9bary1,conservative
"Nah, they'd talk about it for like half a day, the main figures on the station would condem it, they would have guests on that go ""meh, maybe it deserved"" then move on to talk about Trump's attack on the press. ",Glochidiate,e9cncrx,conservative
"I could not find this story on /r/news. But of course the top post of /r/news is of some guy threatening a CNN anchor. You really can't make this stuff up. This may be the most bias major website on the internet.

EDIT: The story appears to be posted now and people are on Tucker's side. Faith in /r/news is minutely restored.",sau1_g0odman,e9bj3az,conservative
"Yes, the new lynch mobs will grow.  It is only a matter of time before the new Democratic leadership endorses them.  I think they will wear brown shirts, the color of the earth they will protect.  conservatives will need to wear some kind of insignia so they can be identified.  Consetvatives have ruined this country and economy.  Conservatives are the cause of misery, lock em up.  /s   with what you know is a bit of truth.",Conservativeone,e9c7tqt,conservative
Theyre in DC they would have arrested her for even thinking of using a shotgun.,War-Damn-America,e9bj1xe,conservative
"Or his other advice, and fire one through the front door.",mlmack,e9blcqx,conservative
"Sadly, only five hundred and fifty six to stay away from mine.",rf-engineer,e9bc5cc,conservative
"I've only got nine, and they're all hollow. ",Jerseydevil556,e9bl5qi,conservative
Multiply that number by 39 or 51,sau1_g0odman,e9bhzp1,conservative
"Don’t be silly the Carlson’s live in DC, where even thinking of uttering the phrase firearm will get you arrested. ",War-Damn-America,e9bj8h0,conservative
"Yeah, but when they get shot up, they're going to say they're the victims, and that they did no wrong.",ModeratorsAreDouches,e9c2t09,conservative
I live in Ohio. I don't *have* to wait for them to break through the door.,unibuckeye,e9blx9j,conservative
"Yes, this is real.  This is the current state of American politics, where violent Leftist mobs besiege terrified women in their homes because their husbands committed thoughtcrime.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bgcz7,conservative
http://i.magaimg.net/img/1jb.jpg,PrawnsAreOk,e9bavcf,conservative
"Fuck waiting patiently. That's gotten us from a free country to a socialist/capitalist/bureaucratic corporatist muddle, trending toward socialism. We need to push this country back toward liberty as fast as possible, using any and all methods that are justifiable and will be most effective in the long run.",LibertyTerp,e9bbx4r,conservative
I think the modern left is a conspiracy to make Trump look good.,rAlexanderAcosta,e9bngxm,conservative
"> Carlson, host of ""Tucker Carlson Tonight,"" was not home at the time. He said his wife, Susie, was home alone and heard the commotion from the kitchen. She called the police and locked herself into a pantry, he said. His brother -- who lives close by -- arrived about the same time as law enforcement.

> The host said activists rang his doorbell, broke his oak door and one protester was apparently caught on security video mentioning a pipe bomb.

Directly from the Fox news report, maybe if you actually read the article you would know that.

https://www.foxnews.com/politics/mob-chants-threats-outside-tucker-carlsons-dc-home",Havebaconwilltravel,e9azzze,conservative
"They did. Apparently they didn't detain anyone. Not sure if that means Antifa scattered like roaches when they showed up, or if they just... didn't detain anyone. :/",trustymutsi,e9carly,conservative
"""Nobody needs more than 10 rounds.""",ValidMakesnake,e9b8dsk,conservative
"Shotgun > [musket > handgun > cannon loaded with grape shot > bayonet](https://i.imgur.com/efCkOd4.jpg) > all else 

for home defense",OnionLamp,e9bdnfs,conservative
AR pistols are fun to build ,gtrdundave2,e9bu56w,conservative
Still the most frightening sound on the planet is the sound of the slide going back on a 12 gauge pump shotgun. (The bad guy knows you can't miss.),StephenScherer1,e9bmpcq,conservative
"AR is unwieldy and super fucking loud. Better would a “pistol-rifle”, essentially a miniature rifle chambered in pistol ammos. Quieter and easier to wield indoors with better accuracy and control than a handgun. ",trelium06,e9b8df9,conservative
"~~Honestly an AR isn't great for home defense in my opinion if you're considering it for indoor use.  You want a shotgun for that, in large part because 5.56 is going to over-penetrate and you don't want to kill your neighbor by accident.  Now, if you're able to hold a perimeter at or beyond your front door, then an AR is better (as I see it) because you can engage threats at a distance.  But in a case like this, with people literally slamming their bodies against the door... I'd stick with a shotgun.~~

~~Edit - this is my opinion, not the word of God. Please stop downvoting just because you disagree.~~

Edit #2: 5.56 has the penetrating power of a spitball, slightly damp tissue paper will cause the round to fragment.  Please use it for all your home defense needs.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bg3m0,conservative
"An AR will most assuredly deafen you AND any shots you miss will penetrate pretty much anything they come into contact with. You could easily kill your next door neighbor from inside of your house. 


AR is not a close range reason. Pistols are best with shotguns being second best. ",Bears_Bearing_Arms,e9brlbj,conservative
"> In Texas just being on your property dressed like that and being threatening is enough

...and I envy your laws surround the topic of ""Stand your Ground""; in WA State you pretty much need your back against the wall, at the end of a hallway, with the assailant(s) having entered and advanced on you giving you ""no other option"" before using deadly force.  Other instances can be won in court of course, but you need to be able to prove that you feared for your life, or that of your family.  

The commies in Seattle are making it harder and harder to responsibly own, operate, and defend yourself with a firearm every chance they get.  As of now, a .22 semi-auto rimfire plinking rifle is now considered an ""Assault Rifle""...... morons.  

Link; https://ballotpedia.org/Washington_Initiative_1639,_Changes_to_Gun_Ownership_and_Purchase_Requirements_Measure_(2018)",Jizzlobber42,e9bpjl1,conservative
">Can't beat a good shotgun for home defense.

I would disagree.

Shotguns have a very limited round capacity compared to any conventional handgun or semi-automatic rifle. They are extremely slow to chamber the next round unless it's a semi-auto shotgun. They are much longer than a handgun, which makes navigating the confined quarters of a house more difficult. They also have a more difficult to control recoil.

The supposed pros of a shotgun are round spread, which at the range inside of a house are too small to be considered a pro (the size of an orange or smaller), and greater stopping power, which if home invader can easily take a .45 JHP, stopping power isn't the the issue, the issue is why superman is breaking into your house.",PrawnsAreOk,e9bcewp,conservative
"> Can't beat a good shotgun for home defense.

I agree; 00-Buck and in a hallway and you can be a terrible shot and still hit what's coming at you.  My pistol is more accessible to me, and various other semi-auto rifles at my disposal are more comfortable to shoot, and accurate, but pistol ammo (mine is .40) and rifle ammo (mine being 7.62x39 and .308) has the tendency to punch through their targets, the wall behind, the wall behind *that*, and possibly into my neighbors house.",Jizzlobber42,e9bgb9w,conservative
"This is what Hamas does. During the summer in the big border clashes Hamas told their followers to charge towards the fence saying it had been breached, while knowing it had not. Sacrifices for the cause.",MajorLads,e9c5ssj,conservative
"I think we’re terribly close to civil war. But I don’t know of a better solution. Leftism is going to take over and the socialism talks needs to be curbed. Importing shit tier people needs to end. Maybe we just secede, people will obviously have to move or stay In the country they don’t agree with. 

America going into civil war tho would cause a global crisis. ",,e9cuqku,conservative
"This group represents the left in the way that Cesar sayoc represents the right; its the crazy violent radical branch that doesn’t represent the majority. 

Demonizing swaths of people doesn’t help anyone. ",xpis2,e9bhil0,conservative
I mean don’t you think saying “All Leftists want vilification of gun owners and police officers” is as bad as the left saying “All Conservatives want black people dead”?,MADBARZ,e9br1lr,conservative
He called in from a planned vacation.,ngoni,e9cbr81,conservative
"""WHEN WILL YOU TONE DOWN YOUR RHETORIC, YOU ORANGE NAZI?!",unibuckeye,e9bls40,conservative
"Nah, Twitter and Tumblr are still around",dicaparly,e9bnsi4,conservative
I think Tucker needs to play that several times in his next show.,rf-engineer,e9c025r,conservative
"That's plenty, friend. ",AmericanYidGunner,e9bch6n,conservative
"I only have nine, thanks to the gun laws in my country. 

But even that's enough, if you have good arguments and better aim.",SCPendolino,e9bgb9c,conservative
"Three hundred fifty seven in my case, and fear of coddled suburban wannabes isn't one of them.

I'm really waiting to see what happens when one of these kids meets with *real* violence.  I expect crying and lawsuits from his parents. ",LonelyMachines,e9bftlc,conservative
"Buddy, 22 would work just fine. You're shooting antifa, if you can hit those skinny fuxkers they'll just about snap in half regardless of what you hit them with.",Saxtonhine,e9ca5ux,conservative
"Wait, what? I thought Ohio had the same rules as TN for home defense.",dicaparly,e9bo06e,conservative
Yeah heard Ben report on this.  This is said that the main stream cares more about Acostas ego then this.  Chanting we know where you sleep fucking irks me so bad.,callthereaper64,e9bgntg,conservative
"Just saying, timing is important",annonymous93,e9bca5q,conservative
Don't bother. He's a ChapoTrapTard.,PrawnsAreOk,e9b09pl,conservative
"Gavin Newsom says I only need 10 here in Cali  (but, shhhhh, I load 10+1, Jokes on him)  ",Goblicon,e9bl11l,conservative
That’s because for a leftist his wife and daughter getting raped by a train of guys is Friday night.,TomahawkSuppository,e9bi4rx,conservative
That's heresy in the Imperium. Bayonets always come first. ,The_Mighty_Rex,e9bidtx,conservative
"Tally ho, lads.",rf-engineer,e9bhvue,conservative
"Fun fact (legend): Cassius Clay (the man Ali was originally named for) ran an abolitionist newspaper in Lexington KY. One day, an anti-abolitionist mob attacked his home (or possibly newspaper office) and according to legend, he fired a swivel gun from the top of his stairs into the mob to drive them off. Likely bogus story, but he did have at least 2 small cannons at his house and newspaper office.",piper06w,e9bxgy6,conservative
Have you ever fired a shotgun? The spread of the shot is quite tight at close range. It is very easy to miss your target. You need to aim. ,machinerer,e9caplo,conservative
">Still the most frightening sound on the planet is the sound of the slide going back on a 12 gauge pump shotgun. (The bad guy knows you can't miss.)

Unless he doesn't hear it, doesn't care, you short stroke, or you do miss...",richardguy,e9bp8dl,conservative
"Pistol Caliber Carbines are good for that purpose, but it is so much cheaper to build an AR, just make it a pistol AR, give it a 10 inch barrel and a blade brace. ",austin123457,e9b9apq,conservative
"The loudness is Fudd-Lore. Basically, all gunshots are going to be in the 150-decibel range, except for a .22LR rifle, which is around 130 decibels. Pretty much anything at or above 140 decibels can cause immediate hearing damage.

The rest is just conjecture and personal opinion.",haplogreenleaf,e9bam8z,conservative
Pistol rounds over penetrate while 5.56 doesn’t ,bilbobimbopoophead,e9bkprw,conservative
AR is much shorter than the average shotgun and not as loud as you might think. ,richardguy,e9bp9ii,conservative
"Just get a suppressor, then. If you're gonna rely on a gun for home defense you might as well shell out for the perfect PDW. A short-barreled suppressed AR (pistol or rifle configuration) is pretty much the perfect home defense weapon. ",Maswasnos,e9bqlzp,conservative
So a Hi-Point 995TS 9mm carbine. $250.,KingOfTheP4s,e9caqim,conservative
">  5.56 is going to over-penetrate

5.56 starts tumbling after going through as little as drywall. 9mm has been know to penetrate more.",JMB_was_a_god,e9bhpww,conservative
"> 5.56 is going to over-penetrate

It really doesn't. The 55gr bullet fragments fairly quickly and imparts it energy quickly. It'll destroy what it hits really well, and will penetrate a thin initial barrier well due to speed(ballistic vest, car door) but not house walls.",synn89,e9bid6c,conservative
This is false ,bilbobimbopoophead,e9bkmcj,conservative
You are wrong...please do some ballistics research.,Goblicon,e9bl7pr,conservative
A shotgun loaded with any kind of home defense buckshot is going to penetrate way more than a 5.56 round. ,Maswasnos,e9bqxew,conservative
"A good 12 gauge with buck shot (or a slug) should suffice. A pump action is great. If you have a single shot, practice loading and unloading.",unibuckeye,e9blmz6,conservative
"Not a matter of opinion really. This has been tested multiple times. 5.56 is definitely a fast moving round but not an “over-penetrating” one. Shotgun, in anything larger than say birdshot, will vastly out penetrate pretty much all AR rounds. ",DV8EDD,e9byvpl,conservative
"> An AR will most assuredly deafen you AND any shots you miss will penetrate pretty much anything they come into contact with. You could easily kill your next door neighbor from inside of your house. 

this is simply not true. 5.56 will tumble and fragment going through just one barrier. ",JMB_was_a_god,e9bu6dc,conservative
"Sorry but you’re just wrong. Pistol calibers are typically large and slow moving compared to 5.56. 5.56 is small and moves fast, so it burns off kinetic energy quicker. 

There’s a reason 5.56 isn’t good for hunting large animals. It doesn’t cause a lot of damage or go through obstacles well. There’s a reason I use a 45-70 for hunting. It moves very slow but has a very large bullet, so it punches through anything it hits and doesn’t stop. It’s like your car getting hit by a rock going 60 mph vs a train hitting your car going 30.

Also, if you shoot a gun indoors it’s going to deafen you no matter what you shoot.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9bu6ek,conservative
"Yep. In Texas you can use lethal force to protect yourself, someone else, and your property. If they are on your property trying to steal crap you can shoot.",SeismicOne,e9bqv97,conservative
"> the issue is why superman is breaking into your house

That only happens in 0.02% of home invasion scenarios.

Another point on shotguns (and yours are excellent) is that it takes two hands to work the action.

A pump shotgun *can* be good for home defense, but there are more practical options. ",LonelyMachines,e9bfnsr,conservative
Sawed off saiga for the win. ,trump-train-bitches,e9bcp4p,conservative
"I'd disagree with you. A shotgun has statistically more stopping power than any handgun, by far. Is easier to land shots with than a pistol, because it's a long gun. And with a pump action you can leave it loaded without a round in the chamber very safely.

I'd argue it's a simpler weapon to operate than a semi-auto too.",synn89,e9bisee,conservative
00 Buck is going to waaaaaaay penetrate.,Goblicon,e9blfq9,conservative
"I would agree with you if it weren't for political, cultural, and Civic leaders on the left calling for escalation of violence and using their influence to encourage this kind of behavior. Contrast that to every conservative leader and commentator that disavowed Sayoc before we even knew who he was, and consistently denounce all violence except self-defense.",dicaparly,e9bno1g,conservative
"I hear this argument a lot but it's simply untrue. We don't have multiple leaders on the right calling for this action, the left does. That isn't a small group of radicals that's the people trying to lead the party. It's not on the same level at all.",The_Mighty_Rex,e9biacx,conservative
"I think the problem is the politics of hate, parties know toxic rhetoric works so they do not denounce it, and this inspires deranged people. Most democratic voters are not extreme like antifa, but they do not adequately denounce them.  Antifa is often presented as a force that fights fascists by the democrats, while they do not want report the reality of arbitrary violence and intimidation. Throughout history flirting with extremist fringes to try to bolster support never goes well. ",MajorLads,e9c6tu3,conservative
"No.  He sent bombs that weren't going to detonate.  These people are deliberately inciting mass violence and publishing addresses so someone will kill a person on the list.

",chabanais,e9c2qa0,conservative
"Maybe, but that isn't what he said.",rf-engineer,e9bzia5,conservative
No way is that a comparison. What are you smokin?,8K12,e9c64s3,conservative
That's 900 reasons in a different measurement.,Moonthrower,e9cpoeu,conservative
And don't forget the media reaction. I just hope I can move back out to the farm before things really get bad  because my home has 1100 + 50 + 2 people that won't hesitate to use them. We just *really* prefer using ours at the range,dicaparly,e9bnxzm,conservative
In Ohio I can use deadly force on *any* part of my property if I feel threatened. The presumption of innocence is on me.,unibuckeye,e9bp0bm,conservative
"It more than irks me, it worries me.  I'm not Tucker Carlson, I'm (hopefully) never going to have even a fraction of the national recognition / hatred that he enjoys, but when you take a step back and look at this through a non-partisan lens, it's political violence.  The same sort of thing - violent rhetoric turning into violence - was seen [during the collapse of the Roman Republic](https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/lessons-decline-democracy-from-ruined-roman-republic-180970711/).  Consider that we've been teetering for over half a century now on the edge of domestic collapse.  The 1960s and 1970s saw massive riots, high racial tensions, and a heavily divided populace.  The 1980s and 1990s were a time of relative prosperity and foreign policy victories (the USSR fell, the Gulf War was won, the economy was in a massive seemingly endless bull market, etc).  The 2000s and 2010s have seen a growing swell of violent rhetoric, mob violence, and both foreign policy (9/11, Afghanistan, Iraq, etc) and economic uncertainty (2000 crash, 2008 crash, and the inevitable upcoming bear market).  We haven't reached the lows that the 60s and 70s plumbed, but we appear to be well on our way there. 

Our Republic is dying.  I won't predict when it will die or what will replace it, but it is terminally ill.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bi57m,conservative
"Fair enough, not pissed about your post, just adding emphasis. We have to take the initiative. Don't just play defense. Spend most of our time on offense.",LibertyTerp,e9beo2p,conservative
Was more for the people that would see his/her post than really arguing with him/her. ,Havebaconwilltravel,e9b11wx,conservative
Never forget the one in the chamber.......,unibuckeye,e9blhso,conservative
Damn...that escalated quickly.,Goblicon,e9bkzdh,conservative
Where does my trebuchet fit in?,unibuckeye,e9bljhp,conservative
"Silly followers of the corpse emperor, everyone knows that noise based weaponry is superior!",samurguy990,e9brd50,conservative
"Fuck no! Power first, feet, and power bat's come first! Haven't you met the angry marines? Ranged weapons don't exist! ",JakeSaint,e9bwk5v,conservative
"You mean Cassius Marcellus Clay, the great Bowie knife fighter? They say an anti-abolitionist assassin once jumped forward and tried to shoot him, but missed. Clay leapt forward with his knife and took one of his eyes, one of his ears, and had split his skull with it before the horrified crowd pulled him off his would-be killer. Modern historians believe Clay was just angry at what a massive pussy the shooter was and had been trying to whittle a second, leaner, better opponent out of the original. 

And by 'historians' I mean myself, when drinking, as I currently am. ",TheTrumpsOfDoom,e9c3jz1,conservative
"I have several shotguns. A short barrel is for home defense not hunting. At 15 feet the pattern is a foot across using #6 shot. You don't want to risk injury to family or neighbors and #6 shot will not go through walls but will give you that spread out pattern. I'm sorry to burst your bubble but within an INVASION setting there is NO time to aim. You point as you would with your finger and immediately fire. Go find an old Viet Nam Vet, he will have mastered ""quick kill"". Those Viet Nam Vets who did not use quick kill came home in boxes.",StephenScherer1,e9cxut6,conservative
"If he doesn't hear the slide go back; he will still see the flash and hear a big BOOM. Lots of pellets going his way, he will get hit. Then, he has a second chance to hear the slide go back, see the flash and hear a big BOOM ------ AGAIN! --AGAIN! -- AGAIN! -- AGAIN! (You can trust me, I'm a Vet; it's Scary Scary!)",StephenScherer1,e9by1su,conservative
Did not know about prices ouch,trelium06,e9bp7nv,conservative
"Yeah you’re not going to be able to hear much difference between a pistol and a rifle going off directly by your head, without any ears it’ll be loud as fuck either way",kowbrandt,e9bicf5,conservative
"Unless you run subsonic ammo, and let's be real... For home defense you really don't need supersonic ammo. ",JakeSaint,e9bxi99,conservative
"This is accurate, and I’d further add that space and distance to impact could make an difference as well. ",DV8EDD,e9byll2,conservative
You can build an AR with a 7.5in barrell,gtrdundave2,e9bu6lz,conservative
"Accurate, same for heavier shotgun shell types.",DV8EDD,e9byoxe,conservative
"Well, I hope you're right.  I've personally seen 55gr 5.56 fired at 100 yds go through two boards (pallet propped on its side w/ target stapled to it) without any fragmentation or keyholing.  I could very easily see a round punching through drywall and remaining relatively intact with enough kinetic energy to go through somebody's window or maybe even another drywall.  Cinderblocks would probably stop it (e.g. might go through one side but the round will almost certainly fragment and be stopped before it penetrates the other side), and if you shot through bricks or thicker walls (e.g. load-bearing interior wall) it'd be stopped as well.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9bkz74,conservative
"I have.  We aren't talking rounds fired at 100+ yards here, we're talking distances of 10-15 yards tops.  A 5.56 is going to have an awful lot of kinetic energy remaining if the only thing that it hits is drywall and insulation.  Even if it fragments en route, you've still got multiple high-velocity fragments that might go through a window, maaaaybe (probably not but I don't know for certain) drywall.  ",Colonize_The_Moon,e9blht6,conservative
"It’s shitty indoors specifically because it’s a long gun. Stand in a hallway holding a mossberg 500 and try and spin around 180 degrees to the other direction. Your shotgun will bang into the wall.

Also you can leave a round in the chamber in any gun and it’ll be safe. They don’t shoot themselves. Also, a gun for emergencies without a round in the chamber is just a lump of metal.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9bucd6,conservative
"I bought the ammo at the recommendation of the folks at the gun shop; the 00-Buck obliterates pumpkins or watermelons @ 20 feet, then still has enough force to punch through 1 layer of sheetrock (though spread out *a lot*) but looses almost all velocity after that",Jizzlobber42,e9bnqzg,conservative
Can you give some examples of the left leaders encouraging violence?,xpis2,e9bpb7m,conservative
"I wouldn't worry.  These are the participation trophy kids.  They're unaccustomed to the slightest verbal conflict, much less real violence.  When it comes to the real thing, they'll run.

Then they'll call the very police they claim to despise to come help them. ",LonelyMachines,e9bqjfu,conservative
I've said for years that we are Neo-Rome.,callthereaper64,e9bk6xx,conservative
The cancer of statism will always kill its host.  It never stops growing and eventually collapses under its own weight.   It is the inevitabile trajectory  of granting coercive power to one group of people over a society. ,podestaspassword,e9bl909,conservative
Did you just assume xir's gender??,FelixFuckfurter,e9b4kjh,conservative
You forgot ze one in ze chamba!,nsmith1003,e9c427g,conservative
All the way over on the Age Of Sigmar shelves because Bretonians arn't getting any love. ,XOXO_HandBanana_XOXO,e9cckgj,conservative
"\#6 duck shot? Good luck with that. Might want to switch to 00 Buck. Care to define ""short barrel""? Referring to your typical Remington 870 perhaps? 

Worrying about ""overpenetration"" is a red herring. Better to worry about surviving an attack, and stacking the deck in your favor. Damn near anything will go through drywall as it is. 

  
Also, ""quick kill""? Methinks somebody's been reading too much Tom Clancy.  
",machinerer,e9ekens,conservative
Go to bed grandpa,richardguy,e9byck0,conservative
"Eh, you can find a Ruger PCC for about 450.

I'd personally rather have an AR9 but the PCC is probably cheaper.",Nonethewiserer,e9bxm5q,conservative
300 blackout ftw,rf-engineer,e9bxlbc,conservative
"Well, drywall won't stop much of anything, sadly. In fact even common pistol calibers will easily go through an entire car, assuming they don't hit anything solid in between. Shotguns loaded with shot do perform better here.

It's just that an AR-15 isn't going to be much worse than a 9mm or 45, because handguns already penetrate a lot more than most people think.

",synn89,e9bojcp,conservative
Pallet wood is usually lower quality scrap wood anyway.,unibuckeye,e9blp2k,conservative
">does a heavy bullet traveling at low speed penetrate better than a very small one going very fast

Gee I wonder why people don't big game hunt or shoot through brush with 556.",richardguy,e9bop40,conservative
"The reason why you generally want a round in the chamber is because for most guns your normal firing pattern is to not put a round in a chamber and you'll repeat that under stress. Firing a Glock isn't ""round in chamber, pull trigger, round in chamber, pull trigger"" it's ""pull trigger, pull trigger, repeat"". You'll repeat that under stress. This is why safeties on guns are generally bad as well, btw. Your normal firing pattern on each shot isn't to turn off the safety, so you may not do that under stress. 

Lever/pump action don't suffer from this. The normal firing pattern is ""work action, work trigger, work action, work trigger"" so under stress you'll repeat that. Get a dud round? Guess what you'll do under stress? Work action(eject unspent round), pull trigger.

This type of action is also safer to keep around than normal semi-auto because it takes 2 actions to fire the gun, instead of just one. It makes it harder to have a ND, especially for newer users.
",synn89,e9bwle0,conservative
"Hillary Clinton- https://www.cnn.com/2018/10/09/politics/hillary-clinton-civility-congress-cnntv/index.html

Maxine Waters- https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2018/06/25/maxine_waters_god_is_on_our_side.html

Eric Holder- https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/2018/10/10/eric-holder-when-they-go-low-we-kick-them-thats-what-this-new-democratic-party-is-about/

Tim Kaine- https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/01/31/kaine_take_advantage_of_public_outcry_at_trump_to_get_outside_the_bubble.html

Loretta Lynch- http://nation.foxnews.com/2017/03/05/loretta-lynch-we-need-more-marching-blood-death-streets

I’m tired of looking, I’m sure you can find more.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9buzlh,conservative
Maxine Waters. Hillary Clinton. Eric Holder.,runs_in_the_jeans,e9butis,conservative
Tomb kings: oof ouch owie my bones,samurguy990,e9ddsxm,conservative
"Nice comments. I live in a condo in North Palm Beach, Florida. I like my neighbors they are really nice people. My son has 1 more quarter of FAU and occupies the Master Bedroom when he is here. When he isn't I am with my girlfriend. 
1.  00 Buck will go through walls #6 will not. I will NOT risk firing a shot that might harm my son or my neighbors. 
2.  #6 shot will NOT go through a wall but will cause MASSIVE damage to an intruder. There are 5 more #6 shells behind the first one. Hulk Hogan would die with the 3rd shot. Go to the range put a target out 15 feet and fire #6 shot.  Ooops, can you say bleed out?
3.  Home defense precludes using my Concealed Carry Glock 43 or my S&W 38 (my preference) - both go through walls. The AR 15 can go through lots of walls and ALL are unacceptable for HOME DEFENSE. I love my family and I would perish
rather than harm my neighbors. 
4.  I learned my Quick Kill Skills at Fort Gordon Georgia. We were all told that all 800 of us were going to Nam, it was the only reason for being at Fort  Gordon (the rectum of the South). Tom Clancy didn't enter into the picture. (but I really like his games)
5.  I believe my home defense shotgun has an 18""  barrel,  the shortest legally acceptible.
6.  I personally do not like guns. Most of the guns I have purchased are for my grandchildren who have NOT yet been born. History suggests that gun ownership will be very limited in the future. They will not be able to buy a gun to defend themselves. The restrictions will come we are only talking about WHEN. ",StephenScherer1,e9f99s8,conservative
"I had a talk with my guns. None of them are aware of any of their kind ever injuring any living creature. I am also in full agreement with them. However, I do know a number of humans whose overbearing force with guns caused injury. My suggestion is that you not F... with Grandpa and breaking into his home is a very low percentage approach which will surely result in citizens arrest, only if you are easily identified as age 12 or less, and otherwise may result in very serious injury if you are very very very lucky. 

Praise the Lord, pass the ammo and always remember that if your assailant does not bleed out before the police arrive - YOU ARE USING THE WRONG AMMO!",StephenScherer1,e9c60c8,conservative
I dig it,gtrdundave2,e9bxnof,conservative
Yeah no argument on AR vs handgun. ,Colonize_The_Moon,e9brvml,conservative
"Spartacus had some comments too, I thought.",rf-engineer,e9bzm56,conservative
"Oh look at that, he disappeared...",Moonthrower,e9cpkoy,conservative
"Man this has to be an ironic boomer bit or something

please tell me it is",richardguy,e9c67lr,conservative
Oh my shotgun has been known to murder pheasants. I hope that doesn’t make him a bad gun.,TannerPoonslayer,e9cx397,conservative
"I’m sure he did. 

Corey Booker is like a Jack O Lantern .

At first you see the face, but then there’s nothing inside.",tim_tebow_right_knee,e9c6din,conservative
Facts tend to do that to liberals. ,LumpyWumpus,e9cqc2o,conservative
"Highly educated Viet Nam Era Vet.  Nice call. Younger man, when you are 70 you will know or see what I already know. You have 2 generations (40 years) to return to your homeland. The American Experiment is a dismal failure. The American system, REPUBLIC, was designed for those who are genetically presupposed to desire to help others overcome adversity. That is spelled EUROPEAN Christian.  Spanish (SPAIN) or German or Polish the morals and values are the SAME. It is the WRONG system for Central/South Americanos and an outright insult to Muslims. Your parents gave away the AMERICAN Dream and replaced it with the Norte Americano Gringo Lottery with FREE housing FREE medical, FREE food stamps, etc. Their ignorance sealed your fate. You shall go somewhat quietly into the night and that is more than you deserve for giving away your conetree.

Not 40 but 35 years from now according to the 🇺🇸 California will be 50+% CHINESE (Average IQ 104 as oppoaed to theAverage Hispanic IQ of 85 to 90)
I and ANYONE who follows History expect that:

1.   The 104 Group will view the 85- 90 group as little more than WORKER BEES, totally expendible. ONLY Europeans have that innate GENETIC compulsion to help others and no desire to divide up earned assets so that the unproductive and greedy can have equality.
2.  Worker Bees not BREEDER Bees. The Chinese are shy many millions of women. The modest IQ Hispanic Honnies will help fill that gap. They will go to the soldiers first as is the Asian custom throughout all of recorded history. They will care for several Chinese soldiers at a time but be fixed so that they cannot breed.
3.  The 🇺🇸 government estimates that China will have a new modern Navy larger than ours. Learn to say ""Yes Sir"" in Mandarin.
4.  The 51% highly practical Chinese will prefer to rule California rather than listen to the patter of tiny 85 IQ minds and they will have little respect for the 100 IQ Gringos who foolishly gave away their conetree.
5.  Expect a repeat performance of the system that has worked so very well for thousands of years. First China sends their civilians in to live in the country. Second, when Chinese citizens become numerous and annoying/threatening China stations overwhelming military troops on the border claiming that they will protect those of Chinese decent from violence. Third, Chinese migration begins in earnest. 
6.  The Dalai Llama is the religious leader of Tibet and has a Palace in Tibet but he can't go to Tibet because he criticized China for taking over Tibet. He has an arrest warrant outstanding in Chinese controlled Tibet. Now read #5 above again.

This Vet Boomer lived his life under FREEDOM. You will not be that lucky.








",StephenScherer1,e9cwgml,conservative
Your shotgun is forgiven. ,StephenScherer1,e9czau6,conservative
">I’m sure he did. 
>
>Corey Booker is like a Jack O Lantern .
>
>At first you see the face, but then there’s nothing inside.

Not even a candle? You trying to make me feel sorry for him?",rf-engineer,e9c8cbi,conservative
I certainly hope conservatives aren’t going to sit back and watch several elections get stolen. Where’s Trump on this?,the-divine-comedy,e9bg2k2,conservative
Is this out of the ordinary?  What’s the usual procedure?,timbowen,e9bpphn,conservative
Dangerous. ,soxfan90,e9bh9v0,conservative
They do and they will this is your country now sit and accept it ha ha ha ha ha we win we had to cheat but we win now good luck in 2020 losers cuz we won't do it again we promise this time for realsies ,chulocolombian,e9cl4cb,conservative
"Don't worry, the GOP in Florida isn't that incompetent. It'll be fine.",SickofInternetProgs,e9c36b4,conservative
"For what it’s worth this was actually uncovered by Tim Canova who is a Democrat in Broward county who has tried to unseat Debbie Wasserman-Shultz twice now. He claims this is in clear violation of federal or state election laws, can’t remember which. ",Tau23481992,e9bxv02,conservative
Are you kidding? Dems do this all the time and get away with it.,the-divine-comedy,e9c3827,conservative
Good for him! ,StockSkys,e9cbg6v,conservative
I believe I might have finally found a Democrat I respect.,bmack083,e9coak2,conservative
They try in these counties but keep getting caught and slapped down by judges. The only time it works is when the Dems are screwing each other (criminals don't call the police on their own),SickofInternetProgs,e9c3vpg,conservative
Jailtime...,Bubbacat7,e9c5bna,conservative
Should we riot? /s,DBG1998,e9bzzgy,conservative
"We should go to Broward and bang on their doors! Oh wait, the left would say that's wrong to do...",xJownage,e9c3dnx,conservative
What's it going to take for that lady to get fired?,mlmack,e9dsltm,conservative
What deserves a civilian uprising: Trump winning a fair election or our government literally changing results against the will of the people? ,Natetendo83,e9c3r39,conservative
"Um I think we should make our voices heard if they try and pull BS, also they are doing it in Arizona and Wisconsin I have heard. If it is proven true that they are committing fraud then yes I think it would be time to rise up a tad. If they take away our votes, with manufactured ones, then we no longer live in a republic and they will continue to cheat. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9c7rmk,conservative
"Honestly, I'm getting closer to thinking that but not sarcastically. ",ConsistentlyRight,e9cfg4y,conservative
"Look where being the better guys has got us. They take advantage of our kindness, it's time to get tough, if the allegations are true. ",Havebaconwilltravel,e9c7umk,conservative
"""ORANGE MAN BAD!!!!!""",Moonthrower,e9cpv4l,conservative
"Confession: I added /s as an edit, with hesitancy. ",DBG1998,e9cg89u,conservative
"They threw tantrums, ran extreme left, and were rewarded with the House. Obviously the American people want us to dive into the crazy end of the pool with the Dems. ",YankeeBlues21,e9c8602,conservative
"Simple: just, like, pay for it.",gbimmer,e9cn9n0,conservative
"Maybe all the idiots in NYC that voted for her can contribute to getting her a DC apartment.  Oh I forgot, they voted for her so they could get free shit, not her.",optionhome,e9clylm,conservative
See if she can use one of Bernie's houses.,allnamesaretaken45,e9cmyrj,conservative
"And this dingbat wants to tell you how to run your life and control what you spend your money on and how your resources get allocated.

Vacuous doesn't even begin to describe the space between her ears.",DevonWeeks,e9cn3ts,conservative
Get a temporary job?  There's lots of seasonal work around the holidays. ,timbowen,e9df1iq,conservative
"Maybe even conservatives should consider chipping in to get her an apartment because she has important work to do.  Stuff like this ...
https://i.redd.it/lrvxs0aqzxw11.jpg",stancrouch,e9cxgze,conservative
"Yes! Let’s start that wealth redistribution now. 

Because we all know she can’t have a small one bed apartment. She needs the works to roll with her new commie friends ",Chapka69,e9cn27g,conservative
Occasional Cortex 😉,ChironInTheSky,e9cqlus,conservative
"> Get a temporary job? 

good idea.  She can go back to bartending and then steal the pool tip money like she did in her last job.",optionhome,e9dz6g4,conservative
"At this point, she could jockey for being on the House foreign relations committee to better our relationship with Antenna, and I would not be surprised at all. ",justhere2havefun,e9d2exw,conservative
Did... did she actually say that? I find it hard to believe that actually happened. Nobody is that incompetent. Right? Please tell me this is just a meme.,Cr8er,e9cxzna,conservative
This is just a meme.,putercom5,e9czwzh,conservative
"Good. Thanks. It's a good one, though.",Cr8er,e9d107g,conservative
It’s actually not a meme lol. He said that because you said “tell me this is a meme.”,etherealsmog,e9dm5rf,conservative
Oh... Oh no... That's not good. This woman is going to be a member of congress!,Cr8er,e9e1qte,conservative
[deleted],,e9hblly,conservative
"While I agree that she's a walking meme machine, I'm not happy that someone that lacks the critical thinking skills required to understand the functions of a television is going to be a lawmaker for our country. ",Cr8er,e9hfhjo,conservative
